All Contracts
Terms of Service
User Agreement
Terms of Use
Any Hire Terms
Escrow Instructions
Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions
Any Hire Escrow Instructions
Upwork Escrow Inc.
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
Freelancer Membership Agreement
Optional Service Contract Terms
Mark Use Guidelines
Upwork's Virtual Patent Marking
Proprietary Rights Infringement Reporting Procedures
Privacy Policy
Global Data Processing Agreement
Privacy Center
Cookie Policy
API Terms of Use
Upwork Pro Services Terms
'Upwork Team' Software License Agreement
Upwork Payroll Agreement
Upwork Digital Accessibility Statement
Nondiscrimination Statement
Master Subscription Agreement (Enterprise Standard)
Master Subscription Agreement (WPP)
Master Subscription Agreement (Compliance)
Independent Contractor Agreement Premium
Upwork Talent Scout User Agreement
Upwork Talent Scout User Agreement
WEWORK CLIENT ADDENDUM FOR UPWORK ENTERPRISE SERVICES
Starter Project Program Terms of Use for Clients and Freelancers
Team Builder Terms for Clients
Work Together Talent Grants Terms and Conditions
Jumpstarter Projects Program Terms of Use
Upwork Terms for Task Mate Beta
Electronic Delivery Consent of Internal Revenue Service (“IRS”) Tax Information Returns
Independent Contractor Agreement
Referral Program Terms & Conditions
Master Subscription Agreement (Enterprise Core)
Recruitment Services Terms
Dispute Terms Applicable to Service Contracts With Clients on Business Plus - Net30 Terms
Upwork Business Plus Addendum for Billing and Payment Terms (Net-30)
Effective April 30th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
The
Upwork Terms of Service
is comprised of the following agreements:
User Agreement
Terms of Use
Any Hire Terms
Escrow Instructions
Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions
Any Hire Escrow Instructions
Upwork Escrow Inc.
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
Freelancer Membership Policy
Optional Service Contract Terms
Upwork Mark Use Guidelines
Upwork's Virtual Patent Marking
Proprietary Rights Infringement Reporting Procedures
Privacy Policy
Global Data Processing Agreement
Cookie Policy
API Terms of Use
'Upwork Team' Software License Agreement
Upwork Payroll Agreement
Nondiscrimination Statement
Effective December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This is important:
This User Agreement (“
Agreement
”) contains important information about your legal rights, remedies, and obligations, and is a legally binding agreement between you (“
you
” or “
User
”) and Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
,” “
we
”, or “
us
”), Upwork Escrow Inc. (“
Upwork Escrow
”), and to the extent expressly stated, Elance Limited (“
Elance Ltd.
”), governing your use of Upwork’s
Site
and
Site Services
(collectively, “
Services
”).You understand that by using the Upwork Site or Site Services (which generally means using in any way our work marketplace Upwork.com or our applications), and by clicking accept when prompted on the Site, you agree to be bound by all agreements which constitute Upwork’s
Terms of Service
, and you agree that the “
Terms of Service
” means every agreement linked herein and includes the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
,
Privacy Policy
,
Terms of Use
, applicable
Escrow Instructions
and this User Agreement, including Section 14 which contains an arbitration agreement and class action waiver that applies to claims brought against Upwork in the United States. You have an opportunity to opt out of arbitration as provided in Section 14. This Agreement also incorporates, for any User using the Any Hire Services, the
Any Hire Terms
and the
Any Hire Escrow Instructions
. You should read all of our terms carefully because you are promising not to break any agreements in the Terms of Service.
If you want to use our work marketplace or any of our services (which we refer to altogether as Services), whether just by looking around or by registering an account, you must first read and agree to this Agreement (including the dispute resolution and arbitration provisions in Section 14). If you don’t understand this Agreement or you don’t agree to all of its terms and conditions, you may not use our Services. If you do not understand or agree to this Agreement, do not click to accept this Agreement, “Sign Up”, “Create My Account”, or similar, and do not visit Upwork.com, use our mobile applications, or otherwise use our Services. If you are using our Services on behalf of a business or legal entity, you may only do so if you have authority to agree to the Terms of Service on behalf of that business or legal entity.
To make these terms a little easier to understand, we capitalize certain terms and capitalizing them means they have a special meaning. Section 16 provides the definitions of some capitalized terms and others are defined throughout the Terms of Service (look for quotation marks and bold font).
Table of Contents
1.
Upwork Accounts
1.1
Registration
1.2
Account Eligibility
1.3
Account Profile
1.4
Account Types
1.5
Account Permissions
1.6
Identity and Location Verification
1.7
Usernames and Passwords
2.
Purpose of Upwork
2.1
Relationship with Upwork
2.2
Taxes and Benefits
2.3
Marketplace Feedback and User Content
3.
Contractual Relationship Between Client and Freelancer
3.1
Service Contracts
3.2
Disputes Among Users
3.3
Confidential Information
4.
Worker Classification and Upwork Payroll
4.1
Worker Classification
4.2
Upwork Payroll Services
5.
Upwork Fees
5.1
Fees For Freelancers
5.2
Client Fees
5.3
VAT and Other Taxes
5.4
No Fee for Introducing or Finding Projects
6.
Payment Terms and Escrow Services
6.1
Escrow Services
6.2
Client Payments on Service Contracts
6.3
Disbursements to Freelancers on Service Contracts
6.4
Non-Payment
6.5
No Return of Funds and No Chargebacks
6.6
Payment Methods
6.7
U.S. Dollars and Foreign Currency Conversion
7.
Non-Circumvention
7.1
Making Payments Through Upwork
7.2
Communicating Through the Site; Not Sharing Contact Details
7.3
Opting Out
8.
Records of Compliance
9.
Warranty Disclaimer
10.
Limitation of Liability
11.
Release
12.
Indemnification
13.
Agreement Term and Termination
13.1
Termination
13.2
Account Data on Closure
13.3
Survival
14.
Disputes Between You and Upwork
14.1
Dispute Process, Arbitration, and Scope
14.2
Choice of Law
14.3
Informal Dispute Resolution
14.4
Binding Arbitration and Class Action/Jury Trial Waiver
15.
General
15.1
Entire Agreement
15.2
Modifications; Waiver
15.3
Assignability
15.4
Severability; Interpretation
15.5
Force Majeure
15.6
Prevailing Language and Location
15.7
Access of the Site Outside the United States
15.8
Consent to Use Electronic Records
16.
Definitions
When you see this
symbol, look for a simple summary for each section. We wrote these to help you get a quick overview, but you'll need to read the sections completely to get all the details of what you're agreeing to.
1. UPWORK ACCOUNTS
How you can register for an Upwork account and the different types of accounts that you can have.
1.1 REGISTRATION
You must register for an account to have full access to our Services, and your registration is subject to our approval.
You must register for an account with us (“
Account
”) to access and use certain portions of our Services. Registered users of our Services are
“
Users
”
, and unregistered users are “
Site Visitors
”.
Your Account registration is subject to approval by Upwork. We reserve the right to decline a registration either to join Upwork or to add an Account of any type, for any lawful reason, including supply and demand, cost to maintain data, or other business considerations.
1.2 ACCOUNT ELIGIBILITY
You promise to use our Services for business purposes only, and only in ways that are legal. You also promise that you are eligible to enter into this Agreement, including because you are 18 years or older.
Upwork offers the Services for your business purposes only and not for personal or consumer use. By registering for an Account or by using our Services, you represent that you: (a) are doing business under your own name as a self-employed individual/sole proprietor or are an employee or agent of an independent business (such as a corporation, limited liability company, or other entity); (b) will use our Services for business purposes only; (c) will comply with any licensing, registration, or other requirements with respect to your business, or the business for which you are acting, and any offering or provision of Freelancer Services; (d) are either a legal entity or an individual who is at least 18 years old (or the age of majority in your country if the age of majority is over 18), and that you can form legally binding contracts; and (e) will comply with any and all applicable local, state, federal and/or international laws, regulations, and/or conventions in using our Site and Services.
1.3 ACCOUNT PROFILE
You must provide accurate personal information when you sign up and you must update your account if your personal information changes. We can suspend or terminate your account if the information you give us is false, outdated, or incomplete.
To register for an Account to use our Services, you must complete a User profile (“
Profile
”), which you consent to be shown to other Users and, unless you change your privacy settings, to be shown to the public. You agree to provide accurate and complete information on your Profile—and on all registration and other forms you access while using our Services or provide to us—and you agree to keep that information current. You agree not to provide any false or misleading information about your identity or location, your business, the beneficial owner(s) of your business, your skills, or the services your business provides, and you agree to correct any information that is or becomes false or misleading. We reserve the right to suspend or terminate the Account, or access to our Services, of anyone who provides false, inaccurate, or incomplete information in creating, marketing, or maintaining a Profile or an Account.
1.4 ACCOUNT TYPES
We offer three types of accounts (“
Account Types
”): Client, Freelancer, and Agency (which is
a special kind of Freelancer account). Once you register for an Account, you can add Account Types without re-registering. You promise to register for only one Account that requires a unique log in. This Account will house all of your Account Types. Never share your Account password with anyone; you can give permissions to other Users to act under your Account Types as Team Members or Agency Members if needed.
We offer several different Account Types. Once you register for your Account (only one per User), you can add other Account Types under the same username and password. For example, if you already have a Freelancer Account Type (defined below), you can add a Client Account Type (defined below) to your Account without re-registering. You agree not to register for or maintain more than one Account and Profile without express written permission from us.
If you create an Account as an employee or agent on behalf of a company, you represent and warrant that you are authorized to enter into binding contracts, including the Terms of Service, on behalf of yourself and the company. More than one person can create an Account as an employee or agent on behalf of the same company.
1.4.1 CLIENT ACCOUNT
You can register for an Account or add an Account Type to use the Services as a Client (a “
Client Account
”). Client Account Types have a feature that allows the account owner to give permissions to other Users (“
Team Members
”) to act on behalf of the Client Account. Each Team Member must have their own Account to be added as a Team Member on the Client Account.
1.4.2 FREELANCER, AGENCY, AND AGENCY MEMBER ACCOUNT
Freelancer:
You can register for an Account or add an Account Type to use the Services as a Freelancer (a “
Freelancer Account
”).
Agency and Agency Member:
A specific type of Freelancer Account you can add is an “
Agency Account
”, which is referred to as an “
Agency
”. Agency Account Types have a feature that allows the Agency owner to give permissions to other Users (“
Agency Member
”) to act on behalf of the Agency. Each Agency Member must have their own Account to be added as an Agency Member on the Agency Account.
You acknowledge and agree that the Agency Account owner is solely responsible, and assumes all liability, for: (a) the classification of your Agency Members as employees or independent contractors; and (b) paying your Agency Members in accordance with applicable law or contract for work performed on behalf of the Agency for Projects. You further acknowledge and agree that (i) the Agency may determine the Profile visibility and pricing/rate information of any of its Agency Members; and (ii) Agency Members’ Profiles may display work history that includes work done under the Agency Account, including after the Agency Member is no longer an Agency Member.
1.5 ACCOUNT PERMISSIONS
You are responsible for all activity on your Account.
You may provide other Users permissions to act on your Account only as described in Section 1.4 and in this Section 1.5. You agree not to request or allow another person to create an Account for you, your use, or your benefit, except that authorized employees or agents may create an Account on behalf of your business. By granting other Users permissions under your Account, including as a Team Member or Agency Member, you represent that: (a) the User is authorized to act on your behalf; and (b) you are fully responsible and liable for what the User does and does not do, including with respect to making payments and entering into Service Contracts and the Terms of Service. If any User granted permissions under your Account violates the Terms of Service, it may affect your ability to use our Services. When an Account is closed, Upwork may close any related Accounts as well.
1.6 IDENTITY AND LOCATION VERIFICATION
You will allow us to verify your identity, location, and business affiliations from time to time.
When you register for an Account and periodically thereafter, your Account will be subject to verification, including but not limited to validation against third-party databases or the verification of one or more official government or legal documents that confirm your identity, your location, and your ability to act on behalf of your business on Upwork. You authorize Upwork, directly or through third parties, to make any inquiries necessary to validate your identity, your location, and confirm your ownership of your business, email address or financial accounts, subject to applicable law. When requested, you must timely provide us with complete information about yourself and your business, which includes providing official government or legal documents, and cooperating with other reasonable requests we make to verify your identity. During verification some Account features may be temporarily limited but will be restored if verification is successfully completed.
1.7 USERNAMES AND PASSWORDS
You will keep your username and password secret and will not share them, and you will not use anyone else’s username and password.
Each person who uses our Services must register for their own Account with a username and password. You are responsible for safeguarding and maintaining the confidentiality of your username and password, and agree not to share your username or password with anyone. You are responsible for safeguarding your username and password and for any use of our Services with your username and password. You agree to notify us immediately if you suspect or become aware of any unauthorized use of your Account or any unauthorized access to your password. You further agree not to use the Account or log in with the username and password of another User. See Sections 1.4 Account Types and 1.5 Account Permissions for information on allowing another registered User to act on your behalf in your Account.
2. PURPOSE OF UPWORK
What we do and
do not do when providing our Services and some of your responsibilities when using our Services.
The Upwork Site is a work marketplace where Clients and Freelancers can identify each other and advertise, buy, and sell Freelancer Services online. Subject to the Terms of Service, Upwork provides the Services to Users, including hosting and maintaining the Upwork Site, facilitating the formation of Service Contracts, and assisting Users in resolving disputes which may arise in connection with those contracts. When a User enters a Service Contract, the User agrees to use the Services exclusively to invoice, receive, and pay any amounts owed under the Service Contract.
2.1 RELATIONSHIP WITH UPWORK
We offer a work marketplace: an online platform for Users to find and connect with each other. We are not involved directly in your negotiations or the delivery of Freelancer Services and are not a party to any agreements you may make with other Users. You are solely responsible for your content published to Upwork and for your agreements with other Users, including vetting each other and performance under the agreements.
Upwork offers a platform that enables Users to find one another, enter into service relationships and agreements, receive and provide Freelancer Services, and make and receive payments through escrow. Upwork neither performs nor employs individuals to perform Freelancer Services. You acknowledge and agree that Upwork does not supervise, direct, control, or monitor Users in the performance of any contractual obligations they may have under a Service Contract and agree that: (a) Upwork is not responsible for ensuring the accuracy or legality of any User Content, for which Users are solely responsible; (b) Upwork is not responsible for the offering, performance, or procurement of Freelancer Services, (c) Upwork does not make any representations about or guarantee any particular User’s offered services, and (d) nothing will create an employment, agency, or joint venture relationship between Upwork and any User offering services. While Upwork may provide certain badges on Freelancer or Client profiles, such badges are not guarantees, including of quality or ability or willingness of the badged Freelancer or Client to complete a Service Contract.
You further acknowledge and agree that Users, and not Upwork, are solely responsible for (a) evaluating and determining the suitability of any Project, Client, or Freelancer; (b) assessing whether to enter into a Service Contract with another User and for verifying any information about another User, including Composite Information; (c) deciding whether to enter into a Service Contract on Upwork as well as the contract terms, and (d) negotiating, agreeing to, and executing any terms or conditions of the contracts and for performing and monitoring performance under them. All Service Contracts between Users are directly between the Users and Upwork is not a party to those contracts.
If you are an Agency or Agency Member, you expressly acknowledge and agree that, in addition to the provisions above, the Agency is solely responsible for paying its Agency Members for work performed on behalf of the Agency.
Nothing in this Agreement is intended to or does prohibit or discourage any User from engaging in any other business activities or providing any services through any other channels they choose, provided, if applicable, Users comply with the Opt Out provisions described in Section 7. Users are free at all times to engage in such other business activities and services and are encouraged to do so.
As part of our constant effort to improve our Services for our customers, we may test or otherwise temporarily offer certain features and beta tools for your use. We will generally flag on the Site or in related customer forums when a particular tool is being tested and how the feature works, but we do not guarantee that the Site, or any of its tools or features, will be available at any given time.
2.2 TAXES AND BENEFITS
Freelancers are responsible for paying their own taxes, obtaining their own insurance, and ensuring they comply with applicable laws and regulations.
Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Freelancer is solely responsible for: (a) all tax liability associated with payments received from Freelancer’s Clients and through Upwork, and (b) obtaining any liability, health, workers’ compensation, disability, unemployment, or other insurance needed or required by law, and that Freelancer is not covered by or eligible for any insurance from Upwork; (c) determining and fulfilling Freelancer’s obligations under applicable laws and regulations with respect to invoicing and reporting, collecting, or remitting any applicable taxes or charges; and (d) if outside of the United States, determining if Upwork is required by applicable law to withhold any amount of the Freelancer Fees and notifying Upwork of any such requirement and indemnifying Upwork for any requirement to pay any withholding amount to the appropriate authorities (including penalties and interest). Freelancer is responsible for paying all taxes arising in connection with any Service Agreement entered into on the Platform and this Agreement, without any offset or deduction to the fees paid to Upwork.
In the event of an audit of Upwork, Freelancer agrees to promptly cooperate with Upwork and provide copies of Freelancer’s tax returns and other documents as may be reasonably requested for purposes of such audit, including but not limited to records showing Freelancer is engaging in an independent business as represented to Upwork.
2.3 MARKETPLACE FEEDBACK AND USER CONTENT
Users publish and ask Upwork to publish information and feedback on the Site. We are not responsible for that content, and your publication or use of it is at your own risk.
You acknowledge and agree that Users publish and request Upwork to publish on their behalf information on the Site such as feedback, composite feedback, or geographical location. Such information is based on data that Freelancers or Clients voluntarily submit to Upwork and does not constitute an introduction, endorsement, or recommendation by Upwork. You agree that Upwork is not responsible for verifying such information and provides it solely for the convenience of Users, but providing false or misleading information violates this Agreement and may result in revocation of your access to use the Site Services.
You acknowledge and agree that User feedback benefits the marketplace and its Users, and you specifically request and agree that Upwork may make available to other Users individual and composite feedback about Users, including you. You acknowledge and agree that any feedback results for you, including your Job Success Score and other User Content highlighted by Upwork on the Site or otherwise (“
Composite Information
”), may include User comments, User ratings, indicators of User satisfaction, and other feedback left by other Users. Upwork is not responsible for monitoring, influencing, contributing to or censoring these opinions. You agree to notify Upwork of any error or inaccurate statement in your feedback results, including the Composite Information, and you agree that Upwork may rely on the accuracy of such information if you do not. Upwork provides its feedback system as a means for Users to share their working experiences with and opinions of other Users publicly, and you acknowledge and agree that posted composite or compiled feedback and any other Composite Information relates only to the business advertised in the Profile and not to any individual person. You agree not to use the Composite Information to make any employment, credit, credit valuation, underwriting, or other similar decision about any other User.
By using the Services, you may encounter content or information that might be inaccurate, incomplete, delayed, misleading, illegal, offensive or otherwise harmful. Upwork generally does not review or monitor User Content. You agree that we are not responsible for User Content. We cannot always prevent the misuse of our Services, and you agree that we are not responsible for any such misuse. Upwork reserves the right (but is under no obligation) to remove posted feedback or information that Upwork determines violates the Terms of Service or negatively affects our marketplace, diminishes the integrity of the feedback system or otherwise is inconsistent with the business interests of Upwork.
3. CONTRACTUAL RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN CLIENT AND FREELANCER
This section discusses the relationships you may decide to enter into with another User, including contracts to buy or sell Freelancer Services with another User.
3.1 SERVICE CONTRACTS
Users, not Upwork, are responsible for deciding whether to enter into agreements with other Users and for determining what the terms of those agreements will be.
As provided in Section 2.1 above, if a Client and a Freelancer decide to enter into a Service Contract, the contract is a contractual relationship directly between the Client and the Freelancer; Upwork is not responsible for and is not a party to any Service Contract and under no circumstances will any such contract create an employment or any service relationship between Upwork and any User.
With respect to any Service Contract, Clients and Freelancers may enter into any agreements that they deem appropriate (e.g., confidentiality agreements, invention assignment agreements, assignment of rights, etc.), provided that those agreements do not conflict with, narrow, or expand Upwork’s rights and obligations under the Terms of Service, including this Agreement and the applicable Escrow Instructions.
The parties to a Service Contract can, if the parties prefer, agree to the Optional Service Contract Terms in whole or in part, in addition to or instead of other such agreements. The parties to a Service Contract expressly agree that the Optional Service Contract Terms will and do apply to their contract to the extent that they have not agreed to other terms or agreements that conflict with the Optional Service Contract Terms. Users are solely responsible for deciding whether to use the Optional Service Contract Terms, and Upwork does not assume any responsibility for any consequence of using the Optional Service Contract Terms, which are provided as a sample only and may not be appropriate for all jurisdictions or all contracts. The Optional Service Contract Terms are not intended to and do not (a) constitute legal advice, (b) create an attorney-client relationship, or (c) constitute advertising or a solicitation of any type. You should seek legal advice from a licensed attorney for your particular needs.
3.2 DISPUTES AMONG USERS
You agree to try to resolve your disputes with other Users by following the dispute resolution process in the Escrow Instructions that apply to your contract.
For disputes arising between Clients and Freelancers, you agree to abide by the dispute resolution process that is explained in the Escrow Instructions that apply to your particular Service Contract. If that process does not resolve your dispute, you may pursue your dispute independently, but you acknowledge and agree that Upwork will not and is not obligated to provide any further dispute resolution assistance.
If Freelancer or Client seeks an order from an arbitrator or court that might direct Upwork, Upwork Escrow, or our Affiliates to take or refrain from taking any action with respect to an Escrow Account, that party will (a) give us at least five (5) business days’ prior notice of the hearing on the order; (b) include in any such order a provision that, as a precondition to any obligation affecting Upwork or Upwork Escrow, we be paid in full for any amounts to which we would otherwise be entitled; and (c) include in any such order a provision that, as a precondition to any obligation affecting Upwork or Upwork Escrow, Upwork be paid for the reasonable value of the services the order obligates us to undertake.
3.3 CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
Users can agree to their own confidentiality terms. If they do not, these terms apply. Users agree to keep other Users’ confidential information a secret.
Users may agree to any terms they deem appropriate with respect to confidentiality, including those set forth in the Optional Service Contract Terms. If Users do not agree to their own confidentiality terms, this Section 3.3 (Confidential Information) applies.
To the extent a User provides Confidential Information to another User, the recipient will take reasonable steps to keep that information confidential. On a User’s written request, the party that received Confidential Information will promptly destroy or return the disclosing party’s Confidential Information and any copies of it contained in or on its premises, systems, or any other equipment otherwise under its control. Users specifically agree that this Section 3.3 applies to information exchanged for purposes relating to evaluating whether to enter into a Service Contract, even if such contract is never agreed to.
4. WORKER CLASSIFICATION AND UPWORK PAYROLL
Users determine whether a Freelancer is an employee or independent contractor and agree to use Upwork Payroll for employment relationships.
4.1 WORKER CLASSIFICATION
Clients, not Upwork, are responsible for deciding whether to engage Freelancers as employees or independent contractors.
Client is solely responsible for and assumes all liability for determining whether Freelancers should be engaged as independent contractors or employees and engaging them accordingly. Client warrants its decisions regarding classification are correct and its manner of engaging Freelancers complies with applicable laws, regulations, and rules. Upwork is not responsible for worker classification as between Client and Freelancer, and nothing in this Agreement is intended to or should be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, franchisor/franchisee or employer-employee relationship between Upwork and a User..
4.2 UPWORK PAYROLL SERVICES
If Clients engage Freelancers as employees, Clients agree to enroll in Upwork Payroll.
Client agrees to enroll in Upwork Payroll if it will receive services from a Freelancer under terms and conditions that would give rise to an employment relationship (unless Client elects instead to pay the Conversion Fee (see Section 7)). When the Client enrolls in Upwork Payroll, Client will engage Upwork’s third-party staffing vendor (the “
Staffing Provider
”) through the Site. The Staffing Provider will hire Freelancer at the request of Client and Freelancer according to the terms described on the Site and otherwise agreed to by the Staffing Provider, Client and/or Freelancer, and subject to the
Upwork Payroll Agreement
. The employer of Freelancer will be the Staffing Provider and not Upwork.
Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Upwork will have no control over and is not responsible for the terms and conditions of any employment relationship that may arise between Freelancer and Staffing Provider or Client, including the selection process, pay rate, work hours, employment dates, or working conditions.
5. UPWORK FEES
Users agree to pay Upwork certain fees in exchange for Upwork providing the Services and agree that Upwork may collect certain taxes.
5.1 FEES FOR FREELANCERS
Service Fees.
Freelancers agree to pay Upwork a service fee for the use of the Services (including marketing, invoicing, reporting, payment, and dispute resolution services), as set forth in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
(the “
Service Fees
”). Freelancer is responsible for paying all Service Fees. When a Client pays a Freelancer for a Project or when funds related to a Project are otherwise released to a Freelancer as required by the applicable Escrow Instructions (see Section 6.1), Upwork Escrow will credit the Freelancer Escrow Account for the full amount paid or released by the Client, and then subtract and disburse to Upwork the Service Fee. Freelancer hereby irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork Escrow to deduct the Service Fee from the Freelancer Escrow Account and pay Upwork on Freelancer’s behalf. If Freelancer chooses to withdraw funds in a currency other than U.S. dollars, Upwork Escrow (or an affiliate) will impose a foreign currency conversion charge, and the rate may differ from rates that are in effect on the date of the payment. You may be able to obtain a better rate from your bank or financial institution.
Membership Fees and Connects.
Freelancers may subscribe to different levels of participation and privileges on the Site to access additional features and Site Services, by payment of subscription membership fees and by purchasing “
Connects
” as described in the
Freelancer Membership Agreement
.
Disbursement Fees.
Freelancers will pay Upwork a disbursement fee for remitting payments to their preferred payment method. This fee is paid to Upwork in consideration of administrative costs and costs incurred via the disbursement method, and may vary by disbursement method. The fee for each disbursement method is listed on the Site
here
and is subject to change.
5.2 CLIENT FEES
Clients pay Upwork a Marketplace Fee for accessing the Services, and for administration and facilitation of payments related to the Freelancer Fees they pay to Freelancers they engage through the Site, as described in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
.
Clients may also choose to pay for access to additional features and Services, as described in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
.
5.3 VAT AND OTHER TAXES
Upwork Fees are exclusive of taxes. Upwork may be required by applicable law to collect or pay certain taxes or levies, including income tax or VAT (which some jurisdictions refer to as GST or local sales taxes). These collection and withholding requirements and rates may change based on changes to the law in your area. Any amounts Upwork is required or permitted to collect or withhold for the payment of any such taxes shall be collected or withheld in addition to the fees owed to Upwork under the Terms of Service.
5.4 NO FEE FOR INTRODUCING OR FOR FINDING PROJECTS
Upwork does not introduce Clients to Freelancers. Upwork offers a platform that enables Freelancers to introduce themselves and may from time to time highlight Projects or Freelancers that may be of interest. Therefore, Upwork does not charge a fee when a Freelancer finds a suitable Client or finds a Project. In addition, Upwork does not charge any fee or dues for posting or viewing feedback, including Composite Information.
6. PAYMENT TERMS AND ESCROW SERVICES
This section describes how Upwork’s Escrow Services work and discusses your agreement to pay Freelancer Service Fees on Service Contracts, what happens if a Client doesn’t pay, and related topics.
6.1 ESCROW SERVICES
Upwork Escrow provides escrow services to Users to deliver, hold, and receive payment for a Project, and to pay fees to Upwork (“
Escrow Services
”).
Upwork Escrow
is a Delaware corporation and a licensed Internet escrow agent that holds California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation License No. 963 5086. The Escrow Services are intended for business use, and you agree to use the Escrow Services only for business purposes and not for consumer, personal, family, or household purposes.
6.1.1 ESCROW INSTRUCTIONS
We follow what is in the applicable Escrow Instructions when we give the money held by us in escrow to the Freelancer or back to the Client for a Service Contract.
Upwork Escrow will use and release funds deposited in an Escrow Account only in accordance with this Agreement and the applicable Escrow Instructions. You acknowledge and agree that Upwork Escrow acts merely as an Internet escrow agent. Upwork Escrow has fully delivered the Escrow Services to you if Upwork Escrow provides the Escrow Services described in this Agreement and the applicable Escrow Instructions. Upwork Escrow is only obligated to perform those duties expressly described in this Agreement and any applicable Escrow Instructions. Upwork will release funds from any Escrow Account in reliance on your authorization, this Agreement, and the applicable Escrow Instructions or as required by applicable law.
Fixed-Price Projects.
If Users choose fixed-price compensation, then the Users agree that they will be bound by, and Upwork Escrow will follow, the
Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions
.
Hourly Projects, Bonus Payments, or Expense Payments.
If Users choose hourly compensation or if the Client makes bonus or expense payments, then the Users agree that they will be bound by, and Upwork Escrow will follow, the
Hourly, Bonus and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
.
Any Hire Contracts.
If Users enter into an Any Hire Contract, then the Users agree that they will be bound by, and Upwork Escrow will follow, the
Any Hire Escrow Instructions
.
Upwork Payroll Engagements.
If Users use Upwork Payroll (see Section 4) for a particular Project, then the Staffing Employee is paid directly by the Staffing Provider. A Client will be invoiced through the Site by the Staffing Provider, and the applicable Escrow Instructions will apply. However, the Client will not be able to dispute hours reported by the Staffing Employee and there is no dispute waiting period for the disbursement of funds to the Staffing Employee.
6.1.2 ESCROW ACCOUNTS
Upwork Escrow will create and maintain an account to hold funds for you—called an Escrow Account—based on your needs. You authorize Upwork Escrow to be your escrow agent, which means to hold your funds and to follow your instructions on the funds held in your Escrow Account.
Upwork Escrow will use and release funds deposited in an Escrow Account only in accordance with this Agreement, the applicable Escrow Instructions, and applicable law. Depending on your needs and the applicable Escrow Instructions, Upwork Escrow will establish and maintain one of two different types of Escrow Accounts:
(A) Client Escrow Account.
After entering into a Service Contract (hourly or fixed price), the first time a Client makes a payment for a Project, Upwork Escrow will establish and maintain a “
Client Escrow Account
” to hold funds for the Client to use to make payments for Projects, to receive refunds in connection with Projects, and to make payments to Upwork.
(B) Freelancer Escrow Account.
After entering into a Service Contract (hourly or fixed price), the first time a Freelancer uses the Site to receive payment for a Project, Upwork Escrow will establish and maintain a “
Freelancer Escrow Account
” for Freelancer to receive payments for Projects, withdraw payments, make payments to Upwork and issue refunds to Clients.
You hereby authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to act as escrow agent in connection with the Escrow Accounts and the payment, holding, and receipt of funds for each Project and other specified purposes in accordance with the Terms of Service and the applicable Escrow Instructions. Client and Freelancer may access current information regarding the status of an Escrow Account on the Site.
6.1.3 FREELANCER APPOINTMENT OF UPWORK ESCROW AND SUBSIDIARIES AS AGENT
Freelancers authorize Upwork Escrow to act for them to collect and hold payments from Clients.
If you are a Freelancer and you request payment related to an Hourly Contract or the release of funds from a Fixed-Price Escrow Account, you hereby appoint Upwork Escrow as your agent to obtain funds on your behalf and credit them to your Freelancer Escrow Account as you agree in the applicable Escrow Instructions. Because Upwork Escrow is Freelancer’s agent, Freelancer must, and hereby does, fully discharge and credit Freelancer’s Client for all payments and releases of funds that Upwork Escrow receives on Freelancer’s behalf from or on behalf of such Client.
6.1.4 TITLE TO FUNDS
Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and our Affiliates are not banks. We will safeguard your money and not voluntarily make your money available to our creditors.
Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and our Affiliates are not banks. Upwork Escrow deposits and maintains all Escrow Account funds in an escrow trust account at a bank insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and approved to receive, hold, and deliver escrow funds under applicable laws and regulations. Upwork Escrow may utilize an interest-bearing escrow trust account held at Wells Fargo Bank, N.A. or Bank of America, N.A. to maintain Escrow Account funds in accordance with applicable laws. Upwork Escrow may transfer funds between interest and non-interest bearing escrow trust accounts but will not release Escrow Account funds except in accordance with applicable Escrow Instructions. Any escrow trust account is separate from the operating accounts of Upwork and each of our Affiliates. Upwork Escrow will not voluntarily make funds deposited in the escrow trust account available to its creditors, or the creditors of its Affiliates, in the event of a bankruptcy, or for any other purpose. As provided in United States Bankruptcy Code, Section 541(d), Upwork Escrow holds only legal title to, and not any equitable interest in, the escrow trust account and any funds deposited in it. This Agreement is supplementary to the Service Contract and to any other agreement between Client and Freelancer concerning the Project, as provided in Title 11 of the United States Code, Section 365(n).
6.1.5 NO INTEREST
You will not earn any interest on the money we hold in your Escrow Account and you understand that we charge fees for our services, as explained in Section 5.
You agree that you will not receive interest or other earnings on the funds held in your Escrow Account.  If any interest is earned then you agree that all interest is assigned to Upwork Global Inc. In no event will you receive any interest earnings, including if the Project or payment fails, is canceled, or escrow funds are returned to you.  Any interest accrued in an escrow trust account may be retained in the interest-bearing escrow account until the end of the current calendar month.
Upwork, Upwork Escrow, or our Affiliates may charge or deduct fees, may receive a reduction in fees or expenses charged, and may receive other compensation in connection with the services we provide as provided in Section 5 and the Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement.
6.1.6 ESCROW AGENT DUTIES
We only agree to do what is described in this Agreement, the applicable Escrow Instructions, and the rest of the Terms of Service.
We only agree to perform such duties as are expressly set forth in this Agreement, the applicable
Escrow Instructions
, and the other
Terms of Service
, and no other duties will be implied. We have no liability under, and no duty to inquire as to, the provisions of any agreement, other than the Terms of Service (including this Agreement and the applicable Escrow Instructions). We will be under no duty to inquire about or investigate any agreement or communication between Client and Freelancer, even if posted to the Site. We have the right to rely upon, and will not be liable for relying on, any written notice, instruction, or request furnished to us by Client or Freelancer in accordance with this Agreement or the applicable Escrow Instructions, if we reasonably believe that such notice, instruction, or request is genuine and that it is signed or presented by the proper party or parties. We have no duty to inquire about or investigate the validity, accuracy, or content of any such notice, instruction, or request. We have no duty to solicit any payments or releases that may be due to or from any Escrow Account. We may execute any of our powers and perform any of our duties under this Agreement and the applicable Escrow Instructions directly or through agents or attorneys (and will be liable only for the careful selection of any such agent or attorney) and may consult with counsel, accountants, and other skilled persons to be selected and retained by us. If we are uncertain as to our duties or rights under this Agreement or receive instructions, claims, or demands from any party to this Agreement that, in our opinion, conflict with any of the provisions of this Agreement or the applicable Escrow Instructions, we will be entitled to refrain from taking any action, and our sole obligation will be to keep safely all property held in the Escrow Account until we are directed otherwise in writing by Client and Freelancer or by a final order or judgment of an arbitrator or court of competent jurisdiction.
6.1.7 ESCROW AGENT RIGHT
We may choose to start a dispute process if there is a disagreement between a Client and a Freelancer related to an Escrow Account.
We have the right to institute arbitration or other legal proceedings if applicable, including depositing funds held in the Escrow Account with a court of competent jurisdiction, in order to resolve any dispute between Client and Freelancer related to the Escrow Account. Except as expressly provided, nothing in this Agreement will be construed to limit our legal and equitable rights, including, but not limited to, depositing funds held in the Escrow Account with a court of competent jurisdiction. Any corporation or association into which Upwork Escrow may be merged or converted or with which Upwork Escrow may be consolidated, or any corporation or association to which all or substantially all the escrow business of Upwork Escrow may be transferred will succeed to all the rights and obligations of Upwork Escrow as escrow holder and escrow agent under this Agreement and the applicable Escrow Instructions to the extent permitted by applicable law.
6.2 CLIENT PAYMENTS ON SERVICE CONTRACTS
This section describes when and how Client payments are made on their contracts with Freelancers.
Hourly Contracts.
Freelancer will invoice Client for Freelancer Fees on a weekly basis through Upwork, and Client will pay invoices consistent with the
Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
. When Client approves an Hourly Invoice for an Hourly Contract, including an Hourly Contract initiated through Direct Contracts, Client automatically and irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork or its affiliates Upwork Escrow or Elance Ltd. to charge Client’s Payment Method for the Freelancer Fees.
Fixed-Price Contracts.
Client becomes obligated to pay applicable amounts into the Escrow Account immediately upon sending a Fixed-Price Contract offer (for the full amount or for the first milestone, if milestones are used), upon activating any additional milestone, or upon accepting a Fixed-Price Contract via Direct Contracts. When Client authorizes the payment of the Freelancer Fees for a Fixed-Price Contract under the
Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions
, Client automatically and irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork or its affiliates Upwork Escrow or Elance Ltd. to charge Client’s Payment Method for the Freelancer Fees.
Client acknowledges and agrees that for both Hourly Contracts and Fixed-Price Contracts, failure by Client to decline or dispute an Hourly Invoice or request for payment is an authorization and instruction to release payment, as described more fully in the applicable Escrow Instructions.
6.3 DISBURSEMENTS TO FREELANCERS ON SERVICE CONTRACTS
This section describes when Freelancers receive their funds that we were holding for the Freelancers in escrow.
Upwork Escrow disburses funds that are available in the applicable Freelancer Escrow Account and payable to a Freelancer as described in the relevant
Escrow Instructions
. A Freelancer can request disbursement of available funds any time on a one-time basis or by setting up an automatic disbursement schedule. Otherwise, except as provided in the following paragraph, Upwork will automatically disburse available funds no more than ninety (90) days after the Freelancer Fees are released to the Freelancer Escrow Account, unless the amount in the Escrow Account is less than the Minimum Threshold. For purposes of the Terms of Service, a “
Minimum Threshold
” is either (a) $100 for Freelancers within the United States, or (b) $1,000 for Freelancers outside the United States. Except as provided in the following paragraph, when the funds in the Freelancer Escrow Account are below the Minimum Threshold, the automatic disbursement schedule is paused and the available and payable funds are released on the earlier of: (i) Freelancer’s request; (ii) on the first scheduled automatic disbursement occurring after the amount exceeds the Minimum Threshold; or (iii) 180 days after the funds are available in the Freelancer Escrow Account.
If a Freelancer that is located outside of the United States is not able to withdraw funds due to economic sanctions applicable to Upwork or our payment partners, or due to Upwork's payment partners' refusal to service certain geographic areas, Upwork will suspend automatic disbursement as provided in the prior paragraph and will safeguard such funds in an Escrow Account, or in another suitable account, as determined in Upwork's sole discretion, until the earlier of (a) the Freelancer is able to and does in fact withdraw the funds, or (b) Upwork is required by law to escheat the funds to an appropriate legal authority, after which the Freelancer can seek to recover the funds from such authority.
Hourly Contracts.
Freelancer Fees become available to Freelancers no later than following the expiration of the five-day security period and dispute period.
Fixed-Price Contracts.
Freelancer Fees become available to Freelancers no later than following the expiration of the five-day security period. The security period begins after Client accepts work submitted by Freelancer and approves payment.
Except as expressly provided in the Terms of Service or the Escrow Instructions and as prohibited by applicable law, Upwork Escrow may refuse to process, may hold the disbursement of the Freelancer Fees or any other amounts and offset amounts owed to us, or take such other actions with respect to the Escrow Account as we deem appropriate in our sole discretion if: (a) we require additional information, such as Freelancer’s tax information, government-issued identification or other proof of identity, address, or date of birth; (b) we have reason to believe the Freelancer Fees may be subject to dispute or chargeback; (c) we suspect a User has committed or attempted to commit fraud or other illicit acts on or through the Site or is using the Site unlawfully; (d) we believe there are reasonable grounds for insecurity with respect to the performance of obligations under this Agreement or other Terms of Service; or (e) we deem it necessary in connection with any investigation, required by applicable law, or necessary due to circumstances outside of our control after a commercially reasonable effort has been made by us due to such circumstances. If, after investigation, we determine that the hold on the disbursement of the Freelancer Fees is no longer necessary, Upwork Escrow will release the hold as soon as practicable.
In addition, except as expressly provided in the Terms of Service or the Escrow Instructions and to the extent permitted by applicable law, we reserve the right to seek reimbursement from you, and you will reimburse us, if we: (i) suspect fraud or criminal activity associated with your payment, withdrawal, or Project; (ii) discover erroneous or duplicate transactions; or (iii) have supplied our services in accordance with this Agreement yet we receive any chargeback from the Payment Method used by you or your Client despite our provision of the Services in accordance with this Agreement. You agree that we have the right to obtain such reimbursement by instructing Upwork Escrow (and Upwork Escrow will have the right) to charge your account(s), offset any amounts determined to be owing, deduct amounts from future payments or withdrawals, charge your Payment Method, or use other lawful means to obtain reimbursement from you. If we are unable to obtain such reimbursement, we may, in addition to any other remedies available under applicable law, temporarily or permanently revoke your access to the Services and close your Account.
6.4 NON-PAYMENT OR DEFAULT
This section describes the actions Upwork can take if a Client does not pay fees on time. Upwork is not responsible for a Client’s non-payment of fees.
If Client is in “
default
”, meaning the Client fails to pay the Freelancer Fees or any other amounts when due under the Terms of Service, or a written agreement for payment terms incorporating the Terms of Service (signed by an authorized representative of Upwork), Upwork will be entitled to the remedies described in this Section 6.4 in addition to such other remedies that may be available under applicable law or in such written agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Client will be deemed to be in default on the earliest occurrence of any of the following: (a) Client fails to pay the Freelancer Fees when due; (b) Client fails to pay a balance that is due or to bring, within a reasonable period of time but no more than 30 days after accrual of the charge, an account current after a credit or debit card is declined or expires; (c) Client fails to pay an invoice issued to the Client by Upwork within the time period agreed or, if no period is agreed, within 30 days; (d) Client initiates a chargeback with a bank or other financial institution resulting in a charge made by Upwork for Freelancer Fees or such other amount due being reversed to the Client; or (e) Client takes other actions or fails to take any action that results in a negative or past-due balance on the Client’s account.
If Client is in default, we may, without notice, temporarily or permanently close Client’s Account and revoke Client’s access to the Services, including Client’s authority to use the Site to process any additional payments, enter into Service Contracts, or obtain any additional Freelancer Services from other Users through the Site. However, Client will remain responsible for any amounts that accrue on any open Projects at the time a limitation is put on the Client’s Account as a result of the default. Without limiting other available remedies, Client must pay Upwork upon demand for any amounts owed, plus interest on the outstanding amount at the lesser of one and one-half percent (1.5%) per month or the maximum interest allowed by applicable law, plus attorneys’ fees and other costs of collection to the extent permitted by applicable law.
At our discretion and to the extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork, Upwork Escrow, Elance Ltd. or its other Affiliates may, without notice, charge all or a portion of any amount that is owed to any Payment Method on file on the Client’s Account; set off amounts due against other amounts received from Client or held by for Client by Upwork, Upwork Escrow or another Affiliate; make appropriate reports to credit reporting agencies and law enforcement authorities; and cooperate with credit reporting agencies and law enforcement authorities in any investigation or prosecution.
Upwork does not guarantee that Client is able to pay or will pay Freelancer Fees, and Upwork is not liable for and may reverse Freelancer Fees if Client is in default or initiates a chargeback of funds with their financial institution. Freelancer may use the dispute process as described in the applicable Escrow Instructions in order to recover funds from Client in the event of a default or may pursue such other remedies against Client as Freelancer chooses. If Upwork recovers funds from a Client who initiated a chargeback or who is in default pursuant to this Section 6.4, Upwork will disburse any portion attributable to Freelancer Fees to the applicable Freelancer to the extent not already paid by Client or credited by Upwork through any Payment Protection program.
6.5 NO RETURN OF FUNDS AND NO CHARGEBACKS
Clients agree that, once Upwork charges their Payment Methods, the charge cannot be refunded except on a condition agreed in the Escrow Instructions. Clients agree not to initiate any chargebacks from their credit card companies, banks, or the like.
Client acknowledges and agrees that Upwork or its affiliates Upwork Escrow or Elance Ltd. may charge or debit Client’s designated Payment Method for the Freelancer Fees incurred as described in the applicable Escrow Instructions and the Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement. Once Upwork or its affiliates Upwork Escrow or Elance Ltd. charges or debits the Client’s designated Payment Method for the Freelancer Fees, the charge or debit is non-refundable, except as provided in the applicable Escrow Instructions or as otherwise required by applicable law. Client also acknowledges and agrees that the Terms of Service provide a dispute resolution process as a way for Client to resolve disputes. To the extent permitted by applicable law, Client therefore agrees not to ask its credit card company, bank, or other Payment Method provider to charge back any Freelancer Fees or other fees charged pursuant to the Terms of Service for any reason. A chargeback in breach of this obligation is a material breach of the Terms of Service. If Client initiates a chargeback in violation of this Agreement, Client agrees that Upwork or its affiliates Upwork Escrow or Elance Ltd. may dispute or appeal the chargeback, institute collection action against Client, close Client’s account, and take such other action it deems appropriate.
6.6 PAYMENT METHODS
Clients and Freelancers agree to designate a Payment Method and authorize us to charge that Payment Method.
In order to use certain Site Services, Users must provide account information for at least one valid Payment Method. Certain Site Services, as indicated on the Site from time to time, may require Users to provide a backup Payment Method.
As a Client or Freelancer, you hereby authorize Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and Elance Ltd., as applicable, to run credit card authorizations on all credit cards provided by Client or Freelancer, to store credit card and banking or other financial details as Client or Freelancer's method of payment consistent with our
Privacy Policy
, and to charge Client or Freelancer’s credit card (or any other Payment Method) for the Freelancer Fees or Service Fees and any other amounts owed under the Terms of Service. If your primary Payment Method fails, you authorize us to charge your backup Payment Method for any amounts due. To the extent permitted by applicable law and subject to our Privacy Policy, you acknowledge and agree that we may use certain third-party vendors and service providers to process payments and manage your Payment Method information.
By providing Payment Method information through the Site or by authorizing payments with the Payment Method, you represent that: (a) you are legally authorized to provide such information; (b) you are legally authorized to make payments using the Payment Method(s); (c) you are an employee or agent of a company or person that owns the Payment Method, that you are authorized by the company or person to use the Payment Method to make payments on Upwork; and (d) such actions do not violate the terms and conditions applicable to your use of such Payment Method(s) or applicable law.
When you authorizes a payment using a Payment Method via the Site, you represent that there are sufficient funds or credit available to complete the payment using the designated Payment Method. To the extent that any amounts owed under this Agreement or the other Terms of Service cannot be collected from Client or Freelancer’s Payment Method(s), Client or Freelancer is solely responsible for paying such amounts by other means.
Upwork is not liable to any User if Upwork does not complete a transaction as a result of any limit by applicable law or your financial institution, or if a financial institution fails to honor any credit or debit to or from an account associated with such Payment Method. Upwork will make commercially reasonable efforts to work with any such affected Users to resolve such transactions in a manner consistent with this Agreement and any applicable Escrow Instructions.
6.7 U.S. DOLLARS AND FOREIGN CURRENCY CONVERSION
If your Payment Method uses a currency other than U.S. Dollars, we may show you foreign currency conversion rates for us to change your currency into U.S. Dollars. The rates we show you may be different than the rates that apply to us and may not be the best rate available to you
The Services operate in U.S. Dollars. If a User’s Payment Method is denominated in a currency other than U.S. Dollars and requires currency conversion to make or receive payments in U.S. Dollars, the Site will display foreign currency conversion rates that Upwork, Upwork Escrow, Elance Ltd., or our other Affiliates currently make available to convert supported foreign currencies to U.S. Dollars. These foreign currency conversion rates adjust regularly based on market conditions. Please note that the wholesale currency conversion rates at which we or our Affiliates obtain foreign currency will usually be different than the foreign currency conversion rates offered on the Site. Each User, at its sole discretion and risk, may authorize the charge, debit, or credit of its Payment Method in a supported foreign currency and the conversion of the payment to U.S. Dollars at the foreign currency conversion rate displayed on the Site. A list of supported foreign currencies is available on the Site. If foreign currency conversion is required to make a payment or disbursement in U.S. Dollars and Upwork, its affiliates Upwork Escrow or Elance Ltd., as applicable, does not support the foreign currency or the User does not authorize the conversion of such payment at the foreign currency conversion rate displayed on the Site, Upwork Escrow or one of our Affiliates will charge, debit, or credit the User’s Payment Method in U.S. Dollars and the User’s Payment Method provider will convert the payment at a foreign currency conversion rate selected by the User’s Payment Method provider. The User’s Payment Method provider may also charge fees directly to the Payment Method even when no currency conversion is involved and any fees assessed by the User's provider will be the responsibility of the User. The User’s authorization of a payment using a foreign currency conversion rate displayed on the Site is at the User’s sole risk. Upwork, Upwork Escrow, Elance Ltd., and our other Affiliates are not responsible for currency fluctuations that occur when billing or crediting a Payment Method denominated in a currency other than U.S. Dollars or for currency fluctuations that occur when receiving or sending payments to and from the Escrow Account.
7. NON-CIRCUMVENTION
You agree to communicate through the Site and make and receive payments only through the Site for two years from the date you first identify or meet your Client or Freelancer on the Site, unless you pay a Conversion Fee. Violations of this Section constitute a serious breach and may result in permanent suspension of your Account.
7.1 MAKING PAYMENTS THROUGH UPWORK
You agree to exclusively use Upwork to make payments for work that arises out of a relationship you made through Upwork for two years from the date you first established the relationship.
You acknowledge and agree that a substantial portion of the compensation Upwork receives for making the Site available to you is collected through the Service Fee described in Section 5.1 and that in exchange a substantial value to you is the relationships you make with other Users identified through the Services (the “
Upwork Relationship
”). Upwork only receives the Service Fee when a Client and a Freelancer pay and receive payment through the Site. Therefore, except as set out in Section 7.2, for 24 months from the start of an Upwork Relationship (the “Non-Circumvention Period”), you agree to use the Site as your exclusive method to request, make, and receive all payments for work directly or indirectly with that person or arising from that relationship and not to circumvent the Payment Methods offered on the Site unless you pay a fee to take the relationship off of the Site (the “
Conversion Fee
”). If you use the Site as an employee, agent, or representative of another business, then the Non-Circumvention Period applies to you and other employees, agents, or representatives of the business or its successor when acting in that capacity with respect to the other User. If you, or the business you represent, did not identify and were not identified by another person through the Site, such as if you and another User worked together before meeting on the Site, then the Non-Circumvention Period does not apply. By way of example only, you agree that during the Non-Circumvention period you will not:
Offer or solicit or accept any offer or solicitation from parties identified through the Site to contract, hire, invoice, pay, or receive payment in any manner other than through the Site.
Invoice or report on the Site or in a Conversion Fee request an invoice or payment amount lower than that actually agreed, made, or received between Users.
Refer a User you identified on the Site to a third party who is not a User of the Site for purposes of making or receiving payments other than through the Site.
You agree to notify Upwork immediately if a person suggests making or receiving payments other than through the Site in violation of this Section 7 or if you receive unsolicited contact outside of the Site. If you are aware of a breach or potential breach of this non-circumvention agreement, please submit a confidential report to Upwork
here
.
You acknowledge and agree that a violation of this Section 7.1 is a material breach of the Terms of Service, and may result in your Account being permanently suspended and charged the Conversion Fee (defined above). This Section still applies if you choose to cease using the Site, and you must pay the Conversion Fee for each other User you wish to continue working with after you cease using the Site.
7.2 COMMUNICATING THROUGH THE SITE; NOT SHARING CONTACT DETAILS
Prior to entering into a Service Contract, you agree to communicate with other Users exclusively through Upwork.
The provisions of this Section 7.2 apply to any interaction between Users where the Client has a Basic, Plus, or Marketplace Account, and do not apply to any interaction between Users where the Client is an Enterprise Client. For purposes of the Terms of Service, “Enterprise Client” means a Client, including an Enterprise client or an Upwork Business Client, that has the following “
Enterprise
” badge displayed on its job post or search tile:
For Users subject to this Section 7.2, Users agree to use the communication services available on the Site to communicate with other Users prior to entering into a Service Contract. You agree that prior to entering into a Service Contract, you (a) will use Upwork as the sole manner to communicate with other Users; (b) will not provide your Means of Direct Contact (defined below) to any other User or another person that you identified or were identified by through the Site; (c) will not use Means of Direct Contact of another user to attempt to or to communicate with, solicit, contact, or find the contact information of a User outside of Upwork; (d) will not ask for, provide, or attempt to identify through public means the contact information of another User; and (e) will not include any Means of Direct Contact or means by which your contact information could be discovered in any profile, proposal, job posting, invitation, or pre-hire communication through the Site’s communications services (including in each case in any attached file), except as otherwise provided on the Site.
For purposes of the Terms of Service, “
Means of Direct Contact
” means any information that would allow another person to contact you directly, including, without limitation, phone number, email address, physical address, a link to a contact form or form requesting contact information, any link to an applicant management system or means to submit a proposal or application outside of the Site, or any information that would enable a user to contact you on social media or other website or platform or application that includes a communications tool, such as Skype, Slack, Wechat, or Facebook. Information is a Means of Direct Contact if it would enable another user to identify any of the information above through other sources, such as going to a website that included an email address or identifying you through social media.
You acknowledge and agree that a violation of this Section 7.2 is a material breach of the Terms of Service and your Account may be permanently suspended for such violations.
7.3 OPTING OUT
You may opt out of the non-circumvention agreement if you pay a fee.
You may opt out of the obligations in Section 7.1 with respect to each Upwork Relationship only if the Client or Freelancer pays Upwork a Conversion Fee which is a minimum of $1,000 USD and up to $50,000 USD for each Upwork Relationship, unless Client and Freelancer have had an Upwork Relationship for at least two (2) years.
The Conversion Fee may be calculated differently for Upwork Relationships when the Client is an Enterprise Client if the Enterprise Client contract with Upwork provides for different terms.
To learn more about the Conversion Fee or how to pay it visit our Help Center
here
.
You understand and agree that if Upwork determines that you have violated Section 7, it may (a) charge your Payment Method the Conversion Fee (including interest) if permitted by law or send you an invoice for the Conversion Fee (including interest), which you agree to pay within 30 days, (b) close your Account and revoke your authorization to use the Services, and (c) charge you for all losses and costs (including any and all time of Upwork’s internal workforce) and reasonable expenses (including attorneys’ fees) related to investigating such breach and collecting such fees.
You agree that the Conversion Fee is 13.5% of the estimated earnings over a twelve (12) month period, which is calculated by taking the Hourly Rate (defined below) and multiplying it by 2,080. “
Hourly Rate
” means (a) the highest hourly rate charged by the Freelancer on any Service Contract with the Client, if any; or (b) if there is no hourly rate on a Service contract, the hourly rate in the Freelancer’s profile when the conversion is requested. The Conversion Fee includes all applicable taxes and is not subject to the Marketplace Fee. If Client and Freelancer have had an Upwork Relationship for at least two (2) years, the Conversion Fee is a nominal $1 USD for administrative purposes. The Conversion Fee is not refundable. Upwork will apply a discount on the Conversion Fee that is equal to the total amount of Marketplace Fees that Client has paid to Upwork in the preceding twelve (12) months on each marketplace Service Contract between the Client and the Freelancer. In no event shall the Conversion Fee be discounted below the minimum of $1,000 USD.
8. RECORDS OF COMPLIANCE
You agree to make and keep all required records.
You are solely responsible for creation, storage, and backup of your business records. You agree that Upwork has no obligation to store, maintain or provide you a copy of any content or information that you provide, except to the extent required by applicable law.
9. WARRANTY DISCLAIMER
We are not responsible for the quality, safety, or reliability of our Services.
Upwork and its affiliates make no representation or warranty about the services, including that the services will be uninterrupted or error-free, and provide the Services (including content and information) on an “as is” and “as available” basis. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork and its affiliates disclaim any implied or statutory warranty, including any implied warranty of title, accuracy of data, non-infringement, merchantability or fitness for a particular purpose.
10. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
Any liability we may have to you is limited.
Upwork is not liable, and you agree not to hold us responsible, for any damages or losses arising out of or in connection with the Terms of Service, including, but not limited to: (i) your use of or your inability to use our Site or Site Services; (ii) delays or disruptions in our Site or Site Services; (iii) viruses or other malicious software obtained by accessing, or linking to, our Site or Site Services; (iv) glitches, bugs, errors, or inaccuracies of any kind in our Site or Site Services; (v) damage to your hardware device from the use of the Site or Site Services; (vi) the content, actions, or inactions of third parties’ use of the Site or Site Services; (vii) a suspension or other action taken with respect to your Account; (viii) your reliance on the quality, accuracy, or reliability of job postings, Profiles, ratings, recommendations, and feedback (including their content, order, and display), Composite Information, or metrics found on, used on, or made available through the Site; and (ix) your need to modify practices, content, or behavior or your loss of or inability to do business, as a result of changes to the Terms of Service.
Additionally, in no event will Upwork, our affiliates, our licensors, or our third-party service providers be liable for any special, consequential, incidental, punitive, exemplary, or indirect costs or damages, including, but not limited to, litigation costs, installation and removal costs, or loss of data, production, profit, or business opportunities. The liability of Upwork, our affiliates, our licensors, and our third-party service providers to any User for any claim arising out of or in connection with this Agreement or the other Terms of Service will not exceed the lesser of: (a) $2,500 or (b) any fees retained by Upwork with respect to service contracts on which User was involved as Client or Freelancer during the six-month period preceding the date of the claim.
These limitations will apply to any liability, arising from any cause of action whatsoever arising out of or in connection with this Agreement or the other Terms of Service, whether in contract, tort (including negligence), strict liability, or otherwise, even if Upwork has been advised of the possibility of such costs or damages and even if the limited remedies provided herein fail of their essential purpose. Some states and jurisdictions do not allow for all of the foregoing exclusions and limitations, so to that extent, some or all of these limitations and exclusions may not apply to you.
11. RELEASE
You agree not to hold us responsible for any dispute you may have with another User.
In recognition of the fact that Upwork is not a party to any contract between Users, you hereby release Upwork, Upwork Escrow, our other Affiliates, and our respective officers, directors, agents, subsidiaries, joint ventures, employees and service providers from claims, demands, and damages (actual and consequential) of every kind and nature, known and unknown, arising out of or in any way connected with any dispute you have with another User, whether it be at law or in equity that exist as of the time you enter into this Agreement. This release includes, for example and without limitation, any disputes regarding the performance, functions, and quality of the Freelancer Services provided to Client by a Freelancer and requests for refunds based upon disputes. Procedures regarding the handling of certain disputes between Users are discussed in the Escrow Instructions.
To the extent applicable, you hereby waive the protections of California Civil Code § 1542 (and any analogous law in any other applicable jurisdiction) which says: “A general release does not extend to claims that the creditor or releasing party does not know or suspect to exist in his or her favor at the time of executing the release and that, if known by him or her, would have materially affected his or her settlement with the debtor or released party.”
This release will not apply to a claim that Upwork failed to meet our obligations under the Terms of Service.
12. INDEMNIFICATION
If you do something using our Services that gets us sued or fined, you agree to cover our costs or losses as described below.
You will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Upwork, Upwork Escrow, our other Affiliates, and our respective directors, officers, employees, representatives, and agents (each an “
Indemnified Party
”) for all Indemnified Claims (defined below) and Indemnified Liabilities (defined below) relating to or arising out of: (a) your or your agents’ use of the Services, including any payment obligations or default (described in Section 6.4 (Non-Payment or Default)) incurred through use of the Services; (b) any Work Product or User Content related to your use of the Services; (c) any Service Contract entered into by you or your agents, including, but not limited to, the classification of a Freelancer as an independent contractor, any employment-related claims; (d) your or your agents’ failure to comply with the Terms of Service; (e) you or your agents’ failure to comply with applicable law; (f) negligence, willful misconduct, or fraud by you or your agents; and (g) you or your agents’ violation of any third-party right, including without limitation any right of privacy, publicity rights or Intellectual Property Rights. For purposes of this Section 12, your agents include any person who has apparent authority to access or use your account demonstrated by using your username and password.
“
Indemnified Claim
” means any and all claims, damages, liabilities, costs, losses, and expenses (including attorneys’ fees) arising from or relating to any claim, suit, proceeding, demand, or action brought by you or a third party or other User against an Indemnified Party.
“
Indemnified Liability
” means any and all claims, damages, liabilities, costs, losses, and expenses (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and all related costs and expenses) arising from or relating to any claim, suit, proceeding, demand, or action brought by an Indemnified Party against you or a third party or other User.
13. AGREEMENT TERM AND TERMINATION
This section discusses when and how long this Agreement will last, when and how either you or Upwork can end this Agreement, and what happens if either of us ends the Agreement.
13.1 TERMINATION
You and Upwork both have the right to end this Agreement, but certain rights and obligations will survive after this Agreement ends.
Unless both you and Upwork expressly agree otherwise in writing, either of us may terminate this Agreement in our sole discretion at any time, without explanation, upon written notice to the other, which will result in the termination of the other Terms of Service as well, except as otherwise provided in this Agreement. You may provide written notice to legalnotices@upwork.com. In the event you properly terminate this Agreement, your right to use the Services is automatically revoked, and your Account will be closed.
You agree that Upwork is not a party to any Service Contract between Users. Consequently, you understand and acknowledge that termination of this Agreement (or attempt to terminate this Agreement) does not terminate or otherwise impact any Service Contract or Project entered into between Users. If you attempt to terminate this Agreement while having one or more open Projects, you agree that (a) you thereby instruct Upwork to close any open contracts; (b) you will continue to be bound by this Agreement and the other Terms of Service until all such Projects have closed on the Site and your access to the Site has been terminated; (c) Upwork will continue to perform those Services necessary to complete any open transaction between you and another User; and (d) you will continue to be obligated to pay any amounts accrued but unpaid as of the date of termination or as of the closure of any open Service Contracts, whichever is later, to Upwork for any Services or such other amounts owed under the Terms of Service and to any Freelancers for any Freelancer Services.
Without limiting Upwork’s other rights or remedies, we may revoke or limit access to the Services, deny your registration, or revoke your access to the Site and refuse to provide any or all Services to you if: (i) you breach any terms and conditions of this Agreement or any portion of the Terms of Service; (ii) we have reasonable reason to believe that you have provided false or misleading information to us; (iii) we conclude that your actions may cause legal liability for you or others; may be contrary to the interests of the Site or the User community; or may involve illicit or illegal activity; or (iv) we are required to by law, legal process, or law enforcement. If your Account is temporarily or permanently closed, you may not use the Site under the same Account or a different Account or re-register for a new Account without Upwork’s prior written consent. If you attempt to use the Site under a different Account, we reserve the right to reclaim available funds in that Account and/or use an available Payment Method to pay for any amounts owed by you to the extent permitted by applicable law.
You acknowledge and agree that the value, reputation, and goodwill of the Site depend on transparency of Users’ Account status to all Users, including you and other Users who have entered into Service Contracts with you.
You therefore agree that:
if Upwork decides to temporarily or permanently close your account, Upwork has the right (but no obligation) where allowed by law to: (y) notify other users that have entered into Service Contracts with you of your closed account status, and (z) provide those users with a summary of the reasons for your account closure. You agree that Upwork will have no liability arising from or relating to any notice that it may or may not provide to any user regarding closed account status or the reason(s) for the closure.
13.2 ACCOUNT DATA ON CLOSURE
Except as otherwise required by law, if your Account is closed, you will no longer have access to information or material you kept on the Site and any content stored in your Account may be deleted, for which Upwork expressly disclaims liability. Upwork may retain some or all of your Account information as permitted or required by law and the Privacy Policy.
13.3 SURVIVAL
After this Agreement terminates, the terms of this Agreement and the other Terms of Service that expressly or by their nature contemplate performance after this Agreement terminates or expires will survive and continue in full force and effect. For example, the provisions related to arbitration, audits, intellectual property, non-circumvention, indemnification, fees, reimbursements, and limitations of liability each contemplate performance or observance after this Agreement terminates. The termination of this Agreement for any reason will not release you or Upwork from any obligations incurred prior to termination of this Agreement or other parts of the Terms of Service or that may accrue related to any act or omission prior to such termination.
14. DISPUTES BETWEEN YOU AND UPWORK
Section 14 discusses your agreement with Upwork and our agreement with you about how we will resolve any disputes between us, including that we will both first try to resolve any dispute informally and, if you are in the United States, that we both agree to use arbitration instead of going to court or using a jury if we can’t resolve the dispute informally.
Please read the following paragraphs carefully because they require you and us to agree to resolve most all disputes between you and us through binding individual arbitration.
14.1 DISPUTE PROCESS, ARBITRATION, AND SCOPE
If a dispute arises between you and Upwork or our Affiliates, our goal is to resolve the dispute quickly and cost-effectively. Accordingly, unless you opt out as provided in Section 14.4.4 below, you, Upwork, and our Affiliates agree to resolve any and all claims, disputes, or controversies that arise at any time through binding arbitration on an individual basis in accordance with this Section 14 (sometimes referred to as the "Arbitration Provision"). This includes any and all claims that arise out of or relate to this Agreement, the other Terms of Service, your relationship with Upwork (including without limitation any claimed employment with Upwork or one of our Affiliates or successors), the termination of your relationship with Upwork, or the Services (each a “
Claim
” and collectively, “
Claims
”).
Claims that may not be subject to predispute arbitration agreement as provided by the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Public Law 111-203), Ending Forced Arbitration of Sexual Assault and Sexual Harassment Act (Public Law 117-90), or by generally applicable law are excluded from the coverage of this Arbitration Provision.
By agreeing to arbitrate disputes under this Agreement, THE PARTIES ARE EXPRESSLY GIVING UP ANY AND ALL RIGHTS TO A JURY TRIAL OR COURT TRIAL BEFORE A JUDGE. The parties instead elect to have Claims resolved by arbitration. The arbitrator’s decision shall be final and binding on the parties, subject to review on the grounds set forth in the Federal Arbitration Act (“FAA”)).
14.2 CHOICE OF LAW
This Agreement, the Site Terms of Use, the other Terms of Service, and any Claim will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California, without regard to its conflict of law provisions; provided, however, that any Claims made by any Freelancer located within the United States will be governed by the law of the state in which such Freelancer resided at the time the dispute arose.
However, notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, this Arbitration Provision is governed by the Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. §§ 1 et seq.).
14.3 INFORMAL DISPUTE RESOLUTION
Before serving a demand for arbitration of a Claim, you and Upwork agree to first notify each other of the Claim. You agree to notify Upwork of the Claim by email to legalnotices@upwork.com, and Upwork agrees to provide to you a notice at your email address on file (in each case, a “
Notice
”). You and Upwork then will seek informal voluntary resolution of the Claim. Any Notice must include pertinent account information, a brief description of the Claim, and contact information, so that you or Upwork, as applicable, may evaluate the Claim and attempt to informally resolve it. Both you and Upwork will have 60 days from the date of the receipt of the Notice to informally resolve the other party’s Claim and avoid the need for further action.
14.4 BINDING ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION/JURY TRIAL WAIVER (DOES NOT APPLY TO USERS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES AND ITS TERRITORIES)
This Arbitration Provision applies to all Users located in or who reside in the United States and its territories.
In the unlikely event the parties are unable to resolve a Claim within 60 days of the receipt of the applicable Notice, you, Upwork, and our Affiliates agree to resolve the Claim by final and binding individual arbitration before an arbitrator from JAMS, instead of a court or jury. JAMS may be contacted at www.jamsadr.com.
14.4.1 SCOPE OF ARBITRATION AGREEMENT AND CONDUCT OF ARBITRATION
This Arbitration Provision applies to any Claim (defined above) the parties may have, whether based on past, present, or future events, and includes all claims and disputes that arose between the parties before the effective date of this Agreement, and survives after your relationship with Upwork ends. This Arbitration Provision is intended to apply to the resolution of disputes that otherwise would be resolved in a court of law or before a forum other than arbitration. If for any reason JAMS will not administer the arbitration, either party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction with authority over the location where the arbitration will be conducted for appointment of a neutral arbitrator.
Except as otherwise provided in this Agreement, arbitration will be conducted in Santa Clara County, California in accordance with the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures’ Optional Expedited Arbitration Procedures then in effect. All arbitrations shall be conducted in accordance with the JAMS Mass Arbitration Procedures and Guidelines, any conflicting procedures in this Section notwithstanding. For purposes of Section 1(c) of the JAMS Mass Arbitration Procedures and Guidelines, a Mass Arbitration is defined as 10 or more similar demands for Arbitration. Claims by Freelancers that allege employment or worker classification disputes will be conducted in the state and within 25 miles of where Freelancer is located in accordance with the JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules and Procedures then in effect. The applicable JAMS arbitration rules may be found at www.jamsadr.com. Any dispute regarding the applicability of a particular set of JAMS rules shall be resolved exclusively by the arbitrator. Any party will have the right to appear at the arbitration by telephone and/or video rather than in person.
You and Upwork will follow the applicable JAMS rules with respect to filing or initial appearance and arbitration fees. The arbitrator shall follow applicable law and may award only those remedies that would have applied had the matter been heard in court. Judgment may be entered on the arbitrator’s decision in any court having jurisdiction.
This Arbitration Provision does not apply to litigation between Upwork and you that is or was already pending in a state or federal court or arbitration before the expiration of the opt-out period set forth in Section 14.4.4 below. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, no amendment to this Arbitration Provision will apply to any matter pending in an arbitration proceeding brought under this Section 14 unless all parties to that arbitration consent in writing to that amendment.
This Arbitration Provision also does not apply to claims for workers compensation, state disability insurance, or unemployment insurance benefits.
Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents you from making a report to or filing a claim or charge with a government agency, including without limitation the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, U.S. Department of Labor, U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, National Labor Relations Board, or Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents the investigation by a government agency of any report, claim or charge otherwise covered by this Arbitration Provision. This Arbitration Provision also does not prevent federal administrative agencies from adjudicating claims and awarding remedies based on those claims, even if the claims would otherwise be covered by this Arbitration Provision. Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents or excuses a party from satisfying any conditions precedent or exhausting administrative remedies under applicable law before bringing a claim in arbitration. Upwork will not retaliate against you for filing a claim with an administrative agency or for exercising rights (individually or in concert with others) under Section 7 of the National Labor Relations Act.
14.4.2 INTERPRETATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS ARBITRATION PROVISION
This Arbitration Provision is the full and complete agreement relating to the formal resolution of Claims. The parties agree that the arbitrator shall have exclusive jurisdiction to decide all disputes arising out of or relating to the arbitrability of a Claim or the interpretation, enforcement, or application of this Arbitration Provision, including the enforceability, revocability, scope, breach, or validity of the Arbitration Provision or any portion of the Arbitration Provision, except as expressly provided below. All such matters shall be decided by an arbitrator and not by a court. The parties expressly agree that, except as provided by the Class and Collective Waiver section below, the arbitrator and not a court will decide any question of whether the parties agreed to arbitrate, including but not limited to any claim that all or part of this Arbitration Provision, this Agreement, or any other part of the Terms of Service is void or voidable.
Nothing in this Section shall be interpreted to limit the authority or jurisdiction of a Process Administrator under the JAMS Mass Arbitration Procedures and Guidelines.
In the event any portion of this Arbitration Provision is deemed unenforceable, the remainder of this Arbitration Provision will be enforceable, except as set forth in Section 14.4.3 below.
14.4.3 CLASS AND COLLECTIVE WAIVER
Private attorney general representative actions under the California Labor Code are not arbitrable, not within the scope of this Arbitration Provision and may be maintained in a court of law. However, this Arbitration Provision affects your ability to participate in class or collective actions. Both you and Upwork agree to bring any dispute in arbitration on an individual basis only, and not on a class or collective basis on behalf of others. There will be no right or authority for any dispute to be brought, heard or arbitrated as a class or collective action, or as a member in any such class or collective proceeding (“
Class Action Waiver
”). Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement or the JAMS rules, disputes regarding the enforceability, revocability, scope, validity, or breach of the Class Action Waiver may be resolved only by a civil court of competent jurisdiction and not by an arbitrator. If there is a final judicial determination that all or part of the Class Action Waiver is unenforceable or that an arbitration can proceed on a class basis, then the arbitration provision herein shall be considered null and void in its entirety and the class or collective action to that extent must be litigated in a civil court of competent jurisdiction. Other than as provided for by the JAMS Mass Arbitration Procedures and Guidelines, no arbitration or proceeding will be combined with another without the prior written consent of all parties to all affected arbitrations or proceedings. You and Upwork agree that you will not be retaliated against as a result of your filing or participating in a class or collective action in any forum. However, Upwork may lawfully seek enforcement of this Arbitration Provision and the Class Action Waiver under the Federal Arbitration Act and seek dismissal of such class or collective actions or claims.
14.4.4 RIGHT TO OPT OUT OF THE ARBITRATION PROVISION
You may opt out of the Arbitration Provision contained in this Section 14 by notifying Upwork in writing within 30 days of the date you first registered for the Site. To opt out, you must send a written notification to Upwork at Attn: Legal, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998 that includes (a) your Account username, (b) your name, (c) your address, (d) your telephone number, (e) your email address, and (f) a statement indicating that you wish to opt out of the Arbitration Provision. Alternatively, you may send this written notification to legalnotices@upwork.com.
Opting out of this Arbitration Provision will not affect any other terms of this Agreement.
If you do not opt out as provided in this Section 14.4.4, continuing your relationship with Upwork constitutes mutual acceptance of the terms of this Arbitration Provision by you and Upwork. You have the right to consult with counsel of your choice concerning this Agreement and the Arbitration Provision.
14.4.5 Enforcement of this Arbitration Provision
This Arbitration Provision replaces all prior agreements regarding the arbitration of disputes and is the full and complete agreement relating to the formal resolution of disputes covered by this Arbitration Provision. In the event any portion of this Arbitration Provision is deemed unenforceable, the remainder of this Arbitration Provision will be enforceable.
15. GENERAL
Additional terms of the agreement between you and Upwork, including that the Terms of Service contain our full agreement, how the agreement will be interpreted and applied, and your agreement not to access the Site from certain locations.
15.1 ENTIRE AGREEMENT
This Agreement, together with the other
Terms of Service
, is the only agreement between you and us regarding the Services and supersedes all prior agreements for the Services and supersedes any prior agreements between us for actions occurring after the effective date of this Agreement. The only exception to this is a Enterprise Agreement or similar agreement for premium services executed by a duly authorized representative of Upwork (“
Premium Agreement
”), in which cases these Terms of Service are superseded to the extent stated in such Premium Agreement but otherwise survive; written email or letter communications or verbal agreements cannot constitute a Premium Agreement.
15.2 MODIFICATIONS; WAIVER
We may modify these terms and will provide you reasonable advance notice of substantial changes.
Subject to the conditions set forth herein, Upwork may amend this Agreement and any of the other agreements that comprise the Terms of Service at any time by posting a revised version on the Site. Upwork will provide reasonable advance notice of any amendment that includes a Substantial Change (defined below), by posting the updated Terms of Service on the Site and providing notice on the Site or by email. If the Substantial Change includes an increase to Fees charged by Upwork, Upwork will provide at least 30 days’ advance notice of the change, but may not provide any advance notice for changes resulting in a reduction in Fees, any temporary or promotional Fee change, or changes that do not constitute a Substantial Change. Any revisions to the Terms of Service will take effect on the noted effective date. No modification or amendment to the Terms of Service will be binding upon Upwork unless they are agreed in a written instrument signed by a duly authorized representative of Upwork or posted on the Site by Upwork. Email will not constitute a written instrument as contemplated by this Section 15.2.
Our failure to act with respect to a breach by you or others does not waive our right to act with respect to subsequent or similar breaches. We do not guarantee we will take action against all breaches of this User Agreement.
15.3 ASSIGNABILITY
You may not transfer any rights you have under our Terms of Service unless we give you approval
These Terms of Service and any rights or obligations hereunder may not be transferred or assigned by you unless you follow the provisions in this Section.
In order to assign the Terms of Service or your Account to a successor after an acquisition of your company or substantially all of your assets, a merger, or another change in majority ownership of your company, you must provide written notice to Upwork Attn: Legal, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998 or via email to
legalnotices@upwork.com
that includes (a) your Account username, (b) your name, (c) your address, (d) your telephone number, (e) your email address, (f) a statement indicating the manner in which your company was acquired, (g) the name and contact information of the acquiror, and (h) the effective date of such change in ownership. If Upwork does not object via email within 5 business days of sending of an email or 7 business days of the mailing of a written notice, then the assignment is permissible, provided in both cases that such notice is properly addressed. The foregoing does not apply to Enterprise Clients.
No other assignments are valid without Upwork’s prior written consent, which can be requested via email or letter at the above addresses. Any other attempted transfer or assignment will be null and void.
15.4 SEVERABILITY; INTERPRETATION
If any provision of this Agreement is invalid or unenforceable under applicable law, then it will be changed and interpreted to accomplish the objectives of such provision to the greatest extent possible under applicable law, and the remaining provisions of this Agreement will continue in full force and effect. To the extent any provision of this Agreement or the other Terms of Service is held illegal, invalid, or unenforceable in whole or in part under applicable law, such provision or such portion thereof will be ineffective as to the jurisdiction in which it is illegal, invalid, or unenforceable to the extent of its illegality, invalidity, or unenforceability and will be deemed modified to the extent necessary to conform to applicable law so as to give the maximum effect to the intent of the parties. The illegality, invalidity, or unenforceability of such provision in one jurisdiction will not in any way affect the legality, validity, or enforceability of that or any other provision in any other jurisdiction.
15.5 FORCE MAJEURE
When certain circumstances beyond your or our control arise, we both will be temporarily relieved from performing our obligations under this Agreement.
The parties to this Agreement will not be responsible for any delay or failure to perform any obligation under this Agreement for a reasonable period due to labor disturbances, accidents, fires, floods, pandemics, telecommunications or Internet failures, strikes, wars, riots, rebellions, terrorism, blockades, acts of government, governmental requirements and regulations or restrictions imposed by law or any other similar event beyond the parties’ reasonable control.
15.6 PREVAILING LANGUAGE AND LOCATION
The English language version of the Terms of Service will be controlling in all respects and will prevail in case of any inconsistencies with translated versions, if any. The Site is controlled and operated from our facilities in the United States.
15.7 ACCESS OF THE SITE OUTSIDE THE UNITED STATES
Upwork makes no representations that the Site or Services are appropriate or available for use outside of the United States. Those who access or use the Site from other jurisdictions do so at their own risk and are entirely responsible for compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, both in the United States and abroad, including export and import regulations (e.g., the Export Administration Regulations maintained by the U.S. Department of Commerce and the sanctions programs maintained by the U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control). You must not directly or indirectly sell, export, re-export, transfer, divert, or otherwise dispose of any software or service to any end user without obtaining any and all required authorizations from the appropriate government authorities. You also warrant that you are not prohibited from receiving U.S. origin products, including services or software.
In order to access or use the Services, you must and hereby represent that neither you, any company you represent, nor any beneficial owner of you or your company are: (a) a citizen or resident of a geographic area in which access to or use of the Site or Site Services is prohibited by applicable law, decree, regulation, treaty, or administrative act; (b) a citizen or resident of, or located in, a geographic area that is subject to U.S. or other sovereign country sanctions or embargoes; or (c) an individual, or an individual employed by or associated with an entity, identified on the U.S. Department of Commerce Denied Persons or Entity List, the U.S. Department of Treasury Specially Designated Nationals or Blocked Persons Lists, or the U.S. Department of State Debarred Parties List or otherwise ineligible to receive items subject to U.S. export control laws and regulations or other economic sanction rules of any sovereign nation. You agree that if your country of residence or other circumstances change such that the above representations are no longer accurate, that you will immediately cease using the Services and your license to use the Services will be immediately revoked.
15.8 CONSENT TO USE ELECTRONIC RECORDS
Upwork and its Affiliates may need to provide you with certain communications, notices, agreements, statements or disclosures in writing regarding our Services. You consent to receive these records electronically from Upwork and its Affiliates rather than in paper form.
16. DEFINITIONS
Below we define capitalized terms that appear in this Agreement or other parts of the Terms of Service. Other capitalized terms are defined above, which you can tell because the term is put in quotation marks and bold font.
Capitalized terms not defined below or above have the meanings described in the Site
Terms of Use
or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
“
Client
” means any authorized User of the Site or Site Services, including Direct Contract Services, to seek or obtain Freelancer Services, including from another User.
“
Confidential Information
” means any material or information provided to, or created by, a User to evaluate a Project or the suitability of another User for the Project, or provided in connection with a Project, regardless of whether the information is in tangible, electronic, verbal, graphic, visual, or other form. Confidential Information does not include material or information that: (a) is generally known by third parties as a result of no act or omission of Freelancer or Client; (b) was lawfully received by User without restriction from a third party having the right to disseminate the information; (c) was already known by User prior to receiving it from the other party and was not received from a third party in breach of that third party’s obligations of confidentiality; or (d) was independently developed by User without use of another person’s Confidential Information.
“
Direct Contract”
means a Service Contract entered into on Upwork between a Freelancer on Upwork and an eligible client of the Freelancer’s. Eligible clients are those who were not already or previously registered on Upwork when the initial Service Contract was sent. The eligible client must register for an Upwork Account and accept the contract from the Freelancer. Users with a Direct Contract enter into the applicable Service Contract Escrow Instructions, depending on whether the contract entered is an hourly or a fixed-price contract.
“
Escrow Account
” means Client Escrow Account, Freelancer Escrow Account, or Fixed-Price Escrow Account.
“
Escrow Instructions
” means the
Escrow Instructions
agreement that is relevant to the Service Contract.
“
Fixed-Price Contract
” means a Service Contract for which Client is charged a fixed fee agreed between a Client and a Freelancer, prior to the commencement of a Service Contract, for the completion of all Freelancer Services contracted by Client for such Service Contract.
“
Freelancer
” means any authorized User of the Site or Site Services, including Any Hire Services, that utilizes the Site to advertise, provide, or receive payment for the provision of Freelancer Services to Clients, including Agency Member Accounts and Freelancer Accounts that are part of Agency Accounts.
“
Freelancer Fees
” means: (a) for an Hourly Contract, the amount reflected in the Hourly Invoice (the number of hours invoiced by Freelancer, multiplied by the hourly rate charged by Freelancer); (b) for a Fixed-Price Contract, the fixed fee agreed between a Client and a Freelancer; and (c) any bonuses or other payments made by a Client to a Freelancer.
“
Freelancer Services
” means all services performed for or delivered to Clients by Freelancers.
“
Hourly Contract
” means a Service Contract for which Client is charged based on the hourly rate charged by Freelancer.
“
Hourly Invoice
” means the report of hours invoiced for a stated period by a Freelancer for Freelancer Services performed for a Client.
The term “
including
” as used herein means including without limitation.
“
Intellectual Property Rights
” means all patent rights, copyright rights, mask work rights, moral rights, rights of publicity, trademark, trade dress and service mark rights, goodwill, trade secret rights and other intellectual property rights as may now exist or hereafter come into existence, and all applications therefore and registrations, renewals and extensions thereof, in each case, under the laws of any state, country, territory or other jurisdiction.
“
Payment Method
” means a valid credit card issued by a bank acceptable to Upwork, a bank account linked to your Account, a PayPal account, a debit card, or such other method of payment as Upwork may accept from time to time in our sole discretion.
“
Project
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services that a Freelancer provides to a Client under a Service Contract on the Site.
“
Staffing Employee
” means a Freelancer enrolled in Upwork Payroll, accepted for employment by a Staffing Provider, and assigned by the Staffing Provider to provide Freelancer Services to one or more Client(s).
“
Service Contract
” means, as applicable, (a) the contractual provisions between a marketplace or Direct Contract Client and a Freelancer governing the Freelancer Services to be performed by a Freelancer for Client for a Project; (b) an Any Hire Contract as defined in the Upwork
Any Hire Terms
; or (c) if you use Upwork Payroll, the contractual provisions between Freelancer and the Staffing Provider for the provision of services to Client, if any.
“
Substantial Change
” means a change to the terms of the Terms of Service that materially reduces your rights or increases your responsibilities.
“
Upwork App
” means the online platform accessed using Upwork’s downloaded application or other software that enables time tracking and invoicing, chat, and screenshot sharing with other Users.
“
User Content
” means any comments, remarks, data, feedback, content, text, photographs, images, video, music, or other content or information that you or any Site Visitor or User post to any part of the Site or provide to Upwork, including such content or information that is originally generated through the use of generative AI tools or as a result of questions.
“
Work Product
” means any tangible or intangible results or deliverables that Freelancer agrees to create for, or actually delivers to, Client as a result of performing the Freelancer Services, including, but not limited to, configurations, computer programs, or other information, or customized hardware, and any intellectual property developed in connection therewith.
Effective December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This document explain the rules that keep our marketplace running.
We call these rules our
Terms of Use
. They apply to upwork.com and all the websites and apps we own or run. (And by
we
, we mean
Upwork and our affiliates
, which we may also refer to as
us
.)
These terms explain how we expect you to behave when you’re using Upwork – whether you’re a registered
user
or unregistered
site visitor
on our site.
Please read these rules carefully: by using our site, you’re agreeing to follow them.
Contents
1. About licenses and third party content
1.1 We let you use our site and services
1.2 We can stop you using our site and services
1.3 We keep the rights to our intellectual property
1.4 You can use Upwork to share your content with the world
1.4.1 You’re responsible for what you post
1.4.2 Other people have some rights to what you post
1.4.3 We’re open to your ideas
1.5 Third parties post on Upwork too
1.6 You can make a copyright complaint
2. What you’re allowed to do on Upwork
3. What you’re not allowed to do on Upwork
3.1 Post unacceptable content
3.2 Act in a misleading or fraudulent way
3.3 Treat others unfairly
3.4 Abuse our feedback system
3.5 Other uses that aren’t allowed
4. Enforcing our terms of use
4.1 We enforce these rules
4.2 Tell us if you see someone breaking these rules
5. Definitions
When you see this
symbol, look for a simple summary for each section. We wrote these to help you get a quick overview, but you'll need to read the sections completely to get all the details of what you're agreeing to.
1. About licenses and third party content
Here we’ve included the conditions for using our site, which we do our best to keep running smoothly (1.1). That means we have the right to stop people from using our site and services if needed (1.2).
You can’t use our intellectual property (1.3), but you can post your own content to Upwork. You’re responsible for this content (1.4), and equally, we’re not responsible for content you come across from other users (1.5). If you think someone is using something you’ve copyrighted, just let us know (1.6).
1.1 We let you use our site and services
Technically, we’re giving you a ‘limited license’ to the site. Here’s what that means.
We’re happy for you to access our website and services (known as the
services
). You’re free to have this access (or
limited license
) as long as you follow these terms of use and all of our other
Terms of Service
as they apply to you.
We’ll do our best to make sure our
services
are safe and working as they should, but we can’t guarantee you’ll have access continuously. In fact, we might even stop providing certain features or the services completely, and don’t have to give notice if we do.
1.2 We can stop letting you use our services
We can take away your right to use our services at any time.
If you violate our Terms of Use or other parts of our
Terms of Service
, we can take away your access to Upwork. Officially, this is called terminating your license,
and if it happens, we’ll tell you and you must stop using our services immediately.
1.3 We keep the rights to our intellectual property
Using our services doesn’t mean you can use any of our trademarks or other intellectual property, like copyrights and patents. We keep all of our rights to our intellectual property, even though we let you use our services.
Our logos and names are our trademarks and registered in certain jurisdictions. Any other product or company names, logos or similar marks and symbols you see on Upwork may be trademarked by our partners or other users like you.
1.4 You can use Upwork to share your content with the world
1.4.1 You’re responsible for what you post
You’re responsible for how you use our site and anything you post on it. If someone makes a claim against us because of anything you put on the site, you agree to compensate us for our legal fees and expenses (the lawyers call this, ‘indemnification’).
When you post
content
on (or through) our site or give us content for posting, you agree that you’re completely responsible for that content and we’re not. You also agree to only post or give us content that:
you have the right to post
is legal
doesn’t violate anyone’s rights, including intellectual property rights.
You acknowledge and agree that whoever posts content is responsible for any harm caused to anyone by that content – not Upwork – and that you’ll compensate and defend us, our partners, employees and representatives against any costs or legal or government action we have because of your content.
1.4.2 Other people have some rights to what you post
By posting content on the site, you give other people some rights to that content.
Whenever you post content on our site, you give us and our affiliates a permanent right (called an ‘irrevocable and non-exclusive worldwide license’) to use, edit and share that content – across the world and without paying royalties. If your name, voice and image appear in content you post, we also might use those on the site or in our day-to-day business. For example, if you’re a freelancer, we might share your profile with clients we think could be a good match.
You also give each user and site visitor the right to access and use your content through the site. They also have the right to use, copy and share your content – as long as they do it through the site, and follow both
our Terms of Service
and the law.
We might show ads near your content and information, without compensating you. Depending on choices you make in your profile, we might also include your name or photo when promoting one of our features.
1.4.3 We’re open to your ideas
We’d love to hear your thoughts on improving Upwork. Here’s what happens when you share them.
You can send us comments and suggestions about our services and ways to improve them. If you do, you’re agreeing your ideas are free and unsolicited, and you don’t expect or ask anything in return, unless we’ve specifically asked you for your ideas and offered something in return (we like to keep our word).
You agree we’re free to use, change and share the idea as we like, without being obligated to to give you anything for it. And if you do send us an idea, you also agree that this doesn’t affect our right to use similar or related
ideas
–
including those we already have or get from others.
1.5 Third parties post on Upwork, too
Anyone else who uses our site is responsible for what they post or link on Upwork.
We’re not responsible for the accuracy or reliability of any content shared by other people on our site, unless they’re officially working for us when they share or post the content. Any content represents the views of the person sharing it, not Upwork.
Our site might also contain links or other access to third-party websites and applications. These sites and applications are owned and run by other parties, not Upwork. If we use a link or application that goes to a third-party website, it doesn’t mean that we endorse it and you agree that you use it without our endorsement.
1.6 You can make a copyright complaint
If you think content on our site infringes your rights, you can ask to have it removed.
We’re committed to following U.S. copyright and related laws and need site visitors and users to follow them as well. That means you can’t use our site to store or share anything that infringes anyone’s intellectual property rights, including their rights under U.S. copyright law.
If you own copyrighted work and think your rights under U.S. copyright law have been infringed by anything on our site, the Digital Millennium Copyright Act means you can ask us to take it down.
Here’s how to report it
.
2. What you’re allowed to
do on Upwork
You can only use our services for work and to learn from the information we share.
Our site and services were made to be used for business, not for personal or consumer use. We run our marketplace to help users find each other, build working relationships, and make and receive payments for that work.
You can also use some of our services to get information we think might be interesting and useful for our site visitors and users – like our Upwork blog. While we do our best to make sure that this information is timely and accurate, there might sometimes be mistakes. We don’t make any guarantees about information posted on our site, so never use it as tax or legal advice. And you should always double-check the information for yourself.
3. What you’re
not
allowed to do on Upwork
Certain uses of the site are not allowed. Here we go into much more depth about those things, including:
posting unacceptable content (3.1)
acting in a misleading or fraudulent way (3.2)
treating others unfairly (3.3)
abusing our feedback system (3.4)
other uses that aren’t allowed (3.5)
In short, you’re not allowed to use our services to do (or encourage others to do) anything that is illegal, fraudulent or harmful. If you don’t see something on one of the lists below, you shouldn’t assume it’s allowed. When in doubt, contact us to check.
3.1 Posting unacceptable content
You can’t offer, share, support or try to find anything that:
is illegal or defamatory
is violent, discriminatory or harassing, either generally or towards a specific person or group (or encourages others to be), including anyone who is part of a legally protected group
is sexually explicit or related to sex work or escort services
is in any way related to child exploitation
would infringe on any intellectual property rights, including copyrights
would violate our
Terms of Service,
another website’s
terms of service, or any similar contract
would go against professional or academic standards or policies – including improperly submitting someone else’s work as your own, or by ghost-writing essays, tests, or certifications
involves purchasing or requesting a fake review or is connected in any way to making or sharing misleading content (like ‘deep fakes’ or ‘fake news’) which is intended to deceive others.
3.2 Acting in a misleading or fraudulent way
On Upwork, you can’t do anything that’s dishonest or meant to fool others.
You can’t misrepresent yourself, your experience, skills or professional qualifications, or that of others. This includes:
lying about your experience, skills or professional qualifications
using generative AI or other tools to substantially bolster your job proposals or work product if such use is restricted by your client or violates any third-party's rights
passing off any part of someone else’s profile or identity as your own
using a profile picture that isn’t you, misrepresents your identity or is someone else
impersonating or falsely attributing statements to any person or entity, including an Upwork representative or forum leader
falsely claiming or implying you’re connected to a person or organization (including Upwork) – for example, you can’t say you work for a particular company when you don’t, and agencies can’t use a freelancer’s
profile if they’ve stopped working together.
Similarly, you must always be honest about who’s doing the work. That means you can’t:
allow someone else to use your account, which misleads other users or
falsely claim one freelancer will do a job when another will actually do it – including submitting a proposal on behalf of a freelancer who can’t or won’t do the work.
We’re particularly invested in avoiding fraud and misrepresentations when it comes to payments. This means:
Freelancers can’t fraudulently charge a client in any way, including by:
falsifying the hours, keystrokes or clicks recorded in the Upwork app
reporting or billing time you haven’t actually worked
reporting time worked by someone else and claiming you did the work
demanding bribes or other payments without the intention of or without actually providing services in exchange for the payment.
Clients can’t engage in fraud related to payments, including by:
posting jobs with payment terms that are objectively unreasonable or disproportionate to the scope of services requested
hiring themselves as freelancers and paying themselves
demanding services without the intention of or without actually providing payment in exchange for the services.
3.3 Treating others unfairly
Everyone should be treated fairly and legally on Upwork.
You can’t use Upwork to:
express an unlawful preference in a job post or proposal
unlawfully discriminate against someone
incite or encourage violence
post personal identifying information or other sensitive, private data about another person
spam other users with proposals or invites. This includes posting the same job several times at once and contacting people you connected with on Upwork outside of Upwork without their permission
make or demand bribes or payments for anything other than the work
ask for or demand free work – you can’t ask freelancers to submit work for little or no payment as part of a proposal bid or competition
request a fee in order to submit a proposal
request or provide services that primarily concern making purchases on behalf of another, including the purchase of cryptocurrency or NFTs.
3.4 Abusing our feedback system
You must use our feedback system honestly and fairly.
That means you can’t:
withhold payment or work until you’ve been given positive feedback
swap payment (or anything of value) for feedback, including with third parties
coerce another user by threatening negative feedback
use the system to share unrelated views (like about politics or religion)
offer or accept fake services to improve your feedback or rating score, which is called feedback building
hire and rate yourself.
3.5 Other uses that aren’t allowed
Upwork relies on technology and trust – here’s how we maintain those things.
You can’t copy, share or give away your account.
You can’t have multiple accounts and you can’t sell, trade or give your account to anyone else without our permission.
You can’t go around us.
In particular, you can’t talk to another user or ask for or share a way to get in touch - a
means of direct contact
- outside of Upwork before you’ve agreed to a service contract. This means you can’t add your contact details to a job post, your profile, communications or other content. (There are exceptions to this for Enterprise clients.)
You can’t promote other organizations
– including advertising any other websites, products or services. You also can’t use our site to recruit freelancers or clients to join another agency, website or company, unless you pay us a fee to do so. For more information, take a look at Section 7 of our User Agreement.
You can’t interfere with our technology or tamper with our site or services
. That means you can’t:
bypass any security features we’ve put in place to restrict how you use the site – you’re not allowed to try and get around restrictions on copying content
interfere with or compromise our systems, server security, or transmissions
use a robot, spider, scraper, or similar mechanisms on our site without written permission
copy, distribute, or otherwise use any information you found on Upwork, if whether directly or through third parties (like search engines), without our consent (no scraping allowed)
collect or use identifiable information, including account names)
overwhelm the site with an unreasonable or large amount of information
introduce any malware or any other code or viruses that could harm us, our customers, or our services
access our services through any technology other than our interface
frame or link to the services without our written permission
use our services to build a similar service, identify or poach our users or publish any performance or benchmark analysis relating to the site
reverse engineer, decipher, modify, or take source code from our site that is not open source without our written permission.
4. Enforcing our terms of use
If you break any of these rules, we can suspend your account and stop you from using Upwork (4.1). If you see someone else breaking these rules, please let us know (4.2).
4.1 We enforce these rules
We have the right to look into any potential violations of these terms of use, and might decide to pause, change or take away any content on our site when we do.
We can’t guarantee that we’ll take action against every potential violation, but just because we don’t take action against one breach doesn’t waive our right to take action against any future breaches, whether they’re related to the first breach or not.
If we do suspect rule-breaking, we can stop you using our site at any time. If we disable or close your account, you won’t be able to use any of our services, but these things will stay in place:
our rights to use and share your feedback
our users’ and visitors' rights to share your content (1.4.2)
your agreement to all the rules laid out in section 3 on this page.
4.2 Tell us if you see someone breaking these rules
What to do if you become aware of a violation of our Terms of Use.
If you believe anyone is breaking any of our terms of use, please let our customer service team know or report it wherever you see this flag:
If we follow up on the breach, you agree to help with our investigation and take reasonable steps to help us fix the problem.
5. Definitions
Here, we explain some of the terms we’ve used in our Terms of Use. Any other terms in italics should be defined when they’re mentioned, in the
User Agreement
or
Terms of Service
.
An
affiliate
is anyone or anything that in any way manages, is managed by, or shares management with us.
A
c
lient
is someone using our site to find freelancer services from another user.
A
deep fake
is a video or image that has been changed to replace one person with another in a deliberately misleading way, without asking the person whose face has been used.
A
freelancer
is an individual or agency using our site to offer their services to clients.
Freelancer services
refer to the work freelancers do on Upwork.
A
means of direct contact
is information that would let someone get in touch with you directly (or find the information to do that) so you can bypass our site. For example, phone numbers, email and physical addresses, social media accounts, and personal websites with contact information are
means of direct contact
.
Site services
are all services, applications and products – apart from freelancer services – that people can access through Upwork.
Content
is what users post to Upwork themselves, like comments, profiles, feedback, images, or other information. It includes anything posted by you even if elements of the content were originally generated by generative AI or other tools, or in response to questions posed to you by Upwork or other users or Upwork.
Effective September 20th 2022
Download
Summary of changes
Added Any Hire Fees for engagements through International and Domestic Payroll
Table of Contents
This Upwork Any Hire Terms (“
Any Hire Terms
”) defines the agreement between you (the “
Client
” or the “
Freelancer
”, as applicable) and Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) regarding Any Hire services offered through the Site at
www.upwork.com/anyhire
as described in these Any Hire Terms (“
Any Hire Services
”), and are part of and incorporate by reference the
Upwork User Agreement
and other
Terms of Service
(collectively, the “
Agreement
”). The Any Hire Terms is in addition to and, except where explicitly stated, does not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the User Agreement or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
In order to use Any Hire Services, you agree to be bound by the Any Hire contract terms and the
Dispute Process and Arbitration and Class Action Waiver
in the User Agreement. If you do not accept these terms, including the arbitration and class action waiver, you may not use or access any Any Hire Services.
1. ESCROW SERVICES
Client and Freelancer acknowledge and agree that the
Any Hire Contract Escrow Instructions
apply to any engagements via the Any Hire Services (each such engagement, an “
Any Hire Contract
”). Upwork Escrow provides escrow services, but does not guarantee that Freelancer will be paid except and only to the extent that all of the following are true: (a) Upwork has received funds from Client on behalf of the Freelancer, (b) Client has directed such funds to be released to Freelancer, and (c) any hold or security period has passed. Upwork otherwise does not guarantee that Client is able to or will pay Freelancer. Client and Freelancer acknowledge that
these escrow services are intended for business use, and agree to use these escrow services only for business purposes and not for consumer, personal, family, or household purposes.
2. ROLE OF UPWORK
Client and Freelancer understand and agree that Upwork is not involved in or responsible for any work performed by Freelancer(s), is not involved in or responsible for any payment made under a Any Hire Contract except as provided in Section 1 (Escrow Services), and has no control over any Freelancer or Client. Upwork does not guarantee that Client or Freelancer will perform on the Any Hire Contract. Upwork does not have any power or authority to, and does not, determine any eligibility standards for any Any Hire Contract, select or contract any Freelancer to provide services to Client, determine or control any term or condition of the Any Hire Contract or Project, or cause any Freelancer to accept any Any Hire Contract or perform any Freelancer Services. The Parties agree that Client will select the freelancer, that the scope of work will be set exclusively by agreement between Client and Freelancer, and that Client and Freelancer will take up any issues with the work and/or its scope between each other.
3. ANY HIRE COMPLIANCE SERVICES
3.1 WORKER CLASSIFICATION
Upwork will determine the appropriate worker classification (e.g., independent contractor or employee) for each Engagement based on the information that Client and Freelancer provide about the applicable Any Hire Contract. Determining the proper classification for a Freelancer depends on many factors, including information in Client’s control. Client and Freelancer agree to provide Upwork with all information requested that is related to the Any Hire Contract and the classification of a Freelancer in a timely, accurate, and complete manner and notify Upwork immediately if any such information changes.
3.2 FREELANCER ENGAGEMENT
If Client accepts Upwork’s worker classification, Upwork will, based on its worker classification, either: (i) engage the Freelancer as an independent contractor for up to a six-month term, with Upwork Talent Group Inc. acting as agent of record for Client for such purpose, or (ii) cause the Freelancer to be hired as an employee through Upwork Payroll Services (as defined in the
Upwork Payroll Agreement
). Upwork may delegate the engagement of Freelancers (and other obligations regarding Freelancers under this Agreement) to one or more third parties. Upwork and Staffing Provider reserve the right not to engage or hire a Freelancer in their sole discretion. Upwork will cause each Freelancer classified under Upwork’s classification services and engaged as an independent contractor to execute an Independent Contractor Agreement. Upwork (through Staffing Provider) will cause each Freelancer classified and hired as an employee to execute an employment agreement containing confidentiality and intellectual property assignment provisions consistent with this Agreement.
At the end of any six-month independent contractor agreement term, Client may seek to re-enage the Freelancer via Any Hire, and the engagement and worker classification process will begin again.
3.3 OPTION TO REJECT CLASSIFICATION SERVICES
A Client may choose to decline the worker classification services described in Section 3.1. If Client does not accept Upwork’s worker classification, the Client may engage the Freelancer as the Client so chooses, but Upwork shall not be responsible for the classification of the worker or the engagement of the worker. Client shall have sole responsibility of engaging the Freelancer (including preparing any independent contractor agreement or using the
Optional Service Contract Terms
). In addition, if Client declines the worker classification services and still engages the Freelancer, Section 8.2 shall not apply; Client shall have no right to indemnity or any other remedy against Upwork, except as provided in the User Agreement
Section 10
,
Section 11
, and
Section 12
, all three of which shall be deemed to control any conflict with these Upwork Any Hire Terms.
3.4 LEGAL COMPLIANCE
Upwork, Staffing Provider, or any third party acting to engage a Freelancer, as applicable, shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing the engagement and payment of Freelancers; except that Upwork or Employment Provider shall not be liable for any non-compliance associated with any information provided by Client.
3.5 OWNERSHIP OF FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT
Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the independent contractor agreement or employee agreement with the Freelancer, as applicable, both of which will contain a provision that requires a Freelancer to assign all ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product to Client. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from an Any Hire Contract accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Client.
4. CLIENT RESPONSIBILITIES
4.1 ANY HIRE CONTRACTS
Client further agrees to immediately inform Upwork of any complaint or request made by Freelancer concerning any employment-related matter, such as a request for a leave of absence or disability accommodation or a complaint about harassment or discrimination. Client further acknowledges and agrees that Client will not dispute and is responsible for payment for all hours worked on an engagement that uses Upwork Payroll Services.
4.2 UPWORK PAYROLL AGREEMENTS
Client will inform Upwork 72 hours in advance, if possible, or as soon as possible thereafter, of the termination of any Any Hire Contract that uses Upwork Payroll Services. For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as employees, (i) Client will be deemed to have automatically approved all hours worked at the time Client is invoiced for the work, including overtime and (ii) Client authorizes and instructs Upwork to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on any weekly time sheet, including overtime payments. For Freelancers engaged by Upwork or Staffing Provider as employees, Client agrees to comply with all applicable laws (e.g., not requiring or encouraging any Freelancer to work without recording time, not discouraging or prohibiting Freelancers from taking any meal or rest periods authorized by law) and acknowledges and agrees it is responsible to pay that overtime wages.
4.3 NONDISCRIMINATION; COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS
Client to comply with, and to require any person who may interact with Freelancer on behalf of Client to comply with, Upwork’s
Nondiscrimination Statement
, and with all applicable laws in connection with the engagement of Freelancers, including without limitation, as applicable, worker safety laws, nondiscrimination laws, accommodation and leave laws, and privacy laws.
4.4 FREELANCER ELIGIBILITY LIMITATIONS
Any Hire Contracts may only be offered to Freelancers that do not have a pre-existing relationship with Upwork (e.g., a previously established Freelancer Account). If a Freelancer has a pre-existing relationship with Upwork, the Freelancer can be engaged through one of our other offerings, subject to the fees and other terms and conditions of such offerings.
4.5 CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS
Other than as stated in these Any Hire Terms, Client expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) except for the agent of record services, Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Client and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (iv) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work; (vi) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (vii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (viii) if there is a dispute between Client and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Client and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute; (ix) neither Upwork nor its Affiliates is an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any Freelancer or Client; and (x) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Any Hire Contract, independent contractor Freelancer(s) may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at his or her sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Site; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Client or Freelancer can or will actually complete a transaction.
5. FREELANCER ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS
Other than as stated in these Any Hire Terms, Freelancer expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) except for the agent of record services, Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Client and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (iv) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work; (vi) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (vii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (viii) if there is a dispute between Client and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Client and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute; (ix) neither Upwork nor its Affiliates is an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any Freelancer or Client; and (x) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Any Hire Contract, independent contractor Freelancer(s) may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at his or her sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Client’s listings on the Site; the ability of Clients to pay for the Freelancer Services; or that Client or Freelancer can or will actually complete a transaction.
6. FEES
6.1 CLIENT FEES
Client agrees to pay a flat fee per Any Hire Contract (“
Any Hire Fee
”) per two-week billing period (“
Billing Period
”) or any portion of a Billing Period as follows:
Freelancer engaged as an independent contractor: $49USD per month, billed each two-week billing period at $22.62USD
Freelancer engaged through Upwork Payroll (International): $49USD per month, billed each two-week billing period at $22.62USD
Freelancer engaged through Upwork Payroll (Domestic): $199USD per month, billed each two-week period at $91.60USD
Client also acknowledges and agrees that Client is responsible for applicable taxes and any Staffing Provider costs or applicable Payroll Services Fees (to be communicated at the start of the Any Hire Contract), as well as any payment processing fee.  Information on Upwork’s Payroll offering and applicable fees can be found in the
Upwork Payroll Agreement
. All fees are invoiced on the Monday after the end of the Billing Period. Client acknowledges and understands that payment is due in full the day the invoice is sent. Client agrees and authorizes Upwork to charge Client’s Payment Method the full amount invoiced during a Billing Period on the same day the invoice is issued.
6.2 FREELANCER FEES
Freelancers engaged on an Any Hire Contract are not charged Freelancer Service Fees (see Sections 2.1, 2.2, and 2.3 of the Fee and ACH Agreement) for such Any Hire Contract. However, Freelancers will pay any other applicable fees (see Section 2.4 of the Fee and ACH Agreement). If such Freelancer enters into a Service Contract other than an Any Hire Contract, such Service Contract will be subject to Service Fees as applicable.
7. CLIENT AND FREELANCER AUTHORIZATION
Client and Freelancer represent and warrant that it has the authority to agree to these Any Hire Terms on behalf of themselves and the business entity they represent. Any actions performed by Upwork personnel on the Site at Client’s direction, express or implied, will be considered to be actions by and at the direction of Client.
8. INDEMNIFICATION FOR CLIENT
8.1 INTERACTION WITH OTHER TERMS OF SERVICE
These Any Hire Terms controls for any express conflicts between the User Agreement or the
Upwork Payroll Agreement
and these Any Hire Terms concerning indemnification obligations and limitation of liability of Upwork or Client with respect to Any Hire Services only, except as provided in Section 3.3.
8.2 INDEMNIFICATION BY UPWORK
Upwork will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Client and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, judgments, or settlements awarded for Claims, up to a maximum of $50,000USD per Freelancer engaged under an Any Hire Contract, to the extent caused by: (i) Upwork’s misclassification of a Freelancer under the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Internal Revenue Code, state wage and hour law or any other law; (ii) the failure of Upwork or Employment Provider to make, when due, a payment to a Freelancer related to these Any Hire Terms; (iii) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (iv) Employment Provider’s violation of any law or regulation related to workplace safety or conduct, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment.
8.3 INDEMNIFICATION BY CLIENT
Client will indemnify, defend and hold harmless Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all Claims, and/or any and all losses, costs, damages, liabilities, judgments, or settlements awarded for such Claims to the extent arising out of, resulting from or in connection with Client’s or any director, officer, agent, employee of Client, or any other person with apparent or actual authority to act on behalf of Client: (i) in excess of $50,000USD per Freelancer engaged under an Any Hire Contract; (ii) violation of any law or regulation, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment; (iii) misuse or unauthorized use of the Site; (iv) content posted by or on behalf of Client or at Client’s direction; (v) failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations or any such failure by Upwork or the Employment Provider based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by Client or which Client failed to update or was caused by Client; (vi) direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; or (vii) breach of Client’s obligations in Section 5 (Client Responsibilities).
8.4 INDEMNIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under these Any Hire Terms; and (ii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Each Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of an indemnified Claim.
9. NO INDEMNIFICATION FOR FREELANCER
For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer shall have no right to indemnity or any other remedy against Upwork, except as provided in the
User Agreement
Section 10
,
Section 11
, and
Section 12
, all three of which shall be deemed to control any conflict with these Upwork Any Hire Terms.
10. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
THIS SECTION 10 (LIMITATION OF LIABILITY) ONLY APPLIES TO AN ANY HIRE CONTRACT AND IS NOT CUMULATIVE TO ANY OTHER LIMITATION OF LIABILITY. IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE UPWORK FROM CLIENT UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, AND (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 8 WITH RESPECT TO CLIENTS, IN NO EVENT WILL UPWORK BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN $50,000. CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
11. OTHER TERMS
This Agreement, including these Any Hire Terms along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service, represents the entire agreement with Upwork and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to Any Hire Services. To the extent of an express conflict between these Any Hire Terms and the other Terms of Service, these Any Hire Terms shall govern any matters involving Any Hire Services. Provisions of the User Agreement and other Terms of Service that do not expressly conflict with any provision of the Any Hire Terms or are being applied to any products or services other than the Any Hire Services apply in full force and effect. Without voiding or affecting the applicability of any other provision of the User Agreement to the Any Hire Terms, Client specifically reiterates its agreement to comply with the
DISPUTE PROCESS AND ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER
contained in Upwork’s User Agreement, and agrees that this provision applies with full force and effect to the Any Hire Terms.
You agree that you did not accept the Any Hire Terms based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained in these Any Hire Terms along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service. No modification of or amendment to the Any Hire Terms, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by you and Upwork.
Effective February 28th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions
Any Hire Escrow Instructions
Upwork Escrow Inc.
Effective October 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This modified version of Upwork's Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions is effective October 31, 2024.
Click
here
to review the current Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions.
If Client and Freelancer enter into an Hourly Contract, if Client makes a bonus or expense payment to Freelancer, or if you use Upwork Payroll, this Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions (“
Agreement
”) applies.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may modify this Agreement, and the Escrow Instructions it contains, without prior notice to you, and any revisions to the Agreement will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. Please check the Site often for updates.
This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement are defined in the
User Agreement
, elsewhere in the Terms of Service, or have the meanings given such terms on the Site. The Escrow Instructions in this Agreement do not apply to Fixed-Price Escrow Accounts, except that they govern the making and receiving of bonus, expense and other miscellaneous payments for Fixed-Price Contracts.
Escrow services are provided by Upwork Escrow Inc. (“
Upwork Escrow
”) pursuant to Internet Escrow Agent license no. 9635086, issued by the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.
1. DIGITAL SIGNATURE
By clicking to accept an Hourly Contract or make a bonus payment, Client and Freelancer are deemed to have executed this Agreement electronically, effective on the date Freelancer clicks to accept an Hourly Contract, pursuant to California Civil Code section 1633.8 and the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., as amended from time to time (the "
E-Sign Act
"). Doing so constitutes an acknowledgement that Client and Freelancer agree to conduct the transaction electronically, and are able to electronically receive, download, and print this Agreement and the Escrow Instructions it contains.
2. MAKING OR RECEIVING AN HOURLY PAYMENT
2.1 WEEKLY HOURLY INVOICES
For Hourly Contracts, the weekly billing cycle starts Monday at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sunday at 23:59 UTC. Invoices for hours recorded on Upwork in the Work Diary are generated each Monday following the week in which the hours were billed (the "
Hourly Invoice Deadline
"). Freelancer irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork, as its agent, to (i) create an invoice on behalf of Freelancer for payment due based upon the hours that the freelancer recorded in the Work Diary before the Hourly Invoice Deadline (such invoice, the "
Hourly Invoice
"); and (ii) submit the Hourly Invoice on behalf of Freelancer to Freelancer's Client for payment. For the avoidance of doubt, the “
Work Diary
” is the section of Upwork where hours can be recorded on an Hourly Contract.
By recording time in the Work Diary and allowing an Hourly Invoice to be created based on the time recorded, Freelancer represents and warrants that (y) Freelancer has completed the applicable Freelancer Services fully and satisfactorily; and (z) the hours Freelancer reports are true, accurate, and complete.
2.2 HOURLY INVOICE REVIEW
Client must review and approve or dispute the Hourly Invoice by 11:59 PM UTC of the Friday following submission of the Hourly Invoice. Payments will be held in escrow during the Dispute Period (defined below), providing four additional days to review and dispute the invoice before funds are released. During the Dispute Period, Client may initiate a Dispute as to some or all of the time invoiced on the Hourly Invoice.
On the Friday of the week following submission of the Hourly Invoice, Client will be deemed to have approved all undisputed amounts on the Hourly Invoice, and irrevocably instructed Upwork’s Affiliate, Upwork Escrow, to release escrow funds as described in this Agreement.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, all hours recorded and submitted by Payroll Employee on the Upwork website will be deemed approved by Client automatically, and Client authorizes and irrevocably instructs Upwork Escrow to release payments for those hours to be paid to the Staffing Provider by Client's account each Monday following the week in which the hours were worked. Client may not reject time or file a Dispute for Payroll Employee time worked.
3. MAKING OR RECEIVING A BONUS OR EXPENSE PAYMENT
Client may also make a bonus, tip, expense, or other miscellaneous payment to Freelancer using the Site. To make such a payment to a Freelancer, Client must follow the instructions and links on the Site and provide the information requested. If Client clicks to pay such a payment to Freelancer, Client irrevocably instructs Upwork Escrow to and Upwork Escrow will release escrow funds as described in this Agreement.
4. INSTRUCTIONS TO PAY IRREVOCABLE
Client’s instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to pay a Freelancer is irrevocable. Such instruction is Client’s authorization to transfer funds to Freelancer from the Client Escrow Account or authorization to charge Client’s Payment Method. Such instruction is also Client’s representation that Client has received, inspected, and accepted the subject work or expense. Client acknowledges and agrees that upon receipt of Client’s instruction to pay Freelancer, Upwork Escrow will transfer funds to the Freelancer and that Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and other Affiliates have no responsibility to and may not be able to recover such funds. Therefore, and in consideration of services described in this Agreement, Client agrees that once Upwork Escrow or its subsidiary has charged Client’s Payment Method, the charge is non-refundable.
5. RELEASE AND DELIVERY OF AMOUNTS IN ESCROW
In addition, Upwork Escrow is authorized to and will release applicable portions of the Client Escrow Account (each portion, a “
Release
”) to the Freelancer Escrow Account, upon the occurrence of and in accordance with one or more Release Conditions provided below or as otherwise required by applicable law or the Terms of Service. The amount of the Release will be delivered to the Freelancer Escrow Account, in accordance with Freelancer’s and Client’s instructions, as applicable, these Escrow Instructions, and the other Terms of Service.
5.1 RELEASE CONDITIONS
As used in these Escrow Instructions, “
Release Condition
” means any of the following:
Client and Freelancer have submitted joint written instructions for a Release.
Client has approved all or a portion of the Freelancer's Hourly Invoice. This Release Condition will only apply to amounts invoiced by the Freelancer that Client has approved. Client’s failure to dispute an Hourly Invoice, or a portion of an Hourly Invoice, within the Dispute Period pursuant to this Agreement, or as otherwise provided in the Escrow Instructions, constitutes approval by the Client for purposes of this Release Condition.
Freelancer is a Payroll Employee and has submitted an Hourly Invoice under a Services Contract that involves the use of Upwork Payroll.
Upwork reviews Client's dispute of amounts invoiced on Freelancer's Hourly Invoice for an Hourly Contract with Work Diaries pursuant to this Agreement and determines  (1) that the time is related to the Hourly Contract requirements or Client's instructions and (2) that Freelancer met any applicable Work Product delivery deadline or provided 24 hours' advance notice of Freelancer's inability to meet the deadline.
Client initiates a Dispute with respect to Freelancer's Hourly Invoice for an Hourly Contract without Work Diaries pursuant to this Agreement and Client and Freelancer resolve the dispute without the assistance of Upwork.
Issuance of a final order of a court or arbitrator of competent jurisdiction from which appeal is not taken, in which case the funds will be released in accordance with such order.
We believe, in our sole discretion, that fraud, an illegal act, or a violation of Upwork's Terms of Service has been committed or is being committed or attempted, in which case Client and Freelancer hereby irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to take such actions as we deem appropriate in our sole discretion and in accordance with applicable law, in order to prevent or remedy such acts, including without limitation to return the funds associated with such acts to their source of payment.
6. PAYMENT PROTECTION
Upwork provides limited payment protection to Users as detailed in this Section 6 ("
Hourly Payment Protection
").
6.1 FOR FREELANCERS
In the rare event that a Freelancer’s Client does not make payment for legitimate services performed by a Freelancer, Upwork will provide Hourly Payment Protection to the Freelancer as detailed in this Section 6.1 as a membership benefit to foster fairness, reward loyalty, and encourage the Freelancer to continue to use the Site Services for their business needs. Hourly Payment Protection will be offered to a Freelancer only if all of the following criteria are met in Upwork's sole discretion:
Both Client and Freelancer must have agreed to use Work Diaries upon acceptance of the Hourly Contract, as part of the terms.
Client must have an Account in good standing and a valid and verified Payment Method at the start of the Hourly Contract, and must agree to automatically pay for hours billed by Freelancer through Work Diaries.
Freelancer's Account must be in good standing at the time of the payment at issue, including, for example, completion of the identity verification process, tax information, and any other similar requests or requirements.
Freelancer must have enabled and used Work Diaries to document any and all hours covered by the Hourly Payment Protection for Freelancers.
Prior to any Hourly Invoice being submitted, Freelancer must have annotated the screenshots documented in Work Diaries sufficient to demonstrate the work relates to the Hourly Contract.
The screenshots documented by Work Diaries must be clearly related to the applicable Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions.
The number of hours billed in the Work Diaries must be within the hours authorized in the Hourly Contract for the week.
Freelancer must have rendered services in a professional and workmanlike manner in accordance with the professional experience represented by Freelancer to Client.
Freelancer must have responded to Client communications relevant to the Work Product within 7 days, or have provided advance notice of Freelancer's extended absence.
Freelancer must have delivered the Work Product within the timeframe agreed upon with Client or provided a minimum of 24 hours' advance notice to Client in the event Freelancer was unable to meet the deadline.
Within five days after notification of rejected or unpaid time, Freelancer must submit a Dispute specifically identifying the documented work not otherwise paid for by their Client through the Escrow Services.
Upwork will investigate and determine in its sole discretion whether the above terms and conditions are met.
Hourly Payment Protection does not apply to: (a) hours invoiced for work not agreed to or authorized by Client; (b) bonus payments; (c) refunds; (d) manual time; (e) time added after Client has disputed a billing and before the resolution of that dispute; (6) Fixed-Price Contracts; (f) hours reported by Payroll Employees; (g) any payments on Hourly Contracts where the Hourly Contract or the services provided thereunder are prohibited by the Terms of Service; (h) hours billed by Freelancers whom Upwork believes, in its sole discretion, to be aware of or complicit in another User’s violation of this Agreement or the other Terms of Service; or (i) Freelancers whom Upwork believes, in its sole discretion, to be involved in actual fraudulent activities or abuse of this Payment Protection.
The maximum rate per hour protected by Upwork to Freelancer under the Hourly Payment Protection for Freelancers is the lesser of: (i) the rate provided in the Hourly Contract terms; (ii) the usual hourly rate billed by Freelancer on the Site across all Clients; and (iii) the going rate for the same skills on the Site in Freelancer's area (such determination to be made in Upwork's sole discretion). The maximum amount of coverage under the Hourly Payment Protection for Freelancers for the life of a relationship between the same Client and Freelancer is $2,500 or 50 hours logged in Work Diary at Freelancer's average hourly rate billed to Client, based on whichever is less.
6.2 FOR CLIENTS
Freelancer authorizes and instructs Upwork to adjust the Hourly Invoice to remove invoiced hours that are not (a) clearly related to either the Hourly Contract terms or work agreed to by the Client, and (b) within the hours authorized in the Hourly Contract for the week, subject to and conditioned on the following terms:
Both Client and Freelancer must agree to use Work Diaries as part of the Hourly Contract terms.
Client must have an Account in good standing and a valid and verified default Payment Method, and Client must agree to automatically pay for hours billed by Freelancer in the Hourly Invoices.
Additionally, Client must either:
Within the Hourly Invoice Review Period, submit a Dispute specifically identifying the time billed that is not clearly related to either the Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions in the Work Diaries, or else identify an agreed upon timeframe for delivery of Work Product that was not met and specify that Freelancer did not provide 24 hours' advance notice that the deadline would not be met; OR
Have previously submitted a complaint that Freelancer has filed to render services in a professional and workmanlike manner in accordance with the professional experience represented by the Freelancer to the Client or has taken more than 7 seven days to respond to Client communications relevant to the Work Product, without Freelancer having previously notified Client of Freelancer's extended absence.
Upwork will investigate and determine in its sole discretion whether the above terms and conditions are met.
Hourly Protection for Clients only protects Client from the obligation to pay for Freelancer’s work if the documented hours worked are not clearly related to the Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions in the Work Diaries. If Client has requested that the Freelancer use functionality of the Site or third-party software that hides, blurs, or distorts images in the Work Diary, the screenshots will be deemed to be “clearly related” to the Hourly Contract requirements for purposes of the Client's eligibility for Hourly Payment Protection. Hourly Payment Protection for Clients does not create any warranties, express or implied, beyond those expressly stated in the User Agreement.
Hourly Protection for Clients does not apply to: (1) Fixed-Price Contracts; (2) Hourly Contracts using Upwork Payroll; or (3) hours billed by Freelancers who are aware of or complicit in another User's violation of this Agreement or the Terms of Service.
7. DISPUTES BETWEEN CLIENT AND FREELANCER
7.1 DISPUTES INITIATED VIA THE PLATFORM
For Hourly Contracts, Client may dispute Freelancer’s hours invoiced on the Hourly Invoice for the prior week (Sunday 12:00 a.m. midnight UTC to Sunday 11:59 p.m. UTC) during the five days following the close of the weekly invoice period (Monday 12:00 a.m. midnight UTC to Friday 11:59 p.m. UTC) (the “
Dispute Period
“). It is Client’s responsibility to review the Hourly Invoice of every Hourly Contract on a weekly basis and to file any disputes during the Dispute Period. Once the Dispute Period expires, Client will be deemed to have accepted the Freelancer Services and Freelancer Fees and can no longer dispute them. Disputes handled by Upwork can only address the hours billed, not the quality of the Freelancer Services or the Work Product provided under Hourly Contracts. If Client disputes Freelancer’s hours invoiced in the Hourly Invoice under an Hourly Contract during the Dispute Period, Client and Freelancer are encouraged to resolve the dispute between themselves. If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a resolution, Upwork will promptly investigate the Hourly Invoice and determine, in our sole discretion, whether an adjustment is appropriate consistent with Client’s and Freelancer’s instructions in these Escrow Instructions. Upwork's determination of such dispute shall be final.
If Client’s payment is unsuccessful, Upwork will review the Weekly Invoice to determine if it qualifies for Hourly Payment Protection. If Upwork, in its sole discretion, determines that the Weekly Invoice qualifies for Hourly Payment Protection, it will make payment to the Freelancer to cover the Hourly Invoice on behalf of the Client. In the event that Upwork makes payment on behalf of the Client, Freelancer hereby irrevocably assigns any right, title or interest in any payment from Client to Upwork for the amount paid by Upwork.
Client may choose to approve Freelancer’s Weekly Invoice prior to the end of the Dispute Period thereby releasing payment for the Weekly Invoice. If Client releases payment to Freelancer prior to the end of the Dispute Period, Client certifies that it approves the Weekly Invoice, accepts the work, and waives any further right to dispute the work or Weekly Invoice through Upwork's Dispute Assistance (defined below).
You acknowledge and agree that Upwork Escrow or its Affiliates may, at its sole discretion, withhold or delay payment in the event of dispute between a Client and a Freelancer. You further acknowledge and agree that Upwork and Affiliates are not and will not be a party to any dispute between a Client and Freelancer over an Hourly Invoice or Hourly Contract.
Clients may not dispute hours worked with respect to any worker engaged as an employee through Upwork Payroll. The Dispute Period does not apply and payments are released immediately upon completion of the Hourly Invoice for the prior week for Hourly Contracts where the Client has one or more Service Contracts using Upwork Payroll.
7.2 UPWORK DISPUTE ASSISTANCE
Non-binding dispute assistance (“
Dispute Assistance
”) is available within 30 days of the date of the last release of funds from Client to Freelancer. If Client or Freelancer contacts Upwork via support ticket within 30 days of the date of the last payment from Client to Freelancer and requests non-binding dispute assistance for any dispute among them (a “
Dispute
”), Upwork will attempt to assist Client and Freelancer by reviewing the Dispute and proposing a mutual, non-binding resolution. Upwork will only review the 30 days of work performed prior to the date a User requests Dispute Assistance.
The Upwork Disputes team will notify Client and Freelancer via ticket by providing a notice of dispute along with a request for information and supporting documentation.
If both Client and Freelancer respond to the notice and request for information, then the Disputes team will review the documentation submitted and any information available on the Site that pertains to the Dispute. After review, the Disputes team will propose a mutual, non-binding resolution based on the results of the review.
The proposed resolution is non-binding; Client and Freelancer can choose whether or not to agree to it. If Client and Freelancer agree in writing to the proposed resolution, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release Escrow funds in accordance with the proposed resolution.
If Client or Freelancer rejects Upwork’s proposed, non-binding resolution then Client and/or Freelancer must pursue the Dispute independently.
Upwork reserves the right to review the Freelancer’s work for 30 days prior to the date of the request for Dispute Assistance for compliance with Hourly Payment Protection requirements, and in its sole discretion, to make adjustments to invoices, and to direct Upwork Escrow to make appropriate releases to Client if it finds work that clearly does not relate Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions in the Work Diaries or violations of the Terms of Service during its review of the work.
Dispute Assistance does not apply to Freelancer Services using Upwork Payroll.
8. REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS
Client and Freelancer are encouraged to come to a mutual agreement if refunds or cancellations are necessary. If there are no funds in escrow, Freelancer may issue a refund via the Upwork platform up to the full amount paid on the Hourly Contract.
9. S
ERVICE F
EES FOR ESCROW FUNDS RELEASED FOLLOWING DISPUTE ASSISTANCE
All Escrow funds released under Section 7.2 of these Escrow Instructions are subject to the normal Service Fees associated with Escrow Accounts, as detailed in the User Agreement and these Escrow Instructions.
10. NOTICES
All notices to a User required by these Escrow Instructions will be made via email sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address. Users are solely responsible for maintaining a current, active email address registered with Upwork, for checking their registered email address and for responding to notices sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address.
11. COOPERATION WITH THE DISPUTE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
All claims, disputes or other disagreements between you and another User that are covered by the Dispute Assistance program must be resolved in accordance with the terms in the Dispute Assistance program. All claims filed or brought contrary to the Dispute Assistance program will be considered improperly filed, unless otherwise required by law, and Upwork will have the right to take any other action, including suspension or termination of your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds, and any other legal action as Upwork deems appropriate in its sole discretion.
12. ABUSE
Upwork, in its sole discretion, reserves the right to suspend or terminate your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, immediately upon giving notice to you if Upwork believes you may be abusing the Dispute Assistance program or as otherwise permitted by the
Terms of Service
, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds. However, any disputes for any contracts that existed prior to termination will be subject to the Terms of Service.
13. NO RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICES OR PAYMENTS
Upwork and Affiliates merely provide a platform for Internet payment services. Upwork and Affiliates do not have any responsibility or control over the Freelancer Services that Client purchases. Nothing in this Agreement deems or will be interpreted to deem Upwork or any Affiliate as Client’s or Freelancer’s agent with respect to any Freelancer Services, or expand or modify any warranty, liability or indemnity stated in the Terms of Service. For example, Upwork does not guarantee the performance, functionality, quality, or timeliness of Freelancer Services or that a Client can or will make payments.
Current Hourly Escrow Instructions
If Client and Freelancer enter into an Hourly Contract, if Client makes a bonus or expense payment to Freelancer, or if you use Upwork Payroll, this Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions (“
Agreement
”) applies.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may modify this Agreement, and the Escrow Instructions it contains, without prior notice to you, and any revisions to the Agreement will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. Please check the Site often for updates.
This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement are defined in the
User Agreement
,
elsewhere in the Terms of Service, or have the meanings given such terms on the Site. The Escrow Instructions in this Agreement do not apply to Fixed-Price Escrow Accounts, except that they govern the making and receiving of bonus, expense and other miscellaneous payments for Fixed-Price Contracts.
Escrow services are provided by Upwork Escrow Inc. (“
Upwork Escrow
”) pursuant to Internet Escrow Agent license no. 9635086, issued by the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.
1. DIGITAL SIGNATURE
By clicking to accept an Hourly Contract or make a bonus payment, Client and Freelancer are deemed to have executed this Agreement electronically, effective on the date Freelancer clicks to accept an Hourly Contract, pursuant to California Civil Code section 1633.8 and the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., as amended from time to time (the "
E-Sign Act
"). Doing so constitutes an acknowledgement that
Client and Freelancer agree to conduct the transaction electronically, and
are able to electronically receive, download, and print this Agreement and the Escrow Instructions it contains.
2. MAKING OR RECEIVING AN HOURLY PAYMENT
2.1 WEEKLY HOURLY INVOICES
For Hourly Contracts, the weekly billing cycle starts Monday at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sunday at 23:59 UTC. Invoices for hours recorded on Upwork in the Work Diary are generated each Monday following the week in which the hours were billed (the "
Hourly Invoice Deadline
"). Freelancer irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork, as its agent, to (i) create an invoice on behalf of Freelancer for payment due based upon the hours that the freelancer recorded in the Work Diary before the Hourly Invoice Deadline (such invoice, the "
Hourly Invoice
"); and (ii) submit the Hourly Invoice on behalf of Freelancer to Freelancer's Client for payment. For the avoidance of doubt, the “
Work Diary
” is the section of Upwork where hours can be recorded on an Hourly Contract.
By recording time in the Work Diary and allowing an Hourly Invoice to be created based on the time recorded, Freelancer represents and warrants that (y) Freelancer has completed the applicable Freelancer Services fully and satisfactorily; and (z) the hours Freelancer reports are true, accurate, and complete.
2.2 HOURLY INVOICE REVIEW
Client must review and approve or dispute the Hourly Invoice by 11:59 PM UTC of the Friday following submission of the Hourly Invoice. Payments will be held in escrow during the Dispute Period (defined below), providing four additional days to review and dispute the invoice before funds are released. During the Dispute Period, Client may initiate a Dispute as to some or all of the time invoiced on the Hourly Invoice.
On the Friday of the week following submission of the Hourly Invoice, Client will be deemed to have approved all undisputed amounts on the Hourly Invoice, and irrevocably instructed Upwork’s Affiliate, Upwork Escrow, to release escrow funds as described in this Agreement.
Notwithstanding the foregoing, all hours recorded and submitted by Payroll Employee on the Upwork website will be deemed approved by Client automatically, and Client authorizes and irrevocably instructs Upwork Escrow to release payments for those hours to be paid to the Staffing Provider by Client's account each Monday following the week in which the hours were worked. Client may not reject time or file a Dispute for Payroll Employee time worked.
3. MAKING OR RECEIVING A BONUS OR EXPENSE PAYMENT
Client may also make a bonus, tip, expense, or other miscellaneous payment to Freelancer using the Site. To make such a payment to a Freelancer, Client must follow the instructions and links on the Site and provide the information requested. If Client clicks to pay such a payment to Freelancer, Client irrevocably instructs Upwork Escrow to and Upwork Escrow will release escrow funds as described in this Agreement.
4. INSTRUCTIONS TO PAY IRREVOCABLE
Client’s instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to pay a Freelancer is irrevocable. Such instruction is Client’s authorization to transfer funds to Freelancer from the Client Escrow Account or authorization to charge Client’s Payment Method. Such instruction is also Client’s representation that Client has received, inspected, and accepted the subject work or expense. Client acknowledges and agrees that upon receipt of Client’s instruction to pay Freelancer, Upwork Escrow will transfer funds to the Freelancer and that Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and other Affiliates have no responsibility to and may not be able to recover such funds. Therefore, and in consideration of services described in this Agreement, Client agrees that once Upwork Escrow or its subsidiary has charged Client’s Payment Method, the charge is non-refundable.
5. RELEASE AND DELIVERY OF AMOUNTS IN ESCROW
In addition, Upwork Escrow is authorized to and will release applicable portions of the Client Escrow Account (each portion, a “
Release
”) to the Freelancer Escrow Account, upon the occurrence of and in accordance with one or more Release Conditions provided below or as otherwise required by applicable law or the Terms of Service. The amount of the Release will be delivered to the Freelancer Escrow Account, in accordance with Freelancer’s and Client’s instructions, as applicable, these Escrow Instructions, and the other Terms of Service.
5.1 RELEASE CONDITIONS
As used in these Escrow Instructions, “
Release Condition
” means any of the following:
Client and Freelancer have submitted joint written instructions for a Release.
Client has approved all or a portion of the Freelancer's Hourly Invoice. This Release Condition will only apply to amounts invoiced by the Freelancer that Client has approved. Client’s failure to dispute an Hourly Invoice, or a portion of an Hourly Invoice, within the Dispute Period pursuant to this Agreement, or as otherwise provided in the Escrow Instructions, constitutes approval by the Client for purposes of this Release Condition.
Freelancer is a Payroll Employee and has submitted an Hourly Invoice under a Services Contract that involves the use of Upwork Payroll.
Upwork reviews Client's dispute of amounts invoiced on Freelancer's Hourly Invoice for an Hourly Contract with Work Diaries pursuant to this Agreement and determines that the time is related to the Hourly Contract requirements or Client's instructions.
Client initiates a Dispute with respect to Freelancer's Hourly Invoice for an Hourly Contract without Work Diaries pursuant to this Agreement and Client and Freelancer resolve the dispute without the assistance of Upwork.
Issuance of a final order of a court or arbitrator of competent jurisdiction from which appeal is not taken, in which case the funds will be released in accordance with such order.
We believe, in our sole discretion, that fraud, an illegal act, or a violation of Upwork's Terms of Service has been committed or is being committed or attempted, in which case Client and Freelancer hereby irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to take such actions as we deem appropriate in our sole discretion and in accordance with applicable law, in order to prevent or remedy such acts, including without limitation to return the funds associated with such acts to their source of payment.
6. PAYMENT PROTECTION
Upwork provides limited payment protection to Users as detailed in this Section 6 ("
Hourly Payment Protection
").
6.1 FOR FREELANCERS
In the rare event that a Freelancer’s Client does not make payment for legitimate services performed by a Freelancer, Upwork will provide Hourly Payment Protection to the Freelancer as detailed in this Section 6.1 as a membership benefit to foster fairness, reward loyalty, and encourage the Freelancer to continue to use the Site Services for their business needs. Hourly Payment Protection will be offered to a Freelancer only if all of the following criteria are met in Upwork's sole discretion:
Both Client and Freelancer must have agreed to use Work Diaries upon acceptance of the Hourly Contract, as part of the terms.
Client must have an Account in good standing and a valid and verified Payment Method at the start of the Hourly Contract, and must agree to automatically pay for hours billed by Freelancer through Work Diaries.
Freelancer's Account must be in good s
tanding at the time of
the payment at issue
,
including, for example, completion of the i
dentity
verification process, tax information, and any other similar requests or requirements
.
Freelancer must have enabled and used Work Diaries to document any and all hours covered by the Hourly Payment Protection for Freelancers.
Prior to any Hourly Invoice being submitted, Freelancer must have annotated the screenshots documented in Work Diaries sufficient to demonstrate the work relates to the Hourly Contract.
The screenshots documented by Work Diaries must be clearly related to the applicable Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions.
The number of hours billed in the Work Diaries must be within the hours authorized in the Hourly Contract for the week.
Within five days after notification of rejected or unpaid time, Freelancer must submit a Dispute specifically identifying the documented work not otherwise paid for by their Client through the Escrow Services.
Upwork will investigate and determine in its sole discretion whether the above terms and conditions are met.
Hourly Payment Protection does not apply to: (a) hours invoiced for work not agreed to or authorized by Client; (b) bonus payments; (c) refunds; (d) manual time; (e) time added after Client has disputed a billing and before the resolution of that dispute; (6) Fixed-Price Contracts; (f) hours reported by Payroll Employees; (g) any payments on Hourly Contracts where the Hourly Contract or the services provided thereunder are prohibited by the Terms of Service; (h) hours billed by Freelancers whom Upwork believes, in its sole discretion, to be aware of or complicit in another User’s violation of this Agreement or the other Terms of Service; or (i) Freelancers whom Upwork believes, in its sole discretion, to be involved in actual fraudulent activities or abuse of this Payment Protection.
The maximum rate per hour protected by Upwork to Freelancer under the Hourly Payment Protection for Freelancers is the lesser of: (i) the rate provided in the Hourly Contract terms; (ii) the usual hourly rate billed by Freelancer on the Site across all Clients; and (iii) the going rate for the same skills on the Site in Freelancer's area (such determination to be made in Upwork's sole discretion). The maximum amount of coverage under the Hourly Payment Protection for Freelancers for the life of a relationship between the same Client and Freelancer is $2,500 or 50 hours logged in Work Diary at Freelancer's average hourly rate billed to Client, based on whichever is less.
6.2 FOR CLIENTS
Freelancer authorizes and instructs Upwork to adjust the Hourly Invoice to remove invoiced hours that are not (a) clearly related to either the Hourly Contract terms or work agreed to by the Client, and (b) within the hours authorized in the Hourly Contract for the week, subject to and conditioned on the following terms:
Both Client and Freelancer must agree to use Work Diaries as part of the Hourly Contract terms.
Client must have an Account in good standing and a valid and verified default Payment Method, and Client must agree to automatically pay for hours billed by Freelancer in the Hourly Invoices. Within the Hourly Invoice Review Period, Client must submit a Dispute specifically identifying the time billed that is not clearly related to either the Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions in the Work Diaries.
Upwork will investigate and determine in its sole discretion whether the above terms and conditions are met.
Hourly Protection for Clients only protects Client from the obligation to pay for Freelancer’s work if the documented hours worked are not clearly related to the Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions in the Work Diaries. If Client has requested that the Freelancer use functionality of the Site or third-party software that hides, blurs, or distorts images in the Work Diary, the screenshots will be deemed to be “clearly related” to the Hourly Contract requirements for purposes of the Client's eligibility for Hourly Payment Protection. Hourly Payment Protection for Clients does not create any warranties, express or implied, beyond those expressly stated in the User Agreement.
Hourly Protection for Clients does not apply to: (1) Fixed-Price Contracts; (2) Hourly Contracts using Upwork Payroll; or (3) hours billed by Freelancers who are aware of or complicit in another User's violation of this Agreement or the Terms of Service.
7. DISPUTES BETWEEN CLIENT AND FREELANCER
7.1 DISPUTES INITIATED VIA THE PLATFORM
For Hourly Contracts, Client may dispute Freelancer’s hours invoiced on the Hourly Invoice for the prior week (Sunday 12:00 a.m. midnight UTC to Sunday 11:59 p.m. UTC) during the five days following the close of the weekly invoice period (Monday 12:00 a.m. midnight UTC to Friday 11:59 p.m. UTC) (the “
Dispute Period
“). It is Client’s responsibility to review the Hourly Invoice of every Hourly Contract on a weekly basis and to file any disputes during the Dispute Period. Once the Dispute Period expires, Client will be deemed to have accepted the Freelancer Services and Freelancer Fees and can no longer dispute them. Disputes handled by Upwork can only address the hours billed, not the quality of the Freelancer Services or the Work Product provided under Hourly Contracts. If Client disputes Freelancer’s hours invoiced in the Hourly Invoice under an Hourly Contract during the Dispute Period, Client and Freelancer are encouraged to resolve the dispute between themselves. If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a resolution, Upwork will promptly investigate the Hourly Invoice and determine, in our sole discretion, whether an adjustment is appropriate consistent with Client’s and Freelancer’s instructions in these Escrow Instructions. Upwork's determination of such dispute shall be final.
If Client’s payment is unsuccessful, Upwork will review the Weekly Invoice to determine if it qualifies for Hourly Payment Protection. If Upwork, in its sole discretion, determines that the Weekly Invoice qualifies for Hourly Payment Protection, it will make payment to the Freelancer to cover the Hourly Invoice on behalf of the Client. In the event that Upwork makes payment on behalf of the Client, Freelancer hereby irrevocably assigns any right, title or interest in any payment from Client to Upwork for the amount paid by Upwork.
Client may choose to approve Freelancer’s Weekly Invoice prior to the end of the Dispute Period thereby releasing payment for the Weekly Invoice. If Client releases payment to Freelancer prior to the end of the Dispute Period, Client certifies that it approves the Weekly Invoice, accepts the work, and waives any further right to dispute the work or Weekly Invoice through Upwork's Dispute Assistance (defined below).
You acknowledge and agree that Upwork Escrow or its Affiliates may, at its sole discretion, withhold or delay payment in the event of dispute between a Client and a Freelancer. You further acknowledge and agree that Upwork and Affiliates are not and will not be a party to any dispute between a Client and Freelancer over an Hourly Invoice or Hourly Contract.
Clients may not dispute hours worked with respect to any worker engaged as an employee through Upwork Payroll.
The Dispute Period does not apply and payments are released immediately upon completion of the Hourly Invoice
for the prior week for Hourly Contracts where the Client has one or more Service Contracts using Upwork Payroll.
7.2 UPWORK DISPUTE ASSISTANCE
Non-binding dispute assistance (“
Dispute Assistance
”) is available within 30 days of the date of the last release of funds from Client to Freelancer. If Client or Freelancer contacts Upwork via support ticket within 30 days of the date of the last payment from Client to Freelancer and requests non-binding dispute assistance for any dispute among them (a “
Dispute
”), Upwork will attempt to assist Client and Freelancer by reviewing the Dispute and proposing a mutual, non-binding resolution. Upwork will only review the 30 days of work performed prior to the date a User requests Dispute Assistance.
The Upwork Disputes team will notify Client and Freelancer via ticket by providing a notice of dispute along with a request for information and supporting documentation.
If both Client and Freelancer respond to the notice and request for information, then the Disputes team will review the documentation submitted and any information available on the Site that pertains to the Dispute. After review, the Disputes team will propose a mutual, non-binding resolution based on the results of the review.
The proposed resolution is non-binding; Client and Freelancer can choose whether or not to agree to it. If Client and Freelancer agree in writing to the proposed resolution, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release Escrow funds in accordance with the proposed resolution.
If Client or Freelancer rejects Upwork’s proposed, non-binding resolution then Client and/or Freelancer must pursue the Dispute independently.
Upwork reserves the right to review the Freelancer’s work for 30 days prior to the date of the request for Dispute Assistance for compliance with Hourly Payment Protection requirements, and in its sole discretion, to make adjustments to invoices, and to direct Upwork Escrow to make appropriate releases to Client if it finds work that clearly does not relate Hourly Contract requirements or Client instructions in the Work Diaries or violations of the Terms of Service during its review of the work.
Dispute Assistance does not apply to Freelancer Services using Upwork Payroll.
8. REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS
Client and Freelancer are encouraged to come to a mutual agreement if refunds or cancellations are necessary. If there are no funds in escrow, Freelancer may issue a refund via the Upwork platform up to the full amount paid on the Hourly Contract.
9. S
ERVICE F
EES FOR ESCROW FUNDS RELEASED FOLLOWING DISPUTE ASSISTANCE
All Escrow funds released under Section 7.2 of these Escrow Instructions are subject to the normal Service Fees associated with Escrow Accounts, as detailed in the User Agreement and these Escrow Instructions.
10. NOTICES
All notices to a User required by these Escrow Instructions will be made via email sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address. Users are solely responsible for maintaining a current, active email address registered with Upwork, for checking their registered email address and for responding to notices sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address.
11. COOPERATION WITH THE DISPUTE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
All claims, disputes or other disagreements between you and another User that are covered by the Dispute Assistance program must be resolved in accordance with the terms in the Dispute Assistance program. All claims filed or brought contrary to the Dispute Assistance program will be considered improperly filed, unless otherwise required by law, and Upwork will have the right to take any other action, including suspension or termination of your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds, and any other legal action as Upwork deems appropriate in its sole discretion.
12. ABUSE
Upwork, in its sole discretion, reserves the right to suspend or terminate your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, immediately upon giving notice to you if Upwork believes you may be abusing the Dispute Assistance program or as otherwise permitted by the
Terms of Service
, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds. However, any disputes for any contracts that existed prior to termination will be subject to the Terms of Service.
13. NO RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICES OR PAYMENTS
Upwork and Affiliates merely provide a platform for Internet payment services. Upwork and Affiliates do not have any responsibility or control over the Freelancer Services that Client purchases. Nothing in this Agreement deems or will be interpreted to deem Upwork or any Affiliate as Client’s or Freelancer’s agent with respect to any Freelancer Services, or expand or modify any warranty, liability or indemnity stated in the Terms of Service. For example, Upwork does not guarantee the performance, functionality, quality, or timeliness of Freelancer Services or that a Client can or will make payments.
Effective October 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This modified version of Upwork's Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions is effective October 31, 2024.
Click
here
to review the current Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions.
If a Client and a Freelancer (defined below) enter into a Fixed-Price Contract on the Upwork site, these Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions (“
Escrow Instructions
”) apply. These Escrow Instructions govern Fixed-Price Escrow Accounts. If you have a Fixed-Price Contract and wish to make or receive a miscellaneous or bonus payment, those activities are governed by the
Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may modify these Escrow Instructions without prior notice to you, and any revisions to these Escrow Instructions will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. The version of these Escrow Instructions in effect on the date any Fixed-Price Contract is entered into apply to that contract. Please check the Site often for updates.
These Escrow Instructions hereby incorporate by reference the
Terms of Service
(“
Terms of Service
”). Capitalized terms not defined in these Escrow Instructions are defined in the
User Agreement
or
elsewhere in the Terms of Service, or have the meanings given such terms on the Site. For purposes of these Escrow Instructions, the term “
Freelancer
” means a User with a Freelancer and/or Agency account.
Escrow services are provided by Upwork Escrow Inc. (“
Upwork Escrow
”) pursuant to Internet Escrow Agent license no. 9635086, issued by the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.
1. DIGITAL SIGNATURE AND COMMUNICATIONS
By clicking to fund Escrow (a “
Funding Approval
”) or to accept a Fixed-Price Contract, Client and Freelancer are deemed to have executed these Escrow Instructions electronically, effective on the date Freelancer clicks to accept the engagement, pursuant to California Civil Code Section 1633.8 and the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001,
et seq
.
, as may be amended from time to time (the "
E-Sign Act
"). Doing so constitutes an acknowledgement that
Client and Freelancer agree to conduct the transaction electronically, and
are able to electronically receive, download, and print these Escrow Instruc
tions. All references to the Escrow in these Escrow Instructions will include the initial Funding Approval and any additional Funding Approval for a Fixed-Price Contract.
Client and Freelancer agree that any written communications required herein may be provided electronically, including by email or support ticket, if applicable. Any communication sent to Upwork via U.S. mail or similar service will be deemed timely if received by Upwork by the applicable deadline.
2. ACCEPTANCE OF ESCROW INSTRUCTIONS
Once a Client and Freelancer have agreed to a Service Contract, and the Client and Freelancer have selected “Agree” on the send offer, accept offer, or pages relating to the Service Contract to accept the Terms of Service (including these Escrow Instructions), these Escrow Instructions constitute a binding agreement between Client, Freelancer, and Upwork Escrow (collectively, the “
Parties
”). Client and Freelancer must execute (by digital signature or by a method mutually agreed upon by both parties), and Upwork Escrow must agree to, any supplemental instruction or addition, deletion or alteration thereto in writing (collectively the “
Supplemental Escrow Instruction
”). Upwork Escrow reserves the right to reject any Supplemental Escrow Instruction.
3. DEPOSIT OF FUNDS INTO ESCROW
By sending a contract offer to Freelancer or accepting a contract offer from Freelancer, Client agrees to deposit funds for the amount of the first Milestone (as defined on the Site), or, if there are no Milestones, the full amount of the Service Contract. Additional Milestones may be funded on the same contract by Client by selecting the button to add an additional Milestone or to activate the next Milestone on the Site. Funds deposited by Client remain in the Client Escrow Account until they are released to the Freelancer Escrow Account or released to Client Escrow Account. Upwork Escrow will release funds held in escrow pursuant to Section 4 of these Escrow Instructions (Release and Delivery of Amounts in Escrow).
4. RELEASE AND DELIVERY OF AMOUNTS IN ESCROW
Client and Freelancer irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to release applicable portions of the Fixed-Price Escrow Account (each portion, a “
Release
”) to the Freelancer Escrow Account or Client Escrow Account, as applicable, based on the instructions described in this Section 4 (each such instruction, a “
Release Condition
”), or as otherwise required by applicable law or expressly permitted by the Terms of Service. The amount of each Release will be delivered to the applicable Escrow Account in accordance with Freelancer’s or Client’s instructions, these Escrow Instructions, and the other Terms of Service. All funds released pursuant to these Escrow Instructions are subject to applicable fees as described in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
.
4.1 RELEASE OF FUNDS TO FREELANCER
Freelancer and Client authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account on the occurrence of any of the following Release Conditions, such authorization and instruction to be irrevocable except as expressly provided in these Escrow Instructions:
Client affirmatively selects the option to release funds for a Milestone or Service Contract to Freelancer.
Client does not take any action for 14 calendar days from the date of Freelancer’s Release request, in which case Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and instructed to immediately release to Freelancer the amount associated with the applicable Milestone in connection with such Release request.
Client and Freelancer have jointly submitted Supplemental Escrow Instructions in writing and signed by both Client and Freelancer to Upwork Escrow at legalnotices@upwork.com requesting a Release to Freelancer Escrow Account, and Upwork Escrow has agreed to the Supplemental Escrow Instructions.
Client has declined Arbitration or failed to make its Arbitration Payment (defined below) pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program, and Freelancer has agreed to Arbitration and submitted its Arbitration Payment.
Client has failed timely to respond to a Notice of Dispute (defined below) or otherwise failed to comply with the Dispute Assistance Program, as required by the Escrow Disputes Team.
Submittal of a final award of an arbitrator appointed pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program in favor of Freelancer or to the extent the award is in favor of Freelancer.
Issuance of an order by a court, arbitrator, or other judicial body of apparent competent jurisdiction in favor of Freelancer, in whole or in part, to the extent required by the order.
A condition to release funds to Freelancer described elsewhere in these Escrow Instructions applies.
4.2 RELEASE OF FUNDS TO CLIENT
Freelancer and Client authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release funds to the Client Escrow Account on the occurrence of any of the following Release Conditions, such authorization and instruction to be irrevocable except as expressly provided in these Escrow Instructions:
Freelancer cancels the Service Contract or accepts Client’s request to cancel the Service Contract (as described in Section 4.4), and funds for a Milestone or the Service Contract are held in Escrow.
Client and Freelancer have jointly submitted Supplemental Escrow Instructions in writing and signed by both Client and Freelancer to Upwork Escrow at legalnotices@upwork.com requesting a Release to the Client Escrow Account, and Upwork Escrow has agreed to the Supplemental Escrow Instructions.
Client and Freelancer agree to close the Service Contract without release of funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account.
Freelancer has declined Arbitration or failed to make its Arbitration Payment pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program.
Freelancer has failed to timely respond to a request for a refund submitted through the platform, Notice of Dispute, or otherwise failed to comply with the Dispute Assistance Program, as required by the Escrow Disputes Team.
Client shows that Freelancer has failed to render services in a professional and workmanlike manner in accordance with the professional experience represented by  Freelancer to Client.
Client shows that Freelancer has taken more than 7 days to respond to Client communications relevant to the Work Product.
Freelancer failed to deliver Work Product to Client within the timeframe agreed upon with Client and did not provide a minimum of 24 hours' advance notice to Client in the event Freelancer was unable to meet the deadline.
Submittal of a final award of an arbitrator appointed pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program in favor of Client or to the extent the award is in favor of Client.
Issuance of an order of a court, arbitrator, or other judicial body of apparent competent jurisdiction in favor of Client, in whole or in part, to the extent required by the order.
A condition to release funds to Client described elsewhere in these Escrow Instructions applies.
For Service Contracts entered through Project Catalog, Client has failed to respond to a request for project requirements within 48 hours, at which point any funds in escrow will be released to Client and the contract will be closed.
4.3 DORMANT ENGAGEMENTS
To be fair to Clients and Freelancers, Upwork has a procedure for Fixed-Price Contracts that appear to be Dormant Engagements (as defined below). For purposes of determining dormant status, “
activity
” means a change to the Service Contract, including Milestone updates or requests, Fixed-Price Escrow Funding, Fixed-Price Escrow Release, Fixed-Price Escrow Refunds, Funding requests, Release requests, requests to close the Fixed-Price Contract, or actions under the Dispute Assistance Program.
A “Dormant Engagement” is a Fixed-Price Contract that has a Fixed-Price Escrow Account with a balance but has had no activity for 90 consecutive calendar days after the last Milestone date contained in the Service Contract terms (“
Dormant Date
”). Dormant Engagements are subject to the following rules:
Upwork will notify Client when the Fixed-Price Contract becomes Dormant.
If the Client does not take any action within 7 calendar days after the Dormant Date and notification, Upwork will notify Freelancer that the Fixed-Price Contract is Dormant (“
Freelancer Notice of Dormant Engagement
”).
If Freelancer submits a Release request within 7 calendar days after the Freelancer Notice of Dormant Engagement and Client does not take any action for 14 calendar days from the date of the Release request, Freelancer and Client authorize and irrevocably instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release to Freelancer the amount related to the Milestone with the Release request.
If neither Freelancer nor Client take any action for 7 calendar days after the Freelancer Notice of Dormant Engagement, Freelancer and Client authorize and irrevocably instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release escrow funds to the Client Escrow Account.
4.4 REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS
Client and Freelancer are encouraged to come to a mutual agreement if refunds or cancellations are necessary. If there are no funds in Escrow, Client and Freelancer have the ability to cancel the Service Contract by clicking to close the Service Contract. If funds are held in Escrow, refunds and cancellations must be initiated by Client or Freelancer by following the steps in this Section.
4.4.1 REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS BY FREELANCER
If Freelancer wants to cancel a Service Contract with funds held in Escrow, Freelancer must select “End Contract” on the Upwork platform. When Freelancer ends the Service Contract on the Upwork platform, Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all funds held in Escrow on the Service Contract at that time.
Freelancer may issue a refund to Client up to the amount paid on a Service Contract in the past 180 days by selecting “Give a Refund” on the Upwork platform. Freelancer may not issue a refund in an amount greater than the combined amount of funds held in Freelancer Escrow Account, funds for transactions pending to be placed in the Freelancer Escrow Account, and funds for submitted Milestones. By selecting the option to give a refund, Freelancer agrees that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all Escrow funds currently held in the Freelancer Escrow Account and such funds as may be placed into the Freelancer Escrow Account once the funds are available, until the entire refund is provided to Client.
4.4.2 CANCELLATIONS BY CLIENT
If Client wants to cancel a Service Contract with funds held in Escrow, Client must select “End Contract” on the Upwork platform. Freelancer must select the option to either approve or dispute Client’s cancellation within 7 calendar days. If Freelancer approves the cancellation, Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all funds held in Escrow on the Service Contract at that time. If Freelancer is using the Site on a mobile device and does not have the ability to select the option to approve or dispute the cancellation on the mobile website or application, Freelancer must dispute Client’s cancellation via support ticket within 7 calendar days. If Freelancer takes no action within 7 calendar days from the date notification of the cancellation is sent to Freelancer by Upwork, Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all funds held in Escrow on the Service Contract at that time. If Freelancer disputes the cancellation, Freelancer and Client will be offered Upwork Dispute Assistance (as described in Section 6).
4.5 VIOLATION OF UPWORK TERMS OF SERVICE OR LAW
Freelancer and Client acknowledge and agree that if, in Upwork Escrow’s sole discretion, Upwork Escrow believes that fraud, illegal activity, or a violation of the Terms of Service has been committed or is being committed or attempted, then Client and Freelancer irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to take such actions as deemed appropriate, in Upwork Escrow’s sole discretion and in accordance with applicable law, in order to prevent or remedy such acts, including without limitation, to return the funds associated with such acts to their source of payment, as further described in Section 6.3 of the User Agreement. This Section 4.5 allows Upwork Escrow—as permitted by law but otherwise in its sole discretion—to return funds to Client’s Payment Method, continue to hold funds in Escrow, release funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account, or to turn funds over to third parties such as law enforcement.
5.
INSTRUCTIONS IRREVOCABLE
Client and Freelancer are deemed to and hereby agree that the instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to release funds is irrevocable, except as explicitly provided in these Escrow Instructions. Without limiting the foregoing, Client’s instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to release payment to Freelancer is irrevocable. Such instruction is Client’s authorization to transfer funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account from the Client Escrow Account or authorization to charge Client’s Payment Method. Such instruction is also Client’s representation that Client has received, inspected, and accepted the subject work or expense. Client acknowledges and agrees that upon receipt of Client’s instruction to release payment to the Freelancer Escrow Account, Upwork Escrow will transfer funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account and that Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and other Affiliates have no responsibility to and may not be able to recover such funds. Therefore, and in consideration of the services described in these Escrow Instructions and the Terms of Service, Client agrees that once Upwork Escrow or its subsidiaries or Affiliates have charged Client’s Payment Method, the charge is non-refundable. Client and Freelancer further agree that the only manner in which an instruction to Upwork Escrow is revocable is if Client and Freelancer have jointly submitted Supplemental Escrow Instructions in writing and signed by both Client and Freelancer to Upwork Escrow at
legalnotices@upwork.com
requesting that Upwork Escrow take specific action with respect to the funds in its possession, and Upwork Escrow has agreed to the Supplemental Escrow Instructions.
6. DISPUTE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a mutual resolution by way of the Refund and Cancellation process as stated in Section 4.4, Upwork provides the dispute assistance program administered by Upwork and described in this Section 6 (the “
Dispute Assistance Program
”) as a mechanism to resolve the dispute. If the funds in dispute are held in Escrow, the Dispute Assistance Program will proceed as described in Section 6.1. If the funds in dispute have been released, the Dispute Assistance Program will proceed as described in Section 6.2. The Dispute Assistance Program is not available for disputes filed or initiated past the Dispute Assistance deadlines, as set forth in Sections 6.1 and 6.2, as applicable. The Dispute Assistance Program is offered as a form of non-binding assistance to facilitate communication and potential resolution of disputes between clients and freelancers. The Dispute Assistance Program as administered by Upwork in this Section 6 does not evaluate the quality or functionality of work and cannot render binding judgment or determination as to the parties’ respective rights to the disputed funds. Fixed-Price Contracts with Enterprise Clients or Upwork Business Clients (defined in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
) are not subject to Sections 6 and 7, regarding Upwork’s Dispute Assistance Program and Arbitration, respectively.
6.1 DISPUTE OF FUNDS IN ESCROW
This Section applies to disputes over funds that are held in Escrow as of the date the dispute is filed (“
Escrow Dispute
”). The scope of the Escrow Dispute may cover the entirety of the Fixed-Price Contract and all Milestones previously funded, approved, and released. In the event of an Escrow Dispute, funds in Escrow will remain in Escrow while the Dispute Assistance Program or Arbitration, as applicable, is being administered. The Dispute Assistance Program for an Escrow Dispute will be administered as set forth below:
Escrow Dispute Assistance Deadline
: Escrow Disputes must be initiated before the funds in Escrow have been released in order to be eligible for the Dispute Assistance Program under this Section. Disputes over funds that have been released from Escrow may be eligible for the Dispute Assistance Program described in Section 6.2.
Initiating A Dispute:
Clients have the option to release partial milestone payments or request an Escrow refund. In turn, Freelancers and Agencies may initiate an Escrow Dispute when a Client fails to release a Milestone payment,  releases a partial milestone payment, request an escrow refund, or ends the project with an escrow balance, despite any purported delivery of work. More information on how to file a dispute on active or ended contracts can be found
here
Notice of Escrow Dispute:
Once a dispute has been filed, Client will be notified of the Escrow Dispute on the platform ("
Notice of Escrow Dispute").
The Notice of Escrow Dispute will request information and supporting documentation from Client.
Lack of Participation:
Client must respond to the Notice of Escrow Dispute within 5 calendar days. If Client does not timely respond to the Notice of Escrow Dispute, Client and Freelancer agree that the lack of timely response acts as an irrevocable authorization and instruction to Upwork Escrow to release the funds in Escrow from Client to Freelancer.
Non-Binding Assistance:
After Client responds to the Notice of Escrow Dispute, the Escrow Disputes Team will review the documentation submitted and known information available on the Site that pertains to the dispute. The Escrow Disputes Team will facilitate communication between the parties and help assess whether mutual resolution is possible. The Escrow Disputes Team does not evaluate the quality or functionality of work and cannot render binding judgment or determination as to the parties’ respective rights to the disputed funds.
Resolution of Escrow Dispute:
If the Escrow Disputes Team is able to facilitate a resolution between Client and Freelancer that both Client and Freelancer agree to in writing, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release Escrow funds in accordance with the agreed-upon resolution. This will result in a closure of the Escrow dispute ticket.
No Resolution:
If no resolution of the Escrow dispute has been reached within 14 calendar days of the Notice of Escrow Dispute, or if the Escrow Disputes Team determines in its sole discretion that no resolution between the parties is possible through the Dispute Assistance Program, the Escrow Disputes Team will issue a “
Notice of Non-Resolution
” and the Escrow dispute will be referred to Arbitration, as set forth in Section 7 below.
6.2 DISPUTE OF FUNDS RELEASED
This Section applies to disputes filed by Clients or Freelancers over funds that have been released from Escrow as of the date the dispute is filed (“
Dispute Mediation
”). The scope of the Dispute Mediation may cover any portion of or the entirety of the Fixed Price Contract and any Milestone previously funded, approved, and released. The Dispute Assistance Program for Dispute Mediation will be administered as set forth below:
Dispute Mediation Deadline:
Dispute Mediation must be initiated within 30 calendar days of the date that funds in Escrow have been released to the Freelancer in order to be eligible for the Dispute Assistance Program under this Section 6.2. Any dispute over funds that have been released from Escrow more than 30 days prior to the date the dispute is filed is no longer eligible for submission to the Dispute Assistance Program.
Initiating Dispute Mediation:
Requesting a Refund:
Clients may initiate Dispute Mediation for disputes over funds that have been released from Escrow by requesting a refund on the platform. If the Freelancer rejects the request for a refund, grants a partial refund that is subsequently rejected by the Client, or takes no action, the dispute will be referred to the Dispute Assistance Program. More information on how to file a dispute on active or ended contracts can be found
here
.
Contacting Support:
In addition to the above method, any User may contact Upwork Support for assistance initiating Dispute Mediation.
Notice of Dispute Mediation:
Once a dispute has been initiated, the Upwork Dispute Mediation team (“
Dispute Mediation Team
”) will notify Client and Freelancer of the Dispute Mediation in writing and request information and supporting documentation from the parties (“
Notice of Dispute Mediation
”). Client and Freelancer must respond to the Notice of Dispute Mediation within 5 calendar days.
Non-Binding Assistance:
Once both Client and Freelancer respond to the Notice of Dispute Mediation, the Dispute Mediation Team will review the documentation submitted and any information available on the Site that pertains to the dispute. The Dispute Mediation Team will facilitate communication between the parties and help assess whether mutual resolution is possible. The Dispute Mediation Team does not evaluate the quality or functionality of work and cannot render binding judgment or determination as to the parties’ respective rights to the disputed funds.
Resolution of Dispute Mediation:
If the Dispute Mediation Team is able to facilitate a resolution between Client and Freelancer, and if Client and Freelancer agree in writing to the resolution, the Dispute Mediation Team will send the applicable party instructions on transferring payment, if any, to an Escrow Account. By agreeing in writing to the resolution, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release Escrow funds in accordance with the agreed-upon resolution. This will result in the closure of the Dispute Mediation ticket.
No Resolution:
If no resolution of the dispute has been reached within 14 calendar days of the Notice of Dispute Mediation, or if the Dispute Mediation Team determines in its sole discretion that no resolution between the parties is possible through the Dispute Assistance Program, the Dispute Mediation Team will issue a “
Notice of Non-Resolution
,” and the dispute will be referred to Arbitration, as set forth in Section 7 below.
7. ARBITRATION
After a “
Notice of Non-Resolution
” is issued from the Upwork Dispute Assistance Program, Freelancer and Client each has the right to demand Arbitration of a Fixed-Price Contract if the Fixed-Price Escrow associated with the Fixed-Price Contract has been funded at least once. The demand for Arbitration must be communicated to the Escrow Disputes Team or Dispute Mediation Team, as applicable, within 7 calendar days of the date of the Notice of Non-Resolution. In any Arbitration, each of you and the other User is a “
Dispute Party
,” and collectively you are the “
Dispute Parties
.”
Any Arbitration under this Section 7 will be conducted by a neutral third-party Arbitration service (the
"Arbitration Service Provider"
), Ejudicate, Inc. d/b/a BRIEF, unless Upwork chooses another Arbitration service. The Arbitration rules and fees are set out in Appendix A to these Escrow Instructions.
7.1 ARBITRATION INITIATION PROCEDURE
Notice of Arbitration Demand:
Client and Freelancer have 7 calendar days after receiving the Notice of Non-Resolution to notify Upwork via a dispute ticket of their intent to initiate Arbitration and to submit payment. The Upwork Dispute Team will then provide a “
Notice of Arbitration Demand
” to both Client and Freelancer and provide the Dispute Parties with information on how to submit Client’s or Freelancer’s applicable portion of the costs of Arbitration (the “
Arbitration Payment
”).
Upwork Escrow Disputes:
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by both parties:
If both Dispute Parties decline to take the matter to Arbitration or do not make the Arbitration Payment within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release the funds in Escrow, if any, to the Client’s primary payment method on file. This will close the Escrow Dispute ticket. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file for Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s
Privacy Policy
.
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by one party:
If one party elects to take the matter to Arbitration and has submitted the Arbitration Payment (“
Participating Party
”), and the other party rejects Arbitration, fails to submit the Arbitration Payment or does not respond within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution (“
Non-Participating Party
”), Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release the funds in Escrow, if any, to the Participating Party. This will close the Escrow Dispute ticket. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file for Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s
Privacy Policy
.
Upwork Dispute Mediation
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by both parties:
If both Dispute Parties decline to take the matter to Arbitration or do not respond to Upwork’s Notice of Non-Resolution within 7 calendar days, the Dispute Mediation ticket will be closed. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file of Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s
Privacy Policy
.
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by one party:
If one party elects to take the matter to Arbitration and has submitted the Arbitration Payment, and the other party rejects Arbitration, fails to submit the Arbitration Payment or does not respond within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution, the participating party may pay the full Arbitration fee for both parties to proceed to Arbitration. In the event that the participating party pays the full Arbitration fee for both parties, Freelancer and Client agree to proceed to binding Arbitration pursuant to the process listed below and further agree that the non-prevailing party will be responsible for paying any costs and fees incurred by the prevailing party in the Arbitration, as determined by the Arbitrator and included in the Arbitration award. If the participating party does not wish to pay the full Arbitration fee for both parties, the Escrow Dispute ticket will be closed. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file for Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s Privacy Policy.
Arbitration Instructions:
If both parties timely submit the Arbitration Payment, or if one party elects to pay the full Arbitration fee for both parties, Upwork will instruct the parties on the process for initiating the Arbitration with the Arbitration Service Provider. After the parties have initiated the Arbitration, Upwork will provide the Arbitration Service Provider with relevant documentation, including information collected in the Escrow Dispute or Dispute Mediation process and contents of the Contract Room. The scope of Arbitration may cover the entirety of the Fixed-Price Contract and all Milestones previously funded, approved, and released.
7.2 AUTHORIZATION TO COLLECT ARBITRATION FEES
When you electronically authorize payment of the invoice for the Arbitration Payment as emailed to you by Upwork, you irrevocably authorize and instruct (i) Upwork Escrow or its Affiliates, as your agent, to charge your Payment Method for the amount of the payment for credit to your Escrow Account; and (ii) Upwork Escrow, as escrow agent, to immediately release that amount from your Escrow Account and pay it to Upwork. If Upwork Escrow or its Affiliates cannot collect sufficient funds to fulfill the Escrow release instructions for any reason, Upwork Escrow has no obligation with respect to making the payment to Upwork on your behalf, and you will be considered as not having paid the Arbitration Payment as required by this Section 7.2.
7.3 LIMITATIONS PERIOD FOR ARBITRATIONS
If both Client and Freelancer fail to demand Arbitration or fail to timely submit the Arbitration payments within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution, then the dispute is no longer eligible for Arbitration under this process, and Client and Freelancer will be deemed to have irrevocably authorized and instructed Upwork Escrow to, and Upwork Escrow will, release all funds in the Fixed-Price Escrow Account to the Client’s Escrow Account.
7.4 ARBITRATION AWARD
Client and Freelancer agree that the arbitrator of the Arbitration Service Provider is authorized to decide the Escrow Dispute or Dispute Mediation within its sole discretion. You agree that the arbitrator’s award is final and binding, that it may be entered in and enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction, and that if the arbitrator delivers notice of any award to Upwork, then Upwork and Upwork Escrow have the right to treat such notice as conclusive and act in reliance thereon.
If Client or Freelancer refuses to comply with the Arbitrator’s award, Upwork will suspend the non-complying Party’s User account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, which may impact the non-complying Party’s ability to withdraw funds.
8. SERVICE FEES FOR ESCROW FUNDS RELEASED FOLLOWING DISPUTE ASSISTANCE
All Escrow funds released under the Dispute Assistance Program are subject to the normal Service Fees associated with Escrow Accounts, as detailed in the User Agreement and these Escrow Instructions.
9. NOTICES
All notices to a User required by these Escrow Instructions will be made via email sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address. Users are solely responsible for maintaining a current, active email address registered with Upwork, for checking their registered email address and for responding to notices sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address.
10. COOPERATION WITH THE DISPUTE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
All claims, disputes or other disagreements between you and another User that are covered by the Dispute Assistance Program must be resolved in accordance with the terms in the Dispute Assistance Program. All claims filed or brought contrary to the Dispute Assistance Program will be considered improperly filed, unless otherwise required by law, and Upwork will have the right to take any other action, including suspension or termination of your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds, and any other legal action as Upwork deems appropriate in its sole discretion.
11. ABUSE
Upwork, in its sole discretion, reserves the right to suspend or terminate your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, immediately upon giving notice to you if Upwork believes you may be abusing the Dispute Assistance Program or as otherwise permitted by the
Terms of Service
, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds. However, any disputes for any Fixed-Price Contracts that existed prior to termination will be subject to the Terms of Service.
12. NO RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICES OR PAYMENTS
Upwork and Affiliates merely provide a platform for Internet payment services. Upwork and Affiliates do not have any responsibility or control over the Freelancer Services that Client purchases. Nothing in this Agreement deems or will be interpreted to deem Upwork or any Affiliate as Client’s or Freelancer’s agent with respect to any Freelancer Services, or expand or modify any warranty, liability or indemnity stated in the Terms of Service. For example, Upwork does not guarantee the performance, functionality, quality, or timeliness of Freelancer Services or that a Client can or will make payments.
APPENDIX A
RULES AND FEES FOR ARBITRATIONS CONDUCTED BY THE ARBITRATION SERVICE PROVIDER, BRIEF
This Appendix A summarizes certain pertinent contractual terms that BRIEF has agreed to in providing arbitration services to Clients and Freelancers who choose BRIEF as their arbitrator under the Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions. BRIEF is solely a third-party arbitration service provider. Upwork and its Affiliates have no direct or indirect affiliate, partnership, joint venture, ownership or control relationship with or interest in BRIEF, and therefore Upwork and its Affiliates assume no responsibility or liability for the services of BRIEF.
ARBITRATOR SELECTION
All Arbitrations by Brief are conducted by a single arbitrator. The arbitrator is selected by Brief based on jurisdiction of the matter, skillset, experience, impartiality and neutrality, amongst other factors. The arbitrator is required to render a ruling fairly, independently, impartially and without any conflict of interest. The arbitrator will provide a ruling over the matter, but cannot provide independent legal advice to any party.
RULES OF THE PROCEEDINGS
The amount at issue in any claims or counterclaims relating to a Fixed-Price Contract will be limited to the sum still held in Escrow and the sum previously released from Escrow for the Fixed-Price Contract.
The language of the Arbitration will be English.
All proceedings will be “on documents,” unless the parties opt for and fund payment for the additional cost of a live hearing (see fees below). The evidence admissible will consist solely and exclusively of documents and communications between the parties and related to the contract, and testimony if a live hearing is conducted. The arbitrator's award will be based on the supporting, relevant, admissible documents and statements. Once arbitration is initiated, the failure of one party or the other to respond to an arbitrator request or otherwise continue to participate in the Arbitration will not prevent the arbitrator from making an award.
Each party is given an opportunity to submit, in writing or through digital representations, the party’s testimony and supporting evidence through the BRIEF process and platform. Each party is also given an opportunity to rebut the other party’s testimony or supporting evidence. All testimony submitted to BRIEF is submitted under penalty of perjury. Failure to respond to a claim will lead to a waiver of any defenses and may result in an entry of default.
All properly submitted testimony and evidence will be reviewed by the arbitrator after the parties complete their submissions.
The Arbitration generally will conclude within 30 calendar days from the date of submission to the Arbitration Service Provider, with reasonable extensions provided only as necessary.
All awards will be final and non-appealable, and will be enforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction.
COMMUNICATIONS, DOCUMENTS, AND TESTIMONY
All communications between the parties and the arbitrator shall occur over the BRIEF platform. The arbitrator will not engage in ex-parte communications; rather, communications by either party to the arbitrator will be shared with all parties.
Any and all submissions of testimony must be submitted through the BRIEF platform, which can support the following document types: .png, .jpg, .jpeg, .pdf.
The parties do not engage in direct discovery, including interrogatories, requests for admissions or production, or depositions. At the arbitrator’s sole discretion, the arbitrator may permit or require the submission of additional written statements from the parties (“
Additional Arguments
”). The arbitrator is not required to permit Additional Arguments. If the arbitrator permits Additional Arguments, the arbitrator will establish the schedule and rules for the submission of such Additional Arguments, including any limits on the length of such Additional Arguments.
THE AWARD
BRIEF will provide Upwork and the parties with a written award promptly upon the conclusion of the Arbitration, and in no event later than 14 calendar days after conclusion of the Arbitration. At the arbitrator’s sole discretion, the arbitrator may provide written reasons for the Award to the parties. The arbitrator may also issue orders to protect the confidentiality of proprietary information. Once rendered, an arbitrator’s award is final, and cannot be appealed. The award will only be modified or edited after it is issued if such change is due to the arbitrator’s error or otherwise at the arbitrator’s discretion.
FEES
The fee for Arbitrations by BRIEF is $675 for claims with less than $20,000 in dispute. An additional fee is assessed for claims that exceed $20,000, which will be calculated as a percentage of the claim amount. The Client and Freelancer may also choose to pay a $450 fee to have a live hearing with the arbitrator as part of the Arbitration; this additional service and cost is completely optional.
All fees will be collected at the start of the arbitration. For all claims, Client and Freelancer will each be responsible for paying $337.50.  One party may, as described above, pay the full $675 for both parties to proceed to arbitration. They will also share the cost of the live hearing if they choose that option. Upwork will cover the additional initial costs of each arbitration.
Current Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions
If a Client and a Freelancer (defined below) enter into a Fixed-Price Contract on the Upwork site, these Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions (“
Escrow Instructions
”) apply. These Escrow Instructions govern Fixed-Price Escrow Accounts. If you have a Fixed-Price Contract and wish to make or receive a miscellaneous or bonus payment, those activities are governed by the
Hourly, Bonus, and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may modify these Escrow Instructions without prior notice to you, and any revisions to these Escrow Instructions will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. The version of these Escrow Instructions in effect on the date any Fixed-Price Contract is entered into apply to that contract. Please check the Site often for updates.
These Escrow Instructions hereby incorporate by reference the
Terms of Service
(“
Terms of Service
”). Capitalized terms not defined in these Escrow Instructions are defined in the
User Agreement
or
elsewhere in the Terms of Service, or have the meanings given such terms on the Site. For purposes of these Escrow Instructions, the term “
Freelancer
” means a User with a Freelancer and/or Agency account.
Escrow services are provided by Upwork Escrow Inc. (“
Upwork Escrow
”) pursuant to Internet Escrow Agent license no. 9635086, issued by the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.
1. DIGITAL SIGNATURE AND COMMUNICATIONS
By clicking to fund Escrow (a “
Funding Approval
”) or to accept a Fixed-Price Contract, Client and Freelancer are deemed to have executed these Escrow Instructions electronically, effective on the date Freelancer clicks to accept the engagement, pursuant to California Civil Code Section 1633.8 and the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001,
et seq
.
, as may be amended from time to time (the "
E-Sign Act
"). Doing so constitutes an acknowledgement that
Client and Freelancer agree to conduct the transaction electronically, and
are able to electronically receive, download, and print these Escrow Instruc
tions. All references to the Escrow in these Escrow Instructions will include the initial Funding Approval and any additional Funding Approval for a Fixed-Price Contract.
Client and Freelancer agree that any written communications required herein may be provided electronically, including by email or support ticket, if applicable. Any communication sent to Upwork via U.S. mail or similar service will be deemed timely if received by Upwork by the applicable deadline.
2. ACCEPTANCE OF ESCROW INSTRUCTIONS
Once a Client and Freelancer have agreed to a Service Contract, and the Client and Freelancer have selected “Agree” on the send offer, accept offer, or pages relating to the Service Contract to accept the Terms of Service (including these Escrow Instructions), these Escrow Instructions constitute a binding agreement between Client, Freelancer, and Upwork Escrow (collectively, the “
Parties
”). Client and Freelancer must execute (by digital signature or by a method mutually agreed upon by both parties), and Upwork Escrow must agree to, any supplemental instruction or addition, deletion or alteration thereto in writing (collectively the “
Supplemental Escrow Instruction
”). Upwork Escrow reserves the right to reject any Supplemental Escrow Instruction.
3. DEPOSIT OF FUNDS INTO ESCROW
By sending a contract offer to Freelancer or accepting a contract offer from Freelancer, Client agrees to deposit funds for the amount of the first Milestone (as defined on the Site), or, if there are no Milestones, the full amount of the Service Contract. Additional Milestones may be funded on the same contract by Client by selecting the button to add an additional Milestone or to activate the next Milestone on the Site. Funds deposited by Client remain in the Client Escrow Account until they are released to the Freelancer Escrow Account or released to Client Escrow Account. Upwork Escrow will release funds held in escrow pursuant to Section 4 of these Escrow Instructions (Release and Delivery of Amounts in Escrow).
4. RELEASE AND DELIVERY OF AMOUNTS IN ESCROW
Client and Freelancer irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to release applicable portions of the Fixed-Price Escrow Account (each portion, a “
Release
”) to the Freelancer Escrow Account or Client Escrow Account, as applicable, based on the instructions described in this Section 4 (each such instruction, a “
Release Condition
”), or as otherwise required by applicable law or expressly permitted by the Terms of Service. The amount of each Release will be delivered to the applicable Escrow Account in accordance with Freelancer’s or Client’s instructions, these Escrow Instructions, and the other Terms of Service. All funds released pursuant to these Escrow Instructions are subject to applicable fees as described in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
.
4.1 RELEASE OF FUNDS TO FREELANCER
Freelancer and Client authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account on the occurrence of any of the following Release Conditions, such authorization and instruction to be irrevocable except as expressly provided in these Escrow Instructions:
Client affirmatively selects the option to release funds for a Milestone or Service Contract to Freelancer.
Client does not take any action for 14 calendar days from the date of Freelancer’s Release request, in which case Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and instructed to immediately release to Freelancer the amount associated with the applicable Milestone in connection with such Release request.
Client and Freelancer have jointly submitted Supplemental Escrow Instructions in writing and signed by both Client and Freelancer to Upwork Escrow at legalnotices@upwork.com requesting a Release to Freelancer Escrow Account, and Upwork Escrow has agreed to the Supplemental Escrow Instructions.
Client has declined Arbitration or failed to make its Arbitration Payment (defined below) pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program, and Freelancer has agreed to Arbitration and submitted its Arbitration Payment.
Client has failed timely to respond to a Notice of Dispute (defined below) or otherwise failed to comply with the Dispute Assistance Program, as required by the Escrow Disputes Team.
Submittal of a final award of an arbitrator appointed pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program in favor of Freelancer or to the extent the award is in favor of Freelancer.
Issuance of an order by a court, arbitrator, or other judicial body of apparent competent jurisdiction in favor of Freelancer, in whole or in part, to the extent required by the order.
A condition to release funds to Freelancer described elsewhere in these Escrow Instructions applies.
4.2 RELEASE OF FUNDS TO CLIENT
Freelancer and Client authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release funds to the Client Escrow Account on the occurrence of any of the following Release Conditions, such authorization and instruction to be irrevocable except as expressly provided in these Escrow Instructions:
Freelancer cancels the Service Contract or accepts Client’s request to cancel the Service Contract (as described in Section 4.4), and funds for a Milestone or the Service Contract are held in Escrow.
Client and Freelancer have jointly submitted Supplemental Escrow Instructions in writing and signed by both Client and Freelancer to Upwork Escrow at legalnotices@upwork.com requesting a Release to the Client Escrow Account, and Upwork Escrow has agreed to the Supplemental Escrow Instructions.
Client and Freelancer agree to close the Service Contract without release of funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account.
Freelancer has declined Arbitration or failed to make its Arbitration Payment pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program.
Freelancer has failed to timely respond to a request for a refund submitted through the platform, Notice of Dispute, or otherwise failed to comply with the Dispute Assistance Program, as required by the Escrow Disputes Team.
Submittal of a final award of an arbitrator appointed pursuant to the Dispute Assistance Program in favor of Client or to the extent the award is in favor of Client.
Issuance of an order of a court, arbitrator, or other judicial body of apparent competent jurisdiction in favor of Client, in whole or in part, to the extent required by the order.
A condition to release funds to Client described elsewhere in these Escrow Instructions applies.
For Service Contracts entered through Project Catalog, Client has failed to respond to a request for project requirements within 48 hours, at which point any funds in escrow will be released to Client and the contract will be closed.
4.3 DORMANT ENGAGEMENTS
To be fair to Clients and Freelancers, Upwork has a procedure for Fixed-Price Contracts that appear to be Dormant Engagements (as defined below). For purposes of determining dormant status, “
activity
” means a change to the Service Contract, including Milestone updates or requests, Fixed-Price Escrow Funding, Fixed-Price Escrow Release, Fixed-Price Escrow Refunds, Funding requests, Release requests, requests to close the Fixed-Price Contract, or actions under the Dispute Assistance Program.
A “Dormant Engagement” is a Fixed-Price Contract that has a Fixed-Price Escrow Account with a balance but has had no activity for 90 consecutive calendar days after the last Milestone date contained in the Service Contract terms (“
Dormant Date
”). Dormant Engagements are subject to the following rules:
Upwork will notify Client when the Fixed-Price Contract becomes Dormant.
If the Client does not take any action within 7 calendar days after the Dormant Date and notification, Upwork will notify Freelancer that the Fixed-Price Contract is Dormant (“
Freelancer Notice of Dormant Engagement
”).
If Freelancer submits a Release request within 7 calendar days after the Freelancer Notice of Dormant Engagement and Client does not take any action for 14 calendar days from the date of the Release request, Freelancer and Client authorize and irrevocably instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release to Freelancer the amount related to the Milestone with the Release request.
If neither Freelancer nor Client take any action for 7 calendar days after the Freelancer Notice of Dormant Engagement, Freelancer and Client authorize and irrevocably instruct Upwork Escrow to immediately release escrow funds to the Client Escrow Account.
4.4 REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS
Client and Freelancer are encouraged to come to a mutual agreement if refunds or cancellations are necessary. If there are no funds in Escrow, Client and Freelancer have the ability to cancel the Service Contract by clicking to close the Service Contract. If funds are held in Escrow, refunds and cancellations must be initiated by Client or Freelancer by following the steps in this Section.
4.4.1 REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS BY FREELANCER
If Freelancer wants to cancel a Service Contract with funds held in Escrow, Freelancer must select “End Contract” on the Upwork platform. When Freelancer ends the Service Contract on the Upwork platform, Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all funds held in Escrow on the Service Contract at that time.
Freelancer may issue a refund to Client up to the amount paid on a Service Contract in the past 180 days by selecting “Give a Refund” on the Upwork platform. Freelancer may not issue a refund in an amount greater than the combined amount of funds held in Freelancer Escrow Account, funds for transactions pending to be placed in the Freelancer Escrow Account, and funds for submitted Milestones. By selecting the option to give a refund, Freelancer agrees that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all Escrow funds currently held in the Freelancer Escrow Account and such funds as may be placed into the Freelancer Escrow Account once the funds are available, until the entire refund is provided to Client.
4.4.2 CANCELLATIONS BY CLIENT
If Client wants to cancel a Service Contract with funds held in Escrow, Client must select “End Contract” on the Upwork platform. Freelancer must select the option to either approve or dispute Client’s cancellation within 7 calendar days. If Freelancer approves the cancellation, Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all funds held in Escrow on the Service Contract at that time. If Freelancer is using the Site on a mobile device and does not have the ability to select the option to approve or dispute the cancellation on the mobile website or application, Freelancer must dispute Client’s cancellation via support ticket within 7 calendar days. If Freelancer takes no action within 7 calendar days from the date notification of the cancellation is sent to Freelancer by Upwork, Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to the Client Escrow Account all funds held in Escrow on the Service Contract at that time. If Freelancer disputes the cancellation, Freelancer and Client will be offered Upwork Dispute Assistance (as described in Section 6).
4.5 VIOLATION OF UPWORK TERMS OF SERVICE OR LAW
Freelancer and Client acknowledge and agree that if, in Upwork Escrow’s sole discretion, Upwork Escrow believes that fraud, illegal activity, or a violation of the Terms of Service has been committed or is being committed or attempted, then Client and Freelancer irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to take such actions as deemed appropriate, in Upwork Escrow’s sole discretion and in accordance with applicable law, in order to prevent or remedy such acts, including without limitation, to return the funds associated with such acts to their source of payment, as further described in Section 6.3 of the User Agreement. This Section 4.5 allows Upwork Escrow—as permitted by law but otherwise in its sole discretion—to return funds to Client’s Payment Method, continue to hold funds in Escrow, release funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account, or to turn funds over to third parties such as law enforcement.
5.
INSTRUCTIONS IRREVOCABLE
Client and Freelancer are deemed to and hereby agree that the instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to release funds is irrevocable, except as explicitly provided in these Escrow Instructions. Without limiting the foregoing, Client’s instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to release payment to Freelancer is irrevocable. Such instruction is Client’s authorization to transfer funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account from the Client Escrow Account or authorization to charge Client’s Payment Method. Such instruction is also Client’s representation that Client has received, inspected, and accepted the subject work or expense. Client acknowledges and agrees that upon receipt of Client’s instruction to release payment to the Freelancer Escrow Account, Upwork Escrow will transfer funds to the Freelancer Escrow Account and that Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and other Affiliates have no responsibility to and may not be able to recover such funds. Therefore, and in consideration of the services described in these Escrow Instructions and the Terms of Service, Client agrees that once Upwork Escrow or its subsidiaries or Affiliates have charged Client’s Payment Method, the charge is non-refundable. Client and Freelancer further agree that the only manner in which an instruction to Upwork Escrow is revocable is if Client and Freelancer have jointly submitted Supplemental Escrow Instructions in writing and signed by both Client and Freelancer to Upwork Escrow at
legalnotices@upwork.com
requesting that Upwork Escrow take specific action with respect to the funds in its possession, and Upwork Escrow has agreed to the Supplemental Escrow Instructions.
6. DISPUTE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a mutual resolution by way of the Refund and Cancellation process as stated in Section 4.4, Upwork provides the dispute assistance program administered by Upwork and described in this Section 6 (the “
Dispute Assistance Program
”) as a mechanism to resolve the dispute. If the funds in dispute are held in Escrow, the Dispute Assistance Program will proceed as described in Section 6.1. If the funds in dispute have been released, the Dispute Assistance Program will proceed as described in Section 6.2. The Dispute Assistance Program is not available for disputes filed or initiated past the Dispute Assistance deadlines, as set forth in Sections 6.1 and 6.2, as applicable. The Dispute Assistance Program is offered as a form of non-binding assistance to facilitate communication and potential resolution of disputes between clients and freelancers. The Dispute Assistance Program as administered by Upwork in this Section 6 does not evaluate the quality or functionality of work and cannot render binding judgment or determination as to the parties’ respective rights to the disputed funds. Fixed-Price Contracts with Enterprise Clients or Upwork Business Clients (defined in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
) are not subject to Sections 6 and 7, regarding Upwork’s Dispute Assistance Program and Arbitration, respectively.
6.1 DISPUTE OF FUNDS IN ESCROW
This Section applies to disputes over funds that are held in Escrow as of the date the dispute is filed (“
Escrow Dispute
”). The scope of the Escrow Dispute may cover the entirety of the Fixed-Price Contract and all Milestones previously funded, approved, and released. In the event of an Escrow Dispute, funds in Escrow will remain in Escrow while the Dispute Assistance Program or Arbitration, as applicable, is being administered. The Dispute Assistance Program for an Escrow Dispute will be administered as set forth below:
Escrow Dispute Assistance Deadline
: Escrow Disputes must be initiated before the funds in Escrow have been released in order to be eligible for the Dispute Assistance Program under this Section. Disputes over funds that have been released from Escrow may be eligible for the Dispute Assistance Program described in Section 6.2.
Initiating A Dispute:
Clients have the option to release partial milestone payments or request an Escrow refund. In turn, Freelancers and Agencies may initiate an Escrow Dispute when a Client fails to release a Milestone payment,  releases a partial milestone payment, request an escrow refund, or ends the project with an escrow balance, despite any purported delivery of work. More information on how to file a dispute on active or ended contracts can be found
here
Notice of Escrow Dispute:
Once a dispute has been filed, Client will be notified of the Escrow Dispute on the platform ("
Notice of Escrow Dispute").
The Notice of Escrow Dispute will request information and supporting documentation from Client.
Lack of Participation:
Client must respond to the Notice of Escrow Dispute within 5 calendar days. If Client does not timely respond to the Notice of Escrow Dispute, Client and Freelancer agree that the lack of timely response acts as an irrevocable authorization and instruction to Upwork Escrow to release the funds in Escrow from Client to Freelancer.
Non-Binding Assistance:
After Client responds to the Notice of Escrow Dispute, the Escrow Disputes Team will review the documentation submitted and known information available on the Site that pertains to the dispute. The Escrow Disputes Team will facilitate communication between the parties and help assess whether mutual resolution is possible. The Escrow Disputes Team does not evaluate the quality or functionality of work and cannot render binding judgment or determination as to the parties’ respective rights to the disputed funds.
Resolution of Escrow Dispute:
If the Escrow Disputes Team is able to facilitate a resolution between Client and Freelancer that both Client and Freelancer agree to in writing, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release Escrow funds in accordance with the agreed-upon resolution. This will result in a closure of the Escrow dispute ticket.
No Resolution:
If no resolution of the Escrow dispute has been reached within 14 calendar days of the Notice of Escrow Dispute, or if the Escrow Disputes Team determines in its sole discretion that no resolution between the parties is possible through the Dispute Assistance Program, the Escrow Disputes Team will issue a “
Notice of Non-Resolution
” and the Escrow dispute will be referred to Arbitration, as set forth in Section 7 below.
6.2 DISPUTE OF FUNDS RELEASED
This Section applies to disputes filed by Clients or Freelancers over funds that have been released from Escrow as of the date the dispute is filed (“
Dispute Mediation
”). The scope of the Dispute Mediation may cover any portion of or the entirety of the Fixed Price Contract and any Milestone previously funded, approved, and released. The Dispute Assistance Program for Dispute Mediation will be administered as set forth below:
Dispute Mediation Deadline:
Dispute Mediation must be initiated within 30 calendar days of the date that funds in Escrow have been released to the Freelancer in order to be eligible for the Dispute Assistance Program under this Section 6.2. Any dispute over funds that have been released from Escrow more than 30 days prior to the date the dispute is filed is no longer eligible for submission to the Dispute Assistance Program.
Initiating Dispute Mediation:
Requesting a Refund:
Clients may initiate Dispute Mediation for disputes over funds that have been released from Escrow by requesting a refund on the platform. If the Freelancer rejects the request for a refund, grants a partial refund that is subsequently rejected by the Client, or takes no action, the dispute will be referred to the Dispute Assistance Program. More information on how to file a dispute on active or ended contracts can be found
here
.
Contacting Support:
In addition to the above method, any User may contact Upwork Support for assistance initiating Dispute Mediation.
Notice of Dispute Mediation:
Once a dispute has been initiated, the Upwork Dispute Mediation team (“
Dispute Mediation Team
”) will notify Client and Freelancer of the Dispute Mediation in writing and request information and supporting documentation from the parties (“
Notice of Dispute Mediation
”). Client and Freelancer must respond to the Notice of Dispute Mediation within 5 calendar days.
Non-Binding Assistance:
Once both Client and Freelancer respond to the Notice of Dispute Mediation, the Dispute Mediation Team will review the documentation submitted and any information available on the Site that pertains to the dispute. The Dispute Mediation Team will facilitate communication between the parties and help assess whether mutual resolution is possible. The Dispute Mediation Team does not evaluate the quality or functionality of work and cannot render binding judgment or determination as to the parties’ respective rights to the disputed funds.
Resolution of Dispute Mediation:
If the Dispute Mediation Team is able to facilitate a resolution between Client and Freelancer, and if Client and Freelancer agree in writing to the resolution, the Dispute Mediation Team will send the applicable party instructions on transferring payment, if any, to an Escrow Account. By agreeing in writing to the resolution, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release Escrow funds in accordance with the agreed-upon resolution. This will result in the closure of the Dispute Mediation ticket.
No Resolution:
If no resolution of the dispute has been reached within 14 calendar days of the Notice of Dispute Mediation, or if the Dispute Mediation Team determines in its sole discretion that no resolution between the parties is possible through the Dispute Assistance Program, the Dispute Mediation Team will issue a “
Notice of Non-Resolution
,” and the dispute will be referred to Arbitration, as set forth in Section 7 below.
7. ARBITRATION
After a “
Notice of Non-Resolution
” is issued from the Upwork Dispute Assistance Program, Freelancer and Client each has the right to demand Arbitration of a Fixed-Price Contract if the Fixed-Price Escrow associated with the Fixed-Price Contract has been funded at least once. The demand for Arbitration must be communicated to the Escrow Disputes Team or Dispute Mediation Team, as applicable, within 7 calendar days of the date of the Notice of Non-Resolution. In any Arbitration, each of you and the other User is a “
Dispute Party
,” and collectively you are the “
Dispute Parties
.”
Any Arbitration under this Section 7 will be conducted by a neutral third-party Arbitration service (the
"Arbitration Service Provider"
), Ejudicate, Inc. d/b/a BRIEF, unless Upwork chooses another Arbitration service. The Arbitration rules and fees are set out in Appendix A to these Escrow Instructions.
7.1 ARBITRATION INITIATION PROCEDURE
Notice of Arbitration Demand:
Client and Freelancer have 7 calendar days after receiving the Notice of Non-Resolution to notify Upwork via a dispute ticket of their intent to initiate Arbitration and to submit payment. The Upwork Dispute Team will then provide a “
Notice of Arbitration Demand
” to both Client and Freelancer and provide the Dispute Parties with information on how to submit Client’s or Freelancer’s applicable portion of the costs of Arbitration (the “
Arbitration Payment
”).
Upwork Escrow Disputes:
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by both parties:
If both Dispute Parties decline to take the matter to Arbitration or do not make the Arbitration Payment within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution, Client and Freelancer agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release the funds in Escrow, if any, to the Client’s primary payment method on file. This will close the Escrow Dispute ticket. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file for Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s
Privacy Policy
.
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by one party:
If one party elects to take the matter to Arbitration and has submitted the Arbitration Payment (“
Participating Party
”), and the other party rejects Arbitration, fails to submit the Arbitration Payment or does not respond within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution (“
Non-Participating Party
”), Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release the funds in Escrow, if any, to the Participating Party. This will close the Escrow Dispute ticket. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file for Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s
Privacy Policy
.
Upwork Dispute Mediation
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by both parties:
If both Dispute Parties decline to take the matter to Arbitration or do not respond to Upwork’s Notice of Non-Resolution within 7 calendar days, the Dispute Mediation ticket will be closed. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file of Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s
Privacy Policy
.
Rejection of Arbitration or non-participation by one party:
If one party elects to take the matter to Arbitration and has submitted the Arbitration Payment, and the other party rejects Arbitration, fails to submit the Arbitration Payment or does not respond within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution, the participating party may pay the full Arbitration fee for both parties to proceed to Arbitration. In the event that the participating party pays the full Arbitration fee for both parties, Freelancer and Client agree to proceed to binding Arbitration pursuant to the process listed below and further agree that the non-prevailing party will be responsible for paying any costs and fees incurred by the prevailing party in the Arbitration, as determined by the Arbitrator and included in the Arbitration award. If the participating party does not wish to pay the full Arbitration fee for both parties, the Escrow Dispute ticket will be closed. To the extent the parties wish to take legal action to enforce their contractual rights, Upwork may provide contact information on file for Client or Freelancer, consistent with Upwork’s Privacy Policy.
Arbitration Instructions:
If both parties timely submit the Arbitration Payment, or if one party elects to pay the full Arbitration fee for both parties, Upwork will instruct the parties on the process for initiating the Arbitration with the Arbitration Service Provider. After the parties have initiated the Arbitration, Upwork will provide the Arbitration Service Provider with relevant documentation, including information collected in the Escrow Dispute or Dispute Mediation process and contents of the Contract Room. The scope of Arbitration may cover the entirety of the Fixed-Price Contract and all Milestones previously funded, approved, and released.
7.2 AUTHORIZATION TO COLLECT ARBITRATION FEES
When you electronically authorize payment of the invoice for the Arbitration Payment as emailed to you by Upwork, you irrevocably authorize and instruct (i) Upwork Escrow or its Affiliates, as your agent, to charge your Payment Method for the amount of the payment for credit to your Escrow Account; and (ii) Upwork Escrow, as escrow agent, to immediately release that amount from your Escrow Account and pay it to Upwork. If Upwork Escrow or its Affiliates cannot collect sufficient funds to fulfill the Escrow release instructions for any reason, Upwork Escrow has no obligation with respect to making the payment to Upwork on your behalf, and you will be considered as not having paid the Arbitration Payment as required by this Section 7.2.
7.3 LIMITATIONS PERIOD FOR ARBITRATIONS
If both Client and Freelancer fail to demand Arbitration or fail to timely submit the Arbitration payments within 7 calendar days of the Notice of Non-Resolution, then the dispute is no longer eligible for Arbitration under this process, and Client and Freelancer will be deemed to have irrevocably authorized and instructed Upwork Escrow to, and Upwork Escrow will, release all funds in the Fixed-Price Escrow Account to the Client’s Escrow Account.
7.4 ARBITRATION AWARD
Client and Freelancer agree that the arbitrator of the Arbitration Service Provider is authorized to decide the Escrow Dispute or Dispute Mediation within its sole discretion. You agree that the arbitrator’s award is final and binding, that it may be entered in and enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction, and that if the arbitrator delivers notice of any award to Upwork, then Upwork and Upwork Escrow have the right to treat such notice as conclusive and act in reliance thereon.
If Client or Freelancer refuses to comply with the Arbitrator’s award, Upwork will suspend the non-complying Party’s User account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, which may impact the non-complying Party’s ability to withdraw funds.
8. SERVICE FEES FOR ESCROW FUNDS RELEASED FOLLOWING DISPUTE ASSISTANCE
All Escrow funds released under the Dispute Assistance Program are subject to the normal Service Fees associated with Escrow Accounts, as detailed in the User Agreement and these Escrow Instructions.
9. NOTICES
All notices to a User required by these Escrow Instructions will be made via email sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address. Users are solely responsible for maintaining a current, active email address registered with Upwork, for checking their registered email address and for responding to notices sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address.
10. COOPERATION WITH THE DISPUTE ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
All claims, disputes or other disagreements between you and another User that are covered by the Dispute Assistance Program must be resolved in accordance with the terms in the Dispute Assistance Program. All claims filed or brought contrary to the Dispute Assistance Program will be considered improperly filed, unless otherwise required by law, and Upwork will have the right to take any other action, including suspension or termination of your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds, and any other legal action as Upwork deems appropriate in its sole discretion.
11. ABUSE
Upwork, in its sole discretion, reserves the right to suspend or terminate your User Account, as defined in Section 1.4 of the User Agreement, immediately upon giving notice to you if Upwork believes you may be abusing the Dispute Assistance Program or as otherwise permitted by the
Terms of Service
, which may impact your ability to withdraw funds. However, any disputes for any Fixed-Price Contracts that existed prior to termination will be subject to the Terms of Service.
12. NO RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICES OR PAYMENTS
Upwork and Affiliates merely provide a platform for Internet payment services. Upwork and Affiliates do not have any responsibility or control over the Freelancer Services that Client purchases. Nothing in this Agreement deems or will be interpreted to deem Upwork or any Affiliate as Client’s or Freelancer’s agent with respect to any Freelancer Services, or expand or modify any warranty, liability or indemnity stated in the Terms of Service. For example, Upwork does not guarantee the performance, functionality, quality, or timeliness of Freelancer Services or that a Client can or will make payments.
APPENDIX A
RULES AND FEES FOR ARBITRATIONS CONDUCTED BY THE ARBITRATION SERVICE PROVIDER, BRIEF
This Appendix A summarizes certain pertinent contractual terms that BRIEF has agreed to in providing arbitration services to Clients and Freelancers who choose BRIEF as their arbitrator under the Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions. BRIEF is solely a third-party arbitration service provider. Upwork and its Affiliates have no direct or indirect affiliate, partnership, joint venture, ownership or control relationship with or interest in BRIEF, and therefore Upwork and its Affiliates assume no responsibility or liability for the services of BRIEF.
ARBITRATOR SELECTION
All Arbitrations by Brief are conducted by a single arbitrator. The arbitrator is selected by Brief based on jurisdiction of the matter, skillset, experience, impartiality and neutrality, amongst other factors. The arbitrator is required to render a ruling fairly, independently, impartially and without any conflict of interest. The arbitrator will provide a ruling over the matter, but cannot provide independent legal advice to any party.
RULES OF THE PROCEEDINGS
The amount at issue in any claims or counterclaims relating to a Fixed-Price Contract will be limited to the sum still held in Escrow and the sum previously released from Escrow for the Fixed-Price Contract.
The language of the Arbitration will be English.
All proceedings will be “on documents,” unless the parties opt for and fund payment for the additional cost of a live hearing (see fees below). The evidence admissible will consist solely and exclusively of documents and communications between the parties and related to the contract, and testimony if a live hearing is conducted. The arbitrator's award will be based on the supporting, relevant, admissible documents and statements. Once arbitration is initiated, the failure of one party or the other to respond to an arbitrator request or otherwise continue to participate in the Arbitration will not prevent the arbitrator from making an award.
Each party is given an opportunity to submit, in writing or through digital representations, the party’s testimony and supporting evidence through the BRIEF process and platform. Each party is also given an opportunity to rebut the other party’s testimony or supporting evidence. All testimony submitted to BRIEF is submitted under penalty of perjury. Failure to respond to a claim will lead to a waiver of any defenses and may result in an entry of default.
All properly submitted testimony and evidence will be reviewed by the arbitrator after the parties complete their submissions.
The Arbitration generally will conclude within 30 calendar days from the date of submission to the Arbitration Service Provider, with reasonable extensions provided only as necessary.
All awards will be final and non-appealable, and will be enforceable by any court of competent jurisdiction.
COMMUNICATIONS, DOCUMENTS, AND TESTIMONY
All communications between the parties and the arbitrator shall occur over the BRIEF platform. The arbitrator will not engage in ex-parte communications; rather, communications by either party to the arbitrator will be shared with all parties.
Any and all submissions of testimony must be submitted through the BRIEF platform, which can support the following document types: .png, .jpg, .jpeg, .pdf.
The parties do not engage in direct discovery, including interrogatories, requests for admissions or production, or depositions. At the arbitrator’s sole discretion, the arbitrator may permit or require the submission of additional written statements from the parties (“
Additional Arguments
”). The arbitrator is not required to permit Additional Arguments. If the arbitrator permits Additional Arguments, the arbitrator will establish the schedule and rules for the submission of such Additional Arguments, including any limits on the length of such Additional Arguments.
THE AWARD
BRIEF will provide Upwork and the parties with a written award promptly upon the conclusion of the Arbitration, and in no event later than 14 calendar days after conclusion of the Arbitration. At the arbitrator’s sole discretion, the arbitrator may provide written reasons for the Award to the parties. The arbitrator may also issue orders to protect the confidentiality of proprietary information. Once rendered, an arbitrator’s award is final, and cannot be appealed. The award will only be modified or edited after it is issued if such change is due to the arbitrator’s error or otherwise at the arbitrator’s discretion.
FEES
The fee for Arbitrations by BRIEF is $675 for claims with less than $20,000 in dispute. An additional fee is assessed for claims that exceed $20,000, which will be calculated as a percentage of the claim amount. The Client and Freelancer may also choose to pay a $450 fee to have a live hearing with the arbitrator as part of the Arbitration; this additional service and cost is completely optional.
All fees will be collected at the start of the arbitration. For all claims, Client and Freelancer will each be responsible for paying $337.50.  One party may, as described above, pay the full $675 for both parties to proceed to arbitration. They will also share the cost of the live hearing if they choose that option. Upwork will cover the additional initial costs of each arbitration.
Effective December 10th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
If a Client and a Freelancer enter into an Any Hire Contract, whether fixed-price or hourly, these Any Hire Contract Escrow Instructions (“
Escrow Instructions
”) apply. These Escrow Instructions govern Escrow Accounts for Any Hire Contracts. Service Contracts are governed by the applicable
escrow instructions
.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may modify these Escrow Instructions without prior notice to you, and any revisions to these Escrow Instructions will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. Please check the Site often for updates.
These Escrow Instructions hereby incorporate by reference the
Terms of Service
(“
Terms of Service
”). Capitalized terms not defined in these Escrow Instructions are defined in the
User Agreement,
elsewhere in the Terms of Service, or have the meanings given such terms on the Site. These Escrow Instructions only apply to Any Hire Contracts.
Escrow services are provided by Upwork Escrow Inc. (“
Upwork Escrow
”) pursuant to Internet Escrow Agent license no. 9635086, issued by the California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.
1. DIGITAL SIGNATURE
By clicking to accept an Any Hire Contract, whether fixed-price or hourly, Client and Freelancer are deemed to have executed these Escrow Instructions electronically, effective on the date Client clicks to accept the Any Hire Contract, pursuant to California Civil Code section 1633.8 and the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., as may be amended from time to time (the "
E-Sign Act
"). Doing so constitutes an acknowledgement that Client and Freelancer agree to conduct the transaction electronically, and are able to electronically receive, download, and print these Escrow Instructions.
2. ESCROW
2.1 Any Hire Fixed-Price Contracts
Client agrees to deposit funds to the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account on a biweekly basis the amount of any milestone(s) or the full amount of the Any Hire Contract if there is only one milestone for each active fixed-price Any Hire Contract during the biweekly billing cycle. Any funds deposited by Clients remain in the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account until they are released to the Freelancer Escrow Account or released to the Client. Upwork Escrow will not release funds held in escrow except as described in these Escrow Instructions.
2.2 Any Hire Hourly Contracts and Invoices
Client agrees to fund through the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account payments to Freelancer on a biweekly basis for the amount of Freelancer’s applicable hours logged during the billing period (“
Any Hire Hourly Contract Funds
”). The biweekly billing cycle starts Monday at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends 13 days later on Sunday at 23:59 UTC. Invoices for hours recorded by the Freelancer on Upwork within the biweekly billing cycle will be generated each other Monday, on the Monday that follows the end of the biweekly billing cycle (such invoice, the "
Any Hire Hourly Invoice
").
Freelancer is required to submit their hours by 23:59 UTC on the Sunday of each week the Any Hire Hourly Contract is active (the “
Any Hire Hourly Invoice Deadline
”). Freelancer irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork, as its agent, to (i) create an invoice on behalf of Freelancer for payment due based upon the hours that the freelancer recorded before the Any Hire Hourly Invoice Deadline; and (ii) submit the Any Hire Hourly Invoices on behalf of Freelancer to Freelancer's Client on a biweekly basis for payment.
It is the responsibility of Client to review the Any Hire Hourly Invoices. If Client takes no action during the four business days following the close of the biweekly invoice period, Client will be deemed to have accepted the Freelancer Services and all hours invoiced by Freelancer during the biweekly billing period. If Client approves the submitted Any Hire Hourly Invoices or takes no action during the four days following the close of the weekly invoice period, and the Client has deposited sufficient funds to the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account, Upwork Escrow will release the Any Hire Hourly Contract Funds to Freelancer. Upwork Escrow will not release funds held in escrow except as described in these Escrow Instructions.
3. RELEASE AND DELIVERY OF AMOUNTS IN ESCROW
Client and Freelancer irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to release applicable portions of the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account (each portion, a “
Release
”) to their Freelancer Escrow Account or Client Escrow Account, as applicable, upon the occurrence of and in accordance with one or more Release Conditions provided below or as otherwise required by applicable law or the Terms of Service. If the funds are released to the Client Escrow Account, they will be automatically returned to the Client’s Payment Method that was charged to fund escrow. The amount of the Release will be delivered to the applicable Escrow Account in accordance with Freelancer’s or Client’s instructions, as applicable, these Escrow Instructions, and the other Terms of Service.
3.1 RELEASE CONDITIONS
As used in these Escrow Instructions, “
Release Condition
” means any of the following:
For fixed-price Any Hire Contracts, Client affirmatively clicks to accept the milestone(s) or fixed-price Any Hire Contract work submitted by Freelancer for approval.
For fixed-price Any Hire Contracts, Client affirmatively clicks to accept the milestone(s) or fixed-price Any Hire Contract work performed, but not yet submitted by Freelancer for approval.
For fixed-price Any Hire Contracts, Client does not take any action for 14 days from the date Freelancer submits the milestone or Fixed-Price Contract work for approval, in which case Freelancer and Client agree that Upwork Escrow is authorized and irrevocably instructed to immediately release to Freelancer the amount associated with the applicable milestone(s) in connection with such Release request.
For fixed-price Any Hire Contracts, Freelancer cancels the contract before a payment has been released to Freelancer, in which case the funds are to be returned to the Client.
For fixed-price Any Hire Contracts, Client cancels the contract before a payment has been released to Freelancer and Freelancer approves the request or takes no action within 7 days, in which case the funds are to be released to the Client.
For hourly Any Hire Contracts, Client has approved all or a portion of the Freelancer's Hourly Invoice, or has taken no action during the four days following the close of the weekly invoice period, which is deemed approval of all hours invoiced for purposes of this Release Condition.
Client and Freelancer have submitted joint written instructions for a Release.
Issuance of the final order of a court or arbitrator of competent jurisdiction from which appeal is not taken, in which case the funds will be released in accordance with such order.
We believe, in our sole discretion, that fraud, an illegal act, or a violation of Upwork's Terms of Service has been committed or is being committed or attempted, in which case Client and Freelancer irrevocably authorize and instruct Upwork Escrow to take such actions as we deem appropriate in our sole discretion and in accordance with applicable law, in order to prevent or remedy such acts, including without limitation to return the funds associated with such acts to their source of payment.
4. INSTRUCTIONS IRREVOCABLE
On the occurrence of a Release Condition, Client and Freelancer are deemed to and hereby agree that the instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to release funds is irrevocable. Without limiting the foregoing, Client’s instruction to Upwork Escrow and its wholly owned subsidiaries to pay a Freelancer is irrevocable. Such instruction is Client’s authorization to transfer funds to Freelancer from the Client Escrow Account or authorization to charge Client’s Payment Method. Such instruction is also Client’s representation that Client has received, inspected and accepted the subject work or expense. Client acknowledges and agrees that upon receipt of Client’s instruction to pay Freelancer, Upwork Escrow will transfer funds to the Freelancer and that Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and other Affiliates have no responsibility to and may not be able to recover such funds. Therefore, and in consideration of services described in this Agreement, Client agrees that once Upwork Escrow or its subsidiary has charged Client’s Payment Method, the charge is non-refundable.
5. MAKING OR RECEIVING A BONUS OR EXPENSE PAYMENT
Client may also make a bonus, tip, expense, or other miscellaneous payment to Freelancer using the Site. To make such a payment to a Freelancer, Client must follow the instructions and links on the Site and provide the information requested. If Client clicks to pay such a payment to Freelancer, Client irrevocably instructs Upwork Escrow to and Upwork Escrow will release escrow funds to Freelancer.
6. REFUNDS AND CANCELLATIONS
Client and Freelancer are encouraged to come to a mutual agreement if refunds or cancellations are necessary.  Upwork will hold funds in the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account until a Release Condition, as defined in Section 3.1 is fulfilled.  If there are no funds in escrow, Freelancer may issue a refund via the Upwork platform up to the full amount paid on the Any Hire Hourly or Any Hire Fixed-Price Contract.
7. EXCLUSIONS
Upwork’s Dispute Assistance Program and Payment Protection Programs do not apply to Any Hire Contracts.  Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and Affiliates do not guarantee that Freelancer will be paid by Client.  Upon occurrence of a Release Condition, as defined in Section 3.1, Upwork Escrow can release only the amount of funds that have been deposited by Client to the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account. Upwork, Upwork Escrow, and Affiliates are under no circumstances liable to Freelancer for payment for Client’s failure to deposit funds to the Any Hire Contract Escrow Account to cover payment to Freelancer.
8. NOTICES
All notices to a User required by these Escrow Instructions will be made via email sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address. Users are solely responsible for maintaining a current, active email address registered with Upwork, for checking their email and for responding to notices sent by Upwork to the User’s registered email address.
9. ABUSE
Upwork, in its sole discretion, reserves the right to suspend or terminate your Account immediately upon giving notice to you if Upwork believes you are in violation of the
Terms of Service
.
10. APPOINTMENT OF UPWORK ESCROW AS PAYMENTS AGENT OF THE FREELANCER
Each Freelancer hereby appoints Upwork Escrow as its payment collection agent for the limited purpose of receiving, holding, and settling payments from Clients pursuant to this Agreement. Each Freelancer further agrees and understands that a payment received by Upwork Escrow from a Client, on Freelancer’s behalf, shall be considered the same as payment made directly to the Freelancer. Such payment shall be deemed to satisfy the Client’s obligation to pay Freelancer, and the Freelancer will provide its services to the Client in the agreed-upon manner as if the Freelancer had received the payment directly from the Client. Each Freelancer understands that Upwork Escrow’s obligation to pay the Freelancer is subject to, and conditional upon, successful receipt of the associated payments from the Client. Freelancer further agrees that Upwork Escrow is not required to settle such payment to Freelancer in the event that Client initiates a chargeback, ACH return, or otherwise disputes the payment. In the event that Upwork Escrow does not make a payment to Freelancer as required by this Agreement, Freelancer will have recourse against only Upwork Escrow and not against Client. In accepting appointment as the limited payment collection agent of the Freelancer, Upwork Escrow assumes no liability for any acts or omissions of the Freelancer.
Each Client acknowledges and agrees that, notwithstanding the fact that Upwork Escrow is not a party to the agreement between the Client and the Freelancer, Upwork Escrow acts as each Freelancer’s payment collection agent for the limited purpose of accepting payments from the Client on behalf of the Freelancer. Upon a Client’s payment of the funds to Upwork Escrow, the Client’s payment obligation to the Freelancer for the agreed upon amount is extinguished, and Upwork Escrow is responsible for remitting the funds successfully received by Upwork Escrow to the Freelancer in the manner described in this Agreement. In the event that Upwork Escrow does not remit any such amounts, the Freelancer will have recourse only against Upwork Escrow and not the Client directly.
11. NO RESPONSIBILITY FOR SERVICES OR PAYMENTS
Upwork and Affiliates merely provide a platform for Internet payment services. Upwork and Affiliates do not have any responsibility or control over the Freelancer Services that Client purchases, except as explicitly provided in Section 10. Nothing in this Agreement deems or will be interpreted to deem Upwork or any Affiliate as Client’s or Freelancer’s agent with respect to any Freelancer Services, or expand or modify any warranty, liability or indemnity stated in the Terms of Service. For example, Upwork does not guarantee the performance, functionality, quality, or timeliness of Freelancer Services or that a Client can or will make payments.
Effective July 28th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
Upwork Escrow Inc. provides escrow services solely to Users of
Upwork
and
Elance
. We provide these escrow services solely to deliver, hold, or receive payment for jobs for services engaged through, and to pay fees including service, membership and payment processing and administration fees to, Upwork. These escrow services are intended for business use, and the Users agree to use these escrow services only for business purposes and not for consumer, personal, family, or household purposes.
UPWORK ESCROW INC. DOES NOT PROVIDE ESCROW SERVICES TO THE GENERAL PUBLIC.
This escrow company holds California Department of Financial Protection and Innovation License No. 963 5086.
Effective March 3rd 2025
Download
Table of Contents
We’re making changes to the
Business Plus Plan
. Beginning April 3, 2025, a Contract Initiation Fee may apply to contracts.
This Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement (this “Agreement”) is between you and Upwork Global Inc. or Elance Inc. as described below in Section 1 (Parties). This Agreement provides information on the fees Upwork Global Inc. ("Upwork Global") and its Affiliates Elance Limited ("Elance Ltd.") and Upwork Escrow Inc. (“Upwork Escrow”) charge for use of the Site’s communication, invoicing, dispute resolution and payment services, including Payment Protection, and includes eligible Users’ authorization for debits and credits from and to their designated bank accounts via the automated clearing house network (“ACH”). This Agreement is part of the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement are defined in the User Agreement, Site Terms of Use, or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
By clicking to accept the Terms of Service on the Site or by continuing to use the Site or the Site Services on or after the effective date noted above, you accept and agree to this Agreement. To the extent permitted by applicable law and except as otherwise provided in the Terms of Service, we may modify this Agreement without prior notice to you, and any revisions to this Agreement will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. However, we will provide advance notice of any increase in prices or fees affecting current Users. Please check the Site often for updates.
1. PARTIES
You are entering into this Agreement with Upwork (also referred to as “we” and “us”).
If you reside in the United States, you are entering into this Agreement with Upwork Global. If you reside outside the United States, you are entering into this Agreement with Elance Ltd.
2. FEES CHARGED TO FREELANCERS
Pursuant to the User Agreement, we charge Freelancers a Service Fee on the amounts of Freelancer Fees invoiced by the Freelancer to their Client on a Service Contract. The Freelancer Service Fee is described below in Section 2.1. Where applicable, Upwork Global, Elance Ltd., or Upwork Escrow may also collect taxes (such as value added tax (“
VAT
”) in Europe) on Service Fees.
Pursuant to the Freelancer Membership Agreement, we charge Freelancers a Membership Fee. These Membership Fees automatically renew until they are canceled as described on the Site.
Additionally, the use of various Payment Methods offered through the Site and the Site Services may incur added fees or charges. All Payment Methods will be posted on the Site along with any associated fees or charges, which we may update from time to time at our sole discretion. By selecting a Service subject to additional fees or charges, you thereby authorize us to charge to you and to collect from you (consistent with this Agreement, the User Agreement, or elsewhere in the Terms of Service) any fees, charges, or taxes described in this Section 2.
2.1 FREELANCER SERVICE FEE
We will charge you a Service Fee based on the total Freelancer Fees invoiced by you to your Client (less any refunds or reversals) for the duration of your relationship with your Client. Unless different pricing described in Sections 2.2 through 2.5 applies, the Service Fee is a flat 10% of the total Freelancer Fees you have invoiced to your Client for the Engagement Relationship.
For illustrative purposes, here is how the Service Fee will be charged for Fixed-Price or Hourly engagements:
CONTRACT TYPE
SERVICE FEE
FREELANCER FEES
SERVICE FEES
Fixed-Price
10%
$500
$50
Hourly
10%
$50 per hour
$5 per hour
2.2
FREELANCERS WORKING WITH DIRECT CONTRACT CLIENTS
If you are a Freelancer who engaged an eligible Client via Direct Contracts, Upwork will charge you a flat 5% of the total Freelancer Fees you have invoiced to your Direct Contract Client for the Engagement Relationship.
2.3 FREELANCERS WORKING ON ENTERPRISE CLIENT CONTRACTS
If you are a Freelancer with a Service Contract entered into with an Enterprise Client, the Service Fee rate is 10% of the Freelancer Fees, unless otherwise provided in the Enterprise Client contract. If you are a Freelancer with an active Contract with a Client whose Account is being converted to an Enterprise Client Account, then only on any Service Contract that is active at the time of the conversion, Upwork will honor the lower of (a) the Service Fee or Legacy Tiered Service Fee in effect at the time of the conversion, or (b) the Service Fee rate in the Enterprise Client contract for that Account. For purposes of the Terms of Service, “
Enterprise Client
” means a Client, including a legacy Enterprise client or an Upwork Business Client, whose profile displays the following “Enterprise” badge:
2.4 ALTERNATE PRICING
For some Service Contracts, as described in this Section 2.4, we do not charge the flat 10% Service Fee, but instead charge an alternate fee (“Alternate Pricing”) which only applies to Service Contracts when any of the following are true:
(a) you entered into the Service Contract before Upwork first started charging Legacy Tiered Pricing;
(b) you entered into the Service Contract pursuant to a feature of the Site where we advertised a different Service Fee, such as discounted Service Fees offered in some circumstances for amounts charged on a contract or for a Featured Job Post for Clients;
(c) you have an Any Hire Contract with a Client and you did not have an Upwork Relationship prior to the Any Hire Contract (see
Section 7 of the User Agreement
) or for an Upwork Payroll engagement; or
(d) the Service Contract is with a Client who is not an Enterprise Client, but who has a legacy arrangement for lower fees that apply to the Service Contract.
(e) you entered into the Service Contract when Upwork charged the Service Fee based on Legacy Tiered Pricing and you have email or written communication from Upwork that the Legacy Tiered Pricing rate will be applied to the Service Contract.
As described in this Section 2.4, if Alternate Pricing applies, we will typically charge you a Service Fee of a fixed percent.
For certain Service Contracts, the Alternate Pricing may be a lower flat percentage (such as through a “bring your own” program) or may have a different tiered fee rates (such as for a Featured Job Post), or may not have a Service Fee (such as an Upwork Payroll Contract or certain Any Hire Contracts), in each case as clearly stated on the Site at the time the Service Contract was or is entered into, and any applicable changes to Alternate Pricing or fees will be clearly communicated to the Client, including communications posted to the Site.
2.5 OTHER FEES
Freelancers may choose a membership with an associated membership fee (the “
Freelancer Membership Fee
”). More details are provided in the
Freelancer Membership Agreement
. Freelancers may also choose to purchase "Connects" or other features, premium services or options on Upwork, in each case as described on the Site at the time of purchase.
Upwork reserves the right to change the fees of the memberships, features, services, and options offered on the Site, or institute new fees at any time, in each case upon reasonable notice posted in advance on the Site for existing Users.
3. CLIENT MEMBERSHIP PLANS AND RELATED FEES
To access the Site and use the Site Services a Client must have registered for an Account as detailed in Section 1 of the User Agreement. Upwork offers multiple client membership plans. When you sign up for a Client Account, you will be placed into an eligible plan.
3.1 CLIENT MARKETPLACE PLAN AND FEATURES
Upwork offers Client’s on the marketplace membership to the
Client Marketplace Plan
. The Client Marketplace Plan does not require a monthly membership fee. The Client Marketplace Plan includes access to the Site and related Site Services such as assisting Users in resolving disputes which may arise in connection with Service Contracts, providing access to communication tools, and administrative services related to reporting and facilitating payments.
In return for providing Clients with access to the Site and related Site Services, Upwork charges Clients a “
Marketplace Fee
” on each transaction related to a marketplace Service Contract or Project Catalog offering a Client enters into on the Site or with Freelancers on the Site. The Marketplace Fee rate fee can vary, learn more about the Marketplace Fee
here
. In the case of Hourly Service Contracts, Upwork will charge the Marketplace Fee based on hours and expenses recorded by a Freelancer as of the Hourly Invoice Deadline (Sunday at 23:59 UTC) each week. For Fixed-Price Contracts, Upwork will charge the Marketplace Fee on the amount and at the time a Client funds a milestone or pays a bonus or expense. All other transactions subject to the Marketplace Fee, such as transactions for bonus or expense payouts, use of Upwork Payroll related to a marketplace Service Contract, or use of any other service on the Site where displayed on the Site, will be assessed the Marketplace Fee at the time of invoice.
At its sole discretion, Upwork may offer Clients a different Marketplace Fee rate, discount or arrangement; any such rate or arrangement must be explicitly communicated or agreed by an authorized representative of Upwork via email or a written agreement. No refunds of fees already paid will be given; for example, if a funded project is canceled, payments made by a Client are released from the Client Account for any reason or refunded by a Freelancer, the Marketplace Fee will not be refunded.
Upwork will charge Clients a one-time “
Contract Initiation Fee
” for facilitating the formation of each new marketplace Service Contract formed between Client and Freelancer. The Contract Initiation Fee can vary, depending on a variety of factors, learn more about the Contract Initiation Fee
here
. Clients will be charged the Contract Initiation Fee shown and communicated to the Client on the Site before the Client elects to form the Service Contract. For Hourly Service Contracts the Contract Initiation Fee will be charged at the time of the first invoice. For Fixed-Price Contracts the Contract Initiation Fee is charged at the time the Client funds the first milestone. The Marketplace Fee is not assessed on the Contract Initiation Fee. The Contract Initiation Fee is not refundable.
The Marketplace Fee and the Contract Initiation Fee detailed above is not assessed on Any Hire, Enterprise, Talent Scout, Upwork Business, Business Plus engagements, or premium services which are subject to the fees and rate(s) as described in the specific Any Hire, Enterprise, Talent Scout, Upwork Business, or Business Plus contract with Client or on the Site.
3.2 BUSINESS PLUS PLAN AND FEATURES
Upwork may offer Clients membership to the
Business Plus Plan
. In addition to the access and features included in the Client Marketplace Plan, the Business Plus Plan also includes access to expert vetted talent and other premium services, as described on the
Site
.  In return for providing Clients with access to the Site and Business Plus offerings, Upwork will charge Clients enrolled in the Business Plan a “
Business Plus Fee
” of up to 10% on each transaction related to a Service Contract or Project Catalog offering a Client enters into on the Site or with Freelancers on the Site. Eligible Clients who use ACH as their payment method are offered a reduced Business Plus Fee rate of 8%. In the case of Hourly Service Contracts, Upwork will charge the Business Plus Fee based on hours and expenses recorded by a Freelancer as of the Hourly Invoice Deadline (Sunday at 23:59 UTC) each week. For Fixed-Price Contracts, Upwork will charge the Business Plus Fee on the amount and at the time a Client funds a milestone or pays a bonus or expense. All other transactions subject to the Business Plus Fee, such as transactions for bonus or expense payouts, use of Upwork Payroll related to a marketplace Service Contract, or use of any other service on the Site where displayed on the Site, will be assessed the Business Plus Fee at the time of invoice.
Users on the Business Plus Plan will not be charged Client Marketplace Plan fees.
No refunds of fees already paid will be given; for example, if a funded project is canceled, payments made by a Client are released from the Client Escrow Account for any reason or refunded by a Freelancer, the Business Plus Fee will not be refunded.
At its sole discretion, Upwork may offer Clients a different Business Plus Plan rate; any such rate must be explicitly communicated or agreed by an authorized representative of Upwork via email or a written agreement.
3.3 CHANGES TO CLIENT MEMBERSHIP PLANS OR RELATED FEES
Upwork reserves the right to change the the features and services included in the Client Marketplace Plan, Business Plus Plan, change the fees applicable to each Client Membership Plan, change the fees for certain premium services or options, or institute new fees at any time, in each case upon reasonable notice posted in advance on the Site for existing Users. No refunds of fees already paid will be given. If Upwork exercises its right to cancel a Client's Marketplace Plan or Business Plus Plan, Upwork will not refund the fees already paid unless otherwise required by law.
For more information on changing or canceling your plan, check the Site or contact Customer Support.
3.4 TAXES
Where applicable, Upwork Global, Elance Ltd., or Upwork Escrow may also collect taxes (such as VAT where applicable) on Marketplace Fee, Business Plus Fee, Contract Initiation Fee, and the cost for premium services or features, as set forth in the User Agreement.
4. AUTHORIZATION FOR ACH DEBITS AND CREDITS AND OTHER TRANSACTIONS
If and to the extent permitted by Upwork in its sole discretion, Users may pay Freelancer Fees, Membership Fees, Marketplace Fees, and other fees owed under the Terms of Service from their designated bank accounts. Subject to Upwork’s eligibility requirements, if you elect to pay Freelancer Fees or any other amounts owed under the Terms of Service via ACH transfers from your designated bank account, you hereby authorize us to electronically debit and, if necessary, electronically credit your designated bank account via ACH for such amounts pursuant to the Terms of Service, and you agree to comply with the ACH rules issued by the National Automated Clearing House (“
NACHA
”) and all applicable laws, including, but not limited to, the federal Bank Secrecy Act, the U.S.A. Patriot Act, and economic sanctions overseen by the Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC). Your authorization for ACH transfers contained in this Section 4 will remain in full force and effect until you notify us that you wish to revoke your authorization by removing your bank account information from your Profile or by contacting Customer Support. You understand that we require at least one (1) business day’s prior notice in order to cancel your authorization for ACH transfers contained in this Section 4.
You must notify us of any change in your designated bank account’s information at least five (5) business days before any such change by updating your bank account information in your Profile or by contacting Customer Support. If we do not receive notice at least five (5) days before any such change, we may attempt, in our sole discretion, to implement such change prior to any ACH debit or credit transfer performed pursuant to your authorization provided in this Section 4. However, we assume no responsibility for our failure to do so.
You may view a history of your Account transactions by logging in to the Site. You are solely responsible for promptly reconciling your Account transaction history with the transaction records for your bank account. You must notify us of any errors or discrepancies in your Account transaction history (each, an “
Error
”) within 30 days of when the Error could be viewed in your Account transaction history on the Site. If you do not notify us of an Error within 30 days of when the Error could be viewed in your Account transaction history on the Site, you will forfeit the right to contest the Error, except to the extent such forfeiture is prohibited by applicable law or the NACHA rules.
Subject to the foregoing notice requirement: (a) if and to the extent an Error is caused by us, we will correct the Error and (b) if an Error is caused by you, we may, but are under no obligation to, attempt to correct the Error and will offset any costs we incur from any funds returned to your bank account or your Escrow Account, as applicable. If an Error results in your receipt of more funds than you are entitled, we may recover the extra funds from you.
Effective June 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
T
his Freelancer Membership Agreement (“
Agreement
”) is between you and Upwork Global Inc. ("
Upwork Global
") or Elance Limited ("
Elance Ltd.
") as described below in Section 1 (Parties). This Agreement is part of and incorporates by reference the User Agreement and the other Terms of Service. You will be provided advance notice of any material change to this Agreement and your continued participation in a membership program after the last modified date will signify your acceptance of this Agreement. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement are defined in the Site Terms of Use, User Agreement, or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
1. PARTIES
You are entering into this Agreement with Upwork (also referred to as “we” and “us”).
If you reside in the United States, you are entering into this Agreement with Upwork Global. If you reside outside the United States, you are entering into this Agreement with Elance Ltd.
2. FREELANCER
MEMBERSHIP PROGRAMS
Upwork offers several membership programs for Freelancers and Agencies. For purposes of this Agreement, “Member” or “you” means a Freelancer or Agency participating in a membership program.
Each membership program may include a certain number of “Connects,” which reserve monthly capacity for you to submit proposals for Clients' posted Projects, as described on the Site
here
.
If your membership program does not include Connects or your membership otherwise gives you the right to purchase additional Connects, you may do so for the price advertised on the Site at the time of the purchase, subject to a cap determined by your membership program, if applicable. Connects that you do not use will be rolled over to the next month as described on the Site. The conditions under which unused Connects will rollover into the next month may vary from time to time and will depend on your membership program.  For the details on Connects, please visit the
Upwork Support page
.
Upwork reserves the right to change membership fees, change the monthly number of Connects included in each membership program, change the price for Connects or institute new fees at any time, in each case upon reasonable notice posted in advance on the Site. No refunds of fees already paid will be given. If Upwork exercises its right to cancel a membership, we will not refund the membership fee already paid.
3. TAXES
Where applicable, Upwork Global, Elance Ltd., or Upwork Escrow may also collect Taxes (such as value added tax (VAT) in Europe) on membership fees and the cost for Connects.
4. AUTOMATIC MEMBERSHIP RENEWAL
You must pay your Upwork membership fees and Connects through your Upwork Escrow Account. The membership billing period begins on the date that we receive payment. Upwork membership fees are calculated from the beginning of that billing period. Upwork automatically renews your Upwork monthly or annual membership, and you irrevocably authorize and instruct us to make the required monthly or annual payments to Upwork on your behalf.
This authorization will remain in full force and effect until you change your settings in your Profile to change your membership plan, otherwise notify us that you wish to revoke your authorization by contacting Customer Support, or cancel your Account.
5. CHANGES TO MEMBERSHIP PROGRAM
You can change your membership program at any time, including by moving to an unpaid plan, by going to
the Site
here
.
If you change your membership program, the new program and new billing period will be based upon the date Upwork receives payment of the new membership fee. If you upgrade a membership, it will result in a new billing date effective upon the date of payment of the additional fees and, if applicable, will result in a credit of the unused portion of the existing category membership fees. If you downgrade a membership, you will not receive a refund or credit for the fees already paid; instead your membership will continue to the end of your current billing period but will not renew. If your Account is suspended at the beginning of your billing period or you do not pay your membership fees, your Account will be automatically downgraded to an unpaid membership plan. If your Account is reinstated, you may change your membership plan as described in this Agreement. Upwork reserves the right to modify its membership programs at any time, upon reasonable notice posted in advance on the Site.
For more information on upgrading, downgrading, or canceling your membership, check the Site or contact Customer Support
.
Effective October 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This modified version of the Optional Service Contract Terms is effective October 31, 2024.
Click
here
to review the current Optional Service Contract Terms.
Users who enter into a Service Contract on the Site with another User are free to agree to these Optional Service Terms in whole or in part, or to agree to different or additional terms for their Service Contract(s). However, if and to the extent that the Users who are party to a Service Contract have not agreed to different terms, then they agree to incorporate these Optional Terms. Users may not, by agreement amongst themselves, alter the rights or responsibilities of Upwork or Upwork Escrow, including any provision of the Escrow Instructions, or agree to any terms that would violate the Terms of Service. Neither Upwork, Upwork Escrow, nor any affiliate of Upwork is a party to any Service Contract by or between Users regardless of whether these Optional Terms are incorporated.
You acknowledge and agree that Users have discretion whether to contract with each other and will negotiate and determine the specific terms of their Service Contracts with each other. The Optional Service Terms is a sample only, which may not be appropriate for all Service Contracts and which may be adjusted and added to as Users deem appropriate. Users choose whether to use the Optional Service Terms in whole or in part.
1. PARTIES
Client and Freelancer identified on the Site under the Service Contract are the parties to the Services Contract. The address of each party is the address entered under the tax information on the Site. Upwork is not a party to the Service Contract.
2. SERVICES
Client and Freelancer agree that the Freelancer is performing services as an independent contractor and that Freelancer is not an employee or agent of Client. Freelancer will perform the Freelancer Services in a professional and workmanlike manner in accordance with the professional experience represented by Freelancer in Freelancer's profile, proposals, and other communications. The manner and means of performing the Freelancer Services, including the tools to be used in completing the work, will be determined and controlled by Freelancer except as expressly limited by Client’s specifications in the Service Contract.
Client and Freelancer agree to respond to communications relevant to completion of the Service Contract within 7 days, unless Freelancer has communicated to Client that they will be unavailable for an extended period. Freelancer will timely deliver any agreed upon Work Product within the timeframe agreed upon by Freelancer and Client, or will provide a minimum of 24 hours’ advance notice in the event that Freelancer will not be able to meet the deadline. For hourly contracts, Freelancer agrees to bill Client only for time spent working on Client’s contracts.
The terms concerning the services to be performed under the Service Contract described on the Site form part of the Service Contract. Users agree that, once accepted, the terms of the Service Contract cannot be modified by a User without obtaining the consent of the other before making changes to the Service Contract, including by adding additional or different milestones, by closing a Service Contract, or making other changes to the Service Contract on the Site. If consent of the other party is not first obtained, the other party may reject such changes by terminating the Service Contract or accept such changes by continuing to work on the Service Contract.
The parties agree that failure to comply with the provisions of this Section may result in a refund of funds to the other party.
3. RESPONSIBILITY FOR EMPLOYEES AND SUBCONTRACTORS, INCLUDING AGENCY MEMBERS
If a User subcontracts with or employs third parties to perform Freelancer Services on behalf of the User for any Engagement, the User represents and warrants that it does so as a legally recognized entity or person and in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations. Further, at all times a User that agreed to perform services under a Services Contract remains responsible for the quality of the services and represents and warrants that User has entered into agreements with any such employees and subcontractors on confidentiality and intellectual property at least as strong as those in these Optional Service Terms.
4. CLIENT PAYMENTS AND BILLING
Freelancer agrees to accurately report hourly invoices by billing hours worked under the Account of the User that worked the hours, including, if applicable, Agencies billing their Clients for hourly work done by Agency Members.
5. TERMINATION OF A SERVICE CONTRACT
Under Hourly Contracts, either Client or Freelancer has the right to terminate the Service Contract after providing any agreed-upon notice, or immediately on the end date specified in the Service Contract terms and/or upon completion of the Freelancer Services, in the event of a material breach, or with the consent of the other party. Except as required by law or as otherwise may be agreed to by the Parties, Client remains obligated to pay the Freelancer Fees for any Freelancer Services provided prior to termination of the Hourly Contract.
Under Fixed-Price Contracts, once a Client’s Payment Method has been charged to fund the escrow account for the Engagement, absent a full refund to Client by Freelancer, the Service Contract does not terminate until the Freelancer Services are completed. However, either Client or Freelancer has the right to terminate a Fixed-Price Contract at any time with the consent of the other party or in the event of a material breach. If a Fixed-Price Contract is terminated, Client does not have the right to recover any payments already released to Freelancer from the escrow account for the Engagement.
6. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS
6.1 THIRD-PARTY RIGHTS
Freelancer represents and warrants that Freelancer will not incorporate or use the materials of any third party including those of any other client or any employer, in performing the Freelancer Services that are not generally available for use by the public or have not been legally transferred to the Client.
6.2 BACKGROUND TECHNOLOGY
Freelancer will disclose in the Engagement terms any Background Technology which Freelancer proposes to incorporate into Work Product or upon which use or distribution of the Work Product will depend. If Freelancer discloses no Background Technology, Freelancer warrants that it will not incorporate any Background Technology into Work Product provided pursuant thereto. Freelancer will separately provide, with each delivery of Work Product to Client, a bill of materials that identifies all Background Technology and other third-party materials that have been incorporated into the Work Product and provides, for each item of Background Technology identified, (a) the name and any associated version number, (b) the applicable license or licensing terms, (c) whether the item has been modified by Freelancer, and (d) how the item has been incorporated into, is used by, or is relied upon by the Work Product. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise agreed in the Engagement terms, Freelancer agrees that it will not incorporate into Work Product or otherwise deliver to Client any software code for which the use or distribution of the code will create (or purport to create) obligations for Client to grant any rights or immunities under Client intellectual property to a third-party, including without limitation any obligation that the Work Product or Client software combined with, derived from, or distributed with such Work Product (x) be disclosed or distributed in source code form, (y) be licensed for the purpose of making derivative works, or (z) be redistributable at no charge.
6.3 CLIENT MATERIALS
Client grants Freelancer a limited, non-exclusive, revocable (at any time, at Client’s sole discretion) right to use the Client Materials as necessary solely for the performance of the Freelancer Services under the applicable Service Contract. Client reserves all other rights and interest, including, without limitation, all Intellectual Property Rights, in and to the Client Materials. Upon completion or termination of the Service Contract, or upon Client’s written request, Freelancer will immediately return all Client Materials to Client and further agrees to destroy all copies of Client Materials and Deliverables (except for Background Technology as permitted by the Service Contract) contained in or on Freelancer’s premises, systems, or any other equipment or location otherwise under Freelancer’s control. Within ten days of such request from Client, Freelancer agrees to provide written certification to Client that Freelancer has returned or destroyed all Client Materials and Work Product as provided in this subsection.
6.4 OWNERSHIP OF WORK PRODUCT AND INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Upon Freelancer’s receipt of full payment from Client, the Work Product (except for any Background Technology), including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in the Work Product (except for any Background Technology), will be the sole and exclusive property of Client, and Client will be deemed to be the author thereof. If Freelancer has any Intellectual Property Rights to the Work Product that are not owned by Client upon Freelancer’s receipt of payment from Client, Freelancer hereby automatically irrevocably assigns to Client all right, title and interest worldwide in and to such Intellectual Property Rights. Except as set forth above, Freelancer retains no rights to use, and will not challenge the validity of Client’s ownership in, such Intellectual Property Rights. Freelancer hereby waives any moral rights, rights of paternity, integrity, disclosure and withdrawal or inalienable rights under applicable law in and to the Work Product. If payment is made only for partial delivery of Work Product, the assignment described herein applies only to the portion of Work Product delivered and paid for.
6.5 LICENSE TO BACKGROUND TECHNOLOGY
Upon Freelancer’s receipt of full payment from Client for delivery of Work Product, Freelancer hereby automatically grants to Client an exclusive, perpetual, fully-paid and royalty-free, irrevocable and worldwide right, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform, and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, have made, use, sell, import, offer for sale, and exercise any and all present or future rights in the Background Technology incorporated in Work Product delivered for that payment. If payment is made only for partial delivery of Work Product, the license described herein applies only to the portion of Work Product delivered and paid for.
6.6 LICENSE TO OR WAIVER OF OTHER RIGHTS
If Freelancer has any right to the Work Product, including without limitation any Intellectual Property Right, that cannot be assigned to Client by Freelancer, Freelancer hereby automatically, upon Freelancer’s receipt of full payment from Client, unconditionally and irrevocably grants to Client during the term of such rights, an exclusive, even as to Freelancer, irrevocable, perpetual, worldwide, fully-paid and royalty-free license to such rights, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, use, sell, import, offer for sale and exercise any and all such rights. If Freelancer has any rights to such Work Product that cannot be assigned or licensed, Freelancer hereby automatically, upon Freelancer’s receipt of payment from Client, unconditionally and irrevocably waives the enforcement of such rights, and all claims and causes of action of any kind against Client or related to Client’s customers, with respect to such rights, and will, at Client’s request and expense, consent to and join in any action to enforce such rights. If payment is made only for partial delivery of Work Product, the grant described herein applies only to the portion of Work Product delivered.
6.7 ASSISTANCE
Freelancer will assist Client in every way, including by signing any documents or instruments reasonably required, both during and after the term of the Service Contract, to obtain and enforce Intellectual Property Rights relating to Work Product in all countries. In the event Client is unable, after reasonable effort, to secure Freelancer’s signature on any document needed in connection with the foregoing, Freelancer hereby designates and appoints Client and its duly authorized officers and agents as its agent and attorney in fact to act on its behalf to further the purposes of this Section with the same legal force and effect as if executed by Freelancer.
7. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
7.1 CONFIDENTIALITY
To the extent a Client or Freelancer provides Confidential Information to the other, the recipient will protect the secrecy of the discloser’s Confidential Information with the same degree of care as it uses to protect its own Confidential Information, but in no event with less than due care, and will: (a) not disclose or permit others to disclose another’s Confidential Information to anyone without first obtaining the express written consent of the owner of the Confidential Information; (b) not use or permit the use of another’s Confidential Information, except as necessary for the performance of Freelancer Services (including, without limitation, the storage or transmission of Confidential Information on or through the Site for use by Freelancer); and (c) limit access to another’s Confidential Information to its personnel who need to know such information for the performance of Freelancer Services.
7.2 RETURN
If and when Confidential Information is no longer needed for the performance of the Freelancer Services for a Services Contract or at Client’s or Freelancer’s written request (which may be made at any time at Client’s or Freelancer’s sole discretion), the party that received Confidential Information, will, at its expense, promptly destroy or return the disclosing party’s Confidential Information and any copies thereof contained in or on its premises, systems, or any other equipment otherwise under its control. The party that received Confidential Information agrees to provide written certification to the party disclosing the Confidential Information of compliance with this subsection within ten days after the receipt of disclosing party’s written request for such certification.
7.3 PUBLICATION
Without limiting Section 7 (Confidentiality), Client and Freelancer will not publish, or cause to be published, any other party’s Confidential Information or Work Product, except as may be necessary for performance of Freelancer Services for a Services Contract.
7.4 IMMUNITY
A disclosure of information will be immune from prosecution or civil action under the Defend Trade Secrets Act, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1832, if it: (A) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney, and (ii) solely for the purpose of reporting or investigating a suspected violation of law; or (B) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
8. DEFINITIONS
The following capitalized terms have the following meanings:
“
Background Technology
” means all Inventions developed by Freelancer other than in the course of providing Freelancer Services to Client under the Service Contract and all Inventions that Freelancer incorporates into Work Product.
“
Client
” means any person who entered into a Service Contract to obtain Freelancer Services from a Freelancer.
“
Client Deliverables
” means requests, intellectual property, and any other information or materials that a Freelancer receives from a Client to perform Freelancer Services.
“
Client Materials
” means requests, intellectual property, and any other information or materials that Client provides to Freelancer for Freelancer to perform Freelancer Services.
“
Confidential Information
” means Client Deliverables, Freelancer Deliverables, Work Product, and any other information provided to, or created by, a User for a Service Contract or to perform or assist in performing Freelancer Services, regardless of whether in tangible, electronic, verbal, graphic, visual, or other form. Confidential Information does not include material or information that is known to the public or that: (a) is generally known by third parties as a result of no act or omission of Freelancer or Client; (b) subsequent to disclosure hereunder, was lawfully received without restriction on disclosure from a third party having the right to disseminate the information; (c) was already known by User prior to receiving it from the other party and was not received from a third party in breach of that third party’s obligations of confidentiality; or (d) was independently developed by User without use of another person’s Confidential Information.
“
Engagement
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services that a Freelancer provides to a Client under a Service Contract on the Site.
“
Escrow Instructions
” means the Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions or the Hourly, Bonus and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions.
“
Fixed-Price Contract
” means a Service Contract for which Client is charged a fixed fee agreed between a Client and a Freelancer, prior to the commencement of a Service Contract, for the completion of all Freelancer Services contracted by Client for such Service Contract.
“
Freelancer
” means any person who entered into a Service Contract to perform Freelancer services for a Client.
“
Freelancer Deliverables
” means requests, intellectual property, and any other information or materials that a Client receives from a Freelancer for a particular Service Contract.
“
Freelancer Fees
” means: (a) for an Hourly Contract, an amount equal to the number of hours recorded by Freelancer in any Hourly Invoice, multiplied by the hourly rate set by the Freelancer; (b) for a Fixed-Price Contract, the fixed fee agreed between a Client and a Freelancer; and (c) any bonuses or other payments made by a Client.
“
Freelancer Services
” means all services performed for or delivered to Clients by Freelancers.
“
Hourly Contract
” means a Service Contract for which Client is charged based on the hourly rate set by the Freelancer.
“
Hourly Invoice
” means the report of hours recorded for a stated period by a Freelancer for the Freelancer Services performed for a Client.
“
Intellectual Property Rights
” means all patent rights, copyright rights, mask work rights, moral rights, rights of publicity, trademark, trade dress and service mark rights, goodwill, trade secret rights and other intellectual property rights as may now exist or hereafter come into existence, and all applications therefore and registrations, renewals and extensions thereof, under the laws of any state, country, territory or other jurisdiction.
“
Invention
” means any ideas, concepts, information, materials, processes, data, programs, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, artwork, formulae, other copyrightable works, and techniques and all Intellectual Property Rights therein.
“
Service Contract
” means, as applicable, (a) the contractual provisions between a Client and a Freelancer governing the Freelancer Services to be performed by a Freelancer for Client for an Engagement; or (b) if you use Upwork Payroll, the contractual provisions between Freelancer and the Staffing Provider for the provision of services to Client.
“
Work Product
” means any tangible or intangible results or deliverables that Freelancer agrees to create for, or actually delivers to, Client as a result of performing the Freelancer Services, including, but not limited to, configurations, computer programs, or other information, or customized hardware, and any intellectual property developed in connection therewith.
Current Optional Service Contract Terms
Users who enter into a Service Contract on the Site with another User are free to agree to these Optional Service Terms in whole or in part, or to agree to different or additional terms for their Service Contract(s). However, if and to the extent that the Users who are party to a Service Contract have not agreed to different terms, then they agree to incorporate these Optional Terms. Users may not, by agreement amongst themselves, alter the rights or responsibilities of Upwork or Upwork Escrow, including any provision of the Escrow Instructions, or agree to any terms that would violate the Terms of Service. Neither Upwork, Upwork Escrow, nor any affiliate of Upwork is a party to any Service Contract by or between Users regardless of whether these Optional Terms are incorporated.
You acknowledge and agree that Users have discretion whether to contract with each other and will negotiate and determine the specific terms of their Service Contracts with each other. The Optional Service Terms is a sample only, which may not be appropriate for all Service Contracts and which may be adjusted and added to as Users deem appropriate. Users choose whether to use the Optional Service Terms in whole or in part.
1. PARTIES
Client and Freelancer identified on the Site under the Service Contract are the parties to the Services Contract. The address of each party is the address entered under the tax information on the Site. Upwork is not a party to the Service Contract.
2. SERVICES
Client and Freelancer agree that the Freelancer is performing services as an independent contractor and that Freelancer is not an employee or agent of Client. Freelancer will perform the Freelancer Services in a professional and workmanlike manner and will timely deliver any agreed upon Work Product. The manner and means of performing the Freelancer Services, including the tools to be used in completing the work, will be determined and controlled by Freelancer except as expressly limited by Client’s specifications in the Service Contract.
The terms concerning the services to be performed under the Service Contract described on the Site form part of the Service Contract. Users agree that, once accepted, the terms of the Service Contract cannot be modified by a User without obtaining the consent of the other before making changes to the Service Contract, including by adding additional or different milestones, by closing a Service Contract, or making other changes to the Service Contract on the Site. If consent of the other party is not first obtained, the other party may reject such changes by terminating the Service Contract or accept such changes by continuing to work on the Service Contract.
3. RESPONSIBILITY FOR EMPLOYEES AND SUBCONTRACTORS, INCLUDING AGENCY MEMBERS
If a User subcontracts with or employs third parties to perform Freelancer Services on behalf of the User for any Engagement, the User represents and warrants that it does so as a legally recognized entity or person and in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations. Further, at all times a User that agreed to perform services under a Services Contract remains responsible for the quality of the services and represents and warrants that User has entered into agreements with any such employees and subcontractors on confidentiality and intellectual property at least as strong as those in these Optional Service Terms.
4. CLIENT PAYMENTS AND BILLING
Freelancer agrees to accurately report hourly invoices by billing hours worked under the Account of the User that worked the hours, including, if applicable, Agencies billing their Clients for hourly work done by Agency Members.
5. TERMINATION OF A SERVICE CONTRACT
Under Hourly Contracts, either Client or Freelancer has the right to terminate the Service Contract after providing any agreed-upon notice, or immediately on the end date specified in the Service Contract terms and/or upon completion of the Freelancer Services, in the event of a material breach, or with the consent of the other party. Except as required by law or as otherwise may be agreed to by the Parties, Client remains obligated to pay the Freelancer Fees for any Freelancer Services provided prior to termination of the Hourly Contract.
Under Fixed-Price Contracts, once a Client’s Payment Method has been charged to fund the escrow account for the Engagement, absent a full refund to Client by Freelancer, the Service Contract does not terminate until the Freelancer Services are completed. However, either Client or Freelancer has the right to terminate a Fixed-Price Contract at any time with the consent of the other party or in the event of a material breach. If a Fixed-Price Contract is terminated, Client does not have the right to recover any payments already released to Freelancer from the escrow account for the Engagement.
6. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS
6.1 THIRD-PARTY RIGHTS
Freelancer represents and warrants that Freelancer will not incorporate or use the materials of any third party including those of any other client or any employer, in performing the Freelancer Services that are not generally available for use by the public or have not been legally transferred to the Client.
6.2 BACKGROUND TECHNOLOGY
Freelancer will disclose in the Engagement terms any Background Technology which Freelancer proposes to incorporate into Work Product or upon which use or distribution of the Work Product will depend. If Freelancer discloses no Background Technology, Freelancer warrants that it will not incorporate any Background Technology into Work Product provided pursuant thereto. Freelancer will separately provide, with each delivery of Work Product to Client, a bill of materials that identifies all Background Technology and other third-party materials that have been incorporated into the Work Product and provides, for each item of Background Technology identified, (a) the name and any associated version number, (b) the applicable license or licensing terms, (c) whether the item has been modified by Freelancer, and (d) how the item has been incorporated into, is used by, or is relied upon by the Work Product. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise agreed in the Engagement terms, Freelancer agrees that it will not incorporate into Work Product or otherwise deliver to Client any software code for which the use or distribution of the code will create (or purport to create) obligations for Client to grant any rights or immunities under Client intellectual property to a third-party, including without limitation any obligation that the Work Product or Client software combined with, derived from, or distributed with such Work Product (x) be disclosed or distributed in source code form, (y) be licensed for the purpose of making derivative works, or (z) be redistributable at no charge.
6.3 CLIENT MATERIALS
Client grants Freelancer a limited, non-exclusive, revocable (at any time, at Client’s sole discretion) right to use the Client Materials as necessary solely for the performance of the Freelancer Services under the applicable Service Contract. Client reserves all other rights and interest, including, without limitation, all Intellectual Property Rights, in and to the Client Materials. Upon completion or termination of the Service Contract, or upon Client’s written request, Freelancer will immediately return all Client Materials to Client and further agrees to destroy all copies of Client Materials and Deliverables (except for Background Technology as permitted by the Service Contract) contained in or on Freelancer’s premises, systems, or any other equipment or location otherwise under Freelancer’s control. Within ten days of such request from Client, Freelancer agrees to provide written certification to Client that Freelancer has returned or destroyed all Client Materials and Work Product as provided in this subsection.
6.4 OWNERSHIP OF WORK PRODUCT AND INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY
Upon Freelancer’s receipt of full payment from Client, the Work Product (except for any Background Technology), including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in the Work Product (except for any Background Technology), will be the sole and exclusive property of Client, and Client will be deemed to be the author thereof. If Freelancer has any Intellectual Property Rights to the Work Product that are not owned by Client upon Freelancer’s receipt of payment from Client, Freelancer hereby automatically irrevocably assigns to Client all right, title and interest worldwide in and to such Intellectual Property Rights. Except as set forth above, Freelancer retains no rights to use, and will not challenge the validity of Client’s ownership in, such Intellectual Property Rights. Freelancer hereby waives any moral rights, rights of paternity, integrity, disclosure and withdrawal or inalienable rights under applicable law in and to the Work Product. If payment is made only for partial delivery of Work Product, the assignment described herein applies only to the portion of Work Product delivered and paid for.
6.5 LICENSE TO BACKGROUND TECHNOLOGY
Upon Freelancer’s receipt of full payment from Client for delivery of Work Product, Freelancer hereby automatically grants to Client an exclusive, perpetual, fully-paid and royalty-free, irrevocable and worldwide right, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform, and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, have made, use, sell, import, offer for sale, and exercise any and all present or future rights in the Background Technology incorporated in Work Product delivered for that payment. If payment is made only for partial delivery of Work Product, the license described herein applies only to the portion of Work Product delivered and paid for.
6.6 LICENSE TO OR WAIVER OF OTHER RIGHTS
If Freelancer has any right to the Work Product, including without limitation any Intellectual Property Right, that cannot be assigned to Client by Freelancer, Freelancer hereby automatically, upon Freelancer’s receipt of full payment from Client, unconditionally and irrevocably grants to Client during the term of such rights, an exclusive, even as to Freelancer, irrevocable, perpetual, worldwide, fully-paid and royalty-free license to such rights, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, use, sell, import, offer for sale and exercise any and all such rights. If Freelancer has any rights to such Work Product that cannot be assigned or licensed, Freelancer hereby automatically, upon Freelancer’s receipt of payment from Client, unconditionally and irrevocably waives the enforcement of such rights, and all claims and causes of action of any kind against Client or related to Client’s customers, with respect to such rights, and will, at Client’s request and expense, consent to and join in any action to enforce such rights. If payment is made only for partial delivery of Work Product, the grant described herein applies only to the portion of Work Product delivered.
6.7 ASSISTANCE
Freelancer will assist Client in every way, including by signing any documents or instruments reasonably required, both during and after the term of the Service Contract, to obtain and enforce Intellectual Property Rights relating to Work Product in all countries. In the event Client is unable, after reasonable effort, to secure Freelancer’s signature on any document needed in connection with the foregoing, Freelancer hereby designates and appoints Client and its duly authorized officers and agents as its agent and attorney in fact to act on its behalf to further the purposes of this Section with the same legal force and effect as if executed by Freelancer.
7. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION
7.1 CONFIDENTIALITY
To the extent a Client or Freelancer provides Confidential Information to the other, the recipient will protect the secrecy of the discloser’s Confidential Information with the same degree of care as it uses to protect its own Confidential Information, but in no event with less than due care, and will: (a) not disclose or permit others to disclose another’s Confidential Information to anyone without first obtaining the express written consent of the owner of the Confidential Information; (b) not use or permit the use of another’s Confidential Information, except as necessary for the performance of Freelancer Services (including, without limitation, the storage or transmission of Confidential Information on or through the Site for use by Freelancer); and (c) limit access to another’s Confidential Information to its personnel who need to know such information for the performance of Freelancer Services.
7.2 RETURN
If and when Confidential Information is no longer needed for the performance of the Freelancer Services for a Services Contract or at Client’s or Freelancer’s written request (which may be made at any time at Client’s or Freelancer’s sole discretion), the party that received Confidential Information, will, at its expense, promptly destroy or return the disclosing party’s Confidential Information and any copies thereof contained in or on its premises, systems, or any other equipment otherwise under its control. The party that received Confidential Information agrees to provide written certification to the party disclosing the Confidential Information of compliance with this subsection within ten days after the receipt of disclosing party’s written request for such certification.
7.3 PUBLICATION
Without limiting Section 7 (Confidentiality), Client and Freelancer will not publish, or cause to be published, any other party’s Confidential Information or Work Product, except as may be necessary for performance of Freelancer Services for a Services Contract.
7.4 IMMUNITY
A disclosure of information will be immune from prosecution or civil action under the Defend Trade Secrets Act, 18 U.S.C. Sec. 1832, if it: (A) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney, and (ii) solely for the purpose of reporting or investigating a suspected violation of law; or (B) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
8. DEFINITIONS
The following capitalized terms have the following meanings:
“
Background Technology
” means all Inventions developed by Freelancer other than in the course of providing Freelancer Services to Client under the Service Contract and all Inventions that Freelancer incorporates into Work Product.
“
Client
” means any person who entered into a Service Contract to obtain Freelancer Services from a Freelancer.
“
Client Deliverables
” means requests, intellectual property, and any other information or materials that a Freelancer receives from a Client to perform Freelancer Services.
“
Client Materials
” means requests, intellectual property, and any other information or materials that Client provides to Freelancer for Freelancer to perform Freelancer Services.
“
Confidential Information
” means Client Deliverables, Freelancer Deliverables, Work Product, and any other information provided to, or created by, a User for a Service Contract or to perform or assist in performing Freelancer Services, regardless of whether in tangible, electronic, verbal, graphic, visual, or other form. Confidential Information does not include material or information that is known to the public or that: (a) is generally known by third parties as a result of no act or omission of Freelancer or Client; (b) subsequent to disclosure hereunder, was lawfully received without restriction on disclosure from a third party having the right to disseminate the information; (c) was already known by User prior to receiving it from the other party and was not received from a third party in breach of that third party’s obligations of confidentiality; or (d) was independently developed by User without use of another person’s Confidential Information.
“
Engagement
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services that a Freelancer provides to a Client under a Service Contract on the Site.
“
Escrow Instructions
” means the Fixed-Price Escrow Instructions or the Hourly, Bonus and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions.
“
Fixed-Price Contract
” means a Service Contract for which Client is charged a fixed fee agreed between a Client and a Freelancer, prior to the commencement of a Service Contract, for the completion of all Freelancer Services contracted by Client for such Service Contract.
“
Freelancer
” means any person who entered into a Service Contract to perform Freelancer services for a Client.
“
Freelancer Deliverables
” means requests, intellectual property, and any other information or materials that a Client receives from a Freelancer for a particular Service Contract.
“
Freelancer Fees
” means: (a) for an Hourly Contract, an amount equal to the number of hours recorded by Freelancer in any Hourly Invoice, multiplied by the hourly rate set by the Freelancer; (b) for a Fixed-Price Contract, the fixed fee agreed between a Client and a Freelancer; and (c) any bonuses or other payments made by a Client.
“
Freelancer Services
” means all services performed for or delivered to Clients by Freelancers.
“
Hourly Contract
” means a Service Contract for which Client is charged based on the hourly rate set by the Freelancer.
“
Hourly Invoice
” means the report of hours recorded for a stated period by a Freelancer for the Freelancer Services performed for a Client.
“
Intellectual Property Rights
” means all patent rights, copyright rights, mask work rights, moral rights, rights of publicity, trademark, trade dress and service mark rights, goodwill, trade secret rights and other intellectual property rights as may now exist or hereafter come into existence, and all applications therefore and registrations, renewals and extensions thereof, under the laws of any state, country, territory or other jurisdiction.
“
Invention
” means any ideas, concepts, information, materials, processes, data, programs, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, artwork, formulae, other copyrightable works, and techniques and all Intellectual Property Rights therein.
“
Service Contract
” means, as applicable, (a) the contractual provisions between a Client and a Freelancer governing the Freelancer Services to be performed by a Freelancer for Client for an Engagement; or (b) if you use Upwork Payroll, the contractual provisions between Freelancer and the Staffing Provider for the provision of services to Client.
“
Work Product
” means any tangible or intangible results or deliverables that Freelancer agrees to create for, or actually delivers to, Client as a result of performing the Freelancer Services, including, but not limited to, configurations, computer programs, or other information, or customized hardware, and any intellectual property developed in connection therewith.
Effective August 18th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
These Mark Use Guidelines (“
Guidelines
”) let you know about Upwork’s rights with respect to its marks and when and how you can use them. The Guidelines are a part of and incorporate the
Terms of Service
. Capitalized terms not defined in these Guidelines are defined in the User Agreement
or in the other Terms of Service or have the meanings given such terms on the Site. To the extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork may modify these Guidelines without prior notice to you, and any
revisions to these Guidelines will take effect when posted on the Site, unless otherwise stated in the revised Guidelines. Please check the Site often for updates.
1. UPWORK MARKS
The Upwork name and logo are trademarks of Upwork. These Guidelines explain the terms under which you are allowed to use the “
Upwork Marks
”, which for purposes of these Guidelines and the other Upwork Terms of Service means Upwork’s trademarks, including the following:
Upwork
Up
Work Without Limits
Virtual Talent Bench
Project Catalog
Talent Scout
Upwork Enterprise
Elance
oDesk
Elance-oDesk
Private Talent Cloud
Talent Cloud
Work Differently
The Upwork Marks are among our most valuable assets. In order to preserve and strengthen our identity, these Guidelines provide conditions of use and clear instructions on proper use of the Upwork Marks.
2. USE OF UPWORK LOGO MARKS
The Upwork Marks that are also logos are also referred to in these Guidelines as the “
Upwork
Logo Marks
”.
For example, the Upwork Logo Marks include:
You may not use an Upwork Logo Mark unless you have a written license, granted by Upwork, permitting you to use the Upwork Logo Mark. If you have not been granted such a license, then you must not use, copy, modify, distribute, or post the Upwork Logo Mark for any reason. If you have such a license from Upwork Logo Mark to use the Upwork Logo Mark, you must use the Upwork Logo Mark only as licensed and only in accordance with these Guidelines.
3. USE OF OTHER UPWORK MARKS
You may use Upwork Marks other than the Logo Marks descriptively, provided you adhere to these Guidelines, or as otherwise permitted by law.
Descriptive use includes instances where you are referring to Upwork or Upwork services, such as “I registered on Upwork’s website today”, “I attended Upwork’s Work Without Limits Executive Summit”, or “Upwork Enterprise services have saved my company money.”
Keep these principles in mind as well:
Your use should never mislead anyone to believe Upwork sponsorship, affiliation, or endorsement of your company, products, or services exists when it does not.
When referring to Upwork, use the Upwork name in a plain text font and format only.
Upwork always appears as "Upwork," never as "UpWork", “UPWork”, "upwork", or "UPwork".
4. PROHIBITED USE OF UPWORK MARKS
Unless you have written permission from Upwork, you must never use any Upwork Mark:
On any letterhead, business card, or signature block;
As part of your business name or a domain name;
As part of a user ID, including on Upwork or social media;
In association with any third-party trademark in a manner that might create potential confusion as to the ownership of the Upwork Mark;
In any manner that suggests or could lead someone to believe you are acting on behalf of or in association with Upwork or that Upwork has endorsed or sponsored your product or services; or
Outside of your relationship with us, except as permitted by Upwork in writing.
Even if you have permission to use an Upwork Logo Mark, you must never use any Upwork Logo Mark:
That has been reproduced from an unauthorized artwork;
That has been modified, including color specifications, position and relative size of the letterings;
That has been modified to use negative or reverse “drop-out” reproduction;
Tightly confined in a band or bar; or
With other seals, logos, or other marks of other entities.
5. USE OF COPYRIGHTED WORKS
You may not use screenshots of or videos of navigation of the Site (as defined in the Site Terms of Use) or other works copyrighted by Upwork without Upwork’s written permission. Rights to screenshots of user profiles, communications, and work product on Upwork may need to be obtained from the User. You may not use such screenshots anywhere for any purpose without written authorization. Upwork cannot grant you permission to use screenshots that include third-party content.
Effective August 7th 2020
Download
Table of Contents
Upwork Global Inc.’s products and services, whether accessed at
www.upwork.com
and/or via an application, are protected in the United States and elsewhere by one or more of the U.S. Patent(s) listed herein and patents pending. Upwork Global Inc. provides this webpage to satisfy the virtual patent marking provisions of various jurisdictions, including to serve as notice under 35 U.S.C. § 287(a), as amended by the America Invents Act.
Upwork Global Inc.’s Upwork marketplace offering, including the Enterprise, Business, Plus, and Basic service offerings, whether accessed at
www.upwork.com
or via an application, are covered by U.S. Patent Nos.: 6,859,523; 6,938,048; 7,069,242; 7,155,400; 8,073,762; 8,380,709; 8,700,614; 8,706,607; 9,117,178; 9,117,180; 9,529,788; 9,672,491; 9,842,312; 9,940,594; 10,083,422; 10,102,501; 10,121,153; 10,152,695; 10,204,074; 10,223,653; 10,430,763; 10,489,745; 10,635,412; 10,650,332; and other patents pending. Upwork Global Inc.’s Upwork managed service offering is covered by U.S. Patent Nos.: 6,859,523; 6,938,048; 7,069,242; 7,155,400; 8,073,762; 8,380,709; 8,700,614; 8,706,607; 9,117,178; 9,117,180; 9,529,788; 9,672,491; 9,842,312; 9,940,594; 10,083,422; 10,102,501; 10,121,153; 10,152,695; 10,204,074; 10,223,653; 10,430,763; 10,489,745; 10,635,412; 10,650,332; and other patents pending. Upwork Global Inc.’s Upwork Direct Contract service offering is covered by U.S. Patent No. 10,121,153; and other patents pending.
Other products and services not listed here may be protected by one or more patents in the United States and elsewhere.
Effective March 13th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Upwork Global Inc. (
“
Upwork
,” “
our
,” “
us
,” or “
we
”
) respects the intellectual property rights of others and seeks to offer a platform which contains no content that violates those rights. To promote these objectives, we provide a process for submission of complaints concerning content posted by our users. Our policy and procedures are described and referenced below.
Copyright Infringement Claims
Pursuant to the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (17 U.S.C. § 512) (“
DMCA
”), Upwork has procedures for receiving written notification of claimed copyright infringement. Upwork has also designated an agent to receive notices of claimed copyright infringement. If you believe in good faith that your copyright has been infringed, you may submit a written communication that contains all of the following:
An electronic or physical signature of the person authorized to act on behalf of the owner of the copyright interest.
A description of the copyrighted work that you claim has been infringed. Provide a URL or link to where the material is located, if possible.
A description specifying the location on our website(s) of the material that you claim is infringing, including a URL or link to where the material is located.
Provide information reasonably sufficient to enable us to locate it.
Your email address and your mailing address and/or telephone number.
A statement by you that you have a good-faith belief that the disputed use is not authorized by the copyright owner, its agent, or the law.
A statement by you, made under penalty of perjury, that the information in your notice is accurate and that you are the copyright owner or authorized to act on the copyright owner’s behalf.
Upwork’s Legal Department is its designated agent under the DMCA. Please submit your notice to Upwork’s Legal Department by submission of
this online form
or
by email to legalnotices@upwork.com.
In response to a notice, Upwork may remove or disable access to the allegedly infringing material, and take such other actions Upwork deems appropriate in its sole discretion. Please bear in mind that you may be liable for damages (including costs and attorneys’ fees) if you materially misrepresent that material is infringing. If we remove or disable access, we will attempt to contact the poster of the allegedly infringing material so that the poster may provide a counter notification (the “
Counter-Notice
”) as described below.
If you believe that a notice of copyright infringement has been improperly submitted against you, you may submit a Counter-Notice, pursuant to Sections 512(g)(2) and (g)(3) of the DMCA. You may provide a written communication that contains all of the following:
Your physical or electronic signature.
Identification of the material removed or to which access has been disabled, including the specific URL or link.
A statement under penalty of perjury that you have a good-faith belief that removal or disablement of the material was a mistake or that the material was misidentified.
Your full name, your email address, your mailing address, and a statement that you consent to the jurisdiction of the Federal District court (i) in the judicial district where your address is located if the address is in the United States, or (ii) located in the Northern District of California (Santa Clara County), if your address is located outside the United States, and that you will accept service of process from the complainant submitting the notice or his/her authorized agent.
Please submit your Counter-Notice to Upwork’s Copyright Agent by
submission of
this online form
or by email to legalnotices@upwork.com.
Trademark and Other Intellectual Property Right Infringement Notices
For claims of trademark infringement or other claims of intellectual property infringement, you must similarly provide us with clear information about the location of the allegedly infringing work, including the URL or link where the work is located; complete information about your trademark or other intellectual property rights, including identifying the trademarked word(s) or symbol(s), trademark registration number(s), and a direct link to the trademark record(s), if available; and your contact information (name, physical address, email address and telephone number).  Please also indicate your relationship to the trademark holder, including whether you are the trademark holder or whether you are an authorized representative for the holder.
Please submit your notice
to Upwork’s Legal Department by
submission of
this online form
or by email to legalnotices@upwork.com
.
Effective February 7th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
This Privacy Policy explains how and why Upwork collects, uses, and shares personal information when you interact with or use our Site or Service. It also includes any information Upwork collects offline in connection with the Service, which we may combine with information from the Site and Service.
When we say “
Upwork
”, we mean Upwork Global Inc., and any of its affiliates, including Upwork Payments, Inc. When we say “
Site
”, we mean
www.upwork.com
, and when we say “
Service
”, we mean the Site plus any websites, features, applications, widgets, or online services owned or controlled by Upwork.
As part of the Service, Upwork provides a marketplace which results in platform information pertaining to different parties to an interaction. Users of the Service may be
Clients
,
Freelancers
,
Agencies,
or
Site Visitors
(as each is defined in the
User Agreement
). This Privacy Policy applies to Upwork’s processing of personal information of Users where Upwork determines the purposes and means of processing. It does not apply to processing of information by Users themselves, who may be controllers of the personal information they access through the Service. For information about how Users process your personal information, please contact them directly.
Accessibility
: This Privacy Policy uses industry-standard technologies and was developed in connection with the World Wide Web Consortium's Web Content Accessibility Guidelines, version 2.1. If you wish to print this policy, please do so from your web browser or by saving the page as a PDF.
TABLE OF CONTENTS
INFORMATION COLLECTION
USE OF INFORMATION
DATA RETENTION
INFORMATION SHARING AND DISCLOSURE
YOUR CHOICES AND RIGHTS
SECURITY
CROSS-BORDER DATA TRANSFERS
LINKS TO OTHER SITES
CHANGES TO THIS POLICY
CONTACT US
1. INFORMATION COLLECTION
a.   Information You Provide to Us
When you use the Service, you may provide us with information about you. This may include your name and contact information, financial information to make or receive payment for services obtained through the Upwork platform, or information to help us fill out tax forms. When you use the Service, we may also collect information related to your use of the Service and aggregate this with information about other users. This helps us improve our Services for you. You may also provide us with information about your contacts or friends if, for example, you’d like to add those contacts to a message room. Agencies may also provide us with information about Freelancers associated with the Agency.
Depending upon our relationship with you, we may collect the following categories and types of personal information from and about you:
Categories of Personal Information We Collect
Examples of Personal Information Collected
Categories of Sources of Personal Information
Business Purpose for Collection of Personal Information
Identifiers
Name, Date of Birth, Social Media Account Information, Profile Data, IP Address
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, service providers and other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Identification, Communications, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Contact / Account Profile Information
Email Address, Home Address, Billing Address, Phone Number
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, service providers and other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Identification, Communicating with You, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Sensitive Personal Information / Government Issued Identification Numbers
Social Security Number, Driver’s License, State Identification or Passport Number, VAT Identification Number, Tax Identification Number, Immigration Status, Citizenship Information
Directly from You
Improving and Providing the Service, Verifying Your Identity and Detecting Fraud, Identity Theft, or Other Misuse of Your Account, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Commercial Information
Transaction Data including services offered, considered, or purchased
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, service providers and other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Identification, Communications, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Financial Data/Payment Information
Credit card or other financial account information
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, service providers and other users)
Improving and Providing the Service, Identification, Communications, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Internet or Other Network or Device Activities Including Information from Cookies
Unique device and app identifiers, browsing history or other usage data, the browser and operating system you are using, the URL or advertisement that referred you to the Service, the search terms you entered into a search engine that led you to the Service, areas within the Service that you visited, which links you clicked on, which pages or content you viewed and for how long, other similar information and statistics about your interactions, such as content response times, download errors and length of visits to certain pages and other information commonly shared when browsers communicate with websites
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, service providers and other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Identification, Communications, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Approximate Geolocation Information
Your approximate location
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, service providers and other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Identification, Communications, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Sensory Information
Audio recordings if you call our customer service, video recording (if you provide permission).
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Service Providers; Third Parties (such as affiliates)
Providing and Improving the Service, Identification, Communications, Marketing, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Platform Communications
Communication Information (e.g., your name, contact information, and the contents of any messages you send)
Directly from You, Your use of the Service, and Users with whom you communicate
Providing the Service, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
With your consent, the contents of any messages you send may be used to Develop and Improve the Service.
Professional Information
Previous place(s) of employment, position(s), work history, earnings, resume
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Service Providers; Third Parties (such as other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
Other information that identifies or can be reasonably associated with you
User-generated content, (e.g., community posts, feedback, ratings and job postings), photographs, examples of your work, information on work previously performed via the Service and outside the Service, skills, tests taken, test scores, hourly pay rates and earnings information.
Directly from You or Your use of the Service; Service Providers; Third Parties (such as affiliates, agents, and other users)
Developing, Improving, and Providing the Service, Identification, Communications, Marketing, Analytics, Security, Legal, Compliance and Regulatory Obligations.
b.   Non-Identifying Information and De-Identified Information
Non-Identifying Information/Usernames:
We also may collect other information that does not identify you directly, such as zip codes, demographic data, information about your use of the Service, and general project-related data (“
Non-Identifying Information
”). We may combine information collected from Upwork users, whether they are registered or not (“
Upwork Users
”). In some cases, we may render Personal Information (generally, email address) into a form of Non-Identifying Information referred to in this Privacy Policy as “
Hashed Information
.” This is typically accomplished using a mathematical process (commonly known as a hash function) to convert information into a code. While the code does not identify you directly, it may be used by Upwork’s partners to connect your activity and interests.
Combination of Personal and Non-Identifying Information:
We may combine your Personal Information with Non-Identifying Information, but Upwork will treat the combined information as Personal Information.
De-Identified Information:
We may also de-identify or aggregate information and convert it into non-personal information so that it can no longer reasonably be used to identify you (“
De-Identified Information
”). We may use De-Identified Information for any of the purposes described in the “We Use Information We Collect” section below. We will maintain and use De-Identified Information in de-identified form and will not attempt to reidentify the information, except to confirm our de-identification processes or unless required by law.
c.   Information Collected Automatically
Like other online companies, we receive technical information when you use our Services. We use these technologies to analyze how people use the Service, to improve how our Site functions, to save your log-in information for future sessions, and to serve you with advertisements that may interest you.
Upwork and its partners use cookies or similar technologies to analyze trends, administer the website, track users’ movement around the website, the desktop app, and the mobile app, and to gather demographic information about our user base as a whole. The technology used to collect information automatically from Upwork Users may include cookies, web beacons, and embedded scripts. In addition, we and our marketing partners, affiliates, analytics, and service providers may use a variety of other technologies (such as tags) that collect similar information for security and fraud detection purposes and we may use third parties to perform these services on our behalf.
For further information on cookies and how they are used for the Service, please visit our Cookie Policy at
www.upwork.com/legal#cookie-policy
.
d.   Work Diaries and Work View
With your permission, we collect information about a Freelancer’s work for a Client, including automatically collected information about work on a particular project. If a Freelancer enables Work Diaries, we will share Work Diaries with the relevant Client and Agency. We tell Freelancers when we are capturing information for the Work Diary and allow Freelancers to block such data sharing.
As part of the Service, when enabled by a Freelancer, we collect information about a Freelancer’s work on a project for a Client, including information that may be considered personal information. This feature is known as Work Diary. Work Diaries include information provided by the Freelancer, such as a memo, as well as automatically gathered information about work on a project, such as number of mouseclicks and keyboard strokes and regularly taken screenshots (which may include a webcam picture of you if you have enabled this feature in your settings). In order to use Work Diaries, you must download and install the Team App software from
www.upwork.com
.
We will share information contained in Work Diaries with the relevant Client and with any manager or administrator of any applicable Freelancer Agency. We inform Freelancers each time we capture information for Work Diary. As set forth in our Terms of Service, End User License Agreement, and help pages on the Site, a Freelancer may choose to block or delete the screen shot and associated data for a recorded work interval, but then the Freelancer may not be paid for that work interval.
e.   Analytics Providers, Ad Servers and Similar Third Parties
We may work with advertising agencies and vendors who use technology to help us understand how people use our Site. These vendors may use technologies to serve you advertisements that may interest you. You can choose to opt out of receiving certain interest-based advertising.
Upwork works with ad networks, ad agencies, analytics service providers and other vendors to provide us with information regarding traffic on the Service, including pages viewed and the actions taken when visiting the Service; to serve our advertisements on other websites, within mobile apps and elsewhere online; and to provide us with information regarding the use of the Service and the effectiveness of our advertisements. Our service providers may collect certain information about your visits to and activity on the Service as well as other websites or services, they may set and access their own tracking technologies on your device (including cookies and web beacons), and may use that information to show you targeted advertisements. Some of these parties may collect Personal Information when you visit the Service or other online websites and services. We may also share certain Non-Identifying Information with these parties, including Hashed Information, in connection with the services they provide to us. If you wish to opt out of interest-based advertising from participating companies, click
here
(or if located in the European Union, click
here
). You must opt out on each device and each browser where you want your choice to apply. If you choose to opt out, please note you will continue to receive advertisements, but they may be less relevant to you.
While we may use a variety of service providers to perform advertising services, some of these companies are members of the Network Advertising Initiative (“
NAI
”) or the Digital Advertising Alliance (“
DAA
”) Self-Regulatory Program for Online Behavioral Advertising. You may want to visit
http://www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
, which provides information regarding targeted advertising and the “opt-out” procedures of NAI members. You may also want to visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
, which provides information regarding targeted advertising and offers an “opt-out” by participating companies in the DAA Self-Regulatory Program.
f.   Do Not Track Signals and GPC
Please note that your browser setting may allow you to automatically transmit a “Do Not Track” signal to websites and online services you visit. Upwork does not generally alter its practices when it receives a “Do Not Track” signal from a visitor’s browser. To find out more about “Do Not Track,” please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a technical specification that you can use to inform websites of your privacy preferences regarding ad trackers. If you do choose to set up GPC, it may impact the functionality of the Site, but we honor the GPC signal on a per-browser basis automatically in your cookie preferences.
g.  Children
The Service is general audience and intended for users 18 and older. We do not knowingly collect Personal Information from anyone younger than age 18. If we become aware that a child younger than 18 has provided us with Personal Information, we will use commercially reasonable efforts to delete such information from our files. If you are the parent or legal guardian of a child younger than age 18 and believe that Upwork has collected Personal Information from your child, please contact us at:
legalnotices@upwork.com
.
2.  USE OF INFORMATION
We use information collected through the Service to provide and improve the Service, develop new Services and products, process your requests, prevent fraud, provide you with information and advertising that may interest you, comply with the law, and as otherwise permitted with your consent.
a. We Use Information We Collect:
To develop, provide, and improve the Service, complete your transactions, address your inquiries, process your registration, verify the information you provide is valid, and for compliance and internal business purposes.
To contact you with administrative communications and Upwork newsletters, marketing or promotional materials (on behalf of Upwork or third parties) and other information that may be of interest to you. If you decide at any time that you no longer wish to receive such communications from us, please follow the instructions in the Your Choices and Rights section, below.
To tailor content we display to you and offers we may present to you, both on the Service and elsewhere online.
To administer and develop our business relationship with you and, if applicable, the corporation or other legal entity you represent.
To assess your proposal to perform a freelance project on Upwork and prepare related governmental and internal statistics reports.
To enforce and comply with the law, including to conduct an investigation, to protect the property and rights of Upwork or a third party, to protect the safety of the public or any person, or to prevent or stop activity we may consider to be, or to pose a risk of being, illegal, fraudulent, unethical or legally actionable activity. We may also use Device Identifiers to identify Upwork Users.
For the purposes disclosed at the time you provide your information, with your consent, and as further described in this Privacy Policy.
To Honor Our Contractual Commitments to You. Much of our processing of Personal Information is to meet our contractual obligations to our investors, or to take steps at Users' request in anticipation of entering into a contract with them.
For Our Legitimate Interests. In many cases, we handle Personal Information on the grounds that it furthers our legitimate interests in commercial activities, such as the following, in ways that are not overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the affected individuals:
Providing our Site and Service.
Detecting security incidents, protecting against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for that activity.
Measuring interest and engagement in our Services.
Short-term, transient use, such as contextual customization of ads.
Improving, upgrading or enhancing our Services.
Developing new products and services.
Ensuring internal quality control and safety.
Authenticating and verifying individual identities.
Debugging to identify and repair errors with our Services.
Auditing relating to interactions, transactions and other compliance activities.
Enforcing our agreements and policies.
Analyzing and improving our business.
Communications, including marketing and responding to your inquiries about our services.
Addressing information security needs and protecting our Users, Upwork, and others.
Managing legal issues.
To Comply with Legal Obligations. We need to use and disclose Personal Information in certain ways to comply with our legal obligations.
3.  DATA RETENTION
Unless you request that we delete certain information (see
Your Choices and Rights
below), we will only retain your personal information for as long as is necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, regulatory, accounting, or reporting requirements, as well as ongoing fraud prevention, backup, and business continuity purposes.
4.  INFORMATION SHARING AND DISCLOSURE
We do not sell your Personal Information for monetary consideration
, and we do not share your Personal Information with third parties for those third parties’ marketing purposes unless we first provide you with the opportunity to opt-in to or opt-out of such sharing.However, we may use technologies on our Site for the purposes of advertising or marketing to you and understanding how you interact with our ads. This may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of personal information for targeted advertising under applicable data protection laws. We may also share information we have collected about you, including Personal Information, as disclosed at the time you provide your information, with your consent, as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy, or for the following business or commercial purposes:
Upwork Users
For Freelancers who have entered into a contract with a Client or who have elected to participate in Upwork Payroll, we may share their information with Clients, Agencies, and Upwork payroll vendors. For Freelancers who choose to view a job post or submit a proposal via the Service, we may share their information with the applicable Client(s). For Freelancers who have made their profiles publicly visible, we may share their information with Clients, Agencies, Partners, and Developers.
Note that if a Freelancer is suspended from the Upwork Service, we may share that information with Clients for whom that Freelancer has worked or submitted proposals for work. We may also share information with Agencies to whom Freelancers are associated for a particular work project.
For clients who have entered into a service contract or agreed to use Upwork Payroll with another user, we may share your information in order to complete the transaction or to facilitate the resolution of a claim or dispute. The user receiving your information is not allowed to use it for purposes unrelated to the transaction, such as to contact you for marketing purposes, unless you have expressly consented to it.
Service Providers
We may employ service providers and individuals to facilitate our Service, to provide the Service on our behalf, to perform Service-related services (e.g., without limitation, maintenance services, database management, web analytics and online advertising, payment processing, fraud detection and improvement of Upwork’s features) or to assist us in analyzing how our Service is used. These Service providers may include analytics companies, advertising partners, payment processors, identity verification companies, security companies, generative AI partners, or other merchants. These third parties may have access to your Personal Information in order to perform these tasks on our behalf.
Generative AI Partners
We provide certain features of our Service by integrating trusted generative AI service providers. We may share the information you provide while using these features with these generative AI service providers, as well as additional information necessary to utilize the feature.
Where Upwork uses this information to power features, we leverage certain treatments of the data appropriate for the feature, including but not limited to, first removing personal information and only using public data.
The Service includes a two-sided marketplace, which results in platform information pertaining to both parties on either side of an interaction. For example, a Client’s review is inherently about a Freelancer, a Client job post is work history for a Freelancer, and Client spend is part of earning history for a Freelancer. Thus, if a Client or Freelancer chooses to use our generative AI features, the platform information associated with that user’s account – including information described above – may be used to power those features.
Legal and Investigative Purposes
Upwork will share information with government agencies as required by law including (without limitation) in response to lawful requests by public authorities to meet national security or law enforcement requirements and in connection with reporting earnings. We cooperate with government and law enforcement officials and private parties to enforce and comply with the law.
We will disclose information about you to government or law enforcement officials or private parties as we, in our sole discretion, believe necessary or appropriate to respond to claims and legal process (including but not limited to subpoenas), or, at the request of governmental authorities or other third parties conducting an investigation where we determine in our sole discretion the disclosure is necessary to (a) protect the property and rights of Upwork or a third party, (b) protect the safety of the public or any person, or (c) prevent or stop activity we may consider to be, or pose a risk of being, illegal, fraudulent, unethical or legally actionable activity.
Internal and Business Transfers
Upwork may share information, including Personal Information, with its parent company Upwork Inc., and any current or future subsidiaries or affiliates, primarily for business and operational purposes, including activities such as IT management, for them to provide services to you, or support and supplement the Services we provide. We may sell, transfer, or otherwise share some or all of our assets, including your Personal Information, in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization or sale of assets (including, in each case, as part of the due-diligence process with any potential acquiring entity) or in the event of bankruptcy.
Upwork Foundation Initiative
If you choose to participate in The Upwork Foundation Initiative as a Freelancer, we may share information relevant to your participation in the program with partners of Upwork who provide support to Freelancers through that program.
Sweepstakes, Contests, and Promotions
We may offer sweepstakes, contests, and other promotions (any, a “
Promotion
”) that may require registration.
Non-Identifying Information and De-Identified Information
We may share aggregated Non-Identifying Information and we may otherwise disclose Non-Identifying Information (including, without limitation, Hashed Information) or De-Identified Information to third parties.
Categories of Personal Information We Have Shared in the Preceding 12 Months
Categories of Third Parties with whom We Share Personal Information
Whether This Category is Used for Targeted Advertising
Identifiers
Analytics Companies, Identity Verification Companies, Advertising Partners, Payment Processors, Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
Yes
Contact Information
Analytics Companies, Advertising Partners, Payment Processors, Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
Yes
Sensitive Personal Information / Government Issued Identification Numbers
Identity Verification Companies, Security Companies, Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
No
Commercial Information
Payment Processors, Security Companies, Analytics Companies, Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
No
Financial Data/Payment Information
Payment Processors, Security Companies, Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
No
Internet or Other Network or Device Activities Including Information from Cookies
Analytics Companies,     Advertising Partners, Other Merchants, Government Agencies (as required by law)
Yes
Approximate Geolocation Information
Analytics Companies,     Advertising Partners, Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
Yes
Sensory Information
Other Merchants, Upwork Users, Government Agencies (as required by law)
No
5.  YOUR CHOICES AND RIGHTS
You may have certain choices and rights associated with your personal information, including opting out of targeted advertising or other disclosures to third parties. Residents of certain locations may have the right to have an authorized agent submit requests on your behalf. You or your authorized agent may request that Upwork honor these rights by contacting us as outlined in the “Contact Us” section below, or submitting a request
here
. Depending on your location, you may also opt out of targeted advertising
here
.
Non-Discrimination: You will not receive any discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of your privacy rights.
Verifying Your Request: Only you, or a person that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a request related to your personal information. In the case of access and deletion, your request must be verifiable before we can fulfill such request. Verifying your request will require you to provide sufficient information for us to reasonably verify that you are the person about whom we collected personal information or a person authorized to act on your behalf. We will only use the personal information that you have provided in a verifiable request in order to verify your request. We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority. Please note that we may charge a reasonable fee or refuse to act on a request if such request is excessive, repetitive or manifestly unfounded.
For Individuals Located in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK) or Switzerland:
You have a number of rights under applicable data protection laws in relation to your personal information. Under certain circumstances, you have the right to:
Have access to your personal information by submitting a request to us;
Have your personal information deleted;
Have your personal information corrected if it is wrong;
Have the processing of your personal information restricted;
Object to further processing of your personal information, including to object to marketing from us;
Make a data portability request;
Withdraw any consent you have provided to us;
Restrict any automatic processing of your personal information; and
Complain to the appropriate Supervisory Authority.
To exercise any of these rights, please contact us as outlined in the “Contact Us” section below.
Notice for California Residents
“Shine the Light” and “Eraser” Laws
:
Residents of the State of California may request a list of all third parties to which we have disclosed certain information during the preceding year for those third parties’ direct marketing purposes.
California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA)/California Privacy Rights Act (CPRA):
The CCPA, as amended by the CPRA, provides California residents and/or their authorized agents with specific rights regarding the collection and processing of their personal information.
Your Right to Know:
California residents have the right to request that we disclose the following information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past twelve (12) months. We may ask you to provide certain information to identify yourself so that we may compare it with our records in order to verify your request. Upon verification, we will disclose to you:
The categories of personal information we have collected about you.
The categories of sources for the personal information we have collected about you.
The specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you.
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or “selling” your personal information as defined by the CCPA.
The categories of third parties to whom we have sold or shared your personal information, if any, and the categories of personal information that we have shared with each third-party recipient.
Your Right to Opt-Out of “Sale” or “Sharing” of Personal Information:
California residents have the right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of their personal information as defined by the CCPA by clicking
here
or by contacting us using the information in the “Contact Us” section below.
Please note that we do not knowingly “sell” the personal information of any individuals under the age of 18.
Where we are “sharing” your personal information with third parties for the purposes of cross-context behavioral advertising or profiling, you may opt-out of such sharing at any time by submitting a request as directed on the homepage of our website or by contacting us using the information in the “Contact Us” section below.
Your Right to Limit Use of Sensitive Personal Information:
California residents may have the right to request that businesses limit the use of any sensitive personal information to those uses which are necessary to perform the Services or for other specifically-enumerated business purposes under the CCPA, as amended by the CPRA. Please note that we do not use sensitive personal information other than as necessary to perform the Services or as specifically permitted under the CCPA.
Your Right to Delete:
California residents have the right to request that we delete any of the personal information collected from you and retained by us, subject to certain exceptions. We may ask you to provide certain information to identify yourself so that we may compare it with our records in order to verify your request. Once your request is verified and we have determined that we are required to delete the requested personal information in accordance with the CCPA, we will delete, and direct our service providers to delete your personal information from their records. Your request to delete personal information that we have collected may be denied if we conclude it is necessary for us to retain such personal information under one or more of the exceptions listed in the CCPA.
Your Right to Correct:
Under the CCPA, as amended by the CPRA, California residents have the right to request that we correct any inaccurate personal information we maintain about you, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes for which we are processing such personal information. We will use commercially reasonable efforts to correct such inaccurate personal information about you.
Non-Discrimination:
You will not receive any discriminatory treatment by us for the exercise of your privacy rights conferred by the CCPA.
Notice for Nevada Residents
Under Nevada law, certain Nevada residents may opt out of the sale of “personally identifiable information” for monetary consideration to a person for that person to license or sell such information to additional persons. “Personally identifiable information” includes first and last name, address, email address, phone number, Social Security Number, or an identifier that allows a specific person to be contacted either physically or online.
We do not engage in such activity; however, if you are a Nevada resident who has purchased or leased goods or services from us, you may submit a request to opt out of any potential future sales under Nevada law by emailing privacyrequests@upwork.com. Please note we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and the authenticity of the request. Once verified, we will maintain your request in the event our practices change.
Notice for Residents of Certain Other States
The laws of your state of residence (“Applicable State Law”) may provide you with certain rights, including the following:
Your Right to Confirm and Access:
You have the right to confirm whether we are processing personal information about you and access the personal information we process about you.
Your Right to Portability:
You have to right to obtain a copy of the personal information we maintain and process about you in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily-usable format.
Your Right to Delete:
You have the right to request that we delete the personal information we maintain or process about you.
Your Right to Correct:
You have the right to request that we correct inaccuracies in the personal information we maintain or process about you, taking into consideration the nature and purpose of such processing.
Your Rights to Opt-Out:
You have the right to opt-out of certain types of processing of personal information, including:
Opt-Out of the “sale” of personal information as defined by Applicable State Law;
Opt-Out of targeted advertising by us;
Opt-Out of automated profiling for the purposes of making decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects.
Please note, as explained above, we do not “sell” personal information as that word is traditionally defined. However, we do share personal information with third parties to provide you with personalized advertising from us and to better understand how you interact with our Services. Through the use of cookies, we may also make available certain personal information to third parties for targeted advertising. You may opt-out from any of these disclosures under Applicable State Law by clicking
here
.
Appeals Process & Other Concerns
Certain information may be exempt from the rights described above under applicable law. If we deny your request in whole or in part, you may have the right to appeal the decision. In such circumstances, we will provide you with information regarding the appeals process. Depending on your location, you may also email
legalnotices@upwork.com
with the subject “Data Privacy Request Appeal” to provide us with details about why you are appealing the decision.
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed to your satisfaction, please contact our U.S.-based third-party dispute resolution provider free at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
6.  SECURITY
We take a number of steps to protect your data, but no security is guaranteed.
Upwork takes reasonable steps to help protect and secure the information it collects and stores about Upwork Users. We maintain reasonable administrative, technical, and physical safeguards designed to protect personal information that we receive against accidental, unlawful, or unauthorized destruction, loss, alteration, access, disclosure or use.
7.  CROSS-BORDER DATA TRANSFERS
Because we are a U.S. company, we process and store your information in the United States and our service providers may process and store it elsewhere.
Upwork may transfer your personal information to a third party that is located in a jurisdiction other than the one from which we collected your personal information, including to countries that have not been deemed to have an adequate level of protection for the rights and freedoms of data subjects. If we do transfer your personal information to another jurisdiction, we will do so following due diligence and provided that the data recipient is subject to contractual agreements imposing obligations on it to ensure appropriate technical and organizational are implemented and maintained at all times to prevent the unauthorized and unlawful processing of personal information, and the accidental loss or destruction of, or damage to, personal information, consistent with our obligations under applicable data protection laws.
We will use appropriate legal transfer mechanisms, including Standard Contractual Clauses, where required by law. In addition, Upwork Global Inc. is self-certified under the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework, as described below. Personal information from EU, Swiss, and UK residents will be treated in accordance with the Data Privacy Framework Principles. To exercise any legal right to see copies of the data transfer mechanism documents that Upwork uses to transfer data to third parties, please contact us.
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Upwork Global Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Upwork Global Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Upwork Global Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. The Upwork Global Inc. entities certified under the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) are Upwork Inc., Upwork Talent Group Inc., Elance Inc., and Upwork Escrow Inc. To learn more about the DPF Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
When Upwork Global Inc. receives Personal Information under the DPF and then transfers it to a third party service provider acting as an agent on their behalf, Upwork Global Inc. may have certain responsibilities under the DPF if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF and (ii) Upwork or its affiliate is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
Covered European residents should contact Upwork at the contact information below regarding Upwork Global Inc.’s compliance with the DPF. Upwork will attempt to answer your questions and satisfy your concerns in a timely and complete manner as soon as possible. If, after discussing the matter with Upwork, your issue or complaint is not resolved, Upwork Global Inc.  has agreed to participate in the DPF independent dispute resolution mechanisms listed below, free of charge to you. PLEASE CONTACT UPWORK FIRST.
For other Personal Information Upwork Global Inc. receives under the DPF, we have committed to refer unresolved privacy complaints under the DPF Principles to an independent dispute resolution mechanism, JAMS Data Privacy Framework Dispute Resolution, operated by JAMS. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint, or if your complaint is not satisfactorily addressed, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information and to file a complaint.
If your complaint still is not resolved through these channels, under limited circumstances, an additional binding arbitration option may be available before a DPF panel, as described at
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/
. Every individual also has a right to lodge a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Upwork Global Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In cases of onward transfers to third parties, Upwork Global Inc. has responsibility for the processing of personal information we receive under the DPF Principles and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf. To the extent required by the DPF, Upwork Global Inc. shall remain liable under the DPF Principles if our agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless we are able to prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
8.  LINKS TO OTHER SITES
Our Service contains links to other websites. If you choose to click on a third-party link, you will be directed to that third party’s website. The fact that we link to a website is not an endorsement, authorization or representation of our affiliation with that third party, nor is it an endorsement of their privacy or information security policies or practices. We do not exercise control over third party websites. These other websites may place their own cookies or other files on your computer, collect data or solicit Personal Information from you. We encourage you to read the privacy policies or statements of the other websites you visit.
9.  CHANGES TO THIS POLICY
We may change this Privacy Policy. If we make substantial changes, we will provide notice.
This Privacy Policy is effective as of the date stated at the top of this page. Upwork may update this Privacy Policy at any time and any changes will be effective upon posting. By accessing or using the Service after we notify you of such changes to this Privacy Policy, you are deemed to have accepted such changes. Please refer back to this Privacy Policy on a regular basis.
10.  CONTACT US
To request that Upwork honor any of the rights described in this Policy submit a request
here
, or contact us as outlined below.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us at
https://support.upwork.com
or legalnotices@upwork.com, or by mail addressed to Upwork, Attn: Legal, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998, USA. You may also contact us by phone at 866-262-4478.
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) – European Representative
Pursuant to Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), Upwork Inc. has appointed European Data Protection Office (EDPO) as its GDPR Representative in the EU. You can contact EDPO regarding matters pertaining to the GDPR:
by using EDPO’s online request form:
https://edpo.com/gdpr-data-request
, or
by writing to EDPO at Ground Floor, 71 Lower Baggot Street, Dublin, D02 P593, Ireland
UK General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) - UK Representative
Pursuant to Article 27 of the UK GDPR, Upwork Inc. has appointed EDPO UK Ltd as its UK GDPR representative in the UK. You can contact EDPO UK regarding matters pertaining to the UK GDPR:
by using EDPO’s online request form:
https://edpo.com/uk-gdpr-data-request
, or
by writing to EDPO UK at 8 Northumberland Avenue, London WC2N 5BY, United Kingdom
FADP Article 14 Representative
Pursuant to Article 14 of the FADP, Upwork Inc. has appointed EDPO Switzerland as its Representative in Switzerland. You can contact EDPO Switzerland regarding matters pertaining to the FADP:
by using EDPO Switzerland's online request form:
https://edpo.com/swiss-data-request
, or
by writing to EDPO Switzerland at Rue de Lausanne 37, 1201 Geneva, Switzerland
Effective February 2nd 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Effective February 7th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Privacy at Upwork
Upwork understands the importance of data privacy and takes the responsibility of handling and securing personal data seriously. We focus on incorporating data protection principles throughout our platform, program, and services that provide effective data privacy measures for Upwork, its workforce, partners, and users.
Upwork’s Privacy and Information Security teams have carefully analyzed applicable privacy laws and regulations and undertaken the necessary steps for our compliance with their requirements. We provide detailed information about the personal data we collect and how we use it in our agreements, in our help articles, and in our
Privacy Policy
.
Depending on where you are located, you may have certain rights with respect to your personal data, which you can learn about below and exercise here
. Regardless of where you call home, you may
close
your account or request the deletion of all personal information we have about you at any time.
Learn more about how Upwork is complying with GDPR and the CCPA in our
Privacy Policy
.
EUROPE
The
General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
is a data privacy law that gives residents of the European Union (“EU”) more clarity and control over how their personal data is used. Personal data is anything that can directly or indirectly identify a person, such as a photo, name, bank details, medical information, computer IP address, and so on.
Under the GDPR, companies are required to be transparent about what types of personal data they collect and how they use it, be responsible for secure data processing practices, and provide notification to customers or data subjects when breaches occur.
The
United Kingdom General Data Protection Regulation
(UK GDPR) is a UK law that is largely based on the GDPR, but went into effect in 2021 as a result of the UK’s withdrawal from the EU. In conjunction with the
Data Protection Act 2018
, it sets out the key principles, rights and obligations for most processing of personal data in the UK.
Transfer of Data
With respect to transfers that involve personal data that is within the scope of European data protection laws, Upwork relies on
standard contractual clauses
as a transfer mechanism to reflect relevant compliance requirements.
We have posted a
Data Processing Agreement (“DPA”)
, governing the relationship between the Customer (as defined in the DPA) and Upwork with respect to personal data. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing by you and Upwork, the DPA applies to the extent Upwork processes any personal data for you as a controller in your role as a Customer.
Digital Services Act
The
Digital Services Act (DSA)
is a European Union (EU) law that became fully effective on February 17, 2024. Generally speaking, the DSA intends to protect consumers and their fundamental rights online, establish a transparency and accountability framework for online platforms, and foster innovation, growth and competitiveness.
Under the DSA, online platforms, for example, are required to publish “the average monthly active recipients” of their service in the EU over a preceding 6-month period. Platforms that exceed 45 million average monthly active EU recipients may be designated as a “very large online platform” (VLOP), which must comply with additional regulatory requirements. To the extent that any of Upwork’s products or services fall within the scope of the DSA, we continue to monitor our average monthly active EU recipients and have determined as of January 31, 2024 that it remains well below the 45 million threshold for VLOPs.
Upwork takes every report of suspicious or inappropriate activity seriously, and every report goes directly to our Trust and Safety team for investigation. We want Upwork to be your home for work, and providing a safe platform is our top priority. For more information on how to notify us of potentially illegal content, please visit our Help Center to learn about
reporting suspicious user activity
.
For any additional communications related to the DSA, please contact us at
dsa@upwork.com
.
UNITED STATES
The data protection landscape in the U.S. is a patchwork of regulations, state laws, and other requirements that are currently in flux. Upwork’s Legal team performs ongoing monitoring and analysis to determine their application to the personal data we handle and conform to their requirements.
“Sharing” and “Selling” Personal Information
Certain state laws provide rights for individuals to prevent the “sharing” and “sale” of their personal information. Upwork does not sell your personal information as the term is commonly understood. But we do allow some advertising vendors to use your personal information for internet-based marketing that may be considered “selling” or “sharing” under those definitions. The only means by which Upwork may “sell” or “share” your personal information is with our third-party marketing partners.
If you are located in a state that provides this right, you may opt out of the “sale” and “sharing” of your personal information by utilizing the “Do not sell or share my personal info” banner on our website, or clicking corresponding footer link. This opt-out is specific to the browser on the device, so you will need to opt out again if you: 1) later clear your cookies, or 2) visit this site from a different browser or device.
Sensitive Personal Information
State laws have different definitions for personal information that is inherently more sensitive or would pose a greater risk of harm to the individual if mishandled. Upwork identifies and appropriately handles the data classified as “sensitive personal information” or other elevated classification.
Some state laws allow individuals to limit the use of their sensitive personal information to purposes necessary to perform the services. Upwork imposes this limitation upon itself inherently, and only uses the limited sensitive personal information it collects to provide, maintain, improve, and secure our services.
HOW DO I SUBMIT A DATA REQUEST?
Depending on where you are located, you may have certain rights with regard to your personal data. These rights may be limited, for example, if fulfilling a request would reveal personal data about another person, or if you ask us to delete data which we are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests in keeping (such as fraud prevention purposes or record retention requirements under applicable laws). In addition, we typically will not remove data you posted publicly or shared with others through or on the Service, as neither you nor Upwork can delete all copies of data that have been previously shared with others.
If you would like to request to close your account in our system, you can do so through our platform (once you have logged in, visit settings / user settings, and then click on the close my account link). In addition, you can access, correct, or delete your personal data by making updates to that data through your account. You can also submit a request to us regarding your personal data by completing the form below or emailing privacyrequests@upwork.com. Please note that if your data is deleted, then your account may become deactivated. If your account is deactivated or you ask to close your account, you will no longer be able to use the platform.
Click here to access the data request form.
ADDITIONAL RESOURCES
Upwork Privacy Policy
Upwork Cookie Policy
Effective December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This policy describes how Upwork uses cookies
and other related technologies (collectively referred to as “cookies”) when you interact with us
on
http://www.upwork.com
(the “Site”) as set forth in the Upwork
Privacy Policy
.
By visiting or using the Site, you agree that we can use the cookies described in this Cookie Policy.
You can stop or update your cookie preferences by changing the settings in your browser (more information on how to do this is provided below) or adjusting the settings at the bottom of the homepage labeled “Cookie Settings”. We may modify this Agreement without notifying you, so please check back often for updates
.
What are cookies?
Cookies are text files, containing small amounts of information, which are downloaded to your browsing device (such as a computer or smartphone) when you visit a website. Cookies can be recognized by the website that downloaded them,  or by other websites that use the same cookies. First- party cookies are cookies that belong to Upwork, or are placed on your device by Upwork. Third-party cookies are cookies that another party places on your browsing device through our Site
.
What are cookies used for?
Cookies do lots of different jobs, like helping us understand how the Site is being used, letting you navigate between pages efficiently, remembering your preferences, and generally improving your browsing experience. Cookies can also help ensure marketing you see online is more relevant to you and your interests
.
What types of cookies does Upwork use?
To provide you with the best browsing experience, Upwork uses the following types of cookies: Strictly Necessary, Performance, Functional, and Targeting Cookies. You can find out more about each cookie category in the sections below
.
Strictly Necessary Cookies
These cookies are essential, as they enable you to move around the Site and use its features, such as accessing secure areas. Without these cookies, some services you have asked for such as payment submission can’t be provided. These cookies cannot be switched off in our systems, because they are necessary for Site functionality. While you can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, some or all parts of the Site may not function
.
Performance Cookies
These cookies collect information about how you use the Site, for example which pages you go to most often and if you get error messages from certain pages. These cookies gather only aggregated or anonymous information that does not identify you
.
Functionality Cookies
These cookies allow the Site to remember choices you make (such as your username or the region you’re in). For instance, the Site uses functional cookies to remember your language preference. These cookies can also be used to remember changes you’ve made to text size, font and other parts of pages that you can customize. They may also be used to provide services you’ve asked for such as watching a video or commenting on a blog. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly
.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies are used to deliver advertisements that are more relevant to you and your interests. They are also used to limit the number of times you see an advertisement as well as help measure the effectiveness of an advertising campaign. They remember that you have visited a website and this information may be shared with other organizations such as advertisers. This means after you have been to the Site you may see some advertisements about our services elsewhere on the Internet
.
How long will cookies stay on my browsing device?
The length of time a cookie will stay on your browsing device depends on whether it is a “persistent” or “session” cookie. Session cookies will only stay on your device until you stop browsing. Persistent cookies stay on your browsing device until they expire or are deleted
.
How to control and delete cookies through your browser
The browser you are using to view the Site can enable, disable or delete cookies. To do this, follow the instructions provided by your browser (usually located within the “Help,” “Tools'' or “Edit” functions). Please note that if you set your browser to disable cookies, you may not be able to access certain parts of the Site ( e.g. to apply for a job or post a job. Other parts of the Site may also not work properly. You can find out more information about how to change your browser cookie settings at
www.allaboutcookies.org
.
Also, you may update your cookie preferences by clicking the “Cookie Settings” button at the bottom of the Site’s homepage.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions about this Cookie Policy, please contact us at
https://support.upwork.com/home
or by mail addressed to Attn:
Legal,
3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998
,
USA.
Effective December 14th 2016
Download
Table of Contents
These API Terms of Use (the
“API Terms
”), dated as of December 14, 2016 (the “
Effective Date
”), are made and entered into by and between Upwork Global Inc., a Delaware corporation and its affiliates (“
Upwork
” or “
we
”), and you (“
Developer
” or “
you
”). Upwork and Developer are sometimes referred to in the API Terms individually as a “
Party
” and collectively as the “
Parties
”. Upwork and Developer hereby agree as follows:
1. Agreement to the API Terms.
By registering a software application, website, or product you create or service that you offer (a “
Developer Application
”), you agree to be bound by the API Terms. You must read, agree to, and accept all of the terms and conditions contained in the API Terms in order to use the Upwork API. Additionally, you agree to and accept the Upwork Terms of Service, available at
https://www.upwork.com/legal/
.
If you disagree with any of the terms of the API Terms or the Upwork Terms of Service, Upwork does not grant you a license to use the Upwork API.
If you are using the Upwork API on behalf of a company or any other entity, you represent and warrant that you have full legal authority to register a Developer Application on behalf of that entity and bind it to the API Terms and the Upwork Terms of Service. If you are not authorized, you may not accept the API Terms or register a Developer Application for someone else.
2. Definitions.
Capitalized terms not defined in the API Terms have the meanings given to them in the Upwork Terms of Service.
Upwork API.
A set of web-based services providing programmatic access to Upwork systems and data, together with all updates, revisions, and copies thereof. This also includes any associated tools and documentation that Upwork makes available under the API Terms.
Upwork Content.
Any data, content, or executables of or associated with the Upwork API or Site Services (as defined in the Upwork Terms of Service). This includes all Upwork User Data.
Upwork User Data.
Any content, information, and other data about persons who use the Upwork services received or collected by Developer through any instance of the Developer Application, the Upwork API, or otherwise in connection with the API Terms.
3.
Developer’s Use of the Upwork API.
Developer wishes to use and access the Upwork API in connection with the development and distribution of a Developer Application and agrees to the additional requirements herein. Developer and Upwork hereby agree as follows:
Developer Registration.
Before using the Upwork API, Developer must provide accurate information identifying its organization and the individual representative who will serve as a point of contact for Upwork. The registration may be completed and accepted by Upwork on the Site. Upon successful registration, Upwork shall make Access Credentials available to Developer. “
Access Credentials
” means the necessary security keys, secrets, tokens, and other credentials to access the Upwork API. All activities that occur using your Access Credentials are your responsibility. Access Credentials are specific to you and are confidential information. Keep them secret. You must not sell, transfer, or sublicense the Access Credentials. Do not try to circumvent them and do not require your users, employees, contractors, or agents to obtain their own Access Credentials to build, maintain, or use the Developer Application. Developer itself must request any Access Credentials to be used by any employee, contractor, or agent of Developer.
Development of the Developer Application.
Subject to the terms of these Terms of Use, Developer will develop one or more Developer Applications. Developer will ensure that all Developer Applications are and remain in compliance with the API Terms and the Upwork Terms of Service.
Permitted Uses of the Upwork API.
Your use of the Upwork API is limited to the purpose of facilitating your own or your Users’ use of the Upwork Site and Site Services. Some examples of permitted uses of the Upwork API would be to create Applications that:
Allow Upwork Users to search for and browse Upwork job postings with a customized interface;
Allow Upwork Users to manage active contracts;
Allow Upwork Users to apply to jobs on Upwork; or
Allow Upwork Users to manage invoices, billing, and communications on Upwork.
Prohibited Uses of the Upwork API.
Developer must never do any of the following:
Use the Upwork API in any Developer Application that includes adult content, promotes gambling, involves the sale of tobacco or alcohol to persons under 21 years of age, promotes or offers malicious code, or violates any applicable law or regulation.
Use the Upwork API to retrieve Upwork Content that is then aggregated with third-party search results in such a way that a user cannot attribute the Upwork Content to Upwork (such as aggregated search results).
Distribute or allow access to the Upwork API to anyone other than the entity on whose behalf Developer agreed to these Terms, or create an application programming interface that enables access to Upwork Content
Prohibited Uses/Functions of Developer Application.
Developer and the Developer Application must not do the following:
Implement features or business practices that unlawfully harm the professional reputation or relationships of Upwork or Upwork users.
Use Upwork Content received from the Upwork API in any manner that facilitates bias, discrimination, or data “redlining,” whether intentional or inadvertent, based on sensitive or protected categories or characteristics.
Impersonate Upwork or an Upwork user or intentionally misrepresent Upwork or any Upwork user or other third party when requesting or publishing information.
Obfuscate or hide any Upwork buttons, sign-in functionality, or consent or authorization flows from your users.
Proxy, request, or use Upwork account user names or passwords in any fashion for any reason.
Request from the Upwork API more than the minimum data fields and application permissions the Developer Application needs.
Try to exceed or circumvent limitations on calls and use. This includes creating multiple Developer Applications for identical, or largely similar, purposes.
Download, scrape, post, or transmit, in any form or by any means, any part of the Site or Site Services, including data retrieved by web browser plugins.
Copy, reformat, reverse-engineer, or otherwise modify the Upwork API, Access Credentials, the Site, the Site Services, or any Upwork Content.
Promote or operate any product or service that competes with the Upwork Site Services.
Interfere with or disrupt Upwork services, Upwork servers or networks connected to Upwork services, or disobey any requirements, procedures, policies or regulations of networks connected to the Upwork Site or Site Services.
Engage in any conduct that fails to comply with, or is otherwise inconsistent with, any agreement between Developer and Upwork or any written instructions provided by Upwork.
4. API License.
Using the Upwork API.
As part of the API Terms, Upwork grants you a non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable (except as expressly permitted herein) license to use the Upwork API solely to do the following and subject to the restrictions set forth in the API Terms:
Enable your Application to interact with Upwork’s databases to retrieve information necessary to facilitate your own or Your Users’ use of the Site and Site Services through your Application;
Make limited intermediate copies of Upwork Content only as necessary to perform activity permitted under the API Terms. You must delete all intermediate copies when they are no longer required for the purpose for which they were created;
Rearrange or reorganize Upwork Content within your Application; and
Display in your Application Upwork Content consistent with this Agreement.
Access Credentials
. Upwork will provide you with Access Credentials that permit you to access the Upwork API. The Access Credentials are the property of Upwork and may be revoked if you share them with any third party (other than as allowed in the API Terms), if they are compromised, if you violate the API Terms or the Upwork Terms of Service, or if Upwork terminates the API Terms.
API Call Limitations.
The number of API calls you will permitted to make during any given time period may be limited. Upwork will determine call limits based on various factors, including the ways your Application may be used or the anticipated volume of use associated with your Application. Upwork may, in its sole discretion, charge you for API calls that exceed the call limits or terminate your access to the Upwork API in accordance with Section 17 (Suspension and Termination). Unused calls will not roll over to the next day or month, as applicable.
5. Certification.
At its discretion, Upwork may require or offer Certification for certain Applications. Certification will consist of confirmation by Upwork or a third party it designates that your Application’s technology complies with the API Terms and the Upwork Terms of Service. You will be responsible for all costs associated with certification and any modifications necessary to meet the certification requirements and you may not be permitted to access the Upwork API in certain cases until certification is complete. At Upwork’s discretion, future modifications of your Application or use or display of Upwork Content may be subject to re-certification. If Upwork requires certification, your failure to maintain certification is cause for immediate termination of the API Terms.
6. Data Use.
Obligations to Upwork.
Developer may only use, disclose, and otherwise process Upwork User Data in accordance with the written instructions of Upwork and applicable laws, rules and regulations.
Prohibited Uses.
Developer will
not:
Use Upwork Content for any purpose except to the extent necessary for (1) the purpose of processing and supporting a specific transaction for the applicable Upwork user or (2) the purpose of providing services to Upwork.
Use Upwork Content for any research or publication purpose without prior written consent and a license from Upwork to research or publish, as applicable, Upwork Content.
Use Upwork Content for any other purpose (e.g., for Developer’s own benefit or for the benefit of any other entity or person).
Use Upwork Content for user profiling purposes or for advertising purposes.
Sell, lease, sublicense, or otherwise transfer, directly or indirectly, Upwork Content to any third party.
Augment, commingle, or supplement Upwork Content with personally identifiable or confidential information (including any mobile device identifier or other unique identifier that identifies any particular user, browser, computer or device) from any third-party source.
Use the user identification or authentication codes connected to any Upwork user to disclose information related to that user to any third party.
7. Data Storage.
Except as provided in the API Terms, Developer may not copy or store any Upwork Content, or any information expressed by or representing Upwork Content (such as hashed or otherwise transformed data).
Authentication Tokens.
Developer may store any Developer Application-specific alphanumeric user identification codes that Upwork provides to Developer for identifying individual users of the Developer Application or any tokens that Upwork provides to Developer when an Upwork user authenticates the Developer Application for the Upwork user’s account.
Cached Content.
Solely for the purpose of improving user experience, Developer may cache Upwork Content for no more than twenty-four (24) hours.
Deletion.
Developer must promptly and securely delete all Upwork User Data collected from Upwork users upon request of the Upwork user, when the Upwork user deactivates or uninstalls the Developer Application, when the Upwork user closes their account with Developer, and before, when possible, or promptly upon termination of the API Terms. Developer will promptly and securely delete all Upwork Content after completion of all activities reasonably necessary to operate or maintain the Developer Application and upon termination of the API Terms.
8. User Consent and Agreement.
User Agreement and Privacy Policy.
The Developer Application must include your own user agreement and privacy policy. Your user agreement and privacy policy must be prominently identified or located where members download or access the Development Application. Your privacy policy must meet applicable legal standards and accurately describe the collection, use, storage and sharing of data. You must promptly notify us of any breaches of your user agreement or privacy policy that impact or may impact Upwork users.
User Consent.
Before obtaining information from Upwork users, you must obtain their informed consent by telling them what information you collect and how it will be used, stored or shared, and by taking any additional steps required by law or regulation.
9. Data Safeguards.
Developer will protect Upwork User Data in accordance with all applicable laws. Your network, operating system, and software of your web servers, databases, and computer systems (collectively “
Systems
”) must be properly configured to securely operate the Developer Application and Upwork User Data. The Developer Application must use reasonable security measures to protect any Upwork User Data and any elements or components of the Upwork API. You shall not architect, design, or select Systems in a manner to avoid these obligations. You must promptly report to Upwork at
legalnotices@upwork.com
any security deficiencies in, or intrusions into, your Systems that you discover to Upwork. You will work with Upwork to correct any security deficiency and disconnect any intrusions or intruders as soon as practicable upon discovery of any such deficiency or intrusion. In the event of any security deficiency or intrusion involving the Developer Application or Upwork User Data, you will make no public statements without prior written and express permission from Upwork in each instance, unless otherwise required by law.
10. Access to the Upwork API.
Subject to the API Terms, Upwork may, in its sole discretion, make specific instances or versions of the Upwork API available to Developer for use in connection with Developer Applications. Upwork may terminate such access to the Upwork API, in whole or certain features, functions, or services thereof, for convenience, at any time. The Upwork API will be deemed to be a part of the Site Services as set forth in the Upwork Terms of Service.
11. Upwork API Support and Changes.
Upwork may provide technical support, upgrades, or modifications of the Upwork API in Upwork’s sole discretion. Upwork may cease providing technical support, upgrades, or modifications of the Upwork API at any time and for any reason without notice or liability to Developer. Upwork may release new versions of the Upwork API and require Developer to use the new version of the Upwork API. Developer’s use of new releases or versions of the Upwork API will be acceptance of all modifications of the Upwork API.
12. Intellectual Property.
Upwork Materials.
Upwork owns all rights, title, and interest, including all intellectual property rights, in and to, the Upwork API; all elements, components, and executables of the Upwork API; and all elements, components, and executables of the Site Services (collectively, the “
Upwork Materials
”). The only exception to this is any information or Content which you as an Upwork user have licensed to Upwork under the Upwork Terms of Service. Except for the express licenses granted in the API Terms, Upwork does not grant you any right, title, or interest in the Upwork Materials. Developer agrees to take such actions as Upwork may reasonably request to perfect Upwork’s rights to the Upwork Materials.
Developer Property.
Except to the extent the Developer Application contains Upwork Materials, Upwork claims no ownership or control over your Developer Application. During the term of the API Terms you hereby grant Upwork a paid-up, royalty-free, non-exclusive, worldwide, irrevocable right and license, under all of your intellectual property rights, to: (1) use, perform, and display the Developer Application and its content for purposes of marketing, demonstrating, and making the Developer Application available to Upwork users; (2) link to and direct Upwork users to the Developer Application; and (3) sublicense the foregoing rights to our affiliates.
Feedback.
Developer may, but is not required to, provide suggestions, comments, ideas, or know‐how, in any form, to Upwork related to Upwork products, services or technology (“
Feedback
”). To the extent Developer provides Feedback to Upwork, Developer grants Upwork the right to use such Feedback without any right to compensation from Upwork.
13. Independent Development by Upwork.
Developer understands and acknowledges that Upwork may be independently creating applications, content, and other products or services that may be similar to or competitive with the Developer Application. Nothing in the API Terms will be construed as restricting or preventing Upwork from creating and fully exploiting any applications, content, and other products or services, without any obligation to Developer. This paragraph will survive the termination or expiration of the API Terms.
14. Confidential Information.
Developer agrees that the content of the Upwork API, and any Upwork Content that by its nature should reasonably be known to be confidential, is deemed to be confidential information of Upwork and Developer will maintain the same in strict confidence and not disclose the same to any third party (other than employees, agents and contractors of Developer for the sole purpose of providing services to Developer to complete work permitted hereunder) or use the same for any purpose other than its performance under the Agreement. To the extent that you retain any Upwork Content after the termination or expiration of the API Terms, this paragraph will survive the termination or expiration of the API Terms.
15. Effect.
The provisions of the API Terms will control over any inconsistent provisions of the Upwork Terms of Service, and the Upwork Terms of Service, as modified and supplemented by the API Terms, will remain in full force and effect. Any “shrink wrap” or “click wrap” license agreement or any other terms and conditions associated with Developer’s Application is null and void, is not applicable hereunder, and is expressly excluded.
16. Fees.
Upwork currently provides the Upwork API without charge. However, Upwork reserves the right, at Upwork’s sole discretion, to charge fees for future use of or access to the Upwork API.
Developer may not charge any fee to Upwork users for the Developer’s Application without the express written permission or agreement of Upwork.
17. Term and Termination.
Term.
The term of the API Terms will commence on the date upon which you agree to the API Terms and will continue until terminated as set forth below.
Developer’s Termination Rights.
Developer may terminate the API Terms by discontinuing use of the Upwork API and returning all Upwork Content, including Upwork User Data.
Suspension and Termination.
Upwork may suspend or terminate Developer’s use of the Upwork API at any time if we believe you have violated the API Terms or Upwork Terms of Service, or if we believe the availability of the Upwork API in the Developer Application is not in our or our users’ best interests. Immediately upon termination of the API Terms, all licenses granted to Developer will cease and all data retrieved from the Upwork API or Site Services must be deleted.
Effect of Termination.
Upon termination of these Terms:
all rights and licenses granted to Developer will terminate immediately;
Developer will promptly and securely destroy Upwork Content in your possession or control;
neither party is liable to the other party solely because the API Terms have been terminated;
unless we agree otherwise in writing or as stated explicitly in the API Terms, Developer must permanently delete all Upwork Content and Upwork User Data or other data which you stored pursuant to your use of the Upwork API. Upwork may require that you certify in writing your compliance with this section; and
Upwork will make commercially reasonable efforts to remove all references and links to the Developer Application from the Site (Upwork has no other obligation to delete copies of, references to, or links to the Developer Application).
18. Warranties and Liabilities.
Disclaimer of Warranties.
UPWORK PROVIDES THE UPWORK API, UPWORK CONTENT, AND ALL OTHER INFORMATION AND SERVICES ON AN “AS IS” AND “AS AVAILABLE” BASIS WITH NO WARRANTIES, EITHER EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, OF ANY KIND. TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMISSIBLE UNDER APPLICABLE LAW, UPWORK DISCLAIMS ANY AND ALL WARRANTIES AND REPRESENTATIONS, INCLUDING, WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, ACCURACY OF DATA, AND NONINFRINGEMENT. UPWORK DOES NOT GUARANTEE THAT THE UPWORK API WILL FUNCTION WITHOUT INTERRUPTION OR ERRORS IN FUNCTIONING. IN PARTICULAR, THE OPERATION OF THE UPWORK API MAY BE INTERRUPTED DUE TO MAINTENANCE, UPDATES, OR SYSTEM OR NETWORK FAILURES. UPWORK DISCLAIMS ALL LIABILITY FOR DAMAGES CAUSED BY ANY SUCH INTERRUPTION OR ERRORS IN FUNCTIONING. FURTHERMORE, UPWORK DISCLAIMS ALL LIABILITY FOR ANY MALFUNCTIONING, IMPOSSIBILITY OF ACCESS, OR POOR USE CONDITIONS OF THE UPWORK API DUE TO INAPPROPRIATE EQUIPMENT, DISTURBANCES RELATED TO INTERNET SERVICE PROVIDERS, TO THE SATURATION OF THE INTERNET NETWORK, AND FOR ANY OTHER REASON.
Limitations of Liability.
UPWORK AND OUR EMPLOYEES, AGENTS, SHAREHOLDERS, OR DIRECTORS, SHALL NOT BE LIABLE FOR ANY SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES OR LOSS OF USE, PROFIT, REVENUE OR DATA TO YOU OR ANY THIRD PERSON ARISING FROM YOUR USE OF THE UPWORK API. THIS LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY REGARDLESS OF WHETHER (i) YOU BASE YOUR CLAIM ON CONTRACT, TORT, STATUTE, OR ANY OTHER LEGAL THEORY, (ii) WE KNEW OR SHOULD HAVE KNOWN ABOUT THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES, OR (iii) THE LIMITED REMEDIES PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION FAIL OF THEIR ESSENTIAL PURPOSE. THIS LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL NOT APPLY TO ANY DAMAGE THAT UPWORK MAY CAUSE YOU INTENTIONALLY OR KNOWINGLY IN VIOLATION OF THE API TERMS OR APPLICABLE LAW.
Indemnification.
You will defend, hold harmless, and indemnify Upwork (and our and their respective employees, agents, shareholders, and directors) from any claim or action brought by a third party, including all damages, liabilities, costs and expenses, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, to the extent resulting from, alleged to have resulted from, or in connection with: (i) your breach of your obligations herein; or (ii) the violation of any copyright, trademark, service mark, trade secret or United States patent by the Developer Application.
19. General
.
Relationship of the Parties.
The parties are agreeing to the API Terms as independent contractors, and the API Terms will not be construed to create a partnership, joint venture or employment relationship between them. Neither party is authorized to or will represent itself to be an employee or agent of the other or enter into any agreement on the other’s behalf of or in the other’s name.
Assignability.
You may not assign the API Terms, nor any of your rights or obligations hereunder, without Upwork’s prior written consent. Upwork may freely assign the API Terms without your consent. Any attempted assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. Subject to the foregoing restrictions, the API Terms will inure to the benefit of successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
Severability.
If and to the extent any provision of the API Terms is held illegal, invalid, or unenforceable in whole or in part under applicable law, such provision or such portion thereof shall be ineffective as to the jurisdiction in which it is illegal, invalid, or unenforceable to the extent of its illegality, invalidity, or unenforceability, and shall be deemed modified to the extent necessary to conform to applicable law so as to give the maximum effect to the intent of the parties. The illegality, invalidity, or enforceability of such provision in that jurisdiction shall not in any way affect the legality, validity, or enforceability of such provision in any other jurisdiction or of any other provision in any jurisdiction.
Choice of Law and Venue.
The API Terms and any controversy, dispute or claim arising out of or relating to the API Terms shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of California without regard to its conflict of law provisions and excluding the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods (CISG). With respect to any User located outside the United States, the User agrees that the California state courts of Santa Clara County (or, if there is federal jurisdiction, the United States District Court for the Northern District of California) will have jurisdiction and venue with respect to any claim arising out of or relating to the API Terms and consents to the personal jurisdiction and venue of those courts.
No Waiver.
The failure or delay of either party to exercise or enforce any right or claim does not constitute a waiver of such right or claim and shall in no way affect that party’s right to later enforce or exercise it, unless such party issues an express written waiver, signed by a duly authorized representative of each party.
Miscellaneous.
The API Terms set forth the entire agreement and understanding of the parties relating to their subject matter and cancel and supersede any prior or contemporaneous discussions, agreements, representations, warranties, and other communications between them. No modification or amendment to the API Terms shall be binding upon Upwork unless in a written instrument signed by a duly authorized representative of Upwork.
Effective June 27th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
If a Client purchases a Service Contract through the Pro Services feature on an Upwork Partner site, these Upwork Pro Services terms apply. These terms do not apply to Service Contracts entered into directly on the Upwork site.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, we may modify these Upwork Pro Services terms without prior notice to you, and any revisions will take effect when posted on the Site unless otherwise stated. The version of these Upwork Pro Services terms in effect on the date any Pro Services service contract is entered into apply to that contract. Please check the Site often for updates.
These Upwork Pro Services terms hereby incorporate by reference the
Upwork Terms of Service
(“
Terms of Service
”), including the
User Agreement
,
Terms of Use
,
Privacy Policy
, and
Nondiscrimination Statement
. Capitalized terms not defined in these Upwork Pro Services terms are defined in the User Agreement
or elsewhere in the Terms of Service, and have the meanings given such terms. For purposes of these Upwork Pro Services terms, the term “
Client
” indicates the User who purchased the Service Contract through the Upwork Partner site (also referred to as “
You
”).
1. ACCEPTANCE OF SERVICE CONTRACT AND TERMS
Once Client has agreed to a Service Contract by agreeing to Upwork’s Terms of Service and clicking “Checkout,” “Pay” or a similar button on the Upwork Partner’s purchase page (the “
Partner Site
”), these Upwork Pro Services terms constitute a binding agreement. Please note that, in doing so, you have purchased services through that Partner, and Upwork has an agreement with that Partner to provide you with those services. These terms, along with the other Upwork Terms of Service, outline your and Upwork’s rights and responsibilities to each other. Other rights and responsibilities you may have related to the Service Contract you purchased are between you and the Partner, and Upwork is not a party to those additional terms, if any.
2. DELIVERABLES
The expected outcomes of the Service Contract (“Deliverables”), as well as the specifications and time of delivery for all Deliverables, will be determined on the Partner Site at the time of Client’s purchase of the project. Upon Upwork’s receipt of Your purchase on the Partner Site, You will be invited into a Client Portal where You can further discuss the purchased services and track the work on the Deliverables.
All Deliverables will be deemed accepted by You if You do not reject or dispute them within five (5) business days of delivery (the “
Review Period
”), by following the dispute process set forth below through the prompts provided within the Client Portal. Deliverables also will automatically be deemed accepted if You use them in a live-production environment. The acceptance of a Deliverable by You discharges any further obligation to revise the Deliverable or provide a refund of the amounts paid for the Deliverable. In the event that You reject or dispute any Deliverable(s), You may be required to specifically identify the manner in which the Deliverable(s) fails to materially comply with the applicable specifications previously set forth for the Service Contract.
3. DISPUTES
Client may submit a dispute for Deliverables where the Client has not accepted the specified Deliverable pursuant to Section 2 of these Terms.
To submit a dispute, Client must click the appropriate button in the Client Portal to notify the Parties of their request.
All disputes must be filed within the Client Portal. Disputes submitted through other methods may not be considered valid and may be rejected, in Upwork’s sole discretion.
In submitting a dispute, Client will have the option to (1) request revisions to the project or (2) request to cancel and receive a refund for the project. If Client requests revisions, Client must indicate how the Deliverable provided fails to materially comply with the specifications agreed upon in the Service Contract. Only revisions that align with the previously established specifications for the Deliverable will be accepted and provided. If Client requests to receive a refund and cancel the project, Upwork will notify the Upwork Partner of Client’s request. The decision to issue the refund and the amount of the refund, if any, will be determined by and issued from the Upwork Partner to Client. In the event of a refund, Client may be required to return all Deliverables and forfeit all rights to the Deliverables related to the Service Contract.
Client must cooperate with all efforts to resolve disputes, including by responding to inquiries within five (5) calendar days. Failure to cooperate with the dispute process may result in denial and closure of the dispute. Upwork may establish a limitation on the number of revisions and refunds a Client may request, which may be established on a per Service Contract or per Client basis at Upwork’s sole discretion.
4. VIOLATION OF UPWORK TERMS OF SERVICE OR LAW
Client acknowledges and agrees that Client irrevocably authorizes and instructs Upwork to take such actions as deemed appropriate, in Upwork’s sole discretion in accordance with applicable law, if Upwork believes that fraud, illegal activity, or a violation of the Terms of Service has been committed or is being committed or attempted.
Upwork, in its sole discretion, reserves the right to suspend or terminate your use of the Upwork site or Client Portal immediately upon giving notice to you if Upwork believes you may be abusing the Site, the Client Portal, or the dispute process.
Effective May 5th 2015
Download
Table of Contents
IMPORTANT – PLEASE READ CAREFULLY: This End User License Agreement (“EULA”) is a legal agreement between you and Upwork Global Inc. and its affiliates (“Upwork”, “we”, or “us”). This EULA governs your use of the Upwork software and any third party software that may be distributed therewith (collectively the “Software”). Upwork agrees to license the Software to you (personally and/or on behalf of your employer) (collectively “you” or “your”) only if you accept all the terms contained in this EULA. By installing, using, copying, or distributing all or any portion of the software, you accept and agree to be bound by all of the terms and conditions of this EULA. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE WITH ANY OF THE TERMS OF THIS EULA, DO NOT DOWNLOAD, INSTALL, OR USE THE SOFTWARE.
Your use of the Software is also subject to your agreements with us concerning your use of the upwork.com website (the “Site”) and the services provided through that website. This EULA hereby incorporates by reference all terms, conditions rules, policies and guidelines on the Site, including the Upwork Terms of Service (the “Terms of Service”). Please also see the Upwork Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) at
https://www.upwork.com/legal/privacy-policy/
. Capitalized terms not defined in this EULA are defined in the Terms of Service.
1. CONDITIONAL LICENSE.
1.1. License Grant:
Subject to your compliance with the terms and conditions of this EULA, Upwork grants you a non-exclusive, non-transferable right to use the executable code version of the Software for your use solely in connection with work you perform on or through the Site.
1.2. Restrictions on Use:
You agree not to modify, display, adapt, translate, loan, distribute, prepare derivative works from, decompile, reverse engineer, disassemble or otherwise attempt to derive source code from the Software. You may not publish, redistribute, sublicense or sell the Software or any information or material associated with the Software. You may not rent, lease or otherwise transfer your rights to the Software. You may not use the Software in any manner that could damage, disable, overburden or impair the Site, nor may you use the Software in any manner that could interfere with any other party’s use and enjoyment of the Site. You agree that you will use the Software for lawful purposes and only in compliance with all applicable laws, including but not limited to copyright and other intellectual property laws. In addition, you shall not perform, nor release the results of any testing of the Software to any third party without the prior written consent of Upwork. You also agree not to remove, obscure, or alter any copyright notice, trademarks or other proprietary rights notices contained within or accessed in conjunction with or through the Software.
1.3. Intellectual Property Rights:
The Software is licensed, not sold, to you for use pursuant to the terms of this EULA. All rights not expressly granted to you are reserved to Upwork or its licensors or third party providers. You acknowledge that Upwork or its licensors or third party providers own all rights, title and interest, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights, in and to the Software, portions thereof, or any information or material provided through or in conjunction with the Software. Your rights to use the Software shall be limited to those expressly granted in this Section 1. All rights not expressly granted to you are reserved by Upwork, its licensors or third party providers. “Intellectual Property Rights” means all patent rights, copyright rights, mask work rights, moral rights, rights of publicity, trademark, trade dress and service mark rights, goodwill, trade secret rights and other intellectual property rights as may now exist or hereafter come into existence, and all other proprietary rights, and all applications, registrations, renewals, extensions and restorations thereof, now or hereafter in force and effect worldwide.
2. DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES.
2.1. “As Is”; No Warranty:
THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY UPWORK AND ANY OF OUR LICENSORS OR OUR THIRD-PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS “AS IS,” WITH NO WARRANTIES WHATSOEVER. UPWORK EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, ALL EXPRESS, IMPLIED, AND STATUTORY WARRANTIES, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, AND NON-INFRINGEMENT OF PROPRIETARY RIGHTS. COMPUTER PROGRAMS ARE INHERENTLY COMPLEX, AND THE SOFTWARE MAY NOT BE FREE OF ERRORS. THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED WITH ALL FAULTS AND THE ENTIRE RISK AS TO SATISFACTORY QUALITY, PERFORMANCE, ACCURACY AND EFFORT IS WITH YOU. UPWORK DISCLAIMS ANY WARRANTIES REGARDING THE SECURITY, RELIABILITY, TIMELINESS AND PERFORMANCE OF THE SOFTWARE. YOU UNDERSTAND AND AGREE THAT YOU DOWNLOAD AND USE THE SOFTWARE AT YOUR OWN DISCRETION AND RISK AND THAT YOU WILL BE SOLELY RESPONSIBLE FOR ANY DAMAGES TO YOUR COMPUTER SYSTEM OR LOSS OF DATA THAT RESULTS FROM THE DOWNLOAD OR USE OF THE SOFTWARE.
2.2. Privacy Disclaimer:
TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW, UPWORK DISCLAIMS LIABILITY IN THE EVENT OF THE UNAUTHORIZED ACCESS TO OR MISAPPROPRIATION OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION OR PRIVATE COMMUNICATIONS BY THIRD PARTIES.
2.3. Jurisdictional Limitations:
SOME STATES OR OTHER JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF IMPLIED WARRANTIES, SO THE ABOVE EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU. IN JURISDICTIONS WHICH DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OF IMPLIED WARRANTIES, ANY IMPLIED WARRANTIES ARE LIMITED IN DURATION TO NINETY (90) DAYS FROM THE DATE OF DELIVERY OF THE SOFTWARE OR TO THE MINIMUM PRESCRIBED BY LAW. YOU MAY ALSO HAVE OTHER RIGHTS THAT VARY FROM STATE TO STATE AND JURISDICTION TO JURISDICTION.
2.4. Survival of Disclaimer:
The provisions of this Section 2 and of Section 3 shall survive the termination of this EULA, but this shall not imply or create any continued right to use the Software after termination of this EULA.
3. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
3.1. Limitation of Liability:
IN NO EVENT AND UNDER NO CIRCUMSTANCES SHALL UPWORK, OUR LICENSORS OR OUR THIRD-PARTY SERVICE PROVIDERS BE LIABLE TO ANY USER ON ACCOUNT OF THAT USER’S USE OR MISUSE OF THE SOFTWARE. SUCH LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY TO PREVENT RECOVERY OF INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, CONSEQUENTIAL, SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY AND PUNITIVE DAMAGES, WHETHER SUCH CLAIM IS BASED ON WARRANTY, CONTRACT, TORT (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE) OR OTHERWISE (EVEN IF UPWORK HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES). SUCH LIMITATION OF LIABILITY SHALL APPLY WHETHER THE DAMAGES ARISE FROM USE OR MISUSE OF AND RELIANCE ON THE SOFTWARE, FROM THE PERFORMANCE OR MISPERFORMANCE OF THE SOFTWARE, FROM INABILITY TO USE THE SOFTWARE, OR FROM THE INTERRUPTION, SUSPENSION OR TERMINATION OF THE SOFTWARE (INCLUDING SUCH DAMAGES INCURRED BY THIRD PARTIES). SUCH LIMITATION SHALL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING A FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY AND TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY LAW. SOME STATES OR OTHER JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW THE EXCLUSION OR LIMITATION OF LIABILITY FOR INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO THE ABOVE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY TO YOU.
3.2. Damages Cap:
EXCEPT AS LIMITED BY APPLICABLE LAW, REGARDLESS OF THE BASIS FOR YOUR CLAIM, UPWORK’S, LICENSORS’ AND THIRD PARTY PROVIDERS’ TOTAL LIABILITY UNDER THIS EULA SHALL BE LIMITED TO DIRECT DAMAGES WHICH SHALL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF FEES PAID FOR THE LICENSED SOFTWARE GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM, OR ONE U.S. DOLLAR ($1.00), WHICHEVER IS LESS. THESE LIMITATIONS SHALL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING THE FAILURE OF THE ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY. THE FOREGOING PROVISIONS SHALL CONSTITUTE THE SOLE AND EXCLUSIVE REMEDY FOR MONETARY DAMAGES IN RESPECT OF ANY BREACH OF OR DEFAULT UNDER THIS AGREEMENT BY UPWORK.
4. INDEMNIFICATION
To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, you agree to indemnify and hold harmless Upwork and its subsidiaries, affiliates, joint ventures, suppliers, officers, directors, shareholders, employees and agents, from any claim or demand made by any third party due to or arising directly or indirectly out of your conduct or in connection with your use of the Software or its features, any alleged violation of these terms, or any alleged violation of any applicable law or regulation. Upwork reserves the right, at its own expense, to assume the exclusive defense and control of any matter otherwise subject to indemnification by You, but doing so shall not excuse your indemnity obligations.
5. PRIVACY AND SECURITY
The Software creates a means for others to record the visual output (“Screenshot”) of your computer. You hereby acknowledge and agree that each time you activate the Software, the Software may periodically transmit Screenshots to Upwork. These Screenshots may be displayed in the Upwork work diary when the Screenshot is captured. These Screenshots may include, without limitation, the visual output of all open programs, windows, backgrounds, taskbars, system trays, multiple screens, title bars, menus, graphics, screen savers, and any information, images, and text therein. You acknowledge and agree that, if your confidential information is displayed as visual output of your computer while the Software is active, such confidential information may be included in a Screenshot, transmitted to Upwork, and displayed in the applicable work diary. In order to prevent transmission of your confidential information to Upwork, you agree not to access your confidential information while the Software is active. Although we have taken reasonable measures to prevent unauthorized persons from gaining access to your computer via the Software, we cannot foresee or control the actions of third parties. Therefore, use of the Software could make you vulnerable to security breaches that you might not otherwise face and could result in the loss of your privacy or property. You agree that Upwork is not liable to you for security breaches resulting from your use of the Software or otherwise.
6. NO NOTICE OF UPDATES.
Upwork reserves the right to modify or change this EULA from time to time without notice to You. The latest version will be available on the Site. Upwork also may update or modify the Software from time to time at its discretion. Your election to continue use of the Software, after the date of posting of these modifications to the EULA or to the Software constitutes acceptance of those modifications. If you do not agree with the modifications, do not use the Software.
7. EXPORT CONTROLS.
You are responsible for complying with trade regulations and both foreign and domestic laws. You acknowledge that the Software or its underlying technology may not be downloaded to or exported or re-exported: (a) into (or to a resident or national of) Cuba, Iraq, Iran, Libya, North Korea, Syria or any other country subject to United States embargo; (b) to anyone on the U.S. Treasury Department’s list of Specially Designated Nationals or on the U.S. Commerce Department’s Denied Party or Entity List; and (c) you will not export or re-export the Software to any prohibited country, person, end-user or entity specified by U.S. Export Laws.
8. TERM AND TERMINATION:
8.1. Termination:
This EULA is effective as soon as you install, use, copy or distribute the Software and shall continue until it is terminated by Upwork or you, as provided for under the terms of this Section. Unless otherwise agreed to in writing with us, either you or we may terminate the contractual agreement represented by this EULA at any time upon notice to the other party. This EULA, including without limitation your right to the Software as specified in Section 1, terminates immediately and without notice from Upwork if you fail to comply with any of its provisions. Upon termination you shall immediately discontinue use of and destroy the Software and all copies or portions thereof, including any master copy, and within ten (10) days certify in writing to Upwork that all copies have been destroyed.
8.2. Survival of Termination:
Sections 1.3, 2, 3, 4, 7, 8.2 and 9 of these terms will survive any termination of this EULA. The termination of this EULA does not limit Upwork’s other rights it may have by law.
9. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS.
9.1. Severance. Waiver:
If for any reason a court of competent jurisdiction finds any provision or portion of this EULA to be unenforceable, it shall be enforced to the maximum extent permissible, and the remaining provisions shall remain in full force.
9.2. Audit.
You agree that, on Upwork’s request, you will certify in writing your compliance with the terms of this EULA.
9.3. Assignment.
You may not assign this EULA or sublicense, assign, transfer or delegate any right or duty hereunder, without the prior written consent of Upwork, at our sole discretion. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Upwork may assign or transfer this EULA or any rights granted hereunder without your prior consent. This EULA is binding on and will inure to the benefit of the parties successors and permitted assigns.
9.4. Entire Agreement.
This EULA and the terms expressly incorporated by reference herein, constitute the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersede and replace all prior or contemporaneous understandings or agreements, written or oral, regarding such subject matter.
Effective November 1st 2018
Download
Table of Contents
If a Client signs up to use Upwork Payroll, this Upwork Payroll Agreement (this
“Agreement”
) applies to Client. Your use of the Site after the effective date will signify your acceptance of and agreement to this Agreement. Please refer to the
Terms of Service
for the complete terms governing your usage of the Site and Site Services. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement have the meanings in the Terms of Services.
This Agreement is a binding legal agreement by and between Client (
“Client”
and
“you”
) and Upwork Global Inc. (
“Upwork”
or
“we”
) and supersedes and replaces all prior agreements between Client and Upwork concerning Upwork Payroll.
1. UPWORK PAYROLL STAFFING PROVIDER
When a Client uses Upwork Payroll, which is described on the Site
here
(
“Upwork Payroll”
), a third-party staffing vendor will employ the Freelancer (the
“Staffing Provider”
). Freelancer (if accepted for employment as described below) will become an employee of the Staffing Provider. The Staffing Provider will assign Freelancer to work for Client, and Client will be responsible for supervising Freelancer. When, and only if, a Freelancer has been accepted for employment by the Staffing Provider and assigned to Client, Freelancer becomes a
“Payroll Employee”
for purposes of this Agreement, but also remains a Freelancer under the Terms of Service.
Your ability to use Upwork Payroll may depend on certain factors, including, without limitation, the location of the Freelancer, the estimated length of the engagement, the wage to be paid, and the nature of the work to be performed. A request to use Upwork Payroll may be rejected for any lawful reason.
2. INTERNATIONAL PAYROLL SERVICES
Upwork Payroll is currently only available for Freelancers who will work in the United States. Requests regarding international employment and associated fees can be addressed on a case-by-case basis by contacting upworkpayroll@upwork.com.
3. HIRING PROCESS
As a Client, you will select a Freelancer to be employed by the Staffing Provider and assigned to work for you via Upwork Payroll. No work can begin until the engagement is active on the Upwork Site, and Client is informed that the Freelancer has started employment and may begin work. After Freelancer’s employment begins, Client will continue to pay for each Freelancer’s services through the Site unless Client pays the Opt-Out Fee.
4. HIRING DECISIONS; LIMITATIONS ON HIRING
Client acknowledges and agrees that Client selects a Freelancer to become a Payroll Employee based upon Client’s determination that Freelancer possesses the skills, background, and education to satisfy the requirements of the assignment. Upwork does not (a) select the Freelancer; (b) have the authority or ability to decide to engage or end the engagement of the Freelancer on behalf of Client; (c) make any independent evaluation or investigation or otherwise conduct any due diligence regarding Freelancers, their resumes, qualifications, skills, background, or prior experience; or (d) make any representations or warranties as to the skills, experience, background, or education of any Freelancer or Payroll Employee. All information regarding a Payroll Employee posted on or to the Site or provided by Upwork is intended to be indicative or illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty on the part of Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and shall have no liability for Client’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer information posted or provided by Upwork.
The Staffing Provider has the right not to hire a Freelancer for any lawful reason or no reason at all, including if the Freelancer does not meet the Staffing Provider’s standards for employment or the job is considered, in the Staffing Provider’s sole discretion, too hazardous or not covered by the applicable workers’ compensation insurance policy. No Payroll Employee may be engaged to perform services that require the Payroll Employee to handle hazardous materials or operate heavy machinery.
5. DISCLAIMER OF LIABILITY FOR UPWORK
Client acknowledges and agrees that Client and Freelancer are solely responsible for Freelancer Services and for all work performed and Work Product. Upwork provides no express warranty of, will have no implied warranty of, and will have no responsibility for, the Staffing Provider’s services, Freelancer Services and/or Work Product. Upwork expressly disclaims all express and implied warranties for Freelancer Services and/or Work Product, including, without limitation, warranties of non-infringement, merchantability, and fitness for a particular purpose. As between Upwork and Client, Freelancer Services, Work Product, and deliverables are provided AS IS.
6. UPWORK PAYROLL SERVICES
The following are the services provided by the Staffing Provider for Payroll Employees assigned to Client: (a) calculation and payment of wages (including any applicable overtime wages) based upon submitted timesheets; (b) collection, payment, and reporting of all required taxes on such wages; (c) unemployment insurance and workers’ compensation coverage; (d) administration of legally required benefits, including health insurance, disability insurance, paid sick leave, paid vacation, severance, notice or termination costs, retirement benefits or other welfare or pension benefits; and (e) administration of legally required leaves of absence, wage garnishments, and unemployment claims.
7. WORK ENVIRONMENT
Client acknowledges and agrees that neither Upwork nor the Staffing Provider will control the work environment in which a Payroll Employee will perform services for Client. Client will be solely responsible for ensuring that the work environment is safe and free from harassment and discrimination as required by applicable law.
8. PAYROLL EMPLOYEE SUPERVISION AND LIMITATIONS ON SCOPE OF EMPLOYMENT
Client will be solely responsible for protecting its property, including by implementing and enforcing any agreements, policies or procedures to protect Client’s intellectual property and confidential information.
If Client assigns a Payroll Employee any supervisory duties or gives a Payroll Employee authority to sign tax returns, render accounting or legal opinions, issue negotiable instruments, or make final decisions of the nature of those generally made by Client’s executives, officers, or directors, Client agrees that Client and Freelancer are solely responsible for any such decisions or actions by the Payroll Employee.
Client will inform Staffing Provider through Upwork (at
upworkpayroll@upwork.com
) if any Payroll Employee supervises other Client employees or Payroll Employees or will handle hazardous materials or operate heavy machinery.
If a Payroll Employee is required to possess or maintain any license or be supervised by a supervisor with a special license, Client will be responsible for verifying such license and/or providing such supervision.
Client acknowledges and agrees that Payroll Employees are not employees of Upwork and that Upwork does not supervise or control Payroll Employees. Client further acknowledges and agrees that (a) Upwork does not have the power or ability to require a Freelancer to start or stop work; (b) Upwork does not determine or control any term or condition of Freelancer’s employment (including, but not limited to, pay, work hours, work schedules, work locations, performance evaluations, discipline, and termination); (c) Upwork merely provides the platform for Client to assign work to Freelancer and separately facilitates the relationship between Staffing Provider and Freelancer; and (d) Upwork is not an employer or joint employer of the Freelancer.
9. COMPLIANCE WITH LEGAL REQUIREMENTS
With respect to all Payroll Employees, Client will comply with all applicable legal requirements, including without limitation all laws prohibiting discrimination, harassment, and retaliation and all laws concerning meal and rest breaks, expense reimbursements, leave, and safety. Client will also comply with all reasonable directives by the Staffing Provider regarding the Payroll Employee.
Client will immediately inform Staffing Provider through Upwork (at
upworkpayroll@upwork.com
) of (a) any complaint by or against a Payroll Employee of harassment, discrimination, retaliation or unlawful activity; or (b) any request by a Payroll Employee for a leave of absence or disability accommodation or any awareness by Client of a potential disability or need for leave or accommodation. Client will cooperate with Staffing Provider to complete a prompt and thorough investigation of any complaint or to provide any leave or accommodation required by law.
All Payroll Employees must be paid on an hourly, non-exempt basis unless the Staffing Provider explicitly approves an exempt determination. If the Staffing Provider approves an exempt determination, the Client is solely responsible for ensuring the determination remains appropriate. Client agrees never to request, encourage, or require Payroll Employees to work off the clock or without reporting time to the Staffing Provider. Client will not prohibit or discourage any Payroll Employee from taking any meal or rest break authorized by law and/or by the Staffing Provider.
10. PAYING PAYROLL EMPLOYEES
10.1 General Payment Obligations
Your payments for Upwork Payroll are governed by the terms below, as well as the
Hourly and Miscellaneous Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
.
You recognize and agree that all hours recorded and submitted to the Staffing Provider by your Payroll Employees will automatically be deemed approved by you, and you authorize those hours to be paid by you. In addition, Payroll Employees do not pay any Service Fees to Upwork. Instead, the Client pays the fees, as described below. Client also understands and agrees that Client is responsible for covering the cost of all Payroll Employee wages, even if, for example, a Payroll Employee reports having worked more than the number of hours authorized by Client.
10.2 Client Bill Rate; Payroll Employee Pay Rate
The total amount the Client pays is the
“Bill Rate”
, which includes the Payroll Employee’s hourly rate or salary amount (the
“Pay Rate”
) as well as Upwork fees. The Client will pay Upwork’s service fees for the use of the platform and the use of Upwork Payroll (collectively, the
“
Payroll Service Fees
”
). The Payroll Service Fees are 23% of the Bill Rate. For example, if the Client Bill Rate is $25.00 per hour, the Payroll Employee’s Pay Rate would be $19.25. All fees are paid by the Client, and there are no Upwork fees paid by Freelancers for engagements using Upwork Payroll.
To use Upwork Payroll, Client acknowledges and agrees that the Pay Rate on Upwork must be at least the minimum wage in the location where the Payroll Employee works.
In addition to the Bill Rate, Client acknowledges and agrees that it will be responsible for any additional costs required under applicable law. These additional costs vary based on the location of the Payroll Employee and include overtime premiums, expense reimbursements, sick leave, vacation, severance, notice or termination costs, health insurance (including costs under the Affordable Care Act), and other similar benefits (collectively,
“Additional Costs”
). For more information on these Additional Costs, please email
upworkpayroll@upwork.com
.
10.3 Funding and Making Payments
Client’s payments of amounts for wages, expense reimbursements, miscellaneous invoices, and bonuses are governed by the
Hourly, Bonus and Expense Payment Agreement with Escrow Instructions
.
The workweek begins at 00:00 midnight UTC on Monday and ends at 23:59 UTC on Sunday. The workday begins at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends at 23:59 UTC. The Bill Rate (for employees who are paid by salary) or the Bill Rate multiplied by the number of hours worked for the previous workweek, including any overtime premium pay (for employees paid by the hour) will be charged to Client’s Payment Method on the Monday following the end of the workweek or at such other time as communicated by Upwork or Staffing Provider in writing. Additional Costs will be charged to Client’s Payment Method after Client is provided notice of the Additional Costs. Bonuses and expense reimbursements will be charged to Client’s Payment Method after they are approved by Client.
11. REQUIRED NOTIFICATIONS
Client can provide notices required under this Agreement to
upworkpayroll@upwork.com
.
Client will provide written notice within 24 hours of its own receipt of any notice of a work-related accident or injury, and within three days of its receipt of any notice of any garnishment orders, involuntary deduction orders, notices of IRS liens, and other forms of legal process affecting the payment of wages to a Payroll Employee.
Client will provide written notice within three days of any changes to the job description or work hours of a Payroll Employee, including any change from part-time to full-time status.
Client will provide written notice of the termination of a Payroll Employee’s assignment (whether initiated by Client or the Payroll Employee) by providing notice of the termination, including the Payroll Employee name, Client, and termination date to
upworkpayroll@upwork.com
either (a) at least three business days before the Payroll Employee’s last day of employment; (b) immediately if employee quits without notice; or (c) such longer time as may be required to provide the Payroll Employee with adequate notice of termination under the law where the Payroll Employee resides or is legally organized. Failure to timely provide notice may result in additional obligations to the Payroll Employee under applicable law, and Client agrees to pay any such costs.
Client also will provide Upwork notice, as provided above, if a Payroll Employee performs no work for Client for more than 10 consecutive Business Days due to any reason other than planned time off or legally required leave (which includes, without limitation, legally required medical or family leave).
12. INDEMNIFICATION
In addition to the indemnification obligations set forth in the
User Agreement
, Client agrees to (a) release, indemnify, hold harmless, protect, and defend Upwork and its respective partners, employees, directors, officers, agents, affiliates, and subsidiaries (each an
“Indemnified Party”
) from and against any and all claims by any person or entity, including a Freelancer or Payroll Employee; and (b) reimburse any Indemnified Party for any claims, expenses, costs (including attorneys’ fees and court costs), obligations, losses, and damages (whether joint or several and including special, consequential, compensatory, or punitive damages), whether arising in contract, tort, or otherwise, related to: (i) actual or alleged acts, errors, or omissions (including, but not limited to, breaches of contract or violations of statutes, laws, rules, or regulations) by Client, its employees (including Payroll Employee(s)), partners, agents, affiliates, members, subsidiaries, representatives, and officers; (ii) any breach of or failure to perform under this Agreement, including, but not limited to, Client’s failure to accurately or timely report wages, hours, expenses, and other reimbursements owed a Payroll Employee or payment of taxes for which Client is responsible; (iii) any alleged failure to properly classify one or more Payroll Employees as exempt from overtime; (iv) actual or alleged errors in any timesheet(s) provided to Upwork and/or the Staffing Provider; (v) Client’s failure to pay a timesheet properly submitted for payment by Payroll Employee; (vi) the actual or alleged failure of Client to comply in any respect with any workplace law or law related to the employment of persons, including, but not limited to, any location’s laws with respect to the payment of wages or the treatment of employees, and including, without limitation, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Occupational Safety and Health Act, the Americans With Disabilities Act, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the Older Workers Benefit Protection Act, the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, and Title VII of the 1964 Civil Rights Act (collectively,
“Employment Laws and Regulations”
), or (vii) the actual or alleged failure of Upwork or the Staffing Provider to comply in any respect with the Employment Laws and Regulations based in whole or in part (A) on any instruction(s), act(s), or failure(s) to act of Client; or (B) on any incorrect, misleading, or false information provided by Client to Upwork or the Staffing Provider. This indemnification provision will survive the expiration or other termination of this Agreement or Client’s relationship with Upwork.
13. CHANGE OF STAFFING PROVIDER
Upwork may enter into a contract with a new provider or multiple providers to act as the employer of Payroll Employees (
“New Company”
) and may end or change contracts with existing providers. If requested as a result of such changes, Client will cooperate with such New Company in every reasonable manner to ensure uninterrupted performance of Upwork Payroll.
14. TERMINATION OF UPWORK PAYROLL
Without limiting Upwork’s ability to terminate services provided to Client under other Terms of Service, Upwork may terminate Upwork Payroll at any time after providing Client with notice of such termination at least 30 days in advance of the final day Upwork Payroll will be offered (the
“Termination Date”
). The Staffing Provider will have the obligation for wages and benefits accrued to Payroll Employees through and including the Termination Date, at which point such duties will cease. Additionally, all obligations of the Staffing Provider to maintain workers’ compensation insurance coverage and/or health care coverage on behalf of Payroll Employees will cease on the Termination Date.
Client, or another third party designated by Client in Client’s sole discretion and only if it elects to designate a third party, as the case may be, will immediately assume all federal, state, and local obligations of an employer to the Payroll Employees and will immediately assume full responsibility for providing payroll services and workers’ compensation coverage. Client will inform Payroll Employees that they are no longer covered by the Staffing Provider’s workers’ compensation and/or health care policies.
Upon the Termination Date, Upwork will immediately be released from such obligations as are permitted by law, but Upwork and the Staffing Provider will not be relieved of any such obligations that accrued or occurred prior to the Termination Date.
15. GENERAL PROVISIONS
15.1 Governing Law
This Agreement and any Claim or action related thereto will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to its conflict of law provisions and excluding the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods (CISG). Clients located in the United States and its territories agree that any Claim between Client and Upwork must be resolved as described in the subsections of the User Agreement titled
“Informal Dispute Resolution”
and
“Mandatory Binding Arbitration and Class Action/Jury Trial Waiver.”
15.2 Severability
If any provision of this Agreement is, for any reason, held to be invalid or unenforceable, the other provisions of this Agreement will be unimpaired, and the invalid or unenforceable provision will be deemed modified so that it is valid and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law.
15.3 No Assignment
This Agreement, and the parties’ rights and obligations herein, may not be assigned, subcontracted, delegated, or otherwise transferred by a party without the other party’s prior written consent, and any attempted assignment, subcontract, delegation, or transfer in violation of the foregoing will be null and void.
15.4 Waiver
Any waiver or failure to enforce any provision of this Agreement on one occasion will not be deemed a waiver of any other provision or of such provision on any other occasion.
15.5 Execution and Delivery; Binding Effect
The parties will evidence execution and delivery of this Agreement with the intention of becoming legally bound, by accepting the Terms of Service on the Site.
16. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions, or need assistance, please contact
upworkpayroll@upwork.com
.
Effective December 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Upwork is committed to providing an accessible experience to our customers and the public, regardless of background, nationality, race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status, or other similarly protected characteristics. This Upwork Digital Accessibility Statement concerns our commitment to providing access to persons with disabilities.  Please also see our
Nondiscrimination Statement
.
Please contact our Accessibility Coordinator at
accessibilitycoordinator@upwork.com
or send a letter addressed to: Attn: Accessibility Coordinator, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998
,
USA, to learn more about accessibility support services at Upwork.
Reasonable Accommodations
Individuals who need a reasonable accommodation to access Upwork’s services and information should send an email to accessibilitycoordinator@upwork.com or send a letter addressed to: Attn: Accessibility Coordinator, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998, USA to provide information about the nature of the requested accommodation. Requesters must include contact information such as an email address or telephone number at which they can be reached. Depending on the nature of the request, Upwork may need sufficient notice to provide a reasonable accommodation.
Online Accessibility
Upwork strives to provide an accessible digital experience for our users.
The
Web Content Accessibility Guidelines (WCAG)
defines requirements for website providers to improve online accessibility for people with disabilities. Upwork has voluntarily undertaken efforts to comply with, and in some cases exceed, Level AA of the latest version of WCAG guidelines, and employs formal accessibility quality assurance methods to ensure accessibility of Upwork’s digital platform.
Our efforts to improve online accessibility are ongoing. In the event that a user with a disability experiences accessibility issues with our website or mobile application, please notify us by sending an email to
accessibilitycoordinator@upwork.com
or sending a letter addressed to: Attn: Accessibility Coordinator, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998, USA. In your communication to us, please specify the nature of the accessibility difficulty, including the web address or mobile application that may have presented an accessibility challenge.
Third-Party Websites and Elements
Upwork's website may contain sections or links to webpages that are hosted or controlled/powered by third parties, or engage third party plugins or services. WCAG compliance for these sections will be controlled by these third party providers, not by Upwork. Upwork does not make representations with regard to the accessibility of third-party websites and may not be able to remediate accessibility barriers on such websites. However, Upwork continually works to identify and adopt more accessible alternatives to such sections and sites wherever feasible.
Feedback
We are always working to ensure that our products and services are accessible to all users, visitors and the public, including individuals with disabilities. If you have an idea or question about accessibility support services at Upwork, please contact our accessibility coordinator by sending an email to
accessibilitycoordinator@upwork.com
or sending a letter addressed to: Attn: Accessibility Coordinator, 3490 S 4400 W #70008 West Valley City, UT 84120-9998, USA.
Effective September 22nd 2020
Download
Table of Contents
Upwork’s mission is to create economic opportunities so people have better lives. Key to our mission is that these opportunities should be equally available to all qualified talent in our community, regardless of background, nationality, race, ethnicity, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, actual or perceived disability status, veteran status, marital status, or other similarly protected characteristics. Upwork’s goal is for members of our community to feel welcome on the Site. A condition of using the Site is your agreement not to engage in any unlawful discrimination or harassing conduct. Such conduct is not permitted on Upwork by any member of our community. Upwork does not require Users to violate local laws or take actions that may subject them to legal liability. Upwork will take actions to enforce this policy. Users engaging in this activity are subject to Account closure. Please bring any reports of discrimination or harassment to our attention at legalnotices@upwork.com.
Effective July 26th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
MASTER SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT - STANDARD
This Master Subscription Agreement governs each Order Form (collectively, the “
Agreement
”) entered into by Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) and the subscriber identified in the Order Form (“
Subscriber
”). Any term used in this Master Subscription Agreement that is defined in the Order Form and is not otherwise defined herein will have the meaning ascribed to it in the Order Form. The parties hereby agree:
DEFINITIONS
. The following terms will have the meanings ascribed to them below when used in this Agreement:
1.1 “
Affiliate
” means an entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable), whereby “control” (including, with correlative meaning, the terms “controlled by” and “under common control”) means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable).
1.2 “
Authorized Recipients
” means employees and representatives of the party receiving Confidential Information that have a bona fide need to receive such Confidential Information.
1.3 “
Authorized Users
” means Subscriber’s representatives who are permitted to access and use the Platform on Subscriber’s behalf.
1.4 “
BYO Freelancer
” means a Freelancer that Subscriber brings to the Platform that is not already a registered freelancer on the Platform.
1.5 “
BYO Service Fee
” means the fee specified in the Order Form that is payable by Subscriber to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a BYO Freelancer.
1.6 “
Claims
” means any and all third-party claims, suits or proceedings, including without limitation claims or actions by applicable government agencies. For the purposes of Upwork’s indemnities owed to Subscriber in Section 8.2, the term “Claims” excludes Excluded Claims.
1.7 “
Confidential Information
” means any information or materials (regardless of form or manner of disclosure) that are disclosed by or on behalf of one party to the other party that (i) are marked, flagged, or communicated as being “confidential” or “proprietary” at the time of such disclosure; (ii) the disclosing party orally discloses to the receiving party and identifies as being confidential or proprietary at the time of disclosure and confirms to be such in writing promptly after such disclosure; or (iii) a reasonable person should know to be confidential, even if not so marked. The term “Confidential Information” does not include any information or materials that: (a) are or become generally known or available to the public through no breach of this Agreement or other wrongful act or omission by the receiving party; (b) were already known by the receiving party; (c) are acquired by the receiving party without restriction from a third party who has the right to make such disclosure; or (d) are independently developed by or on behalf of the receiving party without reference to any Confidential Information.
1.8 “
Custom Compliance Costs
” means all third-party costs incurred by Upwork, its Affiliates, or Employment Provider for any custom onboarding requirements or other compliance or screening measures required by Subscriber (subject to Upwork or Employment Provider consent, as applicable) or applicable law.
1.9 “
Effective Date
”
means the later of either the “Contract Start Date” listed on the first Order Form signed by the parties or the date that the first Order Form is fully executed by the parties.
1.10 “
Employment Provider
” means Upwork’s third-party employment provider(s) that employ Freelancers classified as employees in conjunction with Employment Provider Services.
1.11 “
Employment Provider Fee
” means the fee specified in the Order Form (as “Upwork Payroll Fee”) charged by Upwork to Subscriber for the provisioning of Employment Provider Services in connection with an Engagement in the United States.
1.12 “
Employment Provider Services
”
means the Service provided by Upwork whereby Employment Provider will handle certain administrative and legal requirements relating to the hiring of the Freelancer, including offering, tracking, and paying Freelancers legally-required sick leave, employment agreements, policies and notices, wage payment, payroll taxes, workers’ compensation, unemployment insurance, and the Affordable Care Act (ACA), if applicable, in addition to any other benefits required by law. For the avoidance of doubt, Employment Provider Services are also marketed as the Upwork Payroll Solution.
1.13 “
Employment-Related Costs
” means any additional employment-related costs, if applicable, for items Subscriber requires or that are required by law, including overtime, premium pay, paid sick leave, paid vacation, severance, notice or termination costs, jurisdictional costs, and other similar benefits.
1.14 “
Engagement
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product that a Freelancer provides to a Subscriber.
1.15 “
Enterprise Billing Services
” means Upwork’s Service of issuing Freelancer Payments on Subscriber’s behalf as due for each Engagement and then billing Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments as further described in Section 3.1 (Enterprise Billing Services).
1.16
“
Excluded Claims
” means claims to the extent arising from (i) Subscriber’s direct engagement of a Freelancer before, after or outside of an Engagement under this Agreement, (ii) Subscriber’s breach of this Agreement, or (iii) inaccurate information provided by Subscriber (including Subscriber’s failure to timely update such information).
1.17
“Freelancer”
means a user that advertises and provides services via the Platform. Freelancers collectively refers to all BYO Freelancers and Platform Freelancers, regardless of their classification.
1.18 “
Freelancer Information
” means any information regarding a Freelancer on the Platform.
1.19 “
Freelancer Payments
”
means all payments made by Upwork or Employment Provider on behalf of Subscriber to Freelancers in accordance with this Agreement, including, if applicable, expenses authorized by Subscriber or required by law. For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer Payments shall not include Subscriber-approved expense reimbursements which are pass-through expenses and not subject to a fee.
1.20 “
Freelancer Payments and Costs
” collectively means Freelancer Payments, Custom Compliance Costs and Employment-Related Costs.
1.21 “
Freelancer Services
” means the services that a Freelancer has agreed to perform for Subscriber, including Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.22 “
Freelancer Work Product
” means all work, work product, and deliverables created by a Freelancer for Subscriber based on Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.23 “
International Employment Provider Services Fee
” means the fee charged by Upwork to Subscriber for the provisioning of Employment Provider Services in connection with an international Engagement.
1.24  “
Order Form
” means the applicable enterprise order form executed by Subscriber and Upwork that references this Agreement.
1.25 “
Platform
”
means the website located at
www.upwork.com
, including any pages tailored to or viewable by a specific client thereon.
1.26 “
Platform Content
” means content (including text, images, video, audio, and other materials or information) that is submitted, uploaded, or posted to Upwork and the Platform for the purposes of such content being displayed on the Platform for the purpose of finding Freelancers. “Platform Content” does not include Freelancer Work Product or Subscriber’s Confidential Information.
1.27 “
Platform Freelancer
” means a Freelancer that is not a BYO Freelancer.
1.28 “
Program Management Services
” means Services available to Subscriber to help Subscriber use its account on the Platform, including without limitation, assistance determining Subscriber’s project needs, suggestion of certain talent and skills needed to complete Subscriber’s project, and helping Subscriber draft project posts, post projects, create Platform Content, prepare and offer contracts on the Platform to Freelancers, release payments, and close such contracts on behalf of Subscriber upon completion of the Engagement. Program Management Services do not include project management or oversight of the Freelancer, the Freelancer Services, or other aspects of the actual Engagement.
1.29
"Service Contract"
means the contractual provisions that govern each Engagement, including any independent contractor agreement, non-disclosure agreement, or other agreement between Subscriber and Freelancer in connection with the Engagement, and the provisioning of Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product, including the Engagement terms awarded and accepted on the Platform, applicable project descriptions and Freelancer rates, hours, and milestones, provided, however, that in each case, such terms will not, and will not purport to, expand Upwork’s obligations or restrict Upwork’s rights under this Agreement. In the event that Subscriber does not provide its own independent contractor agreement for an Engagement, Subscriber will have the ability to use the Platform’s optional service contract terms by default as a convenience.
1.30 “
Service Fee
” means the fee specified in the Order Form that is payable by Subscriber to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a Platform Freelancer.
1.31 “
Services
”
means Upwork’s products and services that are provided to Subscriber in connection with this Agreement, and as further set forth on the Order Form, and any Technology provided by Upwork in connection with the operation or provision of such products and services, including provisioning access to the Platform. The “Services” are separate from and do not include Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product.
1.32 “
Subscription Fee
” means the subscription fee specified in the Order Form that Subscriber pays for its access to the Services described herein.
1.33 “
Talent Sourcing Services
” means Services available to Subscriber related to talent sourcing, which may include helping generate interest in Subscriber’s project posts from Freelancers and the provision of a short list of Freelancers advertising the skills that Subscriber seeks.
1.34 “
Taxes
” means all taxes, levies, imposts, duties, and similar governmental assessments arising in connection with this Agreement, including but not limited to sales, use, VAT, GST, excise, service, business, service, and similar transactional taxes imposed by any jurisdiction, and the interest and penalties for non-compliance by Subscriber. The term “Taxes” does not include taxes levied on Upwork’s own income and property.
1.35 “
Technology
” means all ideas, concepts, inventions, systems, platforms, software, interfaces, tools, utilities, templates, forms, documentation, content, training materials, techniques, methods, processes, algorithms, know-how, trade secrets, and other technologies, implementations, and information.
1.36 “
UTC
”
means Universal Time Coordinated.
PLATFORM AND SERVICES.
2.1
Platform Access
. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Upwork (i) shall use commercially reasonable efforts to make the Platform available to Subscriber and (ii) hereby grants to Subscriber and its Authorized Users to the right to access and use the Platform to (a) find, communicate with, and engage Freelancers through the Platform, (b) receive, review, and approve Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product, and (c) review Freelancer billing records for payment by Upwork or the Employment Provider on behalf of Subscriber. Subscriber acknowledges that Upwork’s implementation of Subscriber’s Platform account requires Subscriber’s reasonable cooperation and agrees to promptly provide the information and documentation required by Upwork for such implementation. During the Term, Upwork may modify the features and functionality of the Platform provided the modifications do not materially degrade the Services. Subscriber is responsible for its Authorized Users’ use of the Platform and compliance with this Agreement and agrees to be directly responsible for all costs and fees incurred by such Authorized User. Subscriber shall take reasonable steps to prevent unauthorized access to the Platform, including without limitation by protecting and instructing Authorized Users to protect passwords and login information. Subscriber shall promptly notify Upwork if it becomes aware of any unauthorized use of the Platform and will reasonably cooperate with Upwork to remediate such breaches.
2.1.1
Affiliate Order Form
.
Subscriber’s Affiliates are permitted to contract for Services and to use the Platform pursuant to the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement by either (i) directly entering into a separate Order Form with Upwork, which will be governed under the same terms of this Master Subscription Agreement (an “
Affiliate Order Form
”) or (ii) if authorized by Subscriber, using the Platform as an Authorized User under Subscriber’s existing account. By entering into an Affiliate Order Form directly with Upwork under romanette (i), (a) Subscriber’s Affiliate will receive its own separate Platform account and agrees to be bound by the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement as if a direct party hereto and all applicable terms that apply to “Subscriber” in this Master Subscription Agreement will be deemed to apply to the Affiliate for the purposes of its use of the Platform and Services, and (b) in the event that this Agreement terminates or expires with respect to Subscriber, the terms of this Agreement will remain in effect for the Affiliate until the sooner occurrence of either the expiration or termination of the Affiliate Order Form.
2.2
Program Management and Other Services
. At its discretion, Subscriber may request Upwork’s optional Program Management Services and/or Talent Sourcing Services. If Subscriber requests Program Management Services from Upwork, then Subscriber authorizes Upwork personnel to access Subscriber’s Upwork enterprise account and take actions on the Platform on behalf of Subscriber as directed by Subscriber. Any use by Subscriber of Program Management Services or Talent Sourcing Services will not alter, reduce or eliminate any Subscriber responsibilities under this Agreement, including without limitation worker classification. Subscriber agrees to enroll any Freelancer that should be classified as an employee or is subject to taxation under the UK tax legislation IR35 (“
IR35
”) in Employment Provider Services, and, unless otherwise instructed by Subscriber, any Service Contracts that Subscriber directs Upwork personnel to open in Subscriber’s enterprise account on behalf of Subscriber will be established as independent contractor relationships.
2.3
Freelancer Services
.
2.3.1
Freelancer Relationship.
If and after the Freelancer has agreed to provide Freelancer Services to Subscriber and has executed a Service Contract and any other necessary agreements that Subscriber may require, Subscriber and Freelancer will work directly together. Upwork will not supervise, control, or otherwise be responsible for the performance of the Freelancer Services by Freelancer. For the avoidance of doubt, Subscriber is responsible for the appropriate classification of each Freelancer, for determining whether any engagement is subject to taxation under IR35, and for providing any designation or notice required under IR35 to Upwork at
legalnotices@upwork.com
and/or the Freelancer. If there is a dispute between Subscriber and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Subscriber and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable to either Subscriber or Freelancer with respect to such dispute.
2.3.2
Hourly Work for Independent Contractors
. For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as independent contractors, Subscriber can dispute the Freelancer billing entries as described by this Section. The Freelancer invoice will cover the billing period that begins Mondays at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sundays at 23:59 UTC (the “
Weekly Billing Period
”). Following each Weekly Billing Period, Subscriber has from Monday at 12 noon UTC until Friday at 23:59 UTC to review the Freelancer’s billing records and file a dispute through the Platform if Subscriber disputes the hours billed by the Freelancer (the “
Subscriber Review Period
”). If Subscriber does not file a dispute during the Subscriber Review Period, then (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have approved the time billed and accepted the Freelancer Services during the time reflected on the Platform at the end of the Subscriber Review Period, and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on the Platform. Once approved by Subscriber, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Subscriber.
2.3.3
Hourly Work for Employees
.
For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as employees, the Employment Provider is legally required to pay a Freelancer for all time actually worked, and as such (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have automatically approved all hours worked at the time Freelancer submits their time sheet for the work, and (ii) pursuant to this approval, Employment Provider will make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on any weekly time sheet, including overtime payments.
2.3.4
Milestone Work
. For Engagements where Freelancer Payments are tied to completing milestones, Subscriber must approve or reject milestone approval requests through the Platform within 14 calendar days after such approval requests are submitted through the Platform. Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that in the event Subscriber fails to approve or reject a submitted milestone approval request within such 14 calendar day period, then (i) the Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product reflected in the milestone approval request will be deemed accepted by Subscriber, and any payment associated with the milestone will be deemed approved by Subscriber and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for such milestone. Once approved by Subscriber, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Subscriber.
2.3.5
Arbitration with Freelancer
. Subscriber shall enter into an agreement with each Freelancer for each Engagement that includes a provision requiring that any and all disputes between Subscriber and Freelancer will be subject to individual arbitration and include a waiver of all class and collective actions. In addition, the arbitration provision must expressly identify Upwork, including its affiliates, officers, and directors, as a third-party beneficiary of such arbitration provision.
2.4
Legal
Compliance
. Upwork and Employment Provider, as applicable, shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing their obligations under this Agreement pertaining to the payment to and Engagement of Freelancers, respectively. Subscriber shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing its use of the Platform and Services and Engagement of Freelancers (including workplace safety or conduct if Subscriber requires onsite work). Subscriber shall not interfere with or impede Employment Provider’s compliance with applicable laws for Freelancers engaged as employees (e.g., requiring or encouraging any Freelancer to work without recording time, discouraging or prohibiting Freelancers from taking any meal or rest periods authorized by law, etc.).
2.5
Restrictions
. Subscriber will not nor attempt to: (i) license, sublicense, sell, resell, distribute, transfer, assign, or otherwise commercially exploit or make available to any third party, the Platform or the Services, except as expressly permitted herein; (ii) modify or make derivative works based on the Services or otherwise violate Upwork’s intellectual property rights in the Services; (iii) reverse engineer or access the Platform, the Services or their systems or networks for any reason that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement, including, without limitation, in order to (a) build a competitive product or service, or for any benchmarking or competitive purposes using similar ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Service, or (b) scrape the Platform for data or content or copy any ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Services, or (c) interfere with the integrity or performance of the Services or data contained in it, including engaging in denial of service attacks; (iv) transmit information that identifies or relates to natural persons or confidential financial information through the Platform unless requested by Upwork; (v) submit or post Platform Content or other material to the Platform that (a) is fraudulent, discriminatory, abusive, spamming, infringing, obscene, threatening, defamatory, unlawful, tortious, or that Upwork in its reasonable discretion determines is inappropriate or objectionable; (b) violates the privacy rights, publicity rights, or intellectual property rights of any third party; or (c) contains viruses, worms, Trojan horses, spam, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs. Subscriber will not encourage any third party to violate these restrictions.
2.6
Upgrading/Downgrading
. If Subscriber requests to change its subscription to a different enterprise product, then, upon execution of the new subscription agreement, Subscriber authorizes and directs Upwork to migrate Freelancer contracts related to existing Engagements by opening a new Freelancer contract under the new subscription and then closing the old Freelancer contract under the old subscription.
FEES AND PAYMENTS.
3.1
Enterprise Billing Services
. Upwork will make, or cause to be made, Freelancer Payments and Costs on behalf of Subscriber in accordance with this Agreement. Upwork will bill Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments made by Upwork and all applicable fees and costs. Subscriber’s ability to use Enterprise Billing Services described in this Section is subject to Upwork’s approval of credit for Subscriber. Upwork may grant, deny, limit, extend, withdraw, increase or decrease credit to Subscriber at its sole discretion.
3.2
Billing and Payment
. Subscriber shall pay Upwork the fees as set forth in the Order Form, in addition to all Freelancer Payments and Costs, within the time period stated on the Order Form measured from the date of the invoice. Payment obligations are non-cancelable and non-refundable. Any late payments are subject to a charge equal to the lesser of 2% per month or the maximum permitted by law, plus reimbursement for collection expenses. All amounts specified in the Order Form are in U.S. dollars. All amounts hereunder will be invoiced in, and must be paid in, U.S. dollars. Upwork has the right to immediately suspend or terminate Subscriber’s account if Upwork does not receive payment from Subscriber by the due date in this Agreement.
3.3
Freelancer Service Fee
.
Upwork normally charges Freelancers a fee stated on the Platform. However, Upwork will not charge such fee to the Freelancer for any work the Freelancer performs for Subscriber as a BYO Freelancer or via Employment Provider Services.
3.4
Employment Provider
Services Fee
.
For Freelancers located in the United States and engaged using Employment Provider Services the Employment Provider Services Fee (identified as “Upwork Payroll Fee” in the Order Form) will apply. The International Employment Provider Services Fee, which varies by country, will apply for international Freelancer Engagements. For Freelancers located outside of the United States and engaged using Employment Provider Services, the International Employment Provider Services Fee and all ascertainable Employment-Related Costs will be quoted to Subscriber for approval prior to the Employment Provider hiring the relevant Freelancer as further detailed in Section 6.3 (Employment Provider Services).
3.5
Taxes
. All amounts payable to Upwork under this Agreement are exclusive of Taxes. Subscriber will be responsible for promptly paying or reimbursing, as the case might be, all Taxes arising in connection with this Agreement and all invoiced amounts shall be paid to Upwork in full, without any offset, deduction or withholding. If applicable for countries outside of the United States, Subscriber shall either (a) provide to Upwork its VAT or GST identification number(s) for the country where Subscriber (i) has established its business, and/or (ii) uses the Services for Subscriber’s business use, or (b) pay such Taxes via reverse charge mechanism to the appropriate tax authority. Upon request, Subscriber shall promptly provide Upwork with proof of Tax payments made to applicable authorities. If Subscriber provides a valid tax exemption certificate, Upwork will not charge Subscriber any Taxes from which it is exempt.
3.6
Purchase Order
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, if Subscriber requires a purchase order to issue payment under this Agreement and Upwork has not received a copy of such purchase order, Upwork reserves the right to suspend Subscriber’s access to the Platform until such purchase order has been received. If Subscriber requires a valid purchase order number to be attached to or entered in an invoice submission to Subscriber’s portal, but a valid purchase order has not been provided to Upwork in a timely manner, the net payment terms will be based on the date of the invoice generated by Upwork and not the date of invoice submission to Subscriber’s portal.
3.7
Non-Circumvention
. If Subscriber engages (or directs a third party to engage) the services of a Platform Freelancer that Subscriber found on the Platform through a source other than Upwork within two years after the date that such Platform Freelancer is first engaged by Subscriber, then Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. If upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork finds a Freelancer that was not on the Platform and Subscriber engages that Freelancer through a source other than Upwork, Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. This provision does not apply to (i) BYO Freelancers or (ii) Freelancers responding independently (without direct solicitation) to Subscriber’s indirect solicitations (such as employment agency referrals and internet job postings).
TERM AND TERMINATION.
4.1
Term.
This Agreement will begin on the Effective Date and will continue for the duration of the initial term length specified in the Order Form (the “
Initial Term
”) unless sooner terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. Following the Initial Term, Subscriber’s Order Form subscription will automatically renew for successive one-year terms unless either party provides the other party notice of non-renewal at least 30 days before the end of the then-current Term (each a “
Renewal Term
”, all of which together with the Initial Term are referred to as the “
Term
”). The pricing during any Renewal Term will remain unchanged unless Upwork provides written notice of a price change at least 60 days before the end of the then-current Term.
4.2
Termination for Cause
. Either party may terminate this Agreement (i) if the other party fails to cure a material breach of this Agreement within 30 days after written notice, or (ii) immediately if the other party becomes subject to any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding under federal or state statute that is not dismissed within 30 days, becomes subject to direct control by a trustee, receiver or similar authority, or has wound up or liquidated, voluntarily, or otherwise.
4.3
Post-Termination Obligations
.  If Subscriber’s subscription to the Services or this Agreement ends early for any reason other than Subscriber’s termination of the Agreement for cause pursuant to Section 4.2 (Termination for Cause), then, in addition to other amounts Subscriber may owe Upwork, Subscriber will be responsible for paying any unpaid Subscription Fee associated with the remainder of the current Term.
4.4
Effect of Termination and Survival
. As of the date either party provides notice of termination to the other, Subscriber shall not enter into new Engagements via the Platform. For Engagements in a working status as of the termination date of this Agreement (each a “
Final Engagement
”), Enterprise Billing Services may continue until completion of the Final Engagement for up to a maximum of 30 days after the effective termination date of this Agreement at which point Upwork is directed to close all open Final Engagements, unless otherwise agreed by the parties and the affected Freelancer(s). Notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, Subscriber remains responsible for payment of all fees and payments owed to Upwork under this Agreement, including any Freelancer Payments and Costs. The sections and subsections titled “Fees and Payments”, “Effect of Termination and Survival”, “Intellectual Property”, “Representations, Warranties and Disclaimers”, “Confidentiality”, “Indemnification”, “Limitation of Liability”, “Miscellaneous” and all of Subscriber’s outstanding obligations, will survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
5.1
Ownership of the Platform and Services
. All rights in and to the Platform and Services, including any modifications made thereto and derivatives thereof, exclusively belong to and at all times will remain the sole and exclusive property of Upwork. All rights not expressly granted to Subscriber and its Authorized Users with respect to the Platform and Services are reserved by Upwork. Subscriber will not take or permit any third party to take any action with respect to the Platform or Services that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement or that is inconsistent with Upwork’s ownership interest herein.
5.2
Platform Content
. Subscriber is solely responsible for all Platform Content submitted, uploaded, or otherwise posted by it to the Platform. Upwork reserves the right to delete Platform Content (in whole or in part) that it reasonably determines may violate this Agreement. By providing Platform Content, Subscriber hereby grants (and represents and warrants that it has the right to grant) Upwork and its representatives the worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, and sublicensable right to use and publish the Platform Content without limitation.
5.3
User Feedback
. Upwork will own, without restriction or obligation of any kind, any feedback, insights, and suggestions provided by or on behalf of Subscriber to Upwork concerning the Platform or Services  (“
User Feedback
”). User Feedback is provided “AS IS” and Subscriber will not be identified as the source without Subscriber’s permission.
5.4
Ownership of Freelancer Work Product
. Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the Service Contract. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from an Engagement accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Subscriber.
REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND DISCLAIMERS.
6.1
Representations and Warranties
. Each party represents and warrants that: (i) it is an entity that is duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is established; (ii) it has full power and authority, and has obtained all required approvals, permissions and consents necessary, to enter into this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder; (iii) this Agreement is legally binding upon it and enforceable in accordance with its terms; and (iv) the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement does not and will not conflict with any agreement, instrument, judgment or understanding, oral or written, to which it is a party or by which it may be bound.
6.2
Subscriber Acknowledgements
.
Other than as stated in this Agreement, Subscriber expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Subscriber and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of project posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork is not a party to any Service Contract and will not have any liability or obligations under or related to Service Contracts for any acts or omissions by Freelancers; (iv) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (v) Upwork does not determine the suitability of Freelancers for Subscriber; (vi) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work, nor is Upwork involved in determining if the Freelancer fees will be set at an hourly or fixed rate for a Service Contract or what those rates will be; (vii) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (viii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (ix) if there is a dispute between Subscriber and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Subscriber and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute; (x) Upwork is not an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any independent contractor Freelancer or Subscriber; and (xi) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Engagement, independent contractor Freelancers may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at the Freelancer’s sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Platform; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Subscriber or Freelancer can or will actually complete an Engagement.
6.3
Employment Provider
Services
. If Subscriber requests Upwork to hire a Freelancer classified as an employee via Employment Provider Services, then Employment Provider will enter into an employment relationship with the applicable Freelancer that governs the provisioning of Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product. In addition to Subscriber’s responsibilities set forth in this Agreement, if Subscriber requests to use Upwork Payroll Services, thenSubscriber shall: (i) not request or allow the Freelancer to commence work until Subscriber receives notice from Upwork or its Employment Provider that employment paperwork has been completed and employment has started; (ii) absent exigent circumstances, (a) provide at least 72 hours’ advance notice (or longer, if required under applicable law) before terminating a worker’s employment assignment, or (b) immediately provide notice of any voluntary termination if Subscriber is aware of such voluntary termination; otherwise, Subscriber will be responsible for any penalties or costs for violating or complying with laws governing final paycheck requirements; and (iii) immediately inform Upwork of any request or need for a leave of absence or disability accommodation if Subscriber becomes aware of the request or need, and subsequently provide any legally protected accommodation or leave.
6.4
Freelancer Information
. Upwork does not independently evaluate, investigate, or otherwise conduct any due diligence regarding Freelancers’ profiles, portfolios, resumes, qualifications, skills, background, or prior experience. Accordingly, Upwork makes no representations as to the reliability, capability, background, identity or qualifications of any Freelancer. Freelancer Information posted on or to the Platform, is intended to be illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty by Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and will have no liability for Subscriber’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer Information, and Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that Subscriber will be solely responsible for undertaking the necessary research and due diligence to evaluate Freelancer Information.
6.5
Disclaimer
. EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 6.1 OF THIS AGREEMENT, UPWORK, ITS AFFILIATES, PARTNERS, AND SUBCONTRACTORS HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING THOSE OF ACCURACY, SYSTEM INTEGRATION, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, VALIDITY, NON-INFRINGEMENT, THOSE ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING OR USAGE OF TRADE WITH RESPECT THERETO, THOSE MADE BY A FREELANCER TO SUBSCRIBER OR RELATING TO ANY FREELANCER SERVICE OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT. THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND WITH ALL FAULTS. LIABILITY FOR FREELANCER’S WORK PRODUCT AND THE FREELANCER SERVICES ARE SOLELY THAT OF THE FREELANCER. NEITHER UPWORK NOR ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES OR SUBCONTRACTORS HAVE ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR FREELANCER SERVICES OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT.
CONFIDENTIALITY.
7.1
Obligations and Restrictions
. The receiving party will: (i) keep the disclosing party’s Confidential Information confidential; (ii) not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party other than an Authorized Recipient without the disclosing party’s prior written permission; (iii) exclusively use such Confidential Information for its intended purpose; and (iv) not remove any copyrights, trademark notices, or other indications of confidentiality from such Confidential Information. The receiving party may disclose Confidential Information to Authorized Recipients provided that each such Authorized Recipient is bound by confidentiality obligations that are at least as restrictive as the terms contained in this Agreement. The receiving party is responsible for its Authorized Recipients’ use and disclosure of Confidential Information and will take reasonable steps to ensure their compliance with this Agreement. Subscriber acknowledges that Freelancers working on their Engagements will have access to Confidential Information that is shared through the Platform with respect to such Engagements. Subscriber authorizes Upwork to collect data related to Subscriber’s use of the Services and Platform, to de-identify (with respect to Subscriber and any user) any such data, and to use and disclose any such data that is not identifiable to a specific person or to Subscriber.
7.2
Compelled Disclosure
. This Agreement does not prohibit a party from complying with (but only to the extent of) a valid legal requirement to disclose Confidential Information, but such party must make reasonable efforts to give the other party reasonable advance notice of such requirement. Subscriber and Upwork further acknowledge receipt of this notice under 18 U.S.C § 1833(b)(1) and that an individual will not be held criminally or civilly liable under any Federal or State trade secret law for disclosing a trade secret that (A) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney; and (ii) solely to report or investigate a suspected violation of law; or (B) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
7.3
Retention of Confidential Information
. Upon termination of this Agreement or at the disclosing party’s request, the receiving party will promptly destroy the disclosing party’s Confidential Information that is in its or its Authorized Recipients’ possession (including materials containing or based upon such Confidential Information). Upon request, the receiving party will also certify in writing its compliance with this provision. However, each party is permitted to retain a copy of any Confidential Information to the extent required by law or as automatically archived pursuant to standard backup processes
provided
that, notwithstanding the expiration of this Agreement, the confidentiality terms of this Agreement will continue to apply to any Confidential Information that remains in the possession of the receiving party or its Authorized Recipients for as long as it remains in their possession.
7.4
Equitable Relief
. The receiving party acknowledges that the unauthorized use or disclosure of the disclosing party’s Confidential Information may cause the disclosing party irreparable harm and significant damages that may be difficult to calculate. Therefore, the disclosing party will have the right to seek equitable relief to prevent or stop any actual or threatened unauthorized use or disclosure of its Confidential Information in addition to any other rights and remedies that it may have.
INDEMNIFICATION.
8.1
Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork
will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by the infringement or alleged infringement of U.S. intellectual property rights of a third party due to Subscriber’s use of the Platform or Services, excluding infringement or alleged infringement that arises or results from (i) Subscriber’s use of the Services or Platform in a way not authorized by Upwork; (ii) any modification to the Platform made by Subscriber; (iii) use of the Services or Platform in combination with any other service, platform, process, or materials with which the Services or Platform is not intended to be combined; (iv) Subscriber’s continued use of the infringing or allegedly infringing Services or Platform after Subscriber has been provided with modifications or other remedies to avoid the alleged infringement; (v) Platform Content; (vi) Freelancer Services; or (vii) Freelancer Work Product.
8.2
Employment Provider Services Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by: (i) the failure of Employment Provider to make, when due, a payment to a Freelancer related to this Agreement; (ii) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (iii) Employment Provider’s violation of any law or regulation related to workplace safety or conduct.
8.3
Indemnification by Subscriber
. Subscriber will indemnify Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses and liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by (i) Subscriber’s violation of applicable law or regulation related to its Engagement of Freelancers; (ii) the misuse or unauthorized use of the Platform; (iii) Platform Content; or (iv) the misclassification of a Freelancer under applicable classification laws and regulations.
8.4
Indemnification Requirements
. The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under this Agreement; (ii) control over the defense and settlement of any such Claim with counsel of the Indemnifying Party’s choice; and (iii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of a Claim. Indemnifying Party is not permitted to enter into any settlement with respect to a Claim other than one for purely money paid by Indemnifying Party with a full release of liability with respect to Indemnified Party without Indemnified Party’s prior written consent, which will not be unreasonably withheld.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE TO UPWORK FROM SUBSCRIBER UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN AND (III) BREACHES OF CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SECTION 7.1 (CONFIDENTIALITY) WITH RESPECT TO CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY SUBSCRIBER TO UPWORK DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY. SUBSCRIBER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
MISCELLANEOUS.
10.1
Records and Audit
. Upwork will maintain reasonable records related to the engagement of Freelancers under this Agreement (“
Engagement Records
”) for at least five years following the termination of the Freelancer’s work for Subscriber. Subject to restrictions imposed by laws and regulations related to the privacy of the Freelancer, for the duration of the Term, Subscriber, at its sole cost and expense and no more than once per calendar year, may audit Engagement Records at any time during Upwork’s normal business hours after providing Upwork with 15 days’ written notice of such audit. Such Engagement Records will automatically be deemed Upwork’s Confidential Information and any outside auditor engaged by Subscriber with respect to such audit will (i) be reasonably acceptable to Upwork; and (ii) enter into a confidentiality and non-use agreement in such form provided by Upwork with respect to the Engagement Records. Subscriber will conduct audits in a manner that is designed to minimize disruptions to Upwork’s business operations. If errors are identified by an audit, then Upwork shall take prompt action to correct such errors.
10.2
Insurance
. Upwork shall maintain at minimum the following types and limits of insurance at its own expense at all times during the Term:
(i) Commercial General Liability covering products/operations, bodily injury, property damage, and personal injury with limits of $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate.
(ii)  Automobile Liability with a combined single limit of $1,000,000 for bodily injury and property damage covering both hired and non-owned automobiles used by Upwork to provide Services to Subscriber under this Agreement.
(iii) Statutory Workers Compensation coverage as required by state law with employer’s liability limits of at least $1,000,000 per claim and $1,000,000 in the aggregate.
(iv) Errors and Omissions coverage including network security and privacy liability that includes third parties with limits of at least $10,000,000 per claim and in the aggregate.
The foregoing policies will be issued on an occurrence basis and provided by a carrier with a rating of at least A-VII. The existence of these insurance policies will neither limit nor expand Upwork’s liability hereunder. Upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork will provide Subscriber with a certification evidencing the coverage described in this Section.
10.3
Service Delivery
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, Upwork has the right, in its sole discretion, to provide the Platform and its Services through, an Affiliate or a third-party subcontractor (including an Employment Provider). Upwork will at all times remain responsible for its Affiliates’ or subcontractors’ compliance with the terms of this Agreement.
10.4
Governing Law
. The laws of California will govern this Agreement and its interpretation without reference to its principles of conflicts of laws. All disputes arising out of this Agreement between Upwork and Subscriber will be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of and a venue located in the federal or state courts of Santa Clara County, California. Subscriber and Upwork hereby consent to the personal and exclusive jurisdiction and venue of these courts and waive any objection (and right to object) to such venue or jurisdiction on the basis that such forum is an inconvenient forum.
10.5
Assignment
. Neither party will be permitted to assign this Agreement to a third party other than an Affiliate or successor to its business or assets without the other party’s prior written consent. For avoidance of doubt, this clause does not restrict (or require consent in connection with) the transfer or assignment of this Agreement in connection with a merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization, or otherwise by a party.
10.6
Entire Agreement
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the parties with respect to those certain Upwork products and services set forth on the Order Form and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters herein. Subject to the terms of this Agreement, no amendment to this Agreement will be effective unless in writing signed by both parties. This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference all policies posted on the Platform, as applicable, as may be modified by Upwork from time to time in its sole discretion. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and the other policies, this Agreement will control. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and an Order Form, the terms of the Order Form will govern to the extent of the conflict. The parties may execute this Agreement in counterparts, which taken together will constitute one instrument. No provision of any pre-printed order form, purchase order, click-through process, or other business form employed by Subscriber will supersede the terms and conditions of this Agreement, and any such document relating to this Agreement will be for administrative purposes only and will have no legal effect.
10.7
Force Majeure
. Except for the obligation to make payments hereunder, both parties will be excused from performance under this Agreement to the extent that either party is prevented from performing or is unable to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement as a result of causes beyond its reasonable control, including without limitation, any act of god, fire, casualty, flood, earthquake, war, strike, lockout, epidemic, destruction of facilities, riot, insurrection, material unavailability, telecommunications or internet failures, acts of the government, governmental requirements and regulations or restrictions imposed by law, if such party has used its commercially reasonable efforts to mitigate its effects, and gave prompt written notice to the other party. In such event, the time for the performance will be extended for the period of delay or inability to perform due to such occurrences.
10.8
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, then such provision will be deemed to be severed from this Agreement and have no legal effect. Provided that the fundamental terms of this Agreement remain valid and enforceable following such severance, the remaining provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect and binding upon the parties.
10.9
Waiver
. The waiver of one breach or default or any delay in exercising any rights hereunder will not constitute a waiver of any subsequent breach or default of such rights.
10.10
Notices
. All notices permitted or required under this Agreement must be in writing and will be delivered by electronic mail to
legalnotices@upwork.com
,
in person or mailed by first class, registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or by any nationally reputable overnight courier able to provide a receipt of delivery, to the address or email address of the party specified in this Agreement, such other address or email address as either party may specify in writing or such address or email address the party sending the notice has on file. Such notice will be deemed to have been given upon receipt.
10.11
Independent Contractor
. Neither party will be deemed to be an agent of the other party and the relationship between the parties will only be that of independent contractors. Neither party will have any right or authority to assume or create any obligations or to make any representations or warranties on behalf of any other party, whether express or implied, or to bind the other party in any respect whatsoever.
10.12
Export Law Assurances
. Subscriber understands that the deliverables provided to Subscriber by Freelancers may be subject to export control laws and regulations. SUBSCRIBER MUST NOT EXPORT OR RE-EXPORT ANY FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR ANY INFORMATION OR TECHNOLOGY UNDERLYING THE FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR FREELANCER SERVICES EXCEPT IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL UNITED STATES AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, UNITED STATES EXPORT CONTROL LAWS.
10.13
Costs
. If any action at law or in equity (including arbitration) is necessary to enforce or interpret the terms of this Agreement, the prevailing party will be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees, costs and necessary disbursements in addition to any other relief to which such party may be entitled.
Effective June 30th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
MASTER SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT - COMPLIANCE WPP
This Master Subscription Agreement governs each Order Form (collectively, the “
Agreement
”) entered into by Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) and the subscriber identified in the Order Form (“
Subscriber
”). Any term used in this Master Subscription Agreement that is defined in the Order Form and is not otherwise defined herein will have the meaning ascribed to it in the Order Form. The parties hereby agree:
DEFINITIONS
. The following terms will have the meanings ascribed to the below when used in this Agreement:
1.1 “
Affiliate
” means an entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable), whereby “control” (including, with correlative meaning, the terms “controlled by” and “under common control”) means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable).
1.2 “
Authorized Recipients
” means employees and representatives of the party receiving Confidential Information that have a bona fide need to receive such Confidential Information.
1.3 “
Authorized Users
” means Subscriber’s representatives who are permitted to access and use the Platform on Subscriber’s behalf.
1.4 “
BYO Freelancer
” ” means a Freelancer that Subscriber brings to Upwork’s Platform that is not a registered freelancer on the Platform.
1.5 “
BYO Service Fee
” means the fee specified in the Order Form that is payable by Subscriber to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a BYO Freelancer.
1.6 “
Claims
” means any and all third-party claims, suits or proceedings, including without limitation claims or actions by applicable government agencies. For the purposes of Upwork’s indemnities owed to Subscriber hereunder, the term “Claims” excludes Excluded Claims.
1.7 “
Confidential Information
” means any information or materials (regardless of form or manner of disclosure) that are disclosed by or on behalf of one party to the other party that (i) are marked, flagged, or communicated as being “confidential” or “proprietary” at the time of such disclosure; (ii) the disclosing party orally discloses to the receiving party and identifies as being confidential or proprietary at the time of disclosure and confirms to be such in writing promptly after such disclosure; or (iii) a reasonable person should know to be confidential, even if not so marked. The term “Confidential Information” does not include any information or materials that: (a) are or become generally known or available to the public through no breach of this Agreement or other wrongful act or omission by the receiving party; (b) were already known by the receiving party; (c) are acquired by the receiving party without restriction from a third party who has the right to make such disclosure; or (d) are independently developed by or on behalf of the receiving party without reference to any Confidential Information.
1.8 “
Custom Compliance Costs
” means all third-party costs incurred by Upwork, its Affiliates, or Employment Provider for any custom onboarding requirements or other compliance or screening measures required by Subscriber (subject to Upwork or Employment Provider consent, as applicable) or applicable law.
1.9 “
Effective Date
”
means the later of either the “Contract Start Date” listed on the first Order Form signed by the parties or the date that the first Order Form is fully executed by the parties.
1.10 “
Employment Provider
” means Upwork’s third-party employment provider(s) that employ Freelancers classified as employees in conjunction with Employment Provider Services.
1.11 “
Employment Provider Services
”
means the Service provided by Upwork whereby Employment Provider will handle certain administrative and legal requirements relating to the hiring of the Freelancer, including offering, tracking, and paying Freelancers legally-required sick leave, employment agreements, policies and notices, wage payment, payroll taxes, workers’ compensation, unemployment insurance, and the Affordable Care Act (ACA), if applicable, in addition to any other benefits required by law. For the avoidance of doubt, Employment Provider Services are also marketed as the Upwork Payroll Solution.
1.12 “
Employment-Related Costs
” means any additional employment-related costs, if applicable, for items Subscriber requires or that are required by law, including overtime, premium pay, paid sick leave, paid vacation, severance, notice or termination costs, jurisdictional costs, and other similar benefits. Subscriber-approved expense reimbursements are pass-through expenses and not subject to any fees.
1.13 “
Engagement
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product that a Freelancer provides to a Subscriber.
1.14 “
Enterprise Billing Services
” means Upwork’s Service of issuing Freelancer Payments on Subscriber’s behalf as due for each Engagement and then billing Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments as further described in Section 3.1 (Enterprise Billing Services).
1.15 “
Excluded Claims
” means claims to the extent arising, from (i) Subscriber’s direct engagement (whether as an employee or independent contractor) of a Freelancer before, after or outside of this Agreement, (ii) Subscriber’s direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer in a manner that results in a misclassification, (iii) Subscriber’s breach of this Agreement, or (iv) an incomplete description of the Freelancer Services or inaccurate information provided by Subscriber (including Subscriber’s failure to timely update such information).
1.16
“Freelancer”
means a user that advertises and provides services via the Platform. Freelancers collectively refers to all BYO Freelancers and Platform Freelancers, regardless of their classification.
1.17 “
Freelancer Information
” means any information regarding a Freelancer on the Platform.
1.18 “
Freelancer Payments
”
means all payments made by Upwork or Employment Provider on behalf of Subscriber to Freelancers in accordance with this Agreement, including, if applicable, expenses authorized by Subscriber or required by law. For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer Payments shall not include Subscriber-approved expense reimbursements which are pass-through expenses and not subject to a fee.
1.19 “
Freelancer Payments and Costs
” collectively means Freelancer Payments, Custom Compliance Costs and Employment-Related Costs.
1.20 “
Freelancer Services
” means the services that a Freelancer has agreed to perform for Subscriber, including the Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.21 “
Freelancer Work Product
” means all work, work product, and deliverables created by a Freelancer for Subscriber based on the Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.22 “
Independent Contractor Agreement
” means the Independent Contractor Agreement between Upwork Talent Group Inc. and the Freelancer, in substantially the form located at www.upwork.com/legal#independent-contractor-premium. For avoidance of doubt, the parties agree that the Independent Contractor Agreement constitutes Upwork’s Confidential Information.
1.23 “
International Employment Provider Services Fee
” means the fee charged by Upwork to Subscriber for the provisioning of Employment Provider Services in connection with an international Engagement. For the avoidance of doubt, the Service Fee or the BYO Service Fee, as applicable, will apply to the provisioning of Employment Provider Services in the United States.
1.24 “
Order Form
” means the applicable enterprise order form executed by Subscriber and Upwork that references this Agreement.
1.25 “
Platform
”
means the website located at www.upwork.com, including any pages tailored to or viewable by a specific client thereon.
1.26 “
Platform Content
” means content (including text, images, video, audio, and other materials or information) that is submitted, uploaded, or posted to Upwork and the Platform for the purposes of such content being displayed on the Platform for the purpose of finding Freelancers. “Platform Content” does not include Freelancer Work Product or Subscriber’s Confidential Information.
1.27 “
Platform Freelancer
” means a Freelancer that is not a BYO Freelancer.
1.28 “
Program Management Services
” means Services available to Subscriber to help Subscriber use its account on the Platform, including without limitation, assistance determining Subscriber’s project needs, suggestion of certain talent and skills needed to complete Subscriber’s project, and helping Subscriber draft project posts, post projects, create Platform Content, prepare and offer contracts on the Platform to Freelancers, release payments, and close such contracts on behalf of Subscriber upon completion of the Engagement. Program Management Services do not include project management or oversight of the Freelancer, the Freelancer Services, or other aspects of the actual Engagement.
1.29 “
Service Fee
” means the Subscriber fee that is payable to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a Platform Freelancer.
1.30 “
Services
”
means Upwork’s products and services that are provided to Subscriber in connection with this Agreement, and as further set forth on the Order Form, and any Technology provided by Upwork in connection with the operation or provision of such products and services, including provisioning access to the Platform. The “Services” are separate from and do not include Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product.
1.31 "
Subscription Fee
" means the subscription fee specified in the Order Form that Subscriber pays for its access to the Services described herein.
1.32 “
Talent Sourcing Services
” means Services available to Subscriber related to talent sourcing, which may include helping generate interest in Subscriber’s project posts from Freelancers and the provision of a short list of Freelancers advertising the skills that Subscriber seeks.
1.33 “
Taxes
” means all taxes, levies, imposts, duties, and similar governmental assessments arising in connection with this Agreement, including but not limited to sales, use, VAT, GST, excise, business, service, and similar transactional taxes imposed by any jurisdiction, and the interest and penalties for non-compliance by Subscriber. The term “Taxes” does not include taxes levied on Upwork’s own income and property.
1.34 “
Technology
” means all ideas, concepts, inventions, systems, platforms, software, interfaces, tools, utilities, templates, forms, documentation, content, training materials, techniques, methods, processes, algorithms, know-how, trade secrets, and other technologies, implementations, and information.
1.35 “
UTC
”
means Universal Time Coordinated.
PLATFORM AND SERVICES.
2.1
Platform Access
. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Upwork (i) shall use commercially reasonable efforts to make the Platform available to Subscriber and (ii) hereby grants to Subscriber and its Authorized Users the right to access and use the Platform to (a) find, communicate with, and engage Freelancers through the Platform, (b) receive, review, and approve Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product, and (c) review Freelancer billing records for payment by Upwork or the Employment Provider on behalf of Subscriber. Subscriber acknowledges that Upwork’s implementation of Subscriber’s Platform account requires Subscriber’s reasonable cooperation and agrees to promptly provide the information and documentation required by Upwork for such implementation. During the Term, Upwork may modify the features and functionality of the Platform provided the modifications do not materially degrade the Services. Subscriber is responsible for its Authorized Users’ use of the Platform and compliance with this Agreement and agrees to be directly responsible for all costs and fees incurred by such Authorized User. Subscriber shall take reasonable steps to prevent unauthorized access to the Platform, including without limitation by protecting and instructing Authorized Users to protect passwords and login information. Subscriber shall promptly notify Upwork if it becomes aware of any unauthorized use of the Platform and will reasonably cooperate with Upwork to remediate such breaches.
2.1.1
Affiliate Order Form
. Subscriber’s Affiliates are permitted to contract for Services and to use the Platform pursuant to the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement by either (i) directly entering into a separate Order Form with Upwork, which will be governed under the same terms of this Master Subscription Agreement (an “
Affiliate Order Form
”) or (ii) if authorized by Subscriber, using the Platform as an Authorized User under Subscriber’s existing account. By entering into an Affiliate Order Form directly with Upwork under romanette (i), (a) Subscriber’s Affiliate will receive its own separate Platform account and agrees to be bound by the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement as if a direct party hereto and all applicable terms that apply to “Subscriber” in this Master Subscription Agreement will be deemed to apply to the Affiliate for the purposes of its use of the Platform and Services and (b) in the event that this Agreement terminates or expires with respect to Subscriber, the terms of this Agreement will remain in effect for the Affiliate until the sooner occurrence of either the expiration or termination of the Affiliate Order Form.
2.2
Compliance Services
.
2.2.1
Worker Classification
.
Upwork will determine the appropriate worker classification (e.g., independent contractor, employee, or other worker status) for each Engagement based on the information that Subscriber and Freelancer provide about the applicable Engagement and scope of work between them. For Upwork to determine the proper classification for a Freelancer, Upwork will rely on Subscriber’s responses to questions asked, and information sought, by Upwork which is in Subscriber’s control. Subscriber will provide Upwork with all information requested that is related to the Engagement and the classification of a Freelancer in a timely, accurate, and complete manner and notify Upwork promptly if any such information changes.
2.2.2
Freelancer Engagement
.
Upwork will, based on its worker classification, either: (i) engage the Freelancer as an independent contractor, (ii) engage the Employment Provider to hire the Freelancer as an employee through Employment Provider Services, or (iii) if the classification is neither employment nor independent contractor, for example the “worker” classification in the United Kingdom, Upwork will engage the worker consistent with applicable law. Upwork may delegate the Engagement of Freelancers (and other obligations regarding Freelancers under this Agreement) to one or more third parties including an Affiliate or Employment Provider. Upwork and Employment Provider reserve the right not to engage or hire a Freelancer in their sole discretion. Upwork will cause each Freelancer classified and engaged as an independent contractor to execute an Independent Contractor Agreement to which Subscriber will be a third-party beneficiary. Upwork (through Employment Provider) will cause each Freelancer classified and hired as an employee to execute an employment agreement containing confidentiality and intellectual property assignment provisions consistent with this Agreement.
2.2.3
Custom Requirements
.
At Subscriber’s request, if legally permissible and subject to any Custom Compliance Costs, Upwork will establish and administer mutually agreeable custom onboarding requirements for Freelancers classified as independent contractors, including, if applicable, background checks. Any requests by Subscriber for custom onboarding requirements for Freelancers classified as employees are also subject to the approval of the Employment Provider.
2.2.4
Work Protection Program.
In connection with Engagements performed for Subscriber under this Agreement by Freelancers, Upwork will provide its Work Protection Program as described in this Section.
2.2.4.1
Freelancer Insurance Coverage.
Prior to the commencement of any Engagement with a project value of $75,000 or more based on the project value as stated in the project description or for Engagements that exceed $75,000 through the addition of milestones or as a result of the hours approved in a project extension by Subscriber, Upwork will verify that the Freelancer (or the Employment Provider for Engagements using the Employment Provider Service) has at least $1,000,000 USD of professional liability or errors and omissions liability insurance coverage in place unless this requirement is waived by Subscriber.
2.2.4.2
Dispute Process.
If a dispute arises between Subscriber and a Freelancer whereby Subscriber reasonably asserts in good faith that the Freelancer Work Product does not match the description of work product agreed upon, before starting the Dispute Process (as described below), Subscriber shall first use reasonable efforts to resolve any such dispute with the Freelancer. Should Subscriber choose to start the “Dispute Process,” Upwork will attempt to help Subscriber and the Freelancer resolve the dispute provided that Subscriber shall provide notice to Upwork by email to
work-protection-disputes@upwork.com
within seven days of acceptance and approval of the Freelancer Work Product (or before such acceptance) (the “
Work Protection Dispute Deadline
”).
If Subscriber, with Upwork’s assistance, is unable to resolve the dispute to its reasonable satisfaction, including specifically to recover amounts from the Freelancer in an amount reasonably satisfactory to Subscriber, Upwork will provide Subscriber with a credit to use on the Platform equal to the amount disputed up to the total amount paid by Subscriber (including applicable Service Fees, but net of any monies returned or to be returned to Subscriber by the Freelancer) in connection with the disputed Freelancer Work Product (the “
Work Protection Credit
”). By accepting the Work Protection Credit, Subscriber agrees that it thereby automatically assigns to Upwork the right to recover damages from the Freelancer to the extent of the amount of the Work Protection Credit. To the extent that Subscriber is harmed beyond the amount of the Work Protection Credit, Subscriber retains the right to pursue recovery of any excess damages from the Freelancer. The Work Protection Credit will automatically be applied to the next applicable invoice and will expire upon the earlier of (a) three months after the provision of such credit in Subscriber’s account or (b) termination of the Agreement.
2.2.4.3
Limitations on Work Protection
.
The Work Protection Program does not apply to Freelancer Work Product or Freelancer Services provided by BYO Freelancers or in cases where Subscriber has waived the insurance requirement described in Section 2.2.4.1 (Freelancer Insurance Coverage). For avoidance of doubt, the parties agree that (i) Freelancers are solely responsible for Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product; and (ii) the Work Protection Program is provided to Subscriber as a monetary remedy only and no guarantee is being made by Upwork with respect to Freelancer Work Product or Freelancer Services. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, Upwork is not obligated to provide the Work Protection Credit (a) and may terminate this Agreement with 30 days prior notice to Subscriber if Upwork reasonably determines that allegations made by Subscriber under the Work Protection Program have not been made in good faith, or (b) if Subscriber does not start the Dispute Process by the Work Protection Dispute Deadline.
2.3
Program Management and
Talent Sourcing Services
. At its discretion, Subscriber may request Upwork’s optional Program Management Services and/or Talent Sourcing Services. If Subscriber requests Program Management Services from Upwork, then Subscriber authorizes Upwork personnel to access Subscriber’s Upwork enterprise account and take actions on the Platform on behalf of Subscriber as directed by Subscriber. Any use by Subscriber of Program Management Services or Talent Sourcing Services will not alter, reduce or eliminate any Subscriber responsibilities under this Agreement.
2.4
Freelancer Services
.
2.4.1
Hourly Work for Independent Contractors
. For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as independent contractors, Subscriber can dispute the Freelancer billing entries as described by this Section. The Freelancer invoice will cover the billing period that begins Mondays at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sundays at 23:59 UTC (the “
Weekly Billing Period
”). Following each Weekly Billing Period, Subscriber has from Monday at 12 noon UTC until Friday at 23:59 UTC to review the Freelancer’s billing records and file a dispute through the Platform if Subscriber disputes the hours billed by the Freelancer (the “
Subscriber Review Period
”). If Subscriber does not file a dispute during the Subscriber Review Period, then (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have approved the time billed and accepted the Freelancer Services during the time reflected on the Platform at the end of the Subscriber Review Period, and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on the Platform. Once approved by Subscriber, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Subscriber.
2.4.2
Hourly Work for Employees
.
For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as employees, the Employment Provider is legally required to pay Freelancer for all time actually worked, and as such (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have automatically approved all hours worked at the time Freelancer submits their time sheet for the work and (ii) pursuant to this approval, Employment Provider will make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on any weekly time sheet, including overtime payments.
2.4.3
Milestone Work
. For Engagements where Freelancer Payments are tied to completing milestones, Subscriber must approve or reject milestone approval requests through the Platform within 14 calendar days after such approval requests are submitted through the Platform. Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that in the event Subscriber fails to approve or reject a submitted milestone approval request within such 14 calendar day period, then (i) the Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product reflected in the milestone approval request will be deemed accepted by Subscriber, and any payment associated with the milestone will be deemed   approved by Subscriber and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for such milestone. Once approved by Subscriber, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Subscriber.
2.4.4
Arbitration with Freelancer
. Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that the Independent Contractor Agreement identifies Subscriber as a third-party beneficiary bound by the arbitration provision therein.
2.5
Legal Compliance
. Upwork, Upwork Affiliate, and Employment Provider, as applicable, shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing their obligations under this Agreement pertaining to the Engagement and payment of Freelancers. Subscriber shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing its use of the Platform and Services and Engagement of Freelancers (including workplace safety or conduct if Subscriber requires onsite work). Subscriber shall not interfere with or impede Upwork’s or Employment Provider’s compliance with applicable laws for Freelancers engaged as employees (e.g., requiring or encouraging any Freelancer to work without recording time, discouraging or prohibiting Freelancers from taking any meal or rest periods authorized by law, etc).
2.6
Restrictions
. Subscriber will not nor attempt to: (i) license, sublicense, sell, resell, distribute, transfer, assign, or otherwise commercially exploit or make available to any third party, the Platform or the Services, except as expressly permitted herein; (ii) modify or make derivative works based on the Services or otherwise violate Upwork’s intellectual property rights in the Services; (iii) reverse engineer or access the Platform, the Services or their systems or networks for any reason that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement, including, without limitation, in order to (a) build a competitive product or service or for any benchmarking or competitive purposes using similar ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Service, (b) scrape the Platform for data or content or copy any ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Services, or (c) interfere with the integrity or performance of the Services or data contained in it, including engaging in denial of service attacks; (iv) transmit information that identifies or relates to natural persons or confidential financial information through the Platform unless requested by Upwork; or (v) submit or post Platform Content or other material to the Platform that (a) is fraudulent, discriminatory, abusive, spamming, infringing, obscene, threatening, defamatory, unlawful, tortious, or otherwise objectionable; (b) violates the privacy rights, publicity rights, or intellectual property rights of any third party; or (c) contains viruses, worms, Trojan horses, spam, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs. Subscriber will not encourage any third party to violate these restrictions.
2.7
Upgrading/Downgrading
. If Subscriber requests to change its subscription to a different enterprise product, then, upon execution of the new subscription agreement, Subscriber authorizes and directs Upwork to migrate Freelancer contracts related to existing Engagements by opening a new Freelancer contract under the new subscription and then closing the old Freelancer contract under the old subscription.
FEES AND PAYMENTS.
3.1
Enterprise Billing Services
. Upwork will make, or cause to be made, Freelancer Payments and Costs on behalf of Subscriber in accordance with this Agreement. Upwork will bill Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments made by Upwork and all applicable fees and costs. Subscriber’s ability to use Enterprise Billing Services described in this Section is subject to Upwork’s approval of credit for Subscriber. Upwork may grant, deny, limit, extend, withdraw, increase or decrease credit to Subscriber at its sole discretion.
3.2
Billing and Payment
. Subscriber shall pay Upwork the fees as set forth in the Order Form in addition to all Freelancer Payments and Costs, within the time period stated on the Order Form measured from the date of the invoice. Payment obligations are non-cancelable and non-refundable. Any late payments are subject to a charge equal to the lesser of 2% per month or the maximum permitted by law, plus reimbursement for collection expenses. All amounts specified in the Order Form are in U.S. dollars. All amounts hereunder will be invoiced in, and must be paid in, U.S. dollars. Upwork has the right to immediately suspend or terminate Subscriber’s account if Upwork does not receive payment from Subscriber by the due date in this Agreement.
3.3
Freelancer Service Fee
.
Upwork normally charges Freelancers a fee stated on the Platform. However, Upwork will not charge such fee to the Freelancer for any work the Freelancer performs for Subscriber as a BYO Freelancer or via Employment Provider Services.
3.4
Fees Related to Employment Provider Services
.
For Freelancers located in the United States and engaged using Employment Provider Services, either the Service Fee or BYO Service Fee set forth in the Order Form will apply to Freelancer Payments and Costs. A separate and additional International Employment Provider Services Fee, which varies by country, will apply to international (outside of the United States) Freelancer Engagements. For Freelancers located outside of the United States and engaged using Employment Provider Services, the International Employment Provider Services Fee and all ascertainable Employment-Related Costs will be quoted to Subscriber for approval prior to the Employment Provider hiring the relevant Freelancer as further detailed in Section 6.3 (Employment Provider Services).
3.5
Taxes
. All amounts payable under this Agreement are exclusive of Taxes. Subscriber will be responsible for promptly paying or reimbursing, as the case might be, all Taxes arising in connection with this Agreement and all invoiced amounts shall be paid in full, without any offset, deduction or withholding. If applicable for countries outside of the United States, Subscriber shall either (a) provide to Upwork its VAT or GST identification number(s) for the country where Subscriber (i) has established its business, and/or (ii) uses the Services for Subscriber’s business use, or (b) pay such Taxes via reverse charge mechanism to the appropriate tax authority. Upon request, Subscriber shall promptly provide Upwork with proof of Tax payments made to applicable authorities. If Subscriber provides a valid tax exemption certificate, Upwork will not charge Subscriber any Taxes from which it is exempt.
3.6
Purchase Order
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, if Subscriber requires a purchase order to issue payment under this Agreement and Upwork has not received a copy of such purchase order, Upwork reserves the right to suspend Subscriber’s access to the Platform until such purchase order has been received. If Subscriber requires a valid purchase order number to be attached to or entered in an invoice submission to Subscriber’s portal, but a valid purchase order has not been provided to Upwork in a timely manner, the net payment terms will be based on the date of the invoice generated by Upwork and not the date of invoice submission to Subscriber’s portal.
3.7
Non-Circumvention
. If Subscriber engages (or directs a third party to engage) the services of a Platform Freelancer that Subscriber found on the Platform through a source other than Upwork within two years after the date that such Platform Freelancer is first engaged by Subscriber, then Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. If upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork finds a Freelancer that was not on the Platform and Subscriber engages that Freelancer through a source other than Upwork, Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. This provision does not apply to (i) BYO Freelancers, or (ii) Freelancers responding independently (without direct solicitation) to Subscriber’s indirect solicitations (such as employment agency referrals and internet job postings).
TERM AND TERMINATION.
4.1
Term.
This Agreement will begin on the Effective Date and will continue for the duration of the initial term length specified in the Order Form (the “
Initial Term
”) unless sooner terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. Following the Initial Term, Subscriber’s Order Form subscription will automatically renew for successive one-year terms unless either party provides the other party notice of non-renewal at least 30 days before the end of the then-current Term (each a “
Renewal Term
”, all of which together with the Initial Term are referred to as the “
Term
”). The pricing during any Renewal Term will remain unchanged unless Upwork provides written notice of a price change at least 60 days before the end of the then-current Term.
4.2
Termination for Cause
. Either party may terminate this Agreement (i) if the other party fails to cure a material breach of this Agreement within 30 days after written notice, or (ii) immediately if the other party becomes subject to any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding under federal or state statute that is not dismissed within 30 days,   becomes subject to direct control by a trustee, receiver or similar authority, or has wound up or liquidated, voluntarily, or otherwise.
4.3
Post-Termination Obligations
.  If Subscriber’s subscription to the Services or this Agreement ends early for any reason other than Subscriber’s termination of the Agreement for cause pursuant to Section 4.2 (Termination for Cause), then, in addition to other amounts Subscriber may owe Upwork, Subscriber will be responsible for paying any unpaid Subscription Fees associated with the remainder of the current Term.
4.4
Effect of Termination and Survival
. As of the date either party provides notice of termination to the other, Subscriber shall not enter into new Engagements via the Platform. For Engagements in a working status as of the date such notice is provided (each a “
Final Engagement
”), Enterprise Billing Services may continue until completion of the Final Engagement for up to a maximum of 30 days after the effective termination date of this Agreement at which point Upwork is directed to close all open Final Engagements, unless otherwise agreed by the parties and the affected Freelancer(s). Notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, Subscriber remains responsible for payment of all fees and payments owed to Upwork under this Agreement, including any Freelancer Payments and Costs. The sections and subsections titled “Fees and Payments”, “Effect of Termination and Survival”, “Intellectual Property”, “Representations, Warranties and Disclaimers”, “Confidentiality”, “Indemnification”, “Limitation of Liability”, “Miscellaneous” and all of Subscriber’s outstanding obligations, will survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
5.1
Ownership of the Platform and Services
. All rights in and to the Platform and Services, including any modifications made thereto and derivatives thereof, exclusively belong to and at all times will remain the sole and exclusive property of Upwork. All rights not expressly granted to Subscriber and its Authorized Users with respect to the Platform and Services are reserved by Upwork. Subscriber will not take or permit any third party to take any action with respect to the Platform or Services that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement or that is inconsistent with Upwork’s ownership interest herein.
5.2
Platform Content
. Subscriber is solely responsible for all Platform Content submitted, uploaded, or otherwise posted by it to the Platform. Upwork reserves the right to delete Platform Content (in whole or in part) that it reasonably determines may violate this Agreement. By providing Platform Content, Subscriber hereby grants (and represents and warrants that it has the right to grant) Upwork and its representatives the worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, and sublicensable right to use and publish the Platform Content without limitation.
5.3
User Feedback
. Upwork will own, without restriction or obligation of any kind, any feedback, insights, and suggestions provided by or on behalf of Subscriber to Upwork concerning the Platform or Services (“
User Feedback
”). User Feedback is provided “AS IS” and Subscriber will not be identified as the source without Subscriber’s permission.
5.4
Ownership of Freelancer Work Product
. Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the Independent Contractor Agreement or employment agreement with the Freelancer, as applicable, both of which will contain a provision that requires the Freelancer to assign all ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product to Subscriber. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from an Engagement accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Subscriber.
REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND DISCLAIMERS.
6.1
Representations and Warranties
. Each party represents and warrants that: (i) it is an entity that is duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is established; (ii) it has full power and authority, and has obtained all required approvals, permissions and consents necessary, to enter into this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder; (iii) this Agreement is legally binding upon it and enforceable in accordance with its terms; and (iv) the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement does not and will not conflict with any agreement, instrument, judgment or understanding, oral or written, to which it is a party or by which it may be bound.
6.2
Subscriber Acknowledgements
. Other than as stated in this Agreement, Subscriber expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Subscriber and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of project posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (iv) Upwork does not determine the suitability of Freelancers for Subscriber; (v) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work, nor is Upwork involved in determining if the Freelancer fees will be set at an hourly or fixed rate, or what those rates will be; (vi) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (vii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (viii) if there is a dispute between Subscriber and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Subscriber and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute except for the dispute assistance described in Section 2.2.4 (Work Protection Program); (ix) Upwork is not an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any independent contractor Freelancer or Subscriber; and (x) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Engagement, independent contractor Freelancers may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at the Freelancer’s sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Platform; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Subscriber or Freelancer can or will actually complete an Engagement.
6.3
Employment Provider
Services
. If a Freelancer is located in the United States and is classified as an employee, then (i) pursuant to Section 2.2.2 (Freelancer Engagement) the Freelancer will be hired by the Employment Provider via the Employment Provider Services, and (ii) where applicable, Subscriber agrees that Upwork shall cancel or revoke any existing Independent Contractor Agreement offered to such Freelancer by Subscriber for such Engagement, on Subscriber’s behalf, so that an employment offer can be made to the Freelancer instead. If a Freelancer is located outside of the United States and is classified as an employee, then Subscriber’s approval will be requested prior to the Employment Provider hiring the relevant Freelancer. In addition to Subscriber’s responsibilities set forth in this Agreement, if a Freelancer is classified as an employee by Upwork, thenSubscriber shall: (a) absent exigent circumstances, (I) provide at least 72 hours’ advance notice (or longer, if required under applicable law) before terminating a worker’s employment assignment, or (II) immediately provide notice of any voluntary termination if Subscriber is aware of such voluntary termination; otherwise, Subscriber will be responsible for any penalties or costs for violating or complying with laws governing final paycheck requirements; and (b) immediately inform Upwork of any request or need for a leave of absence or disability accommodation if Subscriber becomes aware of the request or need, and subsequently provide any legally protected accommodation or leave.
6.4
Actions Affecting Freelancers
. Subscriber agrees that it will not request or allow a Freelancer to commence work before the worker classification process is complete and the contract has been accepted by Freelancer or Freelancer’s employment with Employment Provider has started, as applicable. Subscriber represents and warrants (i) that its benefit plans for U.S.-based employees all contain provisions expressly excluding eligibility for individuals who are not paid directly by Subscriber or an Affiliate of Subscriber; (ii) that it will not direct or exercise any control over a Freelancer that is classified as an independent contractor or otherwise act inconsistent with the independent contractor classification; and (iii) that it will not enter into any agreement or provide Freelancers with any document, including provision of a code of conduct or amendment of contract terms, that could affect the worker classification of a Freelancer without prior written approval from Upwork.
6.5
Freelancer Information
. Upwork does not independently evaluate, investigate, or otherwise conduct any due diligence regarding Freelancers’ profiles, portfolios, resumes, qualifications, skills, background, or prior experience. Accordingly, Upwork makes no representations as to the reliability, capability, background, identity or qualifications of any Freelancer. Freelancer Information posted on or to the Platform, is intended to be illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty by Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and will have no liability for Subscriber’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer Information, and Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that Subscriber will be solely responsible for undertaking the necessary research and due diligence to evaluate Freelancer Information.
6.6
Disclaimer
. EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 6.1 OF THIS AGREEMENT, UPWORK, ITS AFFILIATES, PARTNERS, AND SUBCONTRACTORS HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING THOSE OF ACCURACY, SYSTEM INTEGRATION, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, VALIDITY, NON-INFRINGEMENT, THOSE ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING OR USAGE OF TRADE WITH RESPECT THERETO, THOSE MADE BY A FREELANCER TO SUBSCRIBER OR RELATING TO ANY FREELANCER SERVICE OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT. THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND WITH ALL FAULTS. LIABILITY FOR FREELANCER’S WORK PRODUCT AND THE FREELANCER SERVICES ARE SOLELY THAT OF THE FREELANCER. NEITHER UPWORK NOR ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES OR SUBCONTRACTORS HAVE ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR FREELANCER SERVICES OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT.
CONFIDENTIALITY.
7.1
Obligations and Restrictions
. The receiving party will: (i) keep the disclosing party’s Confidential Information confidential; (ii) not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party other than an Authorized Recipient without the disclosing party’s prior written permission; (iii) exclusively use such Confidential Information for its intended purpose; and (iv) not remove any copyrights, trademark notices, or other indications of confidentiality from such Confidential Information. The receiving party may disclose Confidential Information to Authorized Recipients provided that each such Authorized Recipient is bound by confidentiality obligations that are at least as restrictive as the terms contained in this Agreement. The receiving party is responsible for its Authorized Recipients’ use and disclosure of Confidential Information and will take reasonable steps to ensure their compliance with this Agreement. Subscriber acknowledges that Freelancers working on their Engagements will have access to Confidential Information that is shared through the Platform with respect to such Engagements. Subscriber authorizes Upwork to collect data related to Subscriber’s use of the Services and Platform, to de-identify (with respect to Subscriber and any user) any such data, and to use and disclose any such data that is not identifiable to a specific person or to Subscriber.
7.2
Compelled Disclosure
. This Agreement does not prohibit a party from complying with (but only to the extent of) a valid legal requirement to disclose Confidential Information, but such party must make reasonable efforts to give the other party reasonable advance notice of such requirement. Subscriber and Upwork further acknowledge receipt of this notice under 18 U.S.C § 1833(b)(1) and that an individual will not be held criminally or civilly liable under any Federal or State trade secret law for disclosing a trade secret that (A) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney; and (ii) solely to report or investigate a suspected violation of law; or (B) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
7.3
Retention of Confidential Information
. Upon termination of this Agreement or at the disclosing party’s request, the receiving party will promptly destroy the disclosing party’s Confidential Information that is in its or its Authorized Recipients’ possession (including materials containing or based upon such Confidential Information). Upon request, the receiving party will also certify in writing its compliance with this provision. However, each party is permitted to retain a copy of any Confidential Information to the extent required by law or as automatically archived pursuant to standard backup processes provided that, notwithstanding the expiration of this Agreement, the confidentiality terms of this Agreement will continue to apply to any Confidential Information that remains in the possession of the receiving party or its Authorized Recipients for as long as it remains in their possession.
7.4
Equitable Relief
. The receiving party acknowledges that the unauthorized use or disclosure of the disclosing party’s Confidential Information may cause the disclosing party irreparable harm and significant damages that may be difficult to calculate. Therefore, the disclosing party will have the right to seek equitable relief to prevent or stop any actual or threatened unauthorized use or disclosure of its Confidential Information in addition to any other rights and remedies that it may have.
INDEMNIFICATION.
8.1
Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork
will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by the infringement or alleged infringement of U.S. intellectual property rights of a third party due to Subscriber’s use of the Platform or Services, excluding infringement or alleged infringement that arises or results from (i) Subscriber’s use of the Services or Platform in a way not authorized by Upwork; (ii) any modification to the Platform made by Subscriber; (iii) use of the Services or Platform in combination with any other service, platform, process, or materials with which the Services or Platform is not intended to be combined; (iv) Subscriber’s continued use of the infringing or allegedly infringing Services or Platform after Subscriber has been provided with modifications or other remedies to avoid the alleged infringement; (v) Platform Content; (vi) Freelancer Services; or (vii) Freelancer Work Product.
8.2
Worker Classification Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork
will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by: (i) its misclassification of a Freelancer under applicable law; (ii) the failure of Upwork or Employment Provider to make, when due, a payment to a Freelancer related to this Agreement; (iii) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (iv) Employment Provider’s violation of any law or regulation related to workplace safety or conduct.
8.3
Indemnification by Subscriber
. Subscriber will indemnify Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses and liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by (i) Subscriber’s violation of applicable law or regulation related to its Engagement of Freelancers; (ii) the misuse or unauthorized use of the Platform; (iii) Platform Content; (iv) the misclassification of a Freelancer based on inaccurate information provided by Subscriber (including Subscriber’s failure to update such information) or incomplete information provided by Subscriber about the Freelancer Services; (v) violations of wage and hour laws or regulations based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by Subscriber (including Subscriber’s failure to timely update such information); (vi) Subscriber’s direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer or Freelancer Services in a manner that results in a misclassification; or (vii) Subscriber’s breach of its obligations in Section 6.4 (Actions Affecting Freelancers).
8.4
Indemnification Requirements
. The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under this Agreement; (ii) control over the defense and settlement of any such Claim with counsel of the Indemnifying Party’s choice; and (iii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of a Claim. Indemnifying Party is not permitted to enter into any settlement with respect to a Claim other than one for purely money paid by Indemnifying Party with a full release of liability with respect to Indemnified Party without Indemnified Party’s prior written consent, which will not be unreasonably withheld.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE TO UPWORK FROM SUBSCRIBER UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN AND (III) BREACHES OF CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SECTION 7.1 (CONFIDENTIALITY) WITH RESPECT TO CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY SUBSCRIBER TO UPWORK DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY. SUBSCRIBER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
MISCELLANEOUS.
10.1
Records and Audit
. Upwork will maintain reasonable records related to the engagement of Freelancers under this Agreement (“
Engagement Records
”) for at least five years following the termination of the Freelancer’s work for Subscriber. Subject to restrictions imposed by laws and regulations related to the privacy of the Freelancer, for the duration of the Term, Subscriber, at its sole cost and expense and no more than once per calendar year, may audit Engagement Records at any time during Upwork’s normal business hours after providing Upwork with 15 days’ written notice of such audit. Such Engagement Records will automatically be deemed Upwork’s Confidential Information and any outside auditor engaged by Subscriber with respect to such audit will (i) be reasonably acceptable to Upwork; and (ii) enter into a confidentiality and non-use agreement in such form provided by Upwork with respect to the Engagement Records. Subscriber will conduct audits in a manner that is designed to minimize disruptions to Upwork’s business operations. If errors are identified by an audit, then Upwork shall take prompt action to correct such errors.
10.2
Insurance
. Upwork shall maintain at minimum the following types and limits of insurance at its own expense at all times during the Term:
(i) Commercial General Liability covering products/operations, bodily injury, property damage, and personal injury with limits of $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate.
(ii)  Automobile Liability with a combined single limit of $1,000,000 for bodily injury and property damage covering both hired and non-owned automobiles used by Upwork to provide Services to Subscriber under this Agreement.
(iii) Statutory Workers Compensation coverage as required by state law with employer’s liability limits of at least $1,000,000 per claim and $1,000,000 in the aggregate
(iv) Errors and Omissions coverage including network security and privacy liability that includes third parties with limits of at least $10,000,000 per claim and in the aggregate.
The foregoing policies will be issued on an occurrence basis and provided by a carrier with a rating of at least A-VII. The existence of these insurance policies will neither limit nor expand Upwork’s liability hereunder. Upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork will provide Subscriber with a certification evidencing the coverage described in this Section.
10.3
Service Delivery
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, Upwork has the right, in its sole discretion, to provide the Platform and Services through an Affiliate or a third-party subcontractor (including an Employment Provider). Upwork will at all times remain responsible for its Affiliates’ or subcontractors’ compliance with the terms of this Agreement.
10.4
Governing Law
. The laws of California will govern this Agreement and its interpretation without reference to its principles of conflicts of laws. All disputes arising out of this Agreement between Upwork and Subscriber will be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of and a venue located in the federal or state courts of Santa Clara County, California. Subscriber and Upwork hereby consent to the personal and exclusive jurisdiction and venue of these courts and waive any objection (and right to object) to such venue or jurisdiction on the basis that such forum is an inconvenient forum.
10.5
Assignment
. Neither party will be permitted to assign this Agreement to a third party other than an Affiliate or successor to its business or assets without the other party’s prior written consent. For avoidance of doubt, this clause does not restrict (or require consent in connection with) the transfer or assignment of this Agreement in connection with a merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization, or otherwise by a party.
10.6
Entire Agreement
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the parties with respect to those certain Upwork products and services set forth on the Order Form and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters herein. Subject to the terms of this Agreement, no amendment to this Agreement will be effective unless in writing signed by both parties; provided, however, Upwork may amend the Independent Contractor Agreement from time to time in its sole discretion in light of legal requirements or changes to the Platform provided no such modification adversely changes the rights or obligations of Subscriber. This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference all policies posted on the Platform, as applicable, as may be modified by Upwork from time to time in its sole discretion. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and the other policies, this Agreement will control. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and an Order Form, the terms of the Order Form will govern to the extent of the conflict. The parties may execute this Agreement in counterparts, which taken together will constitute one instrument. No provision of any pre-printed order form, purchase order, click-through process, or other business form employed by Subscriber will supersede the terms and conditions of this Agreement, and any such document relating to this Agreement will be for administrative purposes only and will have no legal effect.
10.7
Force Majeure
. Except for the obligation to make payments hereunder, both parties will be excused from performance under this Agreement to the extent that either party is prevented from performing or is unable to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement as a result of causes beyond its reasonable control, including without limitation, any act of god, fire, casualty, flood, earthquake, war, strike, lockout, epidemic, destruction of facilities, riot, insurrection, material unavailability, telecommunications or internet failures, acts of the government, governmental requirements and regulations or restrictions imposed by law, if such party has used its commercially reasonable efforts to mitigate its effects and gave prompt written notice to the other party. In such event, the time for the performance will be extended for the period of delay or inability to perform due to such occurrences.
10.8
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, then such provision will be deemed to be severed from this Agreement and have no legal effect. Provided that the fundamental terms of this Agreement remain valid and enforceable following such severance, the remaining provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect and binding upon the parties.
10.9
Waiver
. The waiver of one breach or default or any delay in exercising any rights hereunder will not constitute a waiver of any subsequent breach or default of such rights.
10.10
Notices
. All notices permitted or required under this Agreement must be in writing and will be delivered by electronic mail to
legalnotices@upwork.com
,
in person or mailed by first class, registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or by any nationally reputable overnight courier able to provide a receipt of delivery, to the address or email address of the party specified in this Agreement, such other address or email address as either party may specify in writing, or such address or email address the party sending the notice has on file. Such notice will be deemed to have been given upon receipt.
10.11
Independent Contractor
.
Neither party will be deemed to be an agent of the other party and the relationship between the parties will only be that of independent contractors. Neither party will have any right or authority to assume or create any obligations or to make any representations or warranties on behalf of any other party, whether express or implied, or to bind the other party in any respect whatsoever.
10.12
Export Law Assurances
. Subscriber understands that the deliverables provided to Subscriber by Freelancers under this Agreement may be subject to export control laws and regulations. SUBSCRIBER MUST NOT EXPORT OR RE-EXPORT ANY FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR ANY INFORMATION OR TECHNOLOGY UNDERLYING THE FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR FREELANCER SERVICES EXCEPT IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL UNITED STATES AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, UNITED STATES EXPORT CONTROL LAWS.
10.13
Costs
. If any action at law or in equity (including arbitration) is necessary to enforce or interpret the terms of this Agreement, the prevailing party will be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees, costs and necessary disbursements in addition to any other relief to which such party may be entitled.
Effective March 26th 2021
Download
Table of Contents
MASTER SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT
This Master Subscription Agreement governs each Order Form (collectively, the “
Agreement
”) entered into by Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) and the subscriber identified in the Order Form (“
Subscriber
”). Any term used in this Master Subscription Agreement that is defined in the Order Form and is not otherwise defined herein will have the meaning ascribed to it in the Order Form. The parties hereby agree:
DEFINITIONS
. The following terms will have the meanings ascribed to the below when used in this Agreement:
1.1 “
Affiliate
” means an entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable), whereby “control” (including, with correlative meaning, the terms “controlled by” and “under common control”) means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable).
1.2 “
Authorized Users
” means Subscriber’s representatives who are permitted to access and use the Platform on Subscriber’s behalf.
1.3 “
Authorized Recipients
” means employees and representatives of the party receiving Confidential Information that have a bona fide need to receive such Confidential Information.
1.4 “
BYO Freelancer
” ” means a Freelancer that Subscriber brings to Upwork’s Platform that is not a registered freelancer on the Platform.
1.5 “
BYO Service Fee
” means the Subscriber fee that is payable to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a BYO Freelancer.
1.6 “
Claims
” means any and all third-party claims, suits or proceedings, including without limitation claims or actions by applicable government agencies. For the purposes of Upwork’s indemnities owed to Subscriber hereunder, the term “Claims” excludes Excluded Claims.
1.7 “
Confidential Information
” means any information or materials (regardless of form or manner of disclosure) that are disclosed by or on behalf of one party to the other party that (i) are marked, flagged, or communicated as being “confidential” or “proprietary” either at the time of such disclosure; (ii) the disclosing party orally discloses to the receiving party and identifies as being confidential or proprietary at the time of disclosure and confirms to be such in writing within 10 days after such disclosure; or (iii) a reasonable person should know to be confidential, even if not so marked. The term “Confidential Information” does not include any information or materials that: (a) are or become generally known or available to the public through no breach of this Agreement or other wrongful act or omission by the receiving party; (b) were already known by the receiving party; (c) are acquired by the receiving party without restriction from a third party who has the right to make such disclosure; or (d) are independently developed by or on behalf of the receiving party without reference to any Confidential Information.
1.8 “
Custom Compliance Costs
” means all third-party costs incurred by Upwork, its Affiliates, or Employment Provider for any background checks, drug tests or other compliance or screening measures required by Subscriber or applicable law.
1.9 “
Effective Date
”
means the later of either the “Contract Start Date” listed on the first Order Form signed by the parties or date that the first Order Form is fully executed by the parties.
1.10 “
Employment Provider
” means Upwork’s third-party employment provider(s) that employ Freelancers classified as employees in conjunction with Upwork Payroll Services.
1.11 “
Employment-Related Costs
” means any additional employment-related costs, if applicable, for items Subscriber requires or that are required by law, including overtime, premium pay, expense reimbursements, paid sick leave, and Affordable Care Act (ACA) health insurance contributions, paid vacation, severance, notice or termination costs, jurisdictional costs, and other similar benefits.
1.12 “
Engagement
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product that a Freelancer provides to a Subscriber.
1.13 “
Enterprise Billing Services
” means Upwork’s Service of issuing Freelancer Payments on Subscriber’s behalf as due for each Engagement and then billing Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments as further described in Section 3.1 (Enterprise Billing Services).
1.14 “
Excluded Claims
” means claims arising, in whole or in part, from (i) Subscriber’s direct engagement (whether as an employee or independent contractor) of a Freelancer before, after or outside of Upwork’s Engagement of Freelancer to provide Freelancer Services to Subscriber under this Agreement, (ii) Subscriber’s direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer or Freelancer Services, or (iii) any of the following situations to the extent caused by incomplete or inaccurate information provided by Subscriber (including Subscriber’s failure to timely update information) or Subscriber’s acts or omissions: (a) Upwork’s misclassification of a Freelancer; (b) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (c) Upwork or Employment Provider’s failure to make a payment to Freelancer.
1.15
“Freelancer”
means a user that advertises and provides services via the Platform. Freelancers collectively refers to all BYO Freelancers and Platform Freelancers, regardless of their classification.
1.16 “
Freelancer Information
” means any information regarding a Freelancer on the Platform.
1.17 “
Freelancer Payments
”
means all payments made by Upwork or Employment Provider on behalf of Subscriber to Freelancers in accordance with this Agreement, including, if applicable, expenses authorized by Subscriber or required by law.
1.18 “
Freelancer Payments and Costs
” collectively means Freelancer Payments, Custom Compliance Costs and Employment-Related Costs.
1.19 “
Freelancer Services
” means the services that a Freelancer has agreed to perform for Subscriber, including the Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.20 “
Freelancer Work Product
” means all work, work product, and deliverables created by a Freelancer for Subscriber based on the Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.21 “
Independent Contractor Agreement
” means the Independent Contractor Agreement between Upwork Talent Group Inc. and the Freelancer, in substantially the form located at www.upwork.com/legal#independent-contractor-premium. For avoidance of doubt, the parties agree that the Independent Contractor Agreement constitutes Upwork’s Confidential Information.
1.22 “
Order Form
” means the applicable enterprise order form executed by Subscriber and Upwork that references this Agreement.
1.23 “
Platform
”
means the website located at www.upwork.com, including any pages tailored to or viewable by a specific client thereon (e.g., private talent clouds).
1.24 “
Platform Content
” has the meaning given to it in Section 5.2.
1.25 “
Platform Freelancer
” means a Freelancer that is not a BYO Freelancer.
1.26 “
Program Management Services
” means Services provided by Upwork to Subscriber to help Subscriber use its Upwork account on the Platform, including without limitation, assistance by Upwork to help determine Subscriber’s project needs, suggestion of certain talent, and skills needed to complete Subscriber’s project and help Subscriber draft project posts.
1.27 “
Services
”
means Upwork’s products and services that are provided to Subscriber in connection with this Agreement, and as further set forth on the Order Form, and any Technology provided by Upwork in connection with the operation or provision of such products and services, including provisioning access to the Platform. The “Services” are separate from and do not include Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product.
1.28 “
Service Fee
” means the Subscriber fee that is payable to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a Platform Freelancer.
1.28 “
Subscription Fee
” means the subscription fee specified in the Order Form that Subscriber pays for its access to the Services described herein.
1.29 “
Talent Sourcing Services
” means those Services that Subscriber may request from Upwork from time to time related to talent sourcing, which include helping generate interest in Subscriber’s job posts from Freelancers and the provision of a short list of Freelancers advertising the skills that Subscriber seeks. Any use by Subscriber of Talent Sourcing Services will not alter or remove any Subscriber responsibilities under the Agreement.
1.30 “
Taxes
” means all taxes, levies, imposts, duties, and similar governmental assessments arising in connection with this Agreement, including but not limited to sales, use, VAT, GST, income withholding, property, excise, service, transaction, privilege, and occupation, in addition to taxes incurred on transactions between Upwork and its Affiliates or third-party subcontractors. The term “Taxes” does not include taxes levied on Upwork’s own income and property.
1.31 “
Technology
” means all ideas, concepts, inventions, systems, platforms, software, interfaces, tools, utilities, templates, forms, documentation, content, training materials, techniques, methods, processes, algorithms, know-how, trade secrets and other technologies, implementations, and information.
1.32 “
Term
” has the meaning ascribed to it in the Order Form.
1.33 “
UTC
”
means Universal Time Coordinated.
1.34 “
Upwork Payroll Fee
” means the fee charged by Upwork to Subscriber for the provisioning of Upwork Payroll Services in connection with an Engagement.
1.35 “
Upwork Payroll Services
”
means the Service provided by Upwork whereby Employment Provider will handle certain administrative and legal requirements relating to the hiring of the Freelancer, including offering, tracking, and paying Freelancers legally-required sick leave, employment agreements, policies and notices, wage payment, payroll taxes, workers’ compensation, unemployment insurance, and the Affordable Care Act (ACA), if applicable, in addition to any other benefits required by law.
PLATFORM AND SERVICES.
2.1
Platform Access
. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Upwork (i) shall use commercially reasonable efforts to make the Platform available to Subscriber and (ii) hereby grants to Subscriber and its Authorized Users a limited, terminable, non-exclusive, non-assignable, non-sublicensable, non-transferable (except as otherwise authorized herein) world-wide license to access and use the Platform to (a) find, communicate with, and engage Freelancers through the Platform, (b) receive, review, and approve Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product, and (c) approve Freelancer billing records for payment by Upwork or the Employment Provider on behalf of Subscriber. Subscriber is responsible for its Authorized Users’ use of the Platform and will take reasonable steps to ensure that their use of the Platform complies with the terms of this Agreement. During the Term, Upwork may modify the features and functionality of the Platform. Subscriber hereby acknowledges that its access to and use of the Platform will be via the internet only. Subscriber shall take reasonable steps to prevent unauthorized access to the Platform, including without limitation by protecting and instructing Authorized Users to protect passwords and login information. Subscriber shall promptly notify Upwork if it becomes aware of any unauthorized use of the Platform and will reasonably cooperate with Upwork to remediate such breaches.
2.2
Compliance Services
.
2.2.1
Worker Classification
.
Upwork will determine the appropriate worker classification (e.g., independent contractor or employee) for each Engagement based on the information that Subscriber and Freelancer provide about the applicable Engagement between them. Determining the proper classification for a Freelancer depends on many factors, including information in Subscriber’s control. Subscriber will provide Upwork with all information requested that is related to the Engagement and the classification of a Freelancer in a timely, accurate, and complete manner and notify Upwork immediately if any such information changes.
2.2.2
Freelancer Engagement
.
Upwork will, based on its worker classification, either: (i) engage the Freelancer as an independent contractor, (ii) hire the Freelancer as an employee through Upwork Payroll Services, or (iii) if the classification is neither employment nor independent contractor, for example the “worker” classification in the United Kingdom, Upwork will engage the worker consistent with applicable law. Upwork may delegate the Engagement of Freelancers (and other obligations regarding Freelancers under this Agreement) to one or more third parties. Upwork and Employment Provider reserve the right not to engage or hire a Freelancer in their sole discretion. Upwork will cause each Freelancer classified and engaged as an independent contractor to execute an Independent Contractor Agreement. Upwork (through Employment Provider) will cause each Freelancer classified and hired as an employee to execute an employment agreement containing confidentiality and intellectual property assignment provisions consistent with this Agreement.
2.2.3
Custom Requirements
.
At Subscriber’s request, if legally permissible and subject to separate fees, Upwork will establish and administer mutually agreeable custom onboarding requirements, including, if applicable, background checks and drug tests.
2.2.4
Legal Compliance
.
Upwork, Employment Provider, or any third party acting to engage a Freelancer, as applicable, shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing the Engagement and payment of Freelancers; except that Upwork or Employment Provider shall not be liable for any non-compliance associated with any information provided by Subscriber.
2.3
Program Management and Other Services
. If Subscriber requests Program Management Services from Upwork, then Subscriber authorizes Upwork personnel to access Subscriber’s Upwork enterprise account and take actions on the Platform on behalf of Subscriber as directed by Subscriber, including without limitation, posting projects, creating Platform Content, preparing and offering contracts on the Platform to Freelancers, releasing payments, and closing such contracts upon completion of the work. All actions performed by program management personnel in Subscriber’s Upwork enterprise account will be considered to be actions by and at the direction of Subscriber. Any use by Subscriber of Program Management Services or other services listed on the Order Form will not alter, reduce or eliminate any Subscriber responsibilities under this Agreement.
2.4
Affiliates
. Subscriber’s Affiliates are permitted to contract for Services and to use the Platform pursuant to the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement by either (i) directly entering into an Order Form with Upwork, which will be governed under the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement (an “Affiliate Order Form”) or (ii) if authorized by Subscriber, using the Platform as an Authorized User under Subscriber’s account. By entering into an Affiliate Order Form directly with Upwork under romanette (i), (a) Subscriber’s Affiliate agrees to be bound by the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement as if a direct party hereto and all applicable terms that apply to “Subscriber” in this Master Subscription Agreement will be deemed to apply to the Affiliate for the purposes of its use of the Platform and Upwork’s Services and (b) in the event that this Agreement terminates or expires with respect to the Subscriber, the terms of this Agreement will remain in effect for the Affiliate until the sooner occurrence of either the expiration of the Affiliate Order Form or termination by the Affiliate. By authorizing an Affiliate to use Subscriber’s account as an Authorized User under romanette (ii), (1) Subscriber agrees to be directly responsible for all costs and fees incurred by such Affiliate, which will be directly billed to Subscriber and (2) Subscriber will be responsible for its Affiliates’ compliance with this Master Subscription Agreement. If an Affiliate of Subscriber that establishes a relationship with Upwork under this provision ceases to be an Affiliate of Subscriber, then the relevant Affiliate Order Form will terminate with respect to such Services in accordance with Section 4.4 (Effect of Termination and Survival).
2.5
Freelancer Services
.
2.5.1
Hourly Work for Independent Contractors
. For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as independent contractors, Subscriber can dispute the Freelancer billing entries as described by this Section. The Freelancer invoice will cover the billing period that begins Mondays at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sundays at 23:59 UTC (the “
Weekly Billing Period
”). Following each Weekly Billing Period, Subscriber has from Monday at 12 noon UTC until Friday at 23:59 UTC to review the Freelancer’s billing records and file a dispute through the Platform if Subscriber disputes the hours billed by the Freelancer (the “
Subscriber Review Period
”). If Subscriber does not file a dispute during the Subscriber Review Period, then (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have irrevocably approved the time billed and irrevocably accepted the work performed by the Freelancer during the time reflected on the Platform at the end of the Subscriber Review Period, and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on the Platform.
2.5.2
Hourly Work for Employees
.
For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as employees, (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have automatically approved all hours worked at the time Subscriber is invoiced for the work, including overtime and (ii) Subscriber authorizes and instructs Upwork to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on any weekly time sheet, including overtime payments. For Freelancers engaged by Upwork or Employment Provider as employees, Subscriber agrees to comply with all applicable laws (e.g., not requiring or encouraging any Freelancer to work without recording time, not discouraging or prohibiting Freelancers from taking any meal or rest periods authorized by law) and acknowledges and agrees that overtime wages are included in the Freelancer Payments and Costs to be reimbursed by Subscriber.
2.5.3
Milestone Work
. For Engagements where Freelancer Payments are tied to completing milestones, Subscriber must approve or reject milestone approval requests through the Platform within 14 calendar days after such approval requests are submitted through the Platform. Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that in the event Subscriber fails to approve or reject a submitted milestone approval request within such 14 calendar day period, then (i) the Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product reflected in the milestone approval request will be deemed irrevocably accepted by Subscriber, and any payment associated with the milestone will be deemed irrevocably approved by Subscriber and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for such milestone.
2.5.4
Arbitration with Freelancer
. Subscriber understands that the applicable Independent Contractor Agreement contains an arbitration provision identifying Subscriber as a third-party beneficiary. Subscriber agrees to be bound by such provision.
2.6
On-Site Engagements
; Compliance with Worker Safety Laws
. Subscriber is responsible for the safety and protection of Freelancers while such Freelancers are performing Freelancer Services on Subscriber’s premises or at such other location(s) as designated by Subscriber. Subscriber shall comply at all times with all applicable laws and regulations related to Freelancer’s performance of the Freelancer Services, including without limitation, laws, and regulations related to work environment safety and conduct and laws related to illegal discrimination, harassment and retaliation.
2.7
Restrictions
. Subscriber will not: (i) license, sublicense, sell, resell, distribute, transfer, assign, or otherwise commercially exploit or make available to any third party, the Platform or the Services, except as expressly permitted herein; (ii) modify or make derivative works based on the Services or otherwise violate Upwork’s intellectual property rights in the Services; (iii) reverse engineer or access the Services for any reason that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement, including in order to (a) build a competitive product or service or access the Services for the purposes of monitoring performance, availability, functionality, or for any benchmarking or competitive purposes, (b) build a product using similar ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Service, or (c) scrape the Platform for data or content or copy any ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Services; (iv) transmit information that identifies or relates to natural persons or confidential financial information through the Platform; (v) submit or post Platform Content or other material to the Platform that is fraudulent, discriminatory, abusive, spamming, infringing, obscene, threatening, defamatory, unlawful, tortious, or otherwise objectionable to a reasonable person; (vii) submit or post Platform Content or other material to the Platform that violates applicable law or the privacy rights, publicity rights, or intellectual property rights of any third party (vi) submit or post Platform Content or other material to the Platform that contains viruses, worms, Trojan horses, spam, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs; (vii) interfere with or disrupt the integrity or performance of the Services or the data contained in it, including engaging in denial of service attacks; (viii) attempt to gain unauthorized access to the Services or its systems or networks; (ix) use the Services in violation of applicable law. Subscriber will not encourage any third party to violate these restrictions; or (x) use or access any data on the Platform in violation of the published privacy policy on the Platform. Although Upwork is not responsible for Subscriber’s Platform Content, it is permitted to monitor Platform Content and reserves the right to delete any Platform Content (in whole or in part) that Upwork determines in its reasonable discretion violates this provision or any other part of this Agreement or which is inappropriate.
2.8
Upgrading/Downgrading
. If Subscriber decides to Upgrade or Downgrade (as those terms are defined below), then, in addition to such other terms as the parties may need to agree to in connection with such Upgrade or Downgrade, Subscriber authorizes and directs Upwork to migrate Freelancer contracts related to existing Engagements between service tiers by opening a new contract on the new service tier and then closing the old contract on the old service tier. If no end date is indicated on the old contract, the new contract will be established with a six-month duration. In the event the old contract is either (i) a fixed price contract with no incomplete milestones or (ii) an hourly contract that has not had payments made under it over the past six months, then the old contract will only be closed on the old service tier and a new contract will not be entered into on the new service tier. Subscriber acknowledges that it may not be able to leave feedback for Freelancers for Engagements under contracts that are closed by Upwork pursuant to this provision. For the purposes of this provision, “
Upgrade
” means Subscriber’s election to utilize the Platform in a higher service tier and “
Downgrade
” means Subscriber’s election to utilize the Platform in a lower service tier. For Downgrades from a Compliance product, when a Freelancer contract is opened in the lower service tier as described in this Section, the new contract will be set up with the same worker classification applied as it was under the Compliance product.
FEES AND PAYMENTS.
3.1
Enterprise Billing Services
. Upwork will make, or cause to be made, Freelancer Payments and Costs on behalf of Subscriber in accordance with this Agreement. Upwork will bill Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments made by Upwork and all applicable fees and costs. Subscriber’s ability to use Enterprise Billing Services described in this Section is subject to Upwork’s approval of a credit limit for Subscriber and limited by the amount of that approval. Upwork may at any time without notice, grant, deny, limit, extend, withdraw, increase or decrease credit to Subscriber at its sole discretion.
3.2
Billing and Payment
. Subscriber shall pay Upwork the fees set forth in the Order Form in accordance with the terms and conditions contained therein, in addition to all Freelancer Payments and Costs. Subscriber shall pay all invoices within the time period stated on the Order Form, measured from the date of the invoice. Payment obligations are non-cancelable and non-refundable. Any late payments are subject to a finance charge equal to the lesser of 2% per month or the maximum permitted by law, plus reimbursement for collection expenses. All amounts specified in the Order Form are in U.S. dollars. All amounts hereunder will be invoiced in, and must be paid in, U.S. dollars. The pricing during any Renewal Term will be the same as that during the prior Term period unless Upwork provides written notice of a price change at least 30 days before any renewal notice is due, in which case the pricing increase will be effective upon the commencement of the subsequent Renewal Term. Billing for any pricing increases will commence in the month following the renewal month in which the Order Form was renewed.
3.3
Freelancer Service Fee
.
Upwork normally charges Freelancers a fee stated on the Platform. However, if a Freelancer is a BYO Freelancer or if the Freelancer is engaged via Upwork Payroll Services, Upwork will not charge such fee to the Freelancer for any work the Freelancer performs for Subscriber as a BYO Freelancer or via Upwork Payroll Services.
3.4
Fees Related to Upwork Payroll Services
.
The flat rate Service Fees set forth in the Order Form for BYO Freelancers and Platform Freelancers only applies to Freelancers located in the United States who are engaged using Upwork Payroll Services. A separate Upwork Payroll Fee, which varies by country, will apply to international Freelancer Engagements. For Upwork Payroll Service Engagements with respect to Freelancers located outside of the United States, the Upwork Payroll Fee and all Employment-Related Costs will be provided to Subscriber for approval prior to the Employment Provider hiring the relevant Freelancer as further detailed in Section 6.3 (Upwork Payroll Services).
3.5
Taxes
. All fees and charges payable in connection with this Agreement or an Order Form are exclusive of Taxes. Subscriber will be responsible for promptly paying or reimbursing, as the case might be, all Taxes arising in connection with this Agreement (without any offset or deduction to the fees paid to Upwork). For countries where Upwork is not registered to collect indirect Taxes (e.g., VAT or GST), Subscriber will pay such Taxes via reverse charge mechanism to the appropriate tax authority. Subscriber will reimburse Upwork for any deficiency relating to Taxes that are Subscriber’s responsibility under this Agreement. The parties will cooperate in good faith to minimize Taxes to the extent legally permissible and will provide each other with any applicable Tax exemptions or certificates as reasonably requested and notify the other party if any such exemption or certificate is subsequently revoked or modified. If applicable, Subscriber shall communicate to Upwork its VAT or GST identification number(s) attributed by (i) the country where Subscriber has established its business or (ii) any other country where Subscriber has established a fixed establishment to which Upwork’s Services are provided. Upwork will consider the Services under this Agreement to be for Subscriber's business use and provided to the location(s) of the Subscriber as identified by the provided VAT or GST identification number(s). Upon request, Subscriber shall promptly provide Upwork with proof of direct Tax payments made to applicable authorities. Subscriber shall promptly pay or reimburse Upwork for all costs and fines related to any liability incurred by Upwork as a result of Subscriber’s non-compliance or delay with its responsibilities herein. Subscriber’s obligation under this Section will survive the termination or expiration of this Agreement.
3.6
Purchase Order
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, if Subscriber requires a purchase order to issue payment under this Agreement and Upwork has not received a copy of such purchase order, Upwork reserves the right to suspend Subscriber’s access to the Platform until such purchase order has been received. If Subscriber requires a valid purchase order number to be attached to or entered in an invoice submission to Subscriber’s portal, but a valid purchase order has not been provided to Upwork in a timely manner, the net payment terms in the Service Order will be based on the date of the invoice generated by Upwork and not the date of invoice submission to Subscriber’s portal.
3.7
Non-Circumvention
. If Subscriber engages (or directs a third party to engage) the services of a Platform Freelancer that Subscriber found on the Platform through a source other than Upwork within two years after the date that such Platform Freelancer is first engaged by Subscriber or, if never engaged by Subscriber through the Platform, within two years after the Platform Freelancer is first identified by Subscriber on the Platform, then Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. If upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork finds a Freelancer that was not on the Platform and Subscriber engages that Freelancer through a source other than Upwork, Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. This provision does not apply to (i) BYO Freelancers or (ii) Freelancers responding independently and without direct solicitation to Subscriber’s indirect solicitations (such as employment agency referrals and internet job postings).
TERM AND TERMINATION.
4.1
Term.
This Master Subscription Agreement will begin on the Effective Date and will continue for the duration of the initial term length specified in the Order Form unless sooner terminated in accordance with the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement.
4.2
Termination for Cause
. Upon a material breach of this Agreement by either party, the non-breaching party may terminate this Agreement immediately if such default continues and is not remedied within 30 days following written notice of default from the non-breaching party. Either party will have the right to terminate this Agreement immediately if the other party (i) becomes subject to any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding under federal or state statute that is not dismissed within 30 days, (ii) becomes subject to direct control by a trustee, receiver or similar authority, or (iii) has wound up or liquidated, voluntarily, or otherwise. Notwithstanding the foregoing, Upwork has the right to immediately suspend or terminate Subscriber’s account and this Agreement if Upwork does not receive payment from Subscriber by the due date in this Agreement and all amounts owed under the Agreement will become immediately due.
4.3
Post-Termination Obligations
.If Subscriber’s subscription to the Services or this Agreement ends early for any reason other than Subscriber’s termination pursuant to Section 4.2 (Termination for Cause), then, in addition to other amounts Subscriber may owe Upwork, Subscriber will be responsible for paying any unpaid Subscription Fees associated with the remainder of the current Term.
4.4
Effect of Termination and Survival
. As of the date either party provides notice of termination to the other, Subscriber will no longer be able to enter into new Engagements via the Platform. All projects in a working status as of the date such notice is provided (each a “
Final Engagement
”) will remain active until completed, even if completion of the Final Engagement follows the termination date, unless otherwise agreed by the parties and the affected Freelancer(s). Notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, Subscriber remains responsible for payment of all fees and payments owed to Upwork under this Agreement, including any Freelancer Payments and Costs. The sections and subsections titled “Fees and Payments”, “Effect of Termination and Survival”, “Intellectual Property”, “Representations, Warranties and Disclaimers”, “Confidentiality”, “Indemnification”, “Limitation of Liability”, “Miscellaneous” and all of Subscriber’s outstanding obligations, will survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
5.1
Ownership of the Platform and Services
. All rights in and to the Platform and Services, including any modifications made thereto and derivatives thereof, exclusively belong to and at all times will remain the sole and exclusive property of Upwork. All rights not expressly granted to Subscriber and its Authorized Users with respect to the Platform and Services are reserved by Upwork. Subscriber will not take or permit any third party to take any action with respect to the Platform or Services that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement.
5.2
Platform Content
. Upwork allows Subscriber to submit, upload, and post content (including text, images, video, audio, and other materials or information) to Upwork and the Platform for the purposes of such content being displayed on the Platform for the purpose of finding Freelancers (collectively “
Platform Content
”). “Platform Content” does not include Freelancer Work Product or Subscriber’s Confidential Information. Subscriber is solely responsible for all Platform Content submitted, uploaded, or otherwise posted by it to the Platform, included with respect to harm to third parties caused thereby. While Upwork does not claim ownership to any Platform Content submitted by Subscriber or authorized for use on the Platform, Subscriber does hereby grant (and represents and warrants that it has the right to grant) Upwork and its representatives the perpetual, worldwide, royalty-free, and sublicensable right to use and publish the Platform Content in connection with Upwork’s provision and promotion of the services and Subscriber’s use of the Platform.
5.3
User Feedback
. Upwork will own and have a royalty-free right to exploit any feedback, insights, and suggestions provided by or on behalf of Subscriber to Upwork concerning the functionality, features, and performance of the Platform, including without limitation the identification of errors or bugs or any suggested fixes or workarounds, improvements, modifications, or enhancements (“
User Feedback
”). Subscriber agrees that its provision of any User Feedback will be gratuitous, non-confidential, unrestricted, and made without any right to receive any compensation in return.
5.4
Ownership of Freelancer Work Product
. Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the Independent Contractor Agreement or employee agreement with the Freelancer, as applicable, both of which will contain a provision that requires a Freelancer to assign all ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product to Subscriber. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from an Engagement accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Subscriber.
REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND DISCLAIMERS.
6.1
Representations and Warranties
. Each party represents and warrants that: (i) it is an entity that is duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is established; (ii) it has full power and authority, and has obtained all required approvals, permissions and consents necessary, to enter into this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder; (iii) this Agreement is legally binding upon it and enforceable in accordance with its terms; and (iv) the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement does not and will not conflict with any agreement, instrument, judgment or understanding, oral or written, to which it is a party or by which it may be bound.
6.2
Subscriber Acknowledgements
. Other than as stated in this Agreement, Subscriber expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Subscriber and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (iv) Upwork merely makes the Platform available to enable Freelancers to identify and determine the suitability of clients at Freelancers’ discretion and to enable clients, such as Subscriber, to identify and determine the suitability of Freelancers at Subscriber’s discretion; (v) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work, nor is Upwork involved in determining if the Freelancer fees will be set at an hourly or fixed rate, or what those rates will be; (vi) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (vii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (viii) if there is a dispute between Subscriber and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Subscriber and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute except for the dispute assistance described in Section 2.2.5 (Work Protection Program); (ix) Upwork is not an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any independent contractor Freelancer or Subscriber; and (x) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Engagement, independent contractor Freelancers may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at his or her sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Platform; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Subscriber or Freelancer can or will actually complete a transaction.
6.3
Upwork Payroll Services
. If, pursuant to Section 2.2.1 (Worker Classification), Upwork determines that the appropriate classification for a Freelancer should be as an employee, then Subscriber directs Upwork to hire that Freelancer via Upwork’s Payroll Service. Employment Provider will enter into an employment relationship with the applicable Freelancer that governs the provisioning of Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product. Subscriber directs and authorizes Upwork to, on Subscriber’s behalf, cancel or revoke any Independent Contractor Agreements offered to Freelancers in the United States by Subscriber so that an employment offer can be made. In addition to Subscriber’s responsibilities set forth in this Agreement, if a Freelancer is classified as an employee by Upwork, then Subscriber shall: (i) not request or allow the Freelancer to commence work until Subscriber receives notice from Upwork or its Employment Provider that employment paperwork has been completed and employment has started; (ii) absent exigent circumstances, (a) provide at least 72 hours’ advance notice (or longer, if required under applicable law) before terminating a worker’s employment assignment, or (b) immediately provide notice of any voluntary termination; otherwise, Subscriber will be responsible for any penalties or costs for violating or complying with laws governing final paycheck requirements; and (iii) immediately inform Upwork of any request for a leave of absence or disability accommodation or if Subscriber becomes aware of a potential disability or need for leave or accommodation and provide any legally protected accommodation or leave.
6.4
Actions Affecting Freelancers
. Subscriber agrees that it will not request or allow a Freelancer to commence work before the worker classification process (including contracting, if applicable) is complete and both Freelancer and Subscriber have been informed of the result. Subscriber represents and warrants (i) that its benefit plans for U.S.-based employees (including without limitation retirement plans, insurance plans, stock plans, stock option plans, and any plan governed by the Consolidated Omnibus Reconciliation Act (COBRA), the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), and the Employee Retirement Income Security Act (ERISA)) all contain provisions expressly excluding eligibility for individuals who are not paid directly by Subscriber or an Affiliate of Subscriber; (ii) that it will not direct or exercise any control over a Freelancer that is classified as an independent contractor or otherwise act inconsistent with the independent contractor classification; and (iii) that it will not enter into any agreement or provide Freelancers with any document, including provision of a code of conduct or amendment of contract terms, that could affect the worker classification of a Freelancer without prior written approval from Upwork.
6.5
Freelancer Information
. Upwork does not independently evaluate, investigate, or otherwise conduct any due diligence regarding Freelancers, their profiles, portfolios, resumes, qualifications, skills, background, or prior experience. Accordingly, Upwork makes no representations as to the reliability, capability, background, identity or qualifications of any Freelancer. Freelancer Information posted on or to the Platform, is intended to be illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty by Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and will have no liability for Subscriber’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer Information, and Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that Subscriber will be solely responsible for undertaking the necessary research and due diligence to evaluate Freelancer Information and has the proper knowledge, skill, and experience to evaluate Freelancer Information.
6.6
Disclaimer
. UPWORK, ITS AFFILIATES, PARTNERS, AND SUBCONTRACTORS HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING THOSE OF ACCURACY, SYSTEM INTEGRATION, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, VALIDITY, NON-INFRINGEMENT, THOSE ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING OR USAGE OF TRADE WITH RESPECT THERETO, THOSE MADE BY A FREELANCER TO SUBSCRIBER OR RELATING TO ANY FREELANCER SERVICE OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT. THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND WITH ALL FAULTS. LIABILITY FOR FREELANCER’S WORK PRODUCT AND THE FREELANCER SERVICES ARE SOLELY THAT OF THE FREELANCER. NEITHER UPWORK NOR ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES OR SUBCONTRACTORS HAVE ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR FREELANCER SERVICES OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT.
CONFIDENTIALITY.
7.1
Obligations and Restrictions
. The receiving party will: (i) keep the disclosing party’s Confidential Information confidential; (ii) not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party other than an Authorized Recipient without the disclosing party’s prior written permission; (iii) exclusively use such Confidential Information for its intended purpose; and (iv) not remove any copyrights, trademark notices, or other indications of confidentiality from such Confidential Information. The receiving party may disclose Confidential Information to Authorized Recipients provided that each such Authorized Recipient is bound by confidentiality obligations that are at least as restrictive as the terms contained in this Agreement. The receiving party is responsible for its Authorized Recipients’ use and disclosure of Confidential Information and will take reasonable steps to ensure their compliance with this Agreement. Subscriber acknowledges that Freelancers working on their Engagements will have access to Confidential Information that is shared through the Platform with respect to such Engagements. Subscriber authorizes Upwork to collect data related to Subscriber’s use of the Services and Platform, to de-identify (with respect to Subscriber and any user) any such data, and to use and disclose any such data that is not identifiable to a specific person or to Subscriber.
7.2
Compelled Disclosure
. This Agreement does not prohibit a party from complying with (but only to the extent of) a valid legal requirement to disclose Confidential Information, but such party must make reasonable efforts to give the other party reasonable advance notice of such requirement. Subscriber and Upwork further acknowledge receipt of this notice under 18 U.S.C § 1833(b)(1) and that an individual will not be held criminally or civilly liable under any Federal or State trade secret law for disclosing a trade secret that (A) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney; and (ii) solely to report or investigate a suspected violation of law; or (B) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
7.3
Return of Confidential Information
. Upon termination of this Agreement or at the disclosing party’s request, the receiving party will promptly return or destroy the disclosing party’s Confidential Information that is in its or its Authorized Recipients’ possession (including materials containing or based upon such Confidential Information). Upon request, the receiving party will also certify in writing its compliance with this provision. However, each party is permitted to retain a copy of any Confidential Information to the extent required by law or as automatically archived pursuant to standard backup processes provided that, notwithstanding the expiration of this Agreement, the confidentiality terms of this Agreement will continue to apply to any Confidential Information that remains in the possession of the receiving party or its Authorized Recipients for as long as it remains in their possession.
7.4
Equitable Relief
. The receiving party acknowledges that the unauthorized use or disclosure of the disclosing party’s Confidential Information may cause the disclosing party irreparable harm and significant damages that may be difficult to calculate. Therefore, the disclosing party will have the right to seek equitable relief to prevent or stop any actual or threatened unauthorized use or disclosure of its Confidential Information in addition to any other rights and remedies that it may have.
INDEMNIFICATION.
8.1
Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by the infringement or alleged infringement of U.S. intellectual property rights of a third party due to Subscriber’s use of the Platform or Services, excluding infringement or alleged infringement that arises or results from (i) Subscriber’s use of the Services or Platform in a way not authorized by Upwork; (ii) any modification to the Platform made by Subscriber; (iii) use of the Services or Platform in combination with any other service, platform, process, or materials with which the Services or Platform is not intended to be combined; (iv) Subscriber’s continued use of the infringing or allegedly infringing Services or Platform after Subscriber has been provided with modifications or other remedies to avoid the alleged infringement; (v) Platform Content; (vi) Freelancer Services; or (vii) Freelancer Work Product.
8.2
Worker Classification Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by: (i) Upwork’s misclassification of a Freelancer under the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Internal Revenue Code, state wage and hour law or any other law; (ii) the failure of Upwork or Employment Provider to make, when due, a payment to a Freelancer related to this Agreement; (iii) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (iv) Employment Provider’s violation of any law or regulation related to workplace safety or conduct, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment.
8.3
Indemnification by Subscriber
. Subscriber will indemnify Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses and liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by (i) Subscriber’s violation of any law or regulation, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment; (ii) the misuse or unauthorized use of the Platform; (iii) Subscriber’s Platform Content; (iv) the misclassification of a Freelancer under the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Internal Revenue Code, state wage and hour law or any other law based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided to Upwork by Subscriber or which Subscriber failed to update or was caused by Subscriber; (v) Subscriber’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations or any such failure by Upwork or the Employment Provider based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by Subscriber or which Subscriber failed to update or was caused by Subscriber; (vi) Subscriber’s direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; or (vii) Subscriber’s breach of its obligations in Section 6.4 (Actions Affecting Freelancers).
8.4
Indemnification Requirements
. The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under this Agreement; (ii) control over the defense and settlement of any such Claim with counsel of the Indemnifying Party’s choice; and (iii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of a Claim. Indemnifying Party is not permitted to enter into any settlement with respect to a Claim other than one for purely money paid by Indemnifying Party with a full release of liability with respect to Indemnified Party without Indemnified Party’s prior written consent, which will not be unreasonably withheld.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE UPWORK FROM SUBSCRIBER UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN AND (III) BREACHES OF CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SECTION 7.1 (CONFIDENTIALITY) WITH RESPECT TO CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY SUBSCRIBER TO UPWORK DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM FOR WHICH LIABILITY IS SOUGHT TO BE IMPOSED. SUBSCRIBER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
MISCELLANEOUS.
10.1
Records and Audit
. Upwork will maintain reasonable records related to the engagement of Freelancers under this Agreement (“
Engagement Records
”) for at least five years following the termination of the Freelancer’s work for Subscriber. Subject to restrictions imposed by laws and regulations related to the privacy of the Freelancer, for the duration of the Term, Subscriber, at its sole cost and expense and no more than once per calendar year, may audit Engagement Records at any time during Upwork’s normal business hours after providing Upwork with 15 days’ written notice of such audit. Such Engagement Records will automatically be deemed Upwork’s Confidential Information and any outside auditor engaged by Subscriber with respect to such audit will (i) be reasonably acceptable to Upwork; and (ii) enter into a confidentiality and non-use agreement in such form provided by Upwork with respect to the Engagement Records. Subscriber will conduct audits in a manner that is designed to minimize disruptions to Upwork’s business operations. If errors are identified by an audit, then Upwork shall take prompt action to correct such errors.
10.2
Insurance
. Upwork shall maintain at minimum the following types and limits of insurance at its own expense at all times during the Term:
(i) Commercial General Liability covering products/operations, bodily injury, property damage, and personal injury with limits of $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate.
(ii)  Automobile Liability with a combined single limit of $1,000,000 for bodily injury and property damage covering both hired and non-owned automobiles used by Upwork to provide Services to Subscriber under this Agreement.
(iii) Statutory Workers Compensation coverage as required by state law with employer’s liability limits of at least $1,000,000 per claim and $1,000,000 in the aggregate.
(iv) Errors and Omissions coverage including network security and privacy liability that includes third parties with limits of at least $10,000,000 per claim and in the aggregate.
The foregoing policies will be issued on an occurrence basis and provided by a carrier with a rating of at least A-VII. The existence of these insurance policies will neither limit nor expand Upwork’s liability hereunder. Upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork will provide Subscriber with a certification evidencing the coverage described in this Section.
10.3
Service Delivery
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, Upwork has the right, in its sole discretion, to provide the Platform and one or more of its Services through Upwork, an Upwork Affiliate, or a third-party subcontractor. Upwork will at all times remain responsible for its Affiliates’ or subcontractors’ compliance with the terms of this Agreement.
10.4
Governing Law
. The laws of California will govern this Agreement and its interpretation without reference to its principles of conflicts of laws. All disputes arising out of this Agreement between Upwork and Subscriber will be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of and a venue located in the federal or state courts of Santa Clara County, California. Subscriber and Upwork hereby consent to the personal and exclusive jurisdiction and venue of these courts and waive any objection (and right to object) to such venue or jurisdiction on the basis that such forum is an inconvenient forum.
10.5
Assignment
. Neither party will be permitted to assign this agreement to a third party other than an Affiliate or successor to its business or assets without the other party’s prior written consent. For avoidance of doubt, this clause does not restrict (or require consent in connection with) the transfer or assignment of this Agreement in connection with a merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization, or otherwise by a party.
10.6
Entire Agreement
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the parties and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters herein. Subject to the terms of this Agreement, no amendment to this Agreement will be effective unless in writing signed by both parties; provided, however, Upwork may amend the Independent Contractor Agreement from time to time in its sole discretion in light of legal requirements or changes to the Platform provided no such modification adversely changes the rights or obligations of Subscriber. This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference all policies posted on the Platform, as may be modified by Upwork from time to time in its sole discretion. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and the other policies, this Agreement will control. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and an Order Form, the terms of the Order Form will govern to the extent of the conflict. The parties may execute this Agreement in counterparts, which taken together will constitute one instrument. No provision of any pre-printed order form, purchase order, click-through process, or other business form employed by Subscriber will supersede the terms and conditions of this Agreement, and any such document relating to this Agreement will be for administrative purposes only and will have no legal effect.
10.7
Force Majeure
. Excluding Subscriber’s obligation to make payments to Upwork and to reimburse Upwork hereunder, both parties will be excused from performance under this Agreement to the extent that either party is prevented from performing or is unable to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement as a result of causes beyond its reasonable control, including without limitation, any act of god, fire, casualty, flood, earthquake, war, strike, lockout, epidemic, destruction of facilities, riot, insurrection, material unavailability, telecommunications or internet failures, acts of the government, governmental requirements and regulations or restrictions imposed by law, if such party has used its commercially reasonable efforts to mitigate its effects, such party will give prompt written notice to the other party. In such event, the time for the performance will be extended for the period of delay or inability to perform due to such occurrences.
10.8
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, then such provision will be deemed to be severed from this Agreement and have no legal effect. Provided that the fundamental terms of this Agreement remain valid and enforceable following such severance, the remaining provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect and binding upon the parties.
10.9
Waiver
. The waiver of one breach or default or any delay in exercising any rights hereunder will not constitute a waiver of any subsequent breach or default of such rights.
10.10
Notices
. All notices permitted or required under this Agreement must be in writing and will be delivered by electronic mail to legalnotices@upwork.com, in person or mailed by first class, registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or by any nationally reputable overnight courier able to provide a receipt of delivery, to the address of the party specified in this Agreement, such other address as either party may specify in writing or such address the party sending the notice has on file. Such notice will be deemed to have been given upon receipt.
10.11
Independent Contractor
. Neither party will be deemed to be an agent of the other party and the relationship between the parties will only be that of independent contractors. Neither party will have any right or authority to assume or create any obligations or to make any representations or warranties on behalf of any other party, whether express or implied, or to bind the other party in any respect whatsoever.
10.12
Compliance with Law
. Each party is responsible for and shall comply with all laws and regulations that are applicable to their respective businesses, including Subscriber with respect to its use of the Platform and Engagement of Freelancers.
10.13
Export Law Assurances
. Subscriber understands that the deliverables provided to Subscriber under this Agreement may be subject to export control laws and regulations. SUBSCRIBER MUST NOT EXPORT OR RE-EXPORT ANY FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR ANY INFORMATION OR TECHNOLOGY UNDERLYING THE FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR FREELANCER SERVICES EXCEPT IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL UNITED STATES AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, UNITED STATES EXPORT CONTROL LAWS.
10.14
Costs
. If any action at law or in equity (including arbitration) is necessary to enforce or interpret the terms of this Agreement, the prevailing party will be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees, costs and necessary disbursements in addition to any other relief to which such party may be entitled.
10.15
Private Branding
. Upwork is hereby authorized to display Subscriber’s name and logo on the internal-facing custom-branded enterprise portal that Upwork creates for Subscriber hereunder.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF,
the parties hereto have executed this Master Subscription Agreement by their duly authorized officers or representatives.
Effective June 29th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
UTG INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR AGREEMENT
UPWORK CONFIDENTIAL
THIS UTG INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR AGREEMENT
(this “
Agreement
”) is entered into by and between Upwork Talent Group Inc. (“
UTG
”), a Delaware corporation with its principal place of business at 475 Brannan Street, Suite 430, San Francisco, CA 94107, and Freelancer, as of the date Freelancer accepts this Agreement via the Site (the “
Effective Date
”). UTG and Freelancer are sometimes referred to collectively herein as the “
Parties
” and individually as a “
Party
.” “
Upwork Client
” refers to [UPWORK ENTERPRISE COMPLIANCE CLIENT]. UTG and Freelancer agree as follows:
1.BACKGROUND AND INITIAL OBLIGATIONS.
1.1 Use of Platform.
UTG and Freelancer agree to use the marketplace for services owned and operated by Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) at the domain and sub-domains of
http://www.upwork.com
(the “
Site
”) for the designation of, delivery of and payment for Freelancer’s services under this Agreement. UTG and Freelancer specifically incorporate into this Agreement and agree to be bound by the Site’s Terms of Service available at
https://www.upwork.com/legal
(“
Terms of Service
”), as they may be amended from time to time. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement have the meanings given to them in the Terms of Service. To the extent that any provision of this Agreement conflicts with a provision of the Terms of Service, the applicable provision of this Agreement will control.
1.2 Identity of Freelancer.
The “
Freelancer
” is the self-employed individual or entity whose legal name and address are listed in the Tax Information section of the Account on the Site of the User accepting this Agreement via the Site.
a.
Any person who accepts this Agreement on behalf of a corporation, limited company or other legal entity represents and warrants that they accept this Agreement on behalf of such legal entity and that they have the legal authority and authorization to contractually bind that legal entity. A Freelancer that is a legal entity further represents and warrants that it is in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction(s) where Freelancer conducts business and will promptly provide proof of its organization, registration and good standing upon request.
b.
If Freelancer was offered the Project as an Agency Member, Freelancer represents and warrants that it is accepting this Agreement on behalf of the Agency whose Agency Account it is associated with and that Freelancer has the legal authority and authorization to do so. In such cases, except as used in this paragraph, the term “Freelancer” in this Agreement refers to and includes the Agency.
1.3 Work for Upwork Client.
UTG has contracted with Freelancer to provide certain services or deliverables to the Upwork Client (the “
Project
”). Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that the Upwork Client is an express third-party beneficiary of this Agreement, including without limitation the Arbitration Provision contained in section 15, below, having the right to enforce this Agreement in accordance with its terms.
1.4 UPWORK CLIENT CONFIDENTIALITY.
THE IDENTITY OF THE UPWORK CLIENT AND THE NATURE OF THE UPWORK CLIENT’S WORK ARE UPWORK CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION AND THE UPWORK CLIENT CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION UNDER THIS AGREEMENT. FREELANCER AGREES NOT TO DISCLOSE THIS INFORMATION AT ANY TIME, DURING OR AFTER THE PROJECT, WITHOUT ADVANCE WRITTEN APPROVAL BY THE UPWORK CLIENT.
1.5 The Project.
Freelancer agrees to complete the Project described in the contract offer on the Site related to this Project and to comply with all terms or specifications about the work to be completed agreed to by Freelancer on the Site (collectively, “Project Terms”). Freelancer further agrees that Project Terms are incorporated into this Agreement by this reference.
1.6 Use of the Upwork Site.
Freelancer agrees to use the Site, including Upwork Messages, for any communications with UTG, to record time spent working on hourly contracts, to request payment for contract milestones, and to submit any other invoice under this Agreement. Freelancer further understands and agrees that in order to receive payment for the Project all invoicing and payment must be completed through the Site.
1.7 Upwork Enterprise.
Freelancer agrees that Freelancer’s profile may be included in the Upwork Client’s Talent Cloud network on the Site for future consideration by the Upwork Client.
1.8 Upwork Enterprise Compliance.
For clarity, and for the
avoidance of doubt, this Independent Contractor Agreement exclusively applies to Upwork Enterprise Compliance clients where UTG is the agent of record.
1.9 Information Provided by Freelancer.
Freelancer represents and warrants that the information is and has been provided to Upwork or UTG is accurate and that Freelancer will provide notice of any material changes, including, without limitation, changes to Freelancer’s location, insurance coverage, tax residence or identification number, or changes to Freelancer’s business licensure, registration, or similar status.
2.
PROJECT
AND PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES.
2.1
Project Work Product.
Freelancer agrees to complete the Project specified by the Upwork Client in the Project Terms and to deliver the Work Product (defined below) to the Upwork Client by any deadline(s) set forth in the Project Terms or such other time as Freelancer may agree. UTG will pay Freelancer for Work Product in accordance with this Agreement and the Project Terms. As used in this Agreement, the term “
Work Product
” means any and all work and work product developed by Freelancer in completing the Project or delivered to the Upwork Client in performing the Project, certain defined end results of the Project, including without limitation any and all Inventions and/or all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Work Products (as those terms are defined in this Agreement) created hereunder. This Agreement is only for the Work Product completed in accordance with this Agreement, and UTG will not pay Freelancer a regular salary or any minimum regular payment.
2.2
Performance of Services.
Freelancer will perform the services necessary to complete the Project in a timely and professional manner, consistent with industry standards, at a location, place and time (including specific hours), that Freelancer deems appropriate. Freelancer has the sole right to determine and control, and will determine and control, the manner and means of performing the Project. In completing the Project, Freelancer will provide and use Freelancer’s own equipment, tools, and other materials at Freelancer’s own expense. UTG is the agent of record for contracting purposes and is not involved in Freelancer’s work performance or completion of the Work Product. Freelancer is not performing services for this Project on Upwork’s behalf. Freelancer will perform the Project Terms without training from UTG or Upwork Client regarding the project performance. Freelancer will not perform services at UTG’s physical business location. Freelancer will not include in the Work Product any material that is owned by, copyrighted by, or that requires licensing, permission or authorization from a third party without the advance written permission of the Upwork Client.
2.3 Agreements with Upwork Client.
Freelancer acknowledges that Freelancer has contracted to perform work for the Upwork Client, and that material conditions of UTG agreeing to contract with Freelancer are that Freelancer maintain the Upwork Client’s confidentiality and that the Upwork Client owns all Work Product created by Freelancer while providing services to the Upwork Client, all as provided in this Agreement.   Freelancer acknowledges that Upwork Client may require Freelancer to enter into a direct agreement addressing confidentiality, transfer of the Work Product, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Work Products created hereunder, and Work Product obligations as a condition to accepting the Project and performing services under it.  In such instances, Freelancer agrees that it will not accept any Project from the Upwork Client or otherwise provide any services to Upwork Client unless and until Freelancer reviews, accepts and enters into any such direct agreement required by the Upwork Client.
3.
COMPENSATION.
UTG will, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, pay Freelancer the fee specified in the Project Terms. Payment will be made by UTG to Freelancer through the Site in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Terms of Service. Freelancer agrees that UTG will make payment under this section provided the Upwork Client’s account is current at the time the Freelancer’s payment is due. Freelancer also agrees that the Upwork Client is responsible for payment of the fee specified in the Project Terms if the Upwork Client’s account is terminated or suspended. Freelancer will be responsible for all expenses incurred in performing services under this Agreement.
4.
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR RELATIONSHIP.
Freelancer’s relationship with UTG, the Upwork Client and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors will be that of an independent contractor, and nothing in this Agreement should be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, or employer-employee relationship.
4.1 No Employment or Agency.
Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Freelancer (a) is not an employee of UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors; (b) is not the agent of UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors; (c) is not authorized to make or hold itself out as authorized to make any statement, representation, contract, or commitment on behalf of UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors; and (d) is not and will not be entitled to any of the benefits that UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors makes available to its employees, such as group insurance, stock plans, profit-sharing or retirement benefits (and waives the right to receive any such benefits).
4.2 Tax and
Regulatory Compliance.
Freelancer is and will at all times remain solely responsible for all tax returns and payments required to be filed with or made to any national, federal, state, or local tax authority with respect to Freelancer’s performance of services and/or receipt of fees under this Agreement.
If applicable, UTG will report amounts paid to Freelancer by filing a Form 1099 with the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), as required by law.  Freelancer agrees to complete the tax information fields on the Site and, as requested by UTG, to complete an IRS Form W-9, Form W-8 or other tax form.   Freelancer accepts sole and exclusive liability for complying with all applicable national, federal, state, provincial and local laws, including laws governing self-employed individuals and other businesses, such as laws related to payment of taxes, social security, disability, and other contributions based on fees paid to Freelancer under this Agreement.  Where such coverage is required by law, Freelancer represents and warrants that Freelancer has appropriate workers’ compensation coverage or, if it does not already have such coverage, agrees to obtain coverage before beginning work under this Agreement.
Neither UTG nor any Upwork Client will withhold or make payments for social security, any pension or social insurance plan or scheme, unemployment insurance or disability insurance contributions, any employer health taxes or other payroll taxes, including penalties and interest, or obtain workers’ compensation insurance on Freelancer’s behalf.
Freelancer hereby agrees to make any such required payments and obtain any required insurance and to indemnify and defend and hold harmless UTG and the Upwork Client from and against any and all such taxes or contributions, including penalties and interest.   Freelancer agrees to provide proof of payment of appropriate taxes on any fees paid to Freelancer under this Agreement upon reasonable request by UTG and in accordance with Section 4.3.
4.3 Withholding.
Upon execution of this Agreement and thereafter as may be reasonably requested by UTG, Freelancer shall complete and provide to UTG any form reasonably requested by UTG or required by a relevant taxing authority in order to certify that UTG is not required to withhold from Freelancer’s fees or pay on Freelancer’s behalf any income, social security, or other tax withholding on any payment of fees under this Agreement.  In the event any such tax is required by law to be withheld by UTG on compensation payable under this Agreement, UTG may terminate this Agreement immediately.  If UTG elects to continue the Agreement, UTG will have the right to pay such tax on behalf of Freelancer to the appropriate governmental authority, offset the compensation by such tax and furnish Freelancer with proof of payment of such tax.  Any such tax required to be withheld will be an expense of and borne by Freelancer. The Freelancer shall abide by applicable law in connection with the performance of the services hereunder as an independent contractor and assumes sole liability for all self-employment (e.g. social security) and income taxes, all other taxes and mandatory duties and contributions under applicable law to any payment for providing services hereunder.
5.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS.
5.1
Definition of
Inventions and Intellectual Property Rights.
“
Invention
”
means any copyrightable material, notes, records, ideas, concepts, information, materials, processes, know-how, improvements, inventions (whether or not protectable under patent laws), discoveries, developments, designs, artwork, formulae, data, databases, programs, other works of authorship, know-how,  techniques, information fixed in any tangible form, related derivative audio-visual reflections, notwithstanding the language and form of expression, including the initial text and source and/or objective code, or trade secrets conceived, authored, discovered, invented, developed or reduced to practice by Freelancer, solely or in collaboration with others, during the term of this Agreement, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein.  “
Intellectual Property Rights
” means all commercial and trade secrets, copyrights and neighboring and related rights, trademarks and service marks, mask work rights (semiconductor topography), design rights, utility patents, patents, trade names, business and domain names, utility models, industrial designs, databases, moral rights  to the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, and other intellectual property rights recognized by the laws of any country. For the avoidance of doubt, this includes any and all of the above items made available to the Upwork Client by the Freelancer in any way.
5.2
Definition of use of Background Technology.
As used in this Agreement, the term “
Background Technology
” means all Inventions developed by Freelancer other than in the course of providing services hereunder and all Inventions acquired or licensed by Freelancer that Freelancer uses in performing services under this Agreement or incorporates in the Work Product. Freelancer will disclose in advance in writing to the Upwork Client and in the Project Terms any Background Technology that Freelancer proposes to incorporate into Work Product or upon which use or distribution of the Work Product will depend. The Upwork Client will have the right to reject the use or incorporation of such Background Technology in the Upwork Client’s sole and absolute discretion. If Freelancer discloses no Background Technology, Freelancer warrants that it will not incorporate any Background Technology into Work Product. Freelancer will separately provide, with each delivery of Work Product to the Upwork Client, a third-party bill of materials that identifies all Background Technology and other third-party materials that have been incorporated into the Work Product and will provide, for each item of Background Technology identified, (a) the name and any associated version number (b) the applicable license or licensing terms, (c) whether the item has been modified by Freelancer, and (d) how the item has been incorporated into, is used by, or is relied upon by the Work Product. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise agreed in the Project Terms, Freelancer agrees that it will not incorporate into Work Product or otherwise deliver to the Upwork Client any software code for which the use or distribution of the code will create (or purport to create) obligations for the Upwork Client to grant any rights or immunities under the Upwork Client’s Intellectual Property Rights to a third party, including, without limitation, any obligation that the Work Product or the Upwork Client software combined with, derived from, or distributed with such Work Product (x) be disclosed or distributed in source code form, (y) be licensed for the purpose of making derivative works, or (z) be redistributable at no charge.
5.3
Ownership and Assignment of Work Produc
t
.
Upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG, Freelancer hereby absolutely, perpetually, unconditionally and irrevocably transfers, and/or assigns (and agrees to transfer, grant, and assign) exclusively to the Upwork Client, without further consideration and in perpetuity, all right, title and interest worldwide in and to all Work Product, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Work Product. To the extent an assignment or transfer of Work Products is not feasible or permissible under applicable law, Freelancer herewith grants to Upwork Client (who accepts same), immediately upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG, the exclusive, irrevocable and transferable rights in all Work Product (including any and all Intellectual Property Rights therein) for use and exploitation to the widest extent possible, in all media and in all known and unknown and all types of exploitation, without limitation as to duration, territory or content. Freelancer’s aforementioned assignment, transfer, and/or grant of rights shall also apply to all documents, development documents, drafts, plans, and their early stages created in connection with the Work Products, and to the current versions, including the corresponding descriptions in all forms (written or electronic, in handwriting or produced technically, regardless of whether they are complete or not) (the “
Documentation
”).  Further, to the extent that any Work Product includes computer software and/or applications, the above assignment, transfer and/or grant of rights shall also include the source code of the software and related documentation. Upwork Client’s rights to any and all Work Product (including any Intellectual Property Rights therein) shall include, but are not limited to, (a) the exclusive right to use the Work Product, which enables the Upwork Client to use the Work Product at its own will in any form and by any way not prohibited by law; (b) the exclusive right to amend, translate, adapt and create secondary works by other means on the basis of or with the use of the Work Product; (c) the exclusive right to create collective works by inclusion into the Work Products or secondary works created on the basis of the Work Product; (d) the exclusive right to authorize any person (grant a license) to use the Work Product; (e) the exclusive right to transfer to any person all proprietary rights to the Work Product; (f) the exclusive right of the Upwork Client to prohibit other persons to use the Work Product without its consent, save for the cases when such use is not illegal according to the law; (g) the exclusive right to preclude other persons from illegal use of the Work Product by other means, including by bringing a lawsuit; (h) the exclusive right to request reinstatement of infringed proprietary rights of the Upwork Client as owner; and (i) any and all other exclusive proprietary rights of intellectual property, established by the law. Upwork Client’s exclusive rights to the Work Product (including without limitation any and all Intellectual Property Rights) transferred, granted, assigned, and/or waived by Freelancer, shall remain in force for the entire period intellectual property rights are entitled to legal protection in all countries, territories, and/or states. Upwork Client shall be entitled to exercise its rights pursuant to this Section 5 and/or to assign these rights wholly or partially to third parties, and/or to grant third parties sublicences and corresponding rights of use, without obtaining the additional consent of the Freelancer. However, the Upwork Client is not obliged to exercise the rights assigned, transferred and/or granted above.
Except as set forth below, Freelancer retains no rights to use the Work Product and agrees not to challenge the validity of the Upwork Client’s exclusive rights in and ownership of the Work Product, including without limitation any and all Intellectual Property Rights therein.   Nothing in this Section 5 or elsewhere in this Agreement, creates or is intended to create, common ownership of the Upwork Client and the Freelancer to the Work Product, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Work Products created hereunder. Freelancer hereby waives unconditionally and irrevocably for the benefit of the Upwork Client and its successors and assigns, without further consideration, any and all moral or similar rights (where waiver of such moral or similar rights is permissible under applicable law) in or to any Work Product (including without limitation, any rights of identification of authorship; any rights of approval; or restrictions or limitations on use, subsequent modification or development of derivative works) in which copyright may subsist in each jurisdiction throughout the world, to the extent that such rights may be waived in each respective jurisdiction. Freelancer agrees that the assignment, transfer, grant, and/or waiver of rights under this Section is effective immediately upon Freelancer’s receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG, without the need for execution of any other document. To the extent any documentation is required to effectuate the transfer, assignment, grant, and/or waiver of rights included herein, Freelancer agrees to, at the request of the Upwork Client and without any right to further consideration, sign all lawful papers, make all rightful oaths and execute all divisional, continuing, continuation-in-part or reissue applications, all assignments, all registration applications and all other instruments or papers, to carry into full force and effect, the assignment hereby made or intended to be made and generally do everything necessary or helpful for title to the Work Product, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein, to be clearly and exclusively owned and held by the Upwork Client. Freelancer hereby grants to the Upwork Client a power of attorney to execute any of the aforementioned documents on Freelancer’s behalf in order to give effect to the assignment hereby made.
5.4
License to Background Technology.
Freelancer hereby automatically upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG, and without further consideration, grants to the Upwork Client a non-exclusive, perpetual, fully-paid and royalty-free, irrevocable, non-terminable and world-wide right, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels or tiers of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform, and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, have made, use, sell, import, offer for sale, and exercise any and all present or future rights in the Background Technology incorporated or used in the Work Product.
5.5 License to or Waiver of Other Rights
.
If Freelancer has any right to the Work Product, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Work Products created hereunder, that cannot be assigned by Freelancer to the Upwork Client, Freelancer hereby automatically upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG unconditionally and irrevocably grants to the Upwork Client, without further consideration and during the term of such rights, an exclusive, even as to Freelancer, irrevocable, perpetual, non-terminable, worldwide, fully paid up and royalty-free license, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels or tiers of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, have made, use, sell, import, offer for sale and exercise any and all such rights.  If Freelancer has any rights to the Work Product that cannot be assigned or licensed to the Upwork Client, Freelancer hereby automatically upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG unconditionally and irrevocably, without further consideration, waives the enforcement of such rights around the world, and all claims and causes of action of any kind against the Upwork Client, its successors and assigns, or related to the Upwork Client’s customers, with respect to such rights, and agrees, at UTG or the Upwork Client’s request and expense, to consent to and join in any action to enforce such rights.
5.6 Assistance.
Freelancer hereby grants consent to the Upwork Client for making and distributing photo and video shots and other publications which include him and/or his/her Work Products within the scope of this contract and for the comprehensive use and exploitation of such shots/publication to the above extent, in particular also for purposes of advertisement and public relations. Freelancer agrees to, at the request of the Upwork Client and without any right to further consideration, to assist the Upwork Client in every way, during and after the term of this Agreement, to obtain and enforce United States and foreign Intellectual Property Rights relating to the Work Product, in all countries, including to sign all lawful papers, make all rightful oaths and execute all divisional, continuing, continuation-in-part or reissue applications, all assignments, all registration applications and all other instruments or papers, to carry into full force and effect the assignment hereby made or intended to be made and generally do everything necessary or helpful for title to the Work Product, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein, to be clearly and exclusively owned and held by the Upwork Client, including testifying in a suit or other proceeding regarding such Inventions. Freelancer hereby grants to the Upwork Client a power of attorney to execute any of the aforementioned documents on Freelancer’s behalf in order to give effect to the assignment hereby made. This power of attorney shall be deemed coupled with an interest, and shall be irrevocable. Freelancer further agrees that Freelancer’s obligations under this Section 5.6 shall continue after termination of this Agreement.
5.7 Compensation.
No additional payment shall be made for the above-mentioned assignments, transfers, and/or grants, which are included in the compensation (Section 3 of this Agreement), subject only to the mandatory payment provisions under applicable law.
6. CONFLICTING PROJECTS.
UTG and the Upwork Client acknowledge that Freelancer may enter into other contracts and accept work from any other persons or entities during the term of this Agreement; however, Freelancer agrees not to enter into a contract or accept an obligation that would conflict with the provisions of this Agreement or prevent Freelancer from meeting its obligations under this Agreement. Freelancer represents and warrants that there is no such contract or obligation in effect as of the Effective Date. Freelancer further agrees not to disclose to, deliver to, or induce UTG or the Upwork Client to use any confidential information that belongs to anyone other than UTG, the Upwork Client or Freelancer.
7. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION OF THE UPWORK CLIENT.
Freelancer agrees that during the term of this Agreement and thereafter, except as expressly authorized in writing by the Upwork Client, Freelancer (a) will not use or permit the use of Client Confidential Information (defined below) in any manner or for any purpose not expressly set forth in this Agreement; (b) will not disclose, lecture upon, publish, or permit others to disclose, lecture upon, or publish any such Client Confidential Information to any third party without first obtaining the Upwork Client’s express written consent on a case-by-case basis; (c) will limit access to Client Confidential Information to Freelancer Personnel who need to know such information in connection with the Project and who are likewise bound by non-use and non-disclosure obligations at least as restrictive as those set forth in this section; and (d) will not remove any tangible embodiment of any Client Confidential Information from the Upwork Client’s premises without the Upwork Client’s prior written consent. “
Client Confidential Information
” means and includes, but is not limited to, all Work Product and all non-public information related to the business of the Upwork Client or any of its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors and the actual or anticipated research and development of the Upwork Client or any of its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors, including without limitation (i) trade secrets, inventions (whether or not protectable under patent laws), ideas, processes, computer source and object code, formulae, data, databases, programs, other works of authorship, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, techniques, and artwork; (ii) information regarding products or plans for research and development, marketing and business plans, budgets, financial statements, contracts, prices, suppliers, and customers; (iii) information regarding the skills and compensation of the Upwork Client’s employees, contractors, and any other Freelancers; (iv) the existence of any business discussions, negotiations, or agreements between the Upwork Client and any third party; and (v) all such information related to any third party that is disclosed during the course of the Project.  Confidential Information will not include any such information which Freelancer can establish (x) was publicly known or made generally available prior to the time of disclosure to Freelancer; (y) becomes publicly known or made generally available after disclosure to Freelancer through no wrongful action or inaction of Freelancer; or (z) is in the rightful possession of Freelancer, without confidentiality obligations, at the time of disclosure as shown by Freelancer’s then-contemporaneous written records; provided that any combination of individual items of information shall not be deemed to be within any of the foregoing exceptions merely because one or more of the individual items are within such exception, unless the combination as a whole is within such exception.  To the extent Freelancer (1) collects, stores, transmits, discloses, processes, and/or otherwise uses information that identifies a particular individual (“Personal Information”) or (2) accesses Upwork Client’s computer systems or networks in providing services under this Agreement, Freelancer will comply with the privacy and security requirements in
Exhibit 1
, and will ensure Freelancer Personnel comply with such requirements, for the purpose of conforming with applicable laws.
8. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION OF UTG.
Freelancer agrees that during the term of this Agreement and thereafter, except as expressly authorized in writing by UTG, it (a) will not use or permit the use of UTG Confidential Information (defined below) in any manner or for any purpose not expressly set forth in this Agreement; (b) will not disclose, lecture upon, publish, or permit others to disclose, lecture upon, or publish any such UTG Confidential Information to any third party without first obtaining UTG’s express written consent on a case-by-case basis; (c) will limit access to UTG Confidential Information to Freelancer Personnel who need to know such information in connection with their work for UTG and who are likewise bound by non-use and non-disclosure obligations at least as restrictive as those set forth in this section; and (d) will not remove any tangible embodiment of any UTG Confidential Information from UTG’s premises without UTG’s prior written consent. “
UTG Confidential Information
” means and includes, but is not limited to, all non-public information related to UTG’s and/or its affiliates’, subsidiaries’, or parent company’s business and its/their actual or anticipated research and development, including without limitation (i) trade secrets, inventions (whether or not protectable under patent laws), ideas, processes, computer source and object code, formulae, data, databases, programs, other works of authorship, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, techniques, and artwork; (ii) information regarding products or plans for research and development, marketing and business plans, budgets, financial statements, contracts, prices, suppliers, and customers; (iii) information regarding the skills and compensation of UTG’s, its affiliates’, subsidiaries’, or parent company’s employees, contractors, and any other Freelancers; (iv) the existence of any business discussions, negotiations, or agreements between UTG, its affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent company, and any third party; and (v) all such information related to any third party that is disclosed during the course of the Project.  Confidential Information will not include any such information which Freelancer can establish (x) was publicly known or made generally available prior to the time of disclosure to Freelancer; (y) becomes publicly known or made generally available after disclosure to Freelancer through no wrongful action or inaction of Freelancer; or (z) is in the rightful possession of Freelancer, without confidentiality obligations, at the time of disclosure as shown by Freelancer’s then-contemporaneous written records; provided that any combination of individual items of information shall not be deemed to be within any of the foregoing exceptions merely because one or more of the individual items are within such exception, unless the combination as a whole is within such exception.
Immunity for Certain Disclosures.
As set forth in the U.S. Defend Trade Secrets Act, 18 U.S.C. section 1833, please note that a disclosure of trade secrets or other Confidential Information is immune from prosecution or civil action under U.S. Federal or State trade secret law if the disclosure (a) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney; and (ii) solely for the purpose of reporting or investigating a suspected violation of law; or (b) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal. Should any governmental authority, supervisory authority, court of law or an authority similar to a court of law, officially request Confidential Information received pursuant to this Agreement from Freelancer, and Freelancer is legally obligated to provide such requested information, Freelancer will not be liable for any breach of confidentiality or obligations of confidentiality, provided Freelancer takes immediate steps to inform UTG and Upwork Client of the official request for disclosure of the Confidential Information.   UTG and Upwork Client reserve the right to contest any such request from the relevant authority.
Provision Applicable to New York City.
Nothing in this Agreement, including but not limited to its provisions relating to confidentiality, prohibits (or should be construed as prohibiting) any Freelancer residing in, or engaged to provide services in, New York City under this Agreement from disclosing the terms of this Agreement to the Director of the Office of Labor Standards.
9. FREELANCER’S AGENTS AND SUBCONTRACTORS.
Freelancer is free to rely on its employees or subcontractors to assist with performance of services under this Agreement
.
If at any time Freelancer has any employee, independent contractor or other person or entity performing work on Freelancer’s behalf in connection with the Project, however, Freelancer agrees Freelancer remains responsible for the quality of the Work Product and agrees to the following representations and obligations:
9.1
Project
and Performance of Services.
a.
Work Product Ownership, Confidential Information and Other Contractual Provisions
. Before any employee, independent contractor or other person or entity employed or engaged by Freelancer (collectively, “
Freelancer Personnel
”) performs any services in connection with the Project or has access to any Client Confidential Information or UTG Confidential Information, Freelancer will enter into a binding written agreement with such Freelancer Personnel that (i) contains provisions with the same effect as the Agreement sections titled “Intellectual Property Rights,” “Confidential Information of Upwork Client” and “Confidential Information of UTG”; and (ii) specifies that Freelancer Personnel do not have any employment relationship with Upwork Client or UTG or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors and are not entitled to or eligible for any benefits that Upwork Client or UTG or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors may make available to any of their respective employees. In addition, Freelancer will limit access to Client Confidential Information and UTG Confidential Information to Freelancer Personnel who have a reasonable need to have such access in order to perform services for the Project.
b.
Freelancer Personnel Not Employed by Upwork Client or UTG.
Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Freelancer Personnel are not engaged by, supervised by, directed by or assigned work by Upwork Client, UTG, or any of their respective parents, subsidiaries or affiliates. Freelancer further acknowledges and agrees that neither Upwork Client nor UTG determine or control, or have the right to determine or control, any terms and conditions of employment or engagement of any Freelancer Personnel, including without limitation their selection, hiring, work assignment, work hours, compensation, work methods, discipline, working conditions, or termination. For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer Personnel are not employees of Upwork Client or UTG or any of their respective parents, subsidiaries or affiliates. Freelancer will be fully responsible for the acts, work and safety of Freelancer Personnel at all times.
c. Freelancer Personnel Compensation, Taxes and Benefits.
In accordance with all applicable law, Freelancer will be solely responsible for determining and paying all compensation of Freelancer Personnel and will be solely responsible for and pay any taxes, contributions and/or benefits owed to or on behalf of Freelancer Personnel. Neither Upwork Client nor UTG nor any of their respective parents, subsidiaries or affiliates will be liable to Freelancer or to Freelancer Personnel for Freelancer’s failure to perform Freelancer’s compensation, tax or benefit obligations with respect to Freelancer Personnel. Freelancer will indemnify, defend and hold Upwork Client and UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors harmless from and against all such taxes, contributions and benefits and will comply with all associated governmental regulations, including the filing of all necessary reports and tax returns.
d. Background Screening of Freelancer Personnel.
If requested by UTG or Upwork Client and permitted by applicable law, Freelancer will conduct reasonable background screening measures with respect to Freelancer Personnel (the “
Screenings
”) and will be responsible for all costs and fees relating to such Screenings. Freelancer will conduct Screenings in accordance with applicable laws and will obtain written authorization from Freelancer Personnel to share the results of such screening with Upwork Client and/or UTG upon request.
e. Work Diary
. Freelancer agrees to record and invoice through Work Diary on the Site all work performed by any Freelancer Personnel for Projects performed on a time and material or hourly basis under this Agreement.
Freelancer acknowledges that UTG has no obligation to pay Freelancer, and may not approve payment of Freelancer, for time spent on hourly Projects that is not recorded in the Work Diary.
9.2 Freelancer Responsible for Freelancer Personnel.
a.  Employees.
With respect to Freelancer Personnel,
Freelancer is solely responsible for all statutory and contractual benefits including but not limited to salary, allowances, perquisites, bonus, overtime, leave, holidays, provident fund contributions, employees’ state insurance contributions, labor welfare fund contributions, professional taxes, retrenchment compensations, gratuities, notice pay, and will comply with all applicable employment laws, including without limitation laws governing workers’ compensation, unemployment and disability insurance, health insurance and other employee benefits, wage and hour, employment discrimination and harassment, leaves of absence, and health and safety.  Freelancer shall ensure that the wages paid to the Freelancer Personnel are not less than the minimum wages prescribed under applicable law. Freelancer is responsible for providing meal and rest breaks to employees in accordance with any applicable laws and for complying with all paycheck requirements.   If applicable, Freelancer will also comply with all licensing and other regulatory steps necessary to employ workers.   Freelancer assumes full responsibility for any claims brought by, on behalf of or in connection with Freelancer’s employees (or other Freelancer Personnel alleging they are or should have been classified as employees) and agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Upwork Client, UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates and successors harmless from and against any such claims,  including but not limited to claims for non-payment of any amounts to Freelancer Personnel.
b.  Independent Contractors.
With respect to Freelancer Personnel, Freelancer is solely responsible for properly classifying and engaging any Freelancer Personnel as independent contractors or as its employees and will comply with all applicable laws defining or governing the independent contractor or employment relationship. Freelancer warrants and represents that any Freelancer Personnel treated as an independent contractor is properly classified and assumes full responsibility for any claims brought by, on behalf of or in connection with Freelancer Personnel working as independent contractors and agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Upwork Client, UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates and successors harmless from and against any such claims.
9.3 Intellectual Property Rights.
Freelancer agrees that all Inventions conceived, discovered, developed or reduced to practice by Freelancer Personnel, solely or in collaboration with others, during the term of this Agreement that relate in any manner to the business of Upwork Client will belong exclusively to Upwork Client.  Freelancer will ensure that Freelancer Personnel execute appropriate agreements with Freelancer to confirm such ownership, narrowed if and to the extent required by applicable law to be enforceable in the applicable jurisdiction, and to confirm that Freelancer Personnel will not challenge the validity of Upwork Client’s ownership in Work Product, including without limitation the Intellectual Property Rights in Work Product.
9.4 Indemnification.
In addition to the indemnification obligations set forth elsewhere in this Agreement, Freelancer will defend, indemnify, and hold harmless UTG, Upwork Client and each of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates and successors, individually and collectively, against any damage, cost, loss or expense arising from any claim, suit, proceeding, investigation, government inquiry or other action brought against UTG, Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors (a) alleging that any Freelancer Personnel is an employee of UTG, Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors or (b) arising out of the failure (whether negligent, willful, intentional, or unintended in cases of strict liability) of Freelancer to comply with this Agreement or any applicable law or regulation.
10. FREELANCER’S COVENANTS, REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES.
Freelancer hereby covenants, represents and warrants to UTG and to Upwork Client that (a) Freelancer will perform the services necessary to perform the Project in a timely and professional manner, consistent with industry standards, and all in accordance with this Agreement; (b) except any pre-approved Background Technology used or incorporated as part of the Work Product, the Work Product will be an original work of Freelancer and any third parties will have executed assignment of rights prior to being allowed to participate in the development of the Work Product; (c) the Work Product will fully conform to the requirements and terms set forth in this Agreement, including any Project Terms; (d) the Work Product will be free from material errors, faults and defects of any kind; (e) the Work Product will not contain any virus, Trojan horse, malicious code, trap door, time bomb, or shutdown mechanism, or any other software code or functionality that will “lock” or prevent the use of or access to the Work Product or otherwise cause the Work Product to cease functioning, or which is otherwise designed to harm any systems, servers, computers or websites of Upwork Client, UTG or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors; (f) neither the Work Product nor any element thereof does or will infringe or misappropriate the Intellectual Property Rights of any third party; (g) neither the Work Product nor any element thereof will be subject to any restrictions or to any mortgages, liens, pledges, security interests, or encumbrances; (h) Freelancer will not grant, directly or indirectly, any rights or interest whatsoever in the Work Product to third parties other than the Upwork Client; (i) Freelancer has full right and power to enter into and perform this Agreement without the consent of any third party; (j) Freelancer has an unqualified right to grant the license to all Background Technology as set forth in the section titled “License to Background Technology”; (k) if Freelancer is required to possess or maintain any license, registration, or other authorization necessary to provide the Work Product or to provide independent contractor services under this Agreement, then it possess such a license, registration, or other authorization and will maintain such license, registration, or other authorization during the term of this Agreement; (l) Freelancer will not use or incorporate as part of the Work Product any Open Source Code other than as expressly authorized in this Agreement; (m) Freelancer will promptly update changes to Freelancer’s contact information as outlined in the Terms of Service; and (n) Freelancer will comply with all laws and regulations applicable to Freelancer’s obligations under this Agreement.
11. UTG DISCLAIMER; LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
11.1 Disclaimer.
UTG MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES WITH RESPECT TO THE PROJECT, THE PROJECT TERMS, OR IN CONNECTION WITH UTG’S PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES HEREUNDER, AND FREELANCER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT THE SAME ARE BEING PROVIDED OR PERFORMED HEREUNDER “AS IS” AND WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. UTG HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ALL SUCH REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED, WRITTEN, ORAL OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, TITLE, AND/OR VALIDITY. SOME STATES AND JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW FOR ALL THE FOREGOING EXCLUSIONS, SO TO THAT EXTENT, IF ANY, SOME OR ALL OF THESE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY.
11.2 Limitation of Liability.
IN NO EVENT WILL UTG, UPWORK CLIENT OR ANY OF THEIR PARENTS, SUBSIDIARIES, AFFILIATES, OR SUCCESSORS BE LIABLE TO FREELANCER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST PROFITS), EXEMPLARY, OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES, EVEN IF THEY WERE ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY UNDER WHICH ANY SUCH DAMAGES ARE SOUGHT. SOME STATES AND JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW FOR ALL THE FOREGOING EXCLUSIONS AND LIMITATIONS OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO TO THAT EXTENT, IF ANY, SOME OR ALL OF THESE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY.
12. INDEMNIFICATION.
Freelancer will defend, indemnify, and hold harmless UTG, Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors, individually and collectively, against any and all damage, cost, loss or expense arising from any claim, suit or proceeding, actual or alleged, brought or asserted against UTG, Upwork Client and/or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors (a) alleging that any Work Product that Freelancer delivers pursuant to this Agreement or the Project infringes upon any intellectual property rights; (b) alleging that any Work Product that Freelancer delivers pursuant to this Agreement or the Project misappropriates any trade secrets of UTG, Upwork Client and any of their parents and affiliates, or any third party; (c) arising from or related to Freelancer’s breach of any representation or warranty; (d) arising from or related to Freelancer’s failure to pay any taxes or fees due as a result of Freelancer’s work under this Agreement; (e) arising from or related to Freelancer’s or Freelancer’s personnel’s failure to comply with any applicable law or regulation; or (f) arising from or related to Freelancer’s breach of any other terms of this Agreement.
13. INSURANCE.
Freelancer, at its sole cost and expense, will maintain appropriate insurance in accordance with any applicable laws and regulations and in no event less than industry standards, including but not limited to unemployment and workers’ compensation insurance. Without limiting the foregoing sentence, Freelancer and UTG agree that for any Project where the fees are anticipated to be over $75,000, a minimum of $1,000,000 professional liability insurance is reasonable and appropriate and Freelancer will maintain such levels of insurance.  Upon request, Freelancer will furnish proof of insurance in a form acceptable to UTG and the Upwork Client.  Freelancer agrees that Freelancer will promptly inform UTG of any cancellation or lapse in coverage required to be maintained by this Agreement.
14.TERM AND TERMINATION.
14.1 Term.
The term of this Agreement (the “
Term
”) will begin on the Effective Date and will terminate on the first to occur of: (a) the end date in the Project Terms; or (b) the date that the Project is fully completed and thus closed on the Site.
14.2 Termination with Cause.
Either Party has the right to terminate this Agreement immediately in the event that the other Party has materially breached the Agreement and fails to cure such breach within 15 calendar days of receipt of notice by the non-breaching Party, setting forth in reasonable detail the nature of the breach. UTG may also terminate this Agreement immediately, in writing, in its sole discretion in the event of Freelancer’s material breach of section 5, 6, 7, 8 or 9 (including subsections), or if Freelancer engages in unlawful activities while rendering the services specified in the Project.
14.3 Return of Property.
Upon termination of the Agreement or upon UTG’s or Upwork Client’s request at any other time, Freelancer will deliver to UTG or Upwork Client, as applicable, all of UTG’s or the Upwork Client’s property together with all copies thereof and any other documents or materials that contain any Work Product, Client Confidential Information or UTG Confidential Information.
14.4 Survival.
The following provisions will survive the expiration or termination of this Agreement for any reason: sections 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14.3, 14.4, 15, and 16, each including subsections. For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that the license rights and other rights granted by Freelancer in section 5 above are perpetual in nature and will continue in perpetuity notwithstanding the expiration or termination of this Agreement, regardless of the cause, and the expiration or termination of this Agreement will not affect, limit, or otherwise impair such rights.
15. DISPUTES; ARBITRATION PROVISION.
15.1 Dispute Process.
The Parties agree to resolve any claim, dispute, or controversy that arises out of or relates to (a) this Agreement, (b) Freelancer’s relationship with or work for UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors (each of which are express third-party beneficiaries of this Arbitration Provision), including without limitation any claimed employment, or the termination of any relationship referred to in this Agreement, and/or (c) the Site or the Site Services (each, a “
Claim
”) in accordance with this section 15 (sometimes referred to as “
Arbitration Provision
”). Without limiting the rights of Upwork and UTG in any way, Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Upwork Client may assign its Claim to Upwork or UTG and, if Upwork Client does so, Upwork or UTG may pursue recovery of damages, fees, costs and any other remedies permitted by law arising out of the Claim directly from Freelancer.
15.2 Informal Dispute Resolution.
Before serving a demand for arbitration of a Claim, or otherwise seeking relief for any Claim, Freelancer and UTG agree to first notify the other Party or Parties (the “
Notice
”).  The Parties will then seek informal resolution of the Claim.   The Notice must be in writing and include Freelancer’s name, pertinent account information, a brief description of the Claim, and the drafting Party’s contact information, so that the receiving Party may evaluate and attempt to informally resolve the Claim.  The receiving Party will have 60 calendar days from the date of its receipt of the Notice to informally resolve the Claim, which, if successful, will avoid the need for further action.  Notice to UTG of the Claim will be sent to Upwork Global Inc. Headquarters as listed on its Site (https://www.upwork.com/about/contact/), Attn: Legal or
legalnotices@upwork.com
.  Notice to the Upwork Client will be made through any means by which Freelancer communicates with the Upwork Client about the Work Product.   In the event Freelancer provides notice to Upwork Client of a Claim by Freelancer against Upwork Client, Freelancer agrees to provide courtesy notice of such Claim to UTG via one or more of the aforementioned means within twenty-four (24) hours of the time Freelancer first provides notice to Upwork Client, regardless of whether or not Freelancer’s Claim expressly or directly involves, concerns, or relates to UTG. Notice to Freelancer will be provided to the most current physical or email address on the Site.
15.3 Binding Arbitration and Class Action/Jury Trial Waiver (Does Not Apply to Freelancers Located Outside the United States and Its Territories).
This Arbitration Provision applies to all Freelancers except Freelancers located outside of the United States and its territories. In the unlikely event the Parties are unable to resolve a Claim within 60 calendar days of the receipt of the applicable Notice, Freelancer, UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors, and Upwork Client and any of its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors agree to resolve the Claim by final and binding arbitration before an arbitrator from JAMS. JAMS may be contacted at
www.jamsadr.com.
If for any reason JAMS will not administer the arbitration, either Party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction with authority over the location where the arbitration will be conducted for appointment of a neutral arbitrator.
a. Scope of Arbitration Agreement and Conduct of Arbitration
Arbitration as provided in this Arbitration Provision is governed by the United States Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. §§ 1
et seq
.).  This Arbitration Provision applies to any and all Claims (as defined in section 15.1).  For the avoidance of doubt, Claims include, but are not limited to, all claims, disputes, or controversies arising out of or relating to this Agreement, the Project, the Terms of Service, escrow payments or agreements, any payments or monies Freelancer claims are due, trade secrets, unfair competition, false advertising, consumer protection, privacy, compensation, worker classification, minimum wage, seating, expense reimbursement, overtime, breaks and rest periods, termination, retaliation, discrimination or harassment and all claims arising under the Defend Trade Secrets Act, the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. §1981, the Rehabilitation Act, the Civil Rights Acts of 1866 and 1871, the Civil Rights Act of 1991, the Pregnancy Discrimination Act, the Equal Pay Act, the Americans With Disabilities Act, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the Family Medical Leave Act, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, the Affordable Care Act, the Genetic Information Non-Discrimination Act, the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, all state statutes or regulations addressing the same or similar subject matters, and all other federal, state or local legal claims arising out of or relating to Freelancer’s relationship with or work for UTG or the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors and/or the termination of that relationship.  The Upwork Client is an express third party beneficiary and may enforce the agreement to the full extent as though it were a signatory.
Disputes between the parties that may not be subject to a pre-dispute arbitration agreement as provided by the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Public Law 111-203), the Ending Forced Arbitration of Sexual Assault and Sexual Harassment Act, or as provided by an Act of Congress or lawful, enforceable Executive Order, are excluded from the coverage of this Agreement.
Except as otherwise provided herein, arbitration will be conducted in Santa Clara County, California in accordance with the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures under the Optional Expedited Arbitration Procedures then in effect for JAMS.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Claims by Freelancers that allege employment or worker classification disputes will be conducted within 25 miles of where Freelancer is located in accordance with the JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules and Procedures then in effect.  The JAMS arbitration rules may be found at
www.jamsadr.com
or by searching online for “JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures” or “JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules.”  The Parties agree that any Party will have the right to appear at the arbitration by telephone and/or video rather than in person.
The Parties will follow the applicable JAMS rules with respect to arbitration fees.  In any arbitration under the JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules and Procedures, Freelancer will pay JAMS arbitration fees only to the extent those fees are no greater than the filing or initial appearance fees applicable to court actions in the jurisdiction where the arbitration will be conducted, with UTG to make up the difference, if any.  The arbitrator must follow applicable law and may award only those remedies that would have applied had the matter been heard in court.  Judgment may be entered on the arbitrator’s decision in any court having jurisdiction.
This Arbitration Provision does not apply to litigation to which Freelancer is a party that is or was already pending in a state or federal court or arbitration before the Effective Date.  This Arbitration Provision also does not apply to claims for workers compensation, state disability insurance or unemployment insurance benefits, or disputes that an applicable federal statute expressly states cannot be arbitrated or subject to a pre-dispute arbitration agreement.  Either Freelancer or UTG may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for provisional injunctive relief in connection with an arbitrable controversy, but only upon the ground that the award to which that party may be entitled may be rendered ineffectual without such relief; the arbitrator will render the final judgment in the matter.  Any such application shall not be deemed a waiver of this Agreement to arbitrate.   The court to which the application is made is authorized to consider the merits of the arbitrable controversy to the extent it deems necessary in making its ruling, but only to the extent permitted by applicable law.
Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents Freelancer from making a report to or filing a claim or charge with a government agency, including without limitation the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, U.S. Department of Labor, U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, National Labor Relations Board, or Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents the investigation by a government agency of any report, claim or charge otherwise covered by this Arbitration Provision.   This Arbitration Provision also does not prevent federal administrative agencies from adjudicating claims and awarding remedies based on those claims, even if the claims would otherwise be covered by this Arbitration Provision.  Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents or excuses a party from satisfying any conditions precedent and/or exhausting administrative remedies under applicable law before bringing a claim in arbitration. UTG will not retaliate against Freelancer for filing a claim with an administrative agency or for exercising rights (individually or in concert with others) under Section 7 of the National Labor Relations Act
b. Interpretation and Enforcement of this Arbitration Provision
This Arbitration Provision is the full and complete agreement relating to the formal resolution of Claims and replaces all prior agreements between Freelancer and UTG regarding the arbitration of disputes covered by this Arbitration Provision. For the avoidance of doubt, this Arbitration Provision covers, and the arbitrator will have exclusive jurisdiction to decide, all disputes arising out of or relating to the interpretation, enforcement, or application of this Arbitration Provision, including the enforceability, revocability, scope, or validity of the Arbitration Provision or any portion of the Arbitration Provision. All such matters will be decided by an arbitrator and not by a court. The Parties expressly agree that the arbitrator and not a court or jury will decide any question of whether the parties agreed to arbitrate, including but not limited to any claim that all or part of this Agreement is void or voidable.  However, the preceding sentence does not apply to claims under the Ending Forced Arbitration of Sexual Assault and Sexual Harassment Act, and it does not apply to the Class and Collective Action Waivers or California Private Attorneys General Act Individual Action Requirement as each is described below. Notwithstanding any other language in this Agreement and/or any rules or procedures that might otherwise apply by virtue of this Agreement (including without limitation the JAMS Rules discussed below) or any amendments and/or modifications to those rules, any disputes concerning the Ending Forced Arbitration of Sexual Assault and Sexual Harassment Act  and/or the validity of the Class and Collective Action Waivers or the California Private Attorneys General Act Individual Action Requirement will be determined only by a court of competent jurisdiction and not by an arbitrator.
In the event any portion of this Arbitration Provision is deemed unenforceable, the remainder of this Arbitration Provision will be enforceable.  If any portion of the Class Action Waiver or Collective Action Waiver in subsection c, below, of this Arbitration Provision is deemed to be invalid, unenforceable, unconscionable, void or voidable by final judicial determination, the Parties agree that such portion(s) shall be severable from this Agreement and that this Arbitration Provision will be enforced to the fullest extent permitted by law. The Parties further agree that in such instances, the class or collective action must be litigated in a civil court of competent jurisdiction, not in arbitration.
c. Class and Collective Action Waiver and Jury Trial Waiver
The Parties understand that this arbitration provision affects their ability to participate in class, collective or representative actions. The Parties agree to bring any dispute in arbitration on an individual basis only, and not on a class, collective, or representative basis on behalf of others.  There will be no right or authority for any dispute to be brought, heard or arbitrated as a class action and the Arbitrator will have no authority to hear or preside over any such claim (“Class Action Waiver”).   There will be no right or authority for any dispute to be brought, heard or arbitrated as a collective action and the Arbitrator will have no authority to hear or preside over any such claim (“Collective Action Waiver”).  The Collective Action Waiver shall be severable from this Agreement if there is a final judicial determination that the Collective Action Waiver is invalid, unenforceable, unconscionable, void or voidable.  In such instances, the collective action must be litigated in a civil court of competent jurisdiction – not in arbitration.  Freelancer will not be retaliated against, disciplined or threatened with discipline as a result of exercising any rights under Section 7 of the National Labor Relations Act, if applicable, by filing or participating in a class or collective action in any forum.  However, any Party may lawfully seek enforcement of this Arbitration Provision and the Class Action Waiver and Collective Action Waiver under the Federal Arbitration Act and seek dismissal of such class or collective actions or claims.
Subject to the provisions in Sections 15.1 through 15.3(d) of this Agreement, in the event that a court of competent jurisdiction determines that a Claim by either Party against the other must be litigated in a civil court of competent jurisdiction and may not be arbitrated, the Parties hereby waive and covenant not to assert their right to a trial by jury of any and all disputes, and the Parties further agree that their mutual waiver of a trial by jury shall be binding upon their respective successors and assigns and upon all persons and entities asserting rights or claims or otherwise acting on behalf of the Parties or their successors or assigns.
d. California Private Attorneys General Act ("PAGA") Individual Action Requirement
The parties agree to arbitrate PAGA claims on an individual basis only. Therefore, any claim by Freelancer under PAGA to recover statutory penalties, or any other individual relief must be arbitrated under this Agreement. Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that the Arbitrator is without authority to preside over any PAGA claim by Freelancer on behalf of any other person or joined by or consolidated with another person’s PAGA claim. This PAGA Individual Action Requirement clause will be severable from this Agreement if there is a final judicial determination that it is invalid, unenforceable, unconscionable, void or voidable.  In such case, the PAGA action must be litigated in a civil court of competent jurisdiction—not in arbitration—but the portion of the PAGA Individual Action Requirement that is enforceable will be enforced in arbitration.
e. Right to Opt Out of the Arbitration Provision.
Freelancer may opt out of the Arbitration Provision by notifying UTG in writing within 30 calendar days of the Effective Date.
To opt out, Freelancer must send a written notification to UTG to Upwork Global Inc. Headquarters as listed on its Site (https://www.upwork.com/about/contact/), Attn: Legal or
legalnotices@upwork.com
that includes (a) Freelancer’s account username, (b) Freelancer’s name, (c) Freelancer’s address, (d) Freelancer’s telephone number, (e) Freelancer’s email address, and (f) a statement that Freelancer wishes to opt out of the Arbitration Provision. Freelancer understands that Freelancer has the right to consult with counsel of Freelancer’s choice concerning this Agreement and the Arbitration Provision.
16. GENERAL PROVISIONS
16.1
Choice of Law.
Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, this Agreement and any Claims will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to its conflict of law provisions and excluding the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods (CISG); provided, however, that any Claims by any Freelancer located within the United States will be governed by the law of the state in which such Freelancer resided at the time the Project was performed.
16.2 Severability.
If any provision of this Agreement is, for any reason, held to be invalid or unenforceable, the other provisions of this Agreement will be unimpaired and the invalid or unenforceable provision will be deemed modified so that it is valid and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law.  Sections 15.3(b) and (b) govern severability of the Class Action Waiver and Collective Action Waiver. Section 15.3(d) governs the severability of the PAGA Individual Action Requirement.
16.3 No Assignment
.
This Agreement, and the Parties’ respective rights and obligations herein, may not be assigned or otherwise transferred by either Party without the other’s prior written consent, and any attempted assignment or transfer in violation of the foregoing will be null and void; provided, however, UTG may assign this Agreement, its rights and its obligations to an affiliate or to any successor to its business or assets to which this Agreement relates, whether by merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization or otherwise. The terms of this Agreement will be binding upon assignees.
16.4 Injunctive Relief.
Freelancer acknowledges that, because its services are personal and unique and because Freelancer will have access to Confidential Information of UTG and Upwork Client, any breach of this Agreement by Freelancer would cause irreparable injury to UTG or Upwork Client for which monetary damages would not be an adequate remedy and, therefore, will entitle UTG or Upwork Client to injunctive relief (including specific performance). The rights and remedies provided to each Party in this Agreement are cumulative and in addition to any other rights and remedies available to such Party at law or in equity not otherwise waived by this Agreement.
16.5 Waiver.
Any waiver or failure to enforce any provision of this Agreement on one occasion will not be deemed a waiver of any other provision or of such provision on any other occasion.
16.6 Export.
Freelancer agrees not to export, directly or indirectly, any U.S. technical data acquired from UTG, Upwork or Upwork Client, or any products utilizing such data, to countries outside the United States, because such export could be in violation of the United States export laws or regulations.
16.7 Entire Agreement.
This Agreement is the final, complete and exclusive agreement of the Parties with respect to the subject matters hereof and supersedes and merges all prior discussions between the Parties with respect to such subject matters. No modification of or amendment to this Agreement, or any waiver of any rights under this Agreement, will be effective unless in writing and signed by Freelancer and UTG.
16.8 Electronic Acceptance.
The Parties expressly agree that this Agreement may be electronically signed and accepted, and that the Site’s record of Freelancer’s acceptance will be treated, for purposes of validity, enforceability and admissibility, the same as written signatures.
THE PARTIES AGREE THAT BY ACCEPTING THIS AGREEMENT VIA THE SITE, FREELANCER HAS BOUND ITSELF TO THIS AGREEMENT AND CREATED AN AGREEMENT THAT IS ENFORCEABLE AGAINST ALL PARTIES.
FREELANCER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT FREELANCER HAS BEEN GIVEN THE OPPORTUNITY TO OBTAIN INDEPENDENT LEGAL ADVICE WITH RESPECT TO THIS AGREEMENT BEFORE ACCEPTING IT, AND THAT FREELANCER VOLUNTARILY AGREES TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT WITH FULL KNOWLEDGE AND UNDERSTANDING OF ITS TERMS.
EXHIBIT A
Privacy and Information Security Exhibit
To the extent Freelancer (1) collects, stores, transmits, discloses, processes, and/or otherwise uses information that identifies a particular individual (“Personal Information”) or (2) accesses Upwork Client’s computer systems or networks in providing services under this Agreement, Freelancer will comply with the privacy and security requirements in this Exhibit for the purpose of conforming with applicable laws regarding protection of Personal Information.  Freelancer is expected to be familiar with such laws and take whatever additional security measures may be warranted by the particular circumstances.
Privacy Requirements
1. Personal Information:
Freelancer will collect, store, transmit, disclose, process, destroy, or otherwise process Personal Information only (a) for purposes of providing the Services and as otherwise instructed by Upwork Client, (b) in accordance with this Exhibit 1, and (c) in compliance with applicable law.  In the event of any conflict between applicable law and this Exhibit 1, Freelancer will comply with applicable law.  Personal Information includes any information related to an identified or identifiable natural person where such information is protected under applicable data protection law.
2. Notification Of Security Incident:
Freelancer will notify Upwork Client of any actual or suspected security incident involving Personal Information as soon as possible after becoming aware of the incident, but never later than 24 hours after learning of the incident.  Freelancer will cooperate with Upwork Client on any investigation of the security incident.  A “security incident” is a breach of security leading to the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Information transmitted, stored or otherwise processed.
3. Security Standards:
Freelancer will utilize reasonable and physical, technical and administrative safeguards to protect Personal Information and comply at all times with applicable laws concerning the protection and securing of Personal Information. For as long as Freelancer has access to Personal Information or to Upwork Client’s systems/networks, Freelancer will update security practices and controls at Freelancer’s own cost.
4. Malware Protection:
Freelancer will use up-to-date, commercially reasonable virus protection software (i.e. anti-virus) for the duration of the Engagement.
5. Device and Software Management:
Before the start of the Engagement and at all times while Freelancer accesses any Personal Information or Upwork Client’s systems/networks, Freelancer will:
Use up-to-date software and firmware that includes any current patches and updates and that is configured to automatically update/patch;
Use a firewall to protect Freelancer’s own information systems;
Use strong, unique passwords of at least 8 characters (with a mix of letters, numbers, and special characters where possible) for access to devices and applications;
Use password-activated screensavers to lock hardware or devices after a period of inactivity;
Configure devices and applications to require new passwords at least every 90 days;
Ensure that multiple failed login attempts (no more than 10) to devices and applications result in lockout (check security settings on applications); and
Disable Bluetooth on devices (except when use is necessary).
6. Secure Practices:
Freelancer will only connect to trusted, private wireless networks that use complex passwords not known or easily accessible to the public (e.g., not Starbucks).
Freelancer will not share hardware or devices with other people (roommates, spouses, children, etc.) while performing the Engagement until all Personal Information is removed/destroyed from the hardware or device.  Hardware and devices shall be housed in secure places when not in use.
Freelancer will not download and install unsolicited software.  Software downloaded to hardware or devices that connect to Upwork Client’s systems/network could be used to distribute malware.
Freelancer will not share passwords used to access Personal Information with anyone or post passwords near hardware or devices.
7. Disposal:
When no longer needed for the Engagement, and always upon completion of the Engagement or at Upwork Client’s request, Freelancer will return all Personal Information received, compiled or created in the course of the Engagement.  Further, Freelancer will securely delete any and all copies of such Personal Information (including backups) in Freelancer’s possession (e.g., hard copies shredded, desktop/email trashcan emptied, etc.).  Personal Information in electronic form will be deleted with a “wiping” program that overwrites data on the hardware; paper documents containing Personal Information will be shredded.  Deleting files using standard keyboard commands is not sufficient because data may remain on the computer’s hard drive. Wiping programs are available at most office supply stores. Freelancer understands that a failure to delete Personal Information in Freelancer’s possession after completion of the Engagement may constitute theft of Personal Information.
8. Data Protection:
Freelancer will not disclose Personal Information to a subcontractor without Upwork Client’s prior, written consent.  Freelancer will not disclose Personal Information to any other third party without Upwork Client’s prior, written consent except as required by law.  Freelancer will not ever sell Personal Information.  Freelancer will promptly notify Upwork Client of any legally binding request for the production or disclosure of Personal Information (unless prohibited by law from doing so) to allow Upwork Client sufficient time to object to the request.
Freelancer will not attempt to link, identify, or otherwise create a relationship between Personal Information made available to Freelancer by Upwork Client with any other data without the express authorization of Upwork Client.
In the event Freelancer access to, or storage of, Personal Information results in the transfer of Personal Information to a country outside the country where the Personal Information originated, Freelancer will, at Upwork Client’s request and to the extent required by applicable law, take such reasonable steps as Upwork Client deems necessary (e.g., execute a data transfer agreement) to comply with any law in the country of origin that restricts the international transfer of Personal Information.
Freelancer will cooperate with Upwork Client’s reasonable request for assistance in responding to a request to Upwork Client by an individual to exercise his or her rights under applicable data protection law, including but not limited to requests to delete Personal Information, and requests to access Personal Information.  In the event Freelancer receives such a request directly from an individual concerning Personal Information in Freelancer’s possession, Freelancer will promptly forward the request to Upwork Client so that Upwork Client can respond to the individual.
Freelancer will make available, upon Upwork Client’s reasonable request, information necessary to demonstrate compliance with this Exhibit 1 and will allow for audits or inspection by Upwork Client or its designee concerning Freelancer’s handling of Personal Information in accordance with this Exhibit 1.
In the event the Personal Information relates to an individual located in the European Economic Area, Attachment A to this Exhibit 1 describes the nature and purpose of the processing of Personal Information, the type of Personal Information processed, and the categories of data subjects.
Additional information on best practices for protecting Personal Information may be found at
https://www.bulkorder.ftc.gov/publications/protecting-personal-information-guide-business
. Freelancer is encouraged to obtain and read a copy of this free publication.
Attachment A
Description Of The Processing
Nature Of Processing By Freelancer:
Purposes Of Processing By Freelancer:
Categories Of Data Subjects Whose Personal Information Is Processed By Freelancer:
Categories Of Personal Information Processed By Freelancer:
Effective October 6th 2020
Download
Table of Contents
CONFIDENTIAL
This Upwork Talent Scout Agreement (“
Talent Scout Agreement
”) defines the agreement between you (the “
Client
”) and Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) regarding Talent Scout services, as described in this Talent Scout Agreement (“
Talent Scout Services
”), and are part of and incorporate by reference the
Upwork User Agreement
and other
Terms of Service
(collectively, the “
Agreement
”). The Talent Scout Agreement is in addition to and, except where explicitly stated, does not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the User Agreement or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
IN ORDER TO USE TALENT SCOUT SERVICES, YOU AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THE TALENT SCOUT CONTRACT TERMS AND THE
DISPUTE PROCESS AND ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER
IN THE USER AGREEMENT. IF YOU DO NOT ACCEPT THESE TERMS, INCLUDING THE ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER, YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE ANY TALENT SCOUT SERVICES.
1. TALENT SCOUT SERVICES
Upwork agrees to provide assistance to Client engaging Talent Scout Services  to use the Site to source Freelancers and enter into contractual relationships between Client and Freelancers to receive services. Acting at the request and as agent of Client (“
Agent of Record
”), Upwork will enter into a contractual relationship with Freelancer on Client’s behalf (once accepted, the “
Talent Scout Contract
”). For the avoidance of doubt, the Talent Scout Services include acting as Agent of Record on behalf of each Client and Freelancer for purposes of each Talent Scout Contract; Upwork is entering into contractual relationships on behalf of Client and Freelancer in each case at the direction of and with the authority of Client and Freelancer, as applicable. Once the Service Contract has been accepted by the Freelancer, Upwork will, acting as Agent of Record for the Freelancer, request the Client to place the Talent Scout Contract project funds, inclusive of Upwork Talent Scout Fees (defined below) (collectively, “
Talent Scout Contract Funds
”), in escrow via Upwork’s escrow services. As provided in the applicable escrow instructions (see below), when the work is completed, the Freelancer will request, via Upwork’s Freelancer Agent of Record services, that the Client release the Talent Scout Contract Funds from escrow, which, upon receiving instruction from Client, Upwork will do on Client’s behalf.
2. ELIGIBILITY
Client agrees that it meets the eligibility requirements in the
User Agreement
related to use of Upwork Talent Scout. Upwork Talent Scout is available to any Freelancer who enters into a Talent Scout Contract with Client.
3. ESCROW SERVICES
Client acknowledges and agrees that the Direct Contract Escrow Instructions apply to Client’s Talent Scout Contracts. For purposes of Talent Scout Contracts, Client understands and agrees that Upwork will act as Agent of Record for Freelancer for purposes of the
Direct Contract Escrow Instructions
, and for the purposes of such instructions “Freelancer” as used in the instructions shall mean either “Freelancer” or “Upwork acting as Agent of Record for Freelancer”, as applicable.
4. ROLE OF UPWORK
A. AGENT OF RECORD SERVICES
Client agrees that, in regards to Client activity in connection with Upwork Talent Scout, Upwork acts only at the direction of and with the authority of Client. Client further understands and agrees that, through its additional agreement with Freelancer, Upwork will act as Agent of Record of Freelancer. Client agrees that Upwork is not taking on any additional responsibilities or liabilities by acting as Agent of Record except as expressly provided in this Talent Scout Agreement.
B. UPWORK LIMITATIONS
Client understands and agrees that Upwork is not involved in or responsible for any work performed by Freelancer(s), is not involved in or responsible for any payment made under a Talent Scout Contract except as provided in Section 4(c) (Payment Services), and has no control over any Freelancer or Client. Upwork does not guarantee that Client or Freelancer will perform on the Talent Scout Contract. Upwork does not have any power or authority to, and does not, determine any eligibility standards for any Talent Scout Contract, select or contract any Freelancer to provide services to Client, determine or control any term or condition of the Talent Scout Contract or Project, or cause any Freelancer to accept any Talent Scout Contract or perform any Freelancer Services.  The Parties agree that Client will select the freelancer, that the scope of work will be set exclusively by agreement between Client and Freelancer, and that Client and Freelancer will take up any issues with the work and/or its scope between each other.
C. PAYMENT SERVICES
Upwork Escrow provides escrow services, but does not guarantee that Freelancer will be paid except and only to the extent that all of the following are true: (a) Upwork holds funds on behalf of Client, (b) Client has directed such funds to be released to Freelancer, and (c) any hold or security period has passed. Upwork otherwise does not guarantee that Client is able to or will pay Freelancer.D. SERVICE FEES; UPWORK FEES
Client understands that Upwork, acting as Agent of Record for Freelancer and on instruction from Freelancer, will collect from Client the fees that Freelancer will receive as agreed in the Talent Scout Contract and the fees that Upwork receives for the services provided under this Talent Scout Agreement. Client agrees that Upwork will remit to Freelancer only that portion of the fees agreed to with Freelancer and Upwork will retain the fees for Upwork’s services.
D. NO OTHER FREELANCER SERVICE FEES
The Service Fees typically charged to Freelancers described in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
or the
Upwork Direct Service Contract Terms
do not apply to payments on Talent Scout Contract engagements. The Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement otherwise remains in full force and effect, including, without limitation, on any Service Contract if a Freelancer or Client, who uses Talent Scout Contracts, has a Service Contract (as defined in the User Agreement).
5. FREELANCER ENGAGEMENT
A. ENGAGEMENT
Acting as an Agent of Record, Upwork will engage the Freelancer (the “
Engagement
”) as an independent contractor or hire the Freelancer as an employee by a third-party employer of record provider (“
Employment Provider
”) through Upwork Payroll Services. Upwork will engage the worker consistent with applicable law. Upwork may delegate the Engagement of Freelancer(s) (and other obligations regarding Freelancer(s) under this Talent Scout Agreement) to one or more third parties. Upwork and Employment Provider as applicable, reserve the right not to engage or hire a Freelancer in their sole discretion. If Upwork or Employment Provider decline to engage a Freelancer, Upwork will assist Client in sourcing a satisfactory replacement. Upwork will cause each Freelancer classified and engaged as an independent contractor to execute an independent contractor agreement. Upwork (through Employment Provider) will cause each Freelancer classified and hired as an employee to execute an agreement containing confidentiality and intellectual property assignment provisions consistent with this Talent Scout Agreement.
B. LEGAL COMPLIANCE
Upwork, Employment Provider, or any third party acting to engage a Freelancer, as applicable, will comply with applicable laws and regulations governing the Engagement and payment of Freelancers; except that Upwork or Employment Provider shall not be liable for any non-compliance of or caused by Client.
C. OWNERSHIP OF FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT
Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the Independent Contractor Agreement or employee agreement with the Freelancer, as applicable, both of which will contain a provision that requires a Freelancer to assign all ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product to Client. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from a Talent Scout Contract accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Client.
6. CLIENT RESPONSIBILITIES
A. TALENT SCOUT CONTRACTS
Client will inform Upwork 72 hours in advance, if possible, or as soon as possible thereafter, of the termination of any Talent Scout Contract. Client further agrees to immediately inform Upwork of any complaint or request made by Freelancer concerning any employment-related matter, such as a request for a leave of absence or disability accommodation or a complaint about harassment or discrimination..
B. NONDISCRIMINATION; COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS
Client agrees to comply with, and to require any person who may interact with Freelancer on behalf of Client to comply with, Upwork’s
Nondiscrimination Statement
, and with all applicable laws in connection with the engagement of Freelancers, including without limitation, as applicable, worker safety laws, nondiscrimination laws, accommodation and leave laws, and privacy laws.
C. NON-CIRCUMVENTION
Client agrees and understands that the
non-circumvention provisions of the User Agreement
, together with the remainder of the User Agreement, apply to this Talent Scout Agreement. For purposes of the non-circumvention provision, you agree that the “Hourly Rate” shall be the highest hourly rate you have paid on any Talent Scout Contract with the applicable Freelancer.
D.  CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS
Other than as stated in this Talent Scout Agreement, Client expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) except for the Agent of Record services, Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Client and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (iv) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work; (vi) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (vii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (viii) if there is a dispute between Client and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Client and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute except for the dispute assistance described in the
Direct Contract Escrow Instructions
; (ix) neither Upwork nor its Affiliates is an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any independent contractor Freelancer or Client; and (x) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Talent Scout Contract, independent contractor Freelancer(s) may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at his or her sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Site; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Client or Freelancer can or will actually complete a transaction.
7. CLIENT AUTHORIZATION
Client represents and warrants that it has the authority to agree to this Talent Scout Agreement on behalf of him- or herself and the business entity he or she represents. Client authorizes, and represents that he or she has the authority to authorize, Upwork personnel to assist Client by taking actions on the Site and communicating with Freelancers on behalf of Client as directed by Client, including without limitation, posting projects, creating Content, preparing and offering contracts to Freelancers, releasing payments, and closing such contracts upon completion of the work. All actions performed by Upwork personnel on the Site at Client’s direction, express or implied, will be considered to be actions by and at the direction of Client.
8. INDEMNIFICATION
A. INTERACTION WITH USER AGREEMENT
This Talent Scout Agreement shall control any express conflicts between the User Agreement and this Talent Scout Agreement concerning indemnification obligations and limitation of liability of Upwork or Client with respect to Talent Scout Services only.
B. INDEMNIFICATION BY UPWORK
Upwork will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Client and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, judgments, or settlements awarded for Claims to the extent caused by: (i) Upwork’s misclassification of a Freelancer under the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Internal Revenue Code, state wage and hour law or any other law; (ii) the failure of Upwork or Employment Provider to make, when due, a payment to a Freelancer related to this Talent Scout Agreement; (iii) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (iv) Employment Provider’s violation of any law or regulation related to workplace safety or conduct, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment.
C. INDEMNIFICATION BY CLIENT
Client will indemnify, defend and hold harmless Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all Claims, and/or any and all losses, costs, damages, liabilities, judgments, or settlements awarded for such Claims to the extent arising out of, resulting from or in connection with Client’s or any director, officer, agent, employee of Client, or any other person with apparent or actual authority to act on behalf of Client: (i) violation of any law or regulation, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment; (ii)  misuse or unauthorized use of the Site; (iii) content posted by or on behalf of Client or at Client’s direction; (iv)  failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations or any such failure by Upwork or the Employment Provider based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by Client or which Client failed to update or was caused by Client; (v) direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; or (vi)  breach of Client’s obligations in Section 6 (Client Responsibilities).
D. INDEMNIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under this Talent Scout Agreement; (ii) control over the defense and settlement of any such Claim with counsel of the Indemnifying Party’s choice; and (iii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Each Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of an indemnified Claim.
9. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE UPWORK FROM CLIENT UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN AND (III) BREACHES OF CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SECTION 7.1 (CONFIDENTIALITY) WITH RESPECT TO CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY CLIENT TO UPWORK DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM FOR WHICH LIABILITY IS SOUGHT TO BE IMPOSED. CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
10. OTHER TERMS
This Agreement, including this Talent Scout Agreement along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service, represents the entire agreement with Upwork and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to Talent Scout Services. To the extent of an express conflict between this Talent Scout Agreement and the other Terms of Service, this Talent Scout Agreement shall govern any matters involving Talent Scout Services. Provisions of the User Agreement and other Terms of Service that do not expressly conflict with any provision of the Talent Scout Agreement or are being applied to any products or services other than the Talent Scout Services apply in full force and effect.  Without voiding or affecting the applicability of any other provision of the User Agreement to the Talent Scout Agreement, Client specifically reiterates its agreement to comply with the
DISPUTE PROCESS AND ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER
contained in Upwork’s User Agreement, and agrees that this provision applies with full force and effect to the Talent Scout Agreement.
You agree that you did not accept the Talent Scout Agreement based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained in this Talent Scout Agreement along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service. No modification of or amendment to the Talent Scout Agreement, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by you and Upwork.
Effective October 6th 2020
Download
Table of Contents
CONFIDENTIAL
This Upwork Talent Scout Agreement (“
Talent Scout Agreement
”) defines the agreement between you (the “
Client
”) and Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) regarding Talent Scout services, as described in this Talent Scout Agreement (“
Talent Scout Services
”), and are part of and incorporate by reference the
Upwork User Agreement
and other
Terms of Service
(collectively, the “
Agreement
”). The Talent Scout Agreement is in addition to and, except where explicitly stated, does not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the User Agreement or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
IN ORDER TO USE TALENT SCOUT SERVICES, YOU AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THE TALENT SCOUT CONTRACT TERMS AND THE
DISPUTE PROCESS AND ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER
IN THE USER AGREEMENT. IF YOU DO NOT ACCEPT THESE TERMS, INCLUDING THE ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER, YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE ANY TALENT SCOUT SERVICES.
1. TALENT SCOUT SERVICES
Upwork agrees to provide assistance to Client engaging Talent Scout Services  to use the Site to source Freelancers and enter into contractual relationships between Client and Freelancers to receive services. Acting at the request and as agent of Client (“
Agent of Record
”), Upwork will enter into a contractual relationship with Freelancer on Client’s behalf (once accepted, the “
Talent Scout Contract
”). For the avoidance of doubt, the Talent Scout Services include acting as Agent of Record on behalf of each Client and Freelancer for purposes of each Talent Scout Contract; Upwork is entering into contractual relationships on behalf of Client and Freelancer in each case at the direction of and with the authority of Client and Freelancer, as applicable. Once the Service Contract has been accepted by the Freelancer, Upwork will, acting as Agent of Record for the Freelancer, request the Client to place the Talent Scout Contract project funds, inclusive of Upwork Talent Scout Fees (defined below) (collectively, “
Talent Scout Contract Funds
”), in escrow via Upwork’s escrow services. As provided in the applicable escrow instructions (see below), when the work is completed, the Freelancer will request, via Upwork’s Freelancer Agent of Record services, that the Client release the Talent Scout Contract Funds from escrow, which, upon receiving instruction from Client, Upwork will do on Client’s behalf.
2. ELIGIBILITY
Client agrees that it meets the eligibility requirements in the
User Agreement
related to use of Upwork Talent Scout. Upwork Talent Scout is available to any Freelancer who enters into a Talent Scout Contract with Client.
3. ESCROW SERVICES
Client acknowledges and agrees that the Direct Contract Escrow Instructions apply to Client’s Talent Scout Contracts. For purposes of Talent Scout Contracts, Client understands and agrees that Upwork will act as Agent of Record for Freelancer for purposes of the
Direct Contract Escrow Instructions
, and for the purposes of such instructions “Freelancer” as used in the instructions shall mean either “Freelancer” or “Upwork acting as Agent of Record for Freelancer”, as applicable.
4. ROLE OF UPWORK
A. AGENT OF RECORD SERVICES
Client agrees that, in regards to Client activity in connection with Upwork Talent Scout, Upwork acts only at the direction of and with the authority of Client. Client further understands and agrees that, through its additional agreement with Freelancer, Upwork will act as Agent of Record of Freelancer. Client agrees that Upwork is not taking on any additional responsibilities or liabilities by acting as Agent of Record except as expressly provided in this Talent Scout Agreement.
B. UPWORK LIMITATIONS
Client understands and agrees that Upwork is not involved in or responsible for any work performed by Freelancer(s), is not involved in or responsible for any payment made under a Talent Scout Contract except as provided in Section 4(c) (Payment Services), and has no control over any Freelancer or Client. Upwork does not guarantee that Client or Freelancer will perform on the Talent Scout Contract. Upwork does not have any power or authority to, and does not, determine any eligibility standards for any Talent Scout Contract, select or contract any Freelancer to provide services to Client, determine or control any term or condition of the Talent Scout Contract or Project, or cause any Freelancer to accept any Talent Scout Contract or perform any Freelancer Services.  The Parties agree that Client will select the freelancer, that the scope of work will be set exclusively by agreement between Client and Freelancer, and that Client and Freelancer will take up any issues with the work and/or its scope between each other.
C. PAYMENT SERVICES
Upwork Escrow provides escrow services, but does not guarantee that Freelancer will be paid except and only to the extent that all of the following are true: (a) Upwork holds funds on behalf of Client, (b) Client has directed such funds to be released to Freelancer, and (c) any hold or security period has passed. Upwork otherwise does not guarantee that Client is able to or will pay Freelancer.D. SERVICE FEES; UPWORK FEES
Client understands that Upwork, acting as Agent of Record for Freelancer and on instruction from Freelancer, will collect from Client the fees that Freelancer will receive as agreed in the Talent Scout Contract and the fees that Upwork receives for the services provided under this Talent Scout Agreement. Client agrees that Upwork will remit to Freelancer only that portion of the fees agreed to with Freelancer and Upwork will retain the fees for Upwork’s services.
D. NO OTHER FREELANCER SERVICE FEES
The Service Fees typically charged to Freelancers described in the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
or the
Upwork Direct Service Contract Terms
do not apply to payments on Talent Scout Contract engagements. The Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement otherwise remains in full force and effect, including, without limitation, on any Service Contract if a Freelancer or Client, who uses Talent Scout Contracts, has a Service Contract (as defined in the User Agreement).
5. FREELANCER ENGAGEMENT
A. ENGAGEMENT
Acting as an Agent of Record, Upwork will engage the Freelancer (the “
Engagement
”) as an independent contractor or hire the Freelancer as an employee by a third-party employer of record provider (“
Employment Provider
”) through Upwork Payroll Services. Upwork will engage the worker consistent with applicable law. Upwork may delegate the Engagement of Freelancer(s) (and other obligations regarding Freelancer(s) under this Talent Scout Agreement) to one or more third parties. Upwork and Employment Provider as applicable, reserve the right not to engage or hire a Freelancer in their sole discretion. If Upwork or Employment Provider decline to engage a Freelancer, Upwork will assist Client in sourcing a satisfactory replacement. Upwork will cause each Freelancer classified and engaged as an independent contractor to execute an independent contractor agreement. Upwork (through Employment Provider) will cause each Freelancer classified and hired as an employee to execute an agreement containing confidentiality and intellectual property assignment provisions consistent with this Talent Scout Agreement.
B. LEGAL COMPLIANCE
Upwork, Employment Provider, or any third party acting to engage a Freelancer, as applicable, will comply with applicable laws and regulations governing the Engagement and payment of Freelancers; except that Upwork or Employment Provider shall not be liable for any non-compliance of or caused by Client.
C. OWNERSHIP OF FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT
Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the Independent Contractor Agreement or employee agreement with the Freelancer, as applicable, both of which will contain a provision that requires a Freelancer to assign all ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product to Client. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from a Talent Scout Contract accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Client.
6. CLIENT RESPONSIBILITIES
A. TALENT SCOUT CONTRACTS
Client will inform Upwork 72 hours in advance, if possible, or as soon as possible thereafter, of the termination of any Talent Scout Contract. Client further agrees to immediately inform Upwork of any complaint or request made by Freelancer concerning any employment-related matter, such as a request for a leave of absence or disability accommodation or a complaint about harassment or discrimination..
B. NONDISCRIMINATION; COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS
Client agrees to comply with, and to require any person who may interact with Freelancer on behalf of Client to comply with, Upwork’s
Nondiscrimination Statement
, and with all applicable laws in connection with the engagement of Freelancers, including without limitation, as applicable, worker safety laws, nondiscrimination laws, accommodation and leave laws, and privacy laws.
C. NON-CIRCUMVENTION
Client agrees and understands that the
non-circumvention provisions of the User Agreement
, together with the remainder of the User Agreement, apply to this Talent Scout Agreement. For purposes of the non-circumvention provision, you agree that the “Hourly Rate” shall be the highest hourly rate you have paid on any Talent Scout Contract with the applicable Freelancer.
D.  CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS
Other than as stated in this Talent Scout Agreement, Client expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) except for the Agent of Record services, Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Client and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (iv) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work; (vi) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (vii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (viii) if there is a dispute between Client and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Client and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute except for the dispute assistance described in the
Direct Contract Escrow Instructions
; (ix) neither Upwork nor its Affiliates is an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any independent contractor Freelancer or Client; and (x) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Talent Scout Contract, independent contractor Freelancer(s) may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at his or her sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Site; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Client or Freelancer can or will actually complete a transaction.
7. CLIENT AUTHORIZATION
Client represents and warrants that it has the authority to agree to this Talent Scout Agreement on behalf of him- or herself and the business entity he or she represents. Client authorizes, and represents that he or she has the authority to authorize, Upwork personnel to assist Client by taking actions on the Site and communicating with Freelancers on behalf of Client as directed by Client, including without limitation, posting projects, creating Content, preparing and offering contracts to Freelancers, releasing payments, and closing such contracts upon completion of the work. All actions performed by Upwork personnel on the Site at Client’s direction, express or implied, will be considered to be actions by and at the direction of Client.
8. INDEMNIFICATION
A. INTERACTION WITH USER AGREEMENT
This Talent Scout Agreement shall control any express conflicts between the User Agreement and this Talent Scout Agreement concerning indemnification obligations and limitation of liability of Upwork or Client with respect to Talent Scout Services only.
B. INDEMNIFICATION BY UPWORK
Upwork will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless Client and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses, damages, liabilities, judgments, or settlements awarded for Claims to the extent caused by: (i) Upwork’s misclassification of a Freelancer under the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Internal Revenue Code, state wage and hour law or any other law; (ii) the failure of Upwork or Employment Provider to make, when due, a payment to a Freelancer related to this Talent Scout Agreement; (iii) Employment Provider’s failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations; or (iv) Employment Provider’s violation of any law or regulation related to workplace safety or conduct, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment.
C. INDEMNIFICATION BY CLIENT
Client will indemnify, defend and hold harmless Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all Claims, and/or any and all losses, costs, damages, liabilities, judgments, or settlements awarded for such Claims to the extent arising out of, resulting from or in connection with Client’s or any director, officer, agent, employee of Client, or any other person with apparent or actual authority to act on behalf of Client: (i) violation of any law or regulation, including laws related to illegal discrimination or harassment; (ii)  misuse or unauthorized use of the Site; (iii) content posted by or on behalf of Client or at Client’s direction; (iv)  failure to comply with applicable wage and hour laws or regulations or any such failure by Upwork or the Employment Provider based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by Client or which Client failed to update or was caused by Client; (v) direction, participation or involvement with the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; or (vi)  breach of Client’s obligations in Section 6 (Client Responsibilities).
D. INDEMNIFICATION REQUIREMENTS
The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under this Talent Scout Agreement; (ii) control over the defense and settlement of any such Claim with counsel of the Indemnifying Party’s choice; and (iii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Each Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of an indemnified Claim.
9. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE UPWORK FROM CLIENT UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN AND (III) BREACHES OF CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SECTION 7.1 (CONFIDENTIALITY) WITH RESPECT TO CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY CLIENT TO UPWORK DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO THE CLAIM FOR WHICH LIABILITY IS SOUGHT TO BE IMPOSED. CLIENT ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
10. OTHER TERMS
This Agreement, including this Talent Scout Agreement along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service, represents the entire agreement with Upwork and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to Talent Scout Services. To the extent of an express conflict between this Talent Scout Agreement and the other Terms of Service, this Talent Scout Agreement shall govern any matters involving Talent Scout Services. Provisions of the User Agreement and other Terms of Service that do not expressly conflict with any provision of the Talent Scout Agreement or are being applied to any products or services other than the Talent Scout Services apply in full force and effect.  Without voiding or affecting the applicability of any other provision of the User Agreement to the Talent Scout Agreement, Client specifically reiterates its agreement to comply with the
DISPUTE PROCESS AND ARBITRATION AND CLASS ACTION WAIVER
contained in Upwork’s User Agreement, and agrees that this provision applies with full force and effect to the Talent Scout Agreement.
You agree that you did not accept the Talent Scout Agreement based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained in this Talent Scout Agreement along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service. No modification of or amendment to the Talent Scout Agreement, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by you and Upwork.
Effective August 1st 2017
Download
Table of Contents
This WeWork Client Addendum for Upwork Enterprise Services (this “
Addendum
”) supplements the terms and conditions set forth in the click-through Upwork User Agreement (
https://www.upwork.com/legal/
) applicable to the use of the features and functionality made available through the Upwork website located at
www.upwork.com
, as it may be updated from time to time (the “
Upwork User Agreement
”).  Unless otherwise expressly noted herein, this Addendum is governed by the terms of the Upwork User Agreement, and each capitalized term used in this Addendum but not defined herein shall have the same meaning as in the Upwork User Agreement.  “Client” as used in this Addendum shall refer to you.
YOU UNDERSTAND THAT BY CLICKING ON THE “I ACCEPT” BUTTON, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THIS ADDENDUM AND THE UPWORK USER AGREEMENT WITH RESPECT TO UPWORK ENTERPRISE SERVICES.  IF YOU DO NOT ACCEPT THIS ADDENDUM, YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE THE UPWORK ENTERPRISE SERVICES.  IF YOU AGREE TO THIS ADDENDUM ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY (E.G. BY PROVIDING YOUR COMPANY NAME TO UPWORK), YOU REPRESENT AND WARRANT THAT YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND YOUR COMPANY TO THIS ADDENDUM AND THAT YOU ARE AGREEING TO THIS ADDENDUM ON BEHALF OF YOUR COMPANY.  IN THAT EVENT, YOUR COMPANY WILL OWN THE ACCOUNT AND BE BOUND BY THIS ADDENDUM AND “YOU” AND “CLIENT” WILL REFER AND APPLY TO YOUR COMPANY.
Section 1.  Upwork Enterprise Services
Upwork Enterprise.  With Upwork Enterprise, Client will have access to a premium Upwork technology and platform service that allows Client to aggregate and engage, in Client’s Talent Cloud® network, groups of Freelancers found on the Upwork platform or brought by Client to the Upwork platform.
Talent Sourcing and Job Post Assistance Services.  Client may also request Talent Sourcing Services and Job Post Assistance Services, where Upwork will provide Client with: (i) access to expert Freelancers that Upwork has pre-vetted based on their skills and professional capabilities (“
Upwork Pro Talent Pool
”) (ii) a shortlist of Freelancers advertising the skills that Client seeks; and (iii) a dedicated talent specialist to help Client post projects on the Upwork platform (with Client’s approval).
Enterprise Billing.  In addition, Upwork will pay the amounts owed by Client to Freelancers for work and services by Freelancers pursuant to the Upwork User Agreement (“
Client Payment
”) and Client will be invoiced such amounts by WeWork pursuant to Client’s arrangement with WeWork.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, Upwork reserves its right to collect any Client Payment and the Upwork Service Fee (defined below) directly from Client if Client does not remit such payments to WeWork.
The services described in this Section 1 are Site Services as defined in the User Agreement.
Section 2.  Service Fee
Service Fee. In addition to the Client Payment, Client will pay a service fee equal to 10% of the Client Payment to Upwork (the “
Upwork Service Fee
”).  Client Payment includes any applicable fees payable to Upwork pursuant to the User Agreement.  Where applicable, Upwork may collect taxes on the service fee.
Section 3.  Client Duties and Role of Upwork
Client Duties.  Client acknowledges and agrees that Client shall be solely responsible for undertaking the necessary research and due diligence to evaluate any Freelancer information posted or provided by or through Upwork.  Client assumes all responsibility for engaging any Freelancer based on any Freelancer information received through Upwork in connection with Upwork Enterprise Services.  Client understands and agrees that Client is solely responsible for selecting which Freelancers to engage; determining whether to engage each Freelancer as an independent contractor or as an employee; negotiating and determining the amount and type of payment for Freelancer Services; describing the work to be done by each Freelancer and all communications regarding the work; and determining when Freelancer Services shall commence and end.  Any information from Upwork regarding the foregoing for any Freelancer engagement shall not be construed as advice to Client or as binding on Client.
Role of Upwork.  If Client requests Talent Sourcing Services from Upwork, Upwork will review Client’s project requirements as described by Client and provide Client with access to certain profiles of Freelancers from the Upwork platform and the Upwork Pro Talent Pool, subject to the Upwork Pro Talent Pool containing Freelancers who appear to have the skills, availability and interest to meet those requirements. Accordingly, all information regarding a Freelancer posted on or to the Site, the platform, and or provided as part of the Upwork Enterprise Services, is intended to be indicative or illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty on the part of Upwork.  Upwork is not responsible for and shall have no liability for Client’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer information posted or provided by Upwork.
Section 4.  Other Terms
Marks.
Client grants Upwork a non-exclusive, non-transferable, fully revocable license to use Client’s name and logo (the “
Client Marks
”) during the Term in marketing Upwork services on the Site and elsewhere. All rights in and to and ownership of all Client Marks are vested in Client absolutely.  All uses of the Client Marks will inure to the benefit of Client.  Upwork has no right, title or interest in the Client Marks aside from this license.  Upon termination or expiration of this Addendum, or notice from Client, the license to the Client Marks will automatically expire and Upwork will immediately cease using the Client Marks on the Site and in any new materials.
Buy-out Fee.
Client agrees to pay a buy-out fee of $10,000 for each Freelancer whose profile was provided to Client as part of the Upwork Enterprise Services and hired by Client off of or outside the Upwork platform as an employee of Client during the Buy-out Period.  This provision shall not apply if Client had already engaged such freelancer on the Upwork platform prior to receipt of the freelancer profile from Upwork.  The “
Buy-out Period
” is the 24 month period immediately after the date that Upwork provides Client with the profile of the Freelancer that is hired by Client outside of or off the Upwork platform.  The Non-Circumvention provision in the Upwork User Agreement shall continue to apply to all other cases not described in this section.
Term and Termination.
This Addendum shall be effective as of the date Client accepts this Addendum via the web link provided to Client (the “
Effective Date
”) and shall continue until terminated by either the Client or Upwork. Either party may terminate this Addendum with 15 days prior written notice to the other.  Either Client or Upwork may terminate this Addendum immediately if the other party (A) becomes subject to any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding under federal or state statute that is not dismissed within 30 days, (B) becomes insolvent or subject to direct control by a trustee, receiver or similar authority, or (C) has wound up or liquidated.
General; Entire Agreement.
This Addendum together with the User Agreement represents the entire agreement between the Client and Upwork, and this Addendum together with the User Agreement supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters covered by it.  In the event of conflict between the terms of this Addendum and the terms of the Upwork User Agreement, the terms of the Upwork User Agreement will control.  Client agrees that Client did not enter in this Addendum based on any representations other than those contained in this Addendum. No modification of or amendment to this Addendum by Client, nor any waiver of any rights under this Addendum, shall be effective unless in writing signed by both Client and Upwork.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork may amend this Addendum by posting revisions to this Addendum online. Your continued use of the Upwork Enterprise Services after the effective date of a revised version of this Addendum or notice to you of an updated Addendum constitutes your acceptance of its terms and agreement to be bound by its terms. This Addendum will be binding upon and inure to the benefit of Client or Upwork, as applicable, and their respective successors and permitted assigns.  Client will not assign or otherwise transfer this Addendum or any rights or obligations hereunder, in whole or in part, whether by operation of law or otherwise, without Upwork’s prior written consent.  Any purported transfer, assignment or delegation without such prior written consent will be null and void and of no force or effect.  Upwork will have the right to assign this Addendum to any affiliate or successor to its business or assets to which this Addendum relates, whether by merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization or otherwise.
Effective June 6th 2017
Download
Table of Contents
These Starter Project Program Terms of Use for Clients and Freelancers (“
Starter Project Terms
”) are part of and incorporate by reference the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service. The Starter Project Terms are in addition to and do not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the User Agreement or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
YOU AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THE STARTER PROJECT TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT ACCEPT THE STARTER PROJECT TERMS, YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE ANY STARTER PROJECT SERVICES FOR ANY ENGAGEMENT.
SECTION 1. STARTER PROJECT SERVICES DEFINED
The Starter Project Program aims to help new Clients learn to use the Site to post projects quickly and efficiently. For this purpose, Upwork may make sample project descriptions and budgets available for optional use and help connect Clients with Freelancers who have indicated interest in completing such projects (“
Starter Project Services
”).
SECTION 2. SCOPE AND LIMITATIONS
Starter Project Services may be used subject to the following parameters and limitations, which you understand and acknowledge.
Clients may only use Starter Project Services while they are learning to use the Site up to a maximum of ten (10) projects. Once Client has learned to use the Site, Client will post projects without using Starter Project Services.
All information about a project, Freelancer or Client obtained in connection with Starter Project Services is intended to be illustrative only and will not constitute any requirement, guarantee or warranty by Upwork. Users have discretion whether to contract with each other and will negotiate and determine the specific terms of their Service Contracts with each other. Project descriptions and budgets available through Starter Project Services are samples only, which may be adjusted and added to as Users deem appropriate. Users choose whether to use any sample project description and may add any milestones to their Service Contracts and/or post different terms using the job post, contract offer or other features available on the Site.
SECTION 3. ROLE OF UPWORK AND CLIENT RESPONSIBILITIES
You understand and agree that Upwork is not a party to any Service Contract, is not involved in or responsible for any work performed by Freelancers, and has no control over any Freelancer or Client. Upwork does not have any power or authority to, and does not, determine any eligibility standards for any Engagement, select or contract any Freelancer to provide services to a Client, determine or control any term or condition of the Service Contract or Engagement, or cause any Freelancer to accept any Service Contract or perform any Freelancer Services.
Client assumes all responsibility for selecting which Freelancers to contract, determining and completing any screening requirements, determining or negotiating the amount and type of payment and any other Service Contract terms or conditions, and describing the work to be done by Freelancers. Any information from Upwork regarding the foregoing will not be construed as advice to Client or as binding on Client.
SECTION 4. OTHER TERMS
Together with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service, these Starter Project Terms represent the entire agreement with Upwork and supersede all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters covered. You agree that you did not accept the Starter Project Terms based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained herein. No modification of or amendment to the Starter Project Terms, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by you and Upwork. Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork may amend the Starter Project Terms with prior notice at any time. Your continued use of the Starter Project Services after the effective date of a revised version of the Starter Project Terms or notice to you of updated Starter Project Terms constitutes your acceptance of its terms and agreement to be bound by its terms.
Effective August 9th 2017
Download
Table of Contents
These Team Builder Terms for Clients (“
Team Builder Terms
”) are part of and incorporate by reference the Upwork User Agreement and other
Terms of Service
governing use of the Site and the Site Services. The Team Builder Terms are in addition to and do not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the User Agreement or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
YOU UNDERSTAND THAT BY USING TEAM BUILDER SERVICES FOR AN ENGAGEMENT, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THE TEAM BUILDER TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT ACCEPT THE TEAM BUILDER TERMS, YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE THE TEAM BUILDER SERVICES TO ENGAGE A FREELANCER. IF YOU AGREE TO THE TEAM BUILDER TERMS ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY, YOU REPRESENT AND WARRANT THAT (1) YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND THE COMPANY; AND (2) YOU ARE AGREEING TO THE TEAM BUILDER TERMS ON BEHALF OF THE COMPANY. IN THAT EVENT, YOUR COMPANY WILL OWN THE ACCOUNT AND BE BOUND BY THE TEAM BUILDER TERMS, AND “YOU” AND “CLIENT” WILL REFER AND APPLY TO THE COMPANY IN ADDITION TO THE INDIVIDUAL ACCEPTING THESE TERMS.
SECTION 1. TEAM BUILDER SERVICES
To help with efficient use of the Site, Upwork offers Clients that post jobs seeking Freelancers for certain Longer Engagements an optional service whereby a talent scout will highlight profiles of Freelancers that are also seeking such Longer Engagements (“
Team Builder Services
”). Team Builder Services are a Site Service as defined in the User Agreement.
Team Builder Services are available only for Clients who have a verified payment method on file for their Upwork Account and who are seeking Freelancers for Longer Engagements.
For purposes of the Team Builder Terms, “
Longer Engagements
” are defined as Hourly Engagements of more than 3 months with a weekly minimum payment in an amount equal to at least 30 hours of Freelancer Services at the rate agreed on by the Client and Freelancer (hereinafter, “
Weekly Minimum Payment
”).
By using Team Builder Services for an Engagement, Client represents and agrees that Client is seeking to pay the Weekly Minimum Payment to the Freelancer in order to secure the Freelancer’s availability. Client (1) will pay the Freelancer the Weekly Minimum Payment for each weekly billing period starting the second Monday after the Service Contract begins, except for any week when the Service Contract is paused for billing on the Site for any period of time; and (2) authorizes Upwork or its Affiliates to automatically charge the Client’s Payment Method on file for the Weekly Minimum Payment for each weekly billing period when the Service Contract is not paused for billing for any period of time or closed. Client understands and agrees that the Weekly Minimum Payment is paid to secure the Freelancer’s availability and therefore will apply even if less than 30 hours of services were provided and may not be disputed by the Client on the ground that less than 30 hours of work was given to the Freelancer in any given week. Client will pay the agreed rate to the Freelancer for all services provided in any week that exceed 30 hours; however, Client may review and approve or dispute any hours above 30 in a week during the Dispute Period as set forth in the
Hourly Escrow Instructions
.  Client understands and agrees that (1) Client is choosing these Engagement terms and (2) Client may set up a contract that does not use Team Builder Services for any Engagement for which Client is seeking different Engagement terms.
Team Builder Services consist of a talent scout highlighting for Client the profiles and/or proposals of Freelancers who (i) are advertising skills in the category sought by the Client and (ii) have indicated they are seeking Longer Engagements. Client understands that any “screening” conducted for Team Builder Services relates only to these factors, and any statements about whether a Freelancer is “qualified” relates only to these factors and must be verified by the Client independently.
Upwork does not determine or complete the screening requirements for any Client’s particular Engagement and does not determine whether any Freelancer is qualified for any Client’s Engagement.
SECTION 2. ROLE OF UPWORK
As detailed in the
User Agreement
, the Site is a venue for Freelancers and Clients to find and enter into Service Contracts with each other. Upwork is not responsible for evaluating, investigating, or otherwise conducting any due diligence regarding Freelancers or their qualifications, skills, background, prior experience, worker classification, licensing, registrations or legal or tax compliance. All information regarding a Freelancer posted on the Site or provided as part of Team Builder Services is intended to be indicative or illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty on the part of Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and will have no liability for Client’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer information posted or provided by or through Upwork or any talent scout.
Client understands and agrees that Upwork is not a party to the Service Contract, does not determine or control any term or condition of the Service Contract or Engagement, and has no control over any Freelancer or any Freelancer Services. Upwork does not have any power or authority to, and will not, determine any eligibility standards for any Engagement, select or hire any Freelancer to provide services to Client, negotiate or determine the amount or type of payment for Freelancer Services, or cause any Freelancer to accept any Service Contract or start or stop work. Client understands and agrees that Upwork does not determine or have any involvement with Freelancer assignments, productivity standards, scheduling, work hours, work locations, work methods, or working conditions; does not train, supervise, counsel, discipline, evaluate or terminate any Freelancer; does not give any instructions to any Freelancer about the Freelancer Services; and does not have any involvement with the work performed by any Freelancer. This Section 2 is in addition to and does not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the User Agreement.
SECTION 3. CLIENT RESPONSIBILITIES
Client acknowledges and agrees that Client is solely responsible for undertaking the necessary research and due diligence to evaluate any Freelancer and any Freelancer information posted or posted or provided by or through Upwork or any talent scout. Client assumes all responsibility for engaging any Freelancer based on any Freelancer information received in connection with Team Builder Services.
Client further understands and agrees that Client is solely responsible for determining eligibility standards, determining and completing any screening requirements, and selecting which Freelancers to engage; negotiating and agreeing with the Freelancer on the amount and type of payment for Freelancer Services and any other terms or conditions of the Service Contract; describing the work to be done by each Freelancer and all communications regarding the work; and determining when Freelancer Services will commence and end.  Any information from Upwork regarding the foregoing for any Engagement will not be construed as advice to Client or as binding on Client.
As set forth in greater detail in the User Agreement,
Client is responsible and assumes all liability for determining whether Freelancers are independent contractors or employees while providing services to Client and for engaging them accordingly
. Client understands and agrees that Upwork does not make any representation or provide any advice regarding the proper worker classification for any Engagement. For Freelancers that should be classified as employees, Client must sign up for and participate in the
Upwork Payroll
program made available on the Site, unless Client pays the Opt-Out Fee. For independent contractor relationships, Client may not require an exclusive relationship; a Freelancer classified as an independent contractor is free at all times to provide services to persons or businesses other than Client, including any competitor of Client. This Section 3 is in addition to and does not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the User Agreement.
SECTION 4. OTHER TERMS
These Team Builder Terms together with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service represent the entire agreement between the Client and Upwork and supersede all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters covered by it. Client agrees that Client did not accept the Team Builder Terms based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained herein. No modification of or amendment to the Team Builder Terms by Client, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by both Client and Upwork. Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork may amend the Team Builder Terms with prior notice to Client at any time. Your continued use of the Team Builder Services after the effective date of a revised version of the Team Builder Terms or notice to you of updated Team Builder Terms constitutes your acceptance of its terms and agreement to be bound by its terms.
Effective April 27th 2020
Download
Table of Contents
These Work Together Talent Grants Terms and Conditions (the “
Grant Terms
”) apply to any Application for a Grant under Upwork’s Work Together Talent Grant Program. By submitting an Application, an Applicant agrees to these Grant Terms. Pursuant to these Grant Terms, the Work Together Talent Grant program is a program where Upwork will provide Applicants credits in order to complete projects in response to COVID-19 and successful Applicants agree to create and to be featured by Upwork in Promotional Materials.
Terms not defined in text are defined below in Section 9 (Definitions).
1. Grant Program
Upwork is offering to provide $1,000,000 USD in grants under the Work Together Talent Grant program (each, a “
Grant
”). The Grants will be awarded starting on or after April 27, 2020, to approved Applicants (each approved Applicant, a “
Recipient
”). Upwork will review Applications on a rolling basis and will award Grants until it has awarded $1,000,000 USD in Grants, unless it discloses publicly (including by posting on the Site) that it is suspended or ending the Work Together Talent Grant offer. Upwork will announce when funds are exhausted and will attempt to award all Grants by June 30, 2020, unless it is unable to identify sufficient eligible Applicants. If Upwork is unable to identify sufficient eligible Applicants, it may solicit additional Applications.
The Grants will be awarded to Applicants to be used for the sole purpose of funding work that will directly further the COVID-19 response, subject to each Applicant’s agreement to and compliance with these Grant Terms, including, without limitation, the agreement to create content for and participate in promotional materials and to assign the rights to the same to Upwork, as described and assigned in Section 5 (License to Content; Company Name and Logo; Likeness). Upwork will award Grants in its sole discretion except as explicitly stated herein.
Upwork will give priority to Applications that propose serving underrepresented groups. Upwork will not unlawfully discriminate against any Applicant on the basis of nationality, race, ethnicity, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status, marital status, or other similarly protected characteristics.
2. Eligibility
These Grant Terms provide information on the minimum eligibility requirements for a Grant. In order to be eligible for a Grant, an Applicant must (a) meet all the criteria in these Grant Terms, unless a criterion is explicitly waived in writing by Upwork, (b) agree to these Grant Terms, and (c) sign an agreement reaffirming the terms of these Grant Terms outlining the Grant received and the services and content Recipient agrees to provide to Upwork (the “
Grant Agreement
”) . Upwork may waive eligibility criteria in its sole discretion by providing a writing to the Applicant explicitly referencing the criteria and stating it is waived.
a. Eligibility Criteria
An Application must be completed at
www.upwork.com/worktogether
and must be completed in a truthful and accurate manner, contain a permitted purpose for a response or relief effort for COVID-19, and contain sufficient information for Upwork to evaluate the likely success of the Proposal in meeting its intended purpose;
The Applicant (a) must be a registered user of the site,
www.Upwork.com
, before the Grant is made, (b) must be a business or non-profit entity (natural persons are not eligible for a Grant and may only complete Applications as authorized agents of a business entity), and (c) may not be (i) a religious entity, (ii) a lobbying or political advocacy entity; or (ii) an entity that engages in discriminatory practices;
The Applicant must cooperate with Upwork and provide additional information about Applicant or the Application upon request;
The Applicant’s Account (as defined in the Upwork
Terms of Service
) must be in good standing at the time the Application is made and at the time the Grant is awarded;
The Proposal may not, in whole or in part, be for any prohibited purpose (each, below, a “
Prohibited Purpose
”):
Any purpose that is in conflict with Upwork’s values or mission,
A religious purpose,
Any purpose that will involve unlawful discrimination,
A personal purpose of the Applicant or any other person, e.g., to pay personal bills,
Political or lobbying efforts,
Litigation purposes, or
Any purpose other than to further a COVID-19 response
b. No Entitlement
Even if you meet all the eligibility criteria, you acknowledge that you have no entitlement to any Grant. Upwork may reject any Application for any lawful reason in its sole discretion, including, without limitation, concern about the truthfulness, reliability, or completeness of the Application; concerns about the legitimacy or trustworthiness of Applicant; determination that the Proposal would be ineffective; belief that the Applicant or Proposal are inconsistent with Upwork’s mission or values; or any other lawful reason.
3. Grant Recipients and Awards
a. Notification.
Upwork will notify each Recipient about the Grant and the amount of the Grant by email to Recipient’s email included in the Application including the Grant Agreement (the “
Notification
”). Grant amounts will typically be between $5,000 USD and $25,000 USD.
b. Acceptance.
Recipient can accept or decline the Grant by signing the Grant Agreement within five (5) calendar days of the date of the Notification. By accepting the Grant, Recipient affirms that Recipient will complete the proposal and Promotional Materials as described in the Application under these Grant Terms, including Section 4 (Conditions of Grant) and Section 5 (License to Use Company Name and Logo; Likenesses). If there is a conflict between the Application and these Grant Terms, these Grant Terms will apply. If Recipient cannot complete the Proposal for any reason, Recipient may not accept the Grant and must immediately notify Upwork. Such notification will revoke the Grant, which will only be reissued in Upwork’s sole discretion.
c. Award.
Within ten (10) days of Recipient’s (a) signing the Grant Agreement and (b) provision of a W9, W-8BEN-E, or any other requested documentation, Upwork will issue a credit to Recipient’s Upwork Account which can be used to pay for Services to complete the Proposal, subject to Recipient’s compliance with these Grant Terms, including, without limitation, Section 5 (License to Use Company Name and Logo; Likenesses).
d. Complimentary Plus Membership.
In addition to the Grant, Recipients will be awarded a complimentary Plus plan for three (3) months to enable Recipient to more effectively use the Site to find and engage qualified Freelancers and Agencies. If a Recipient already has a Plus plan, the fees will be waived for three (3) months.  The complimentary Plus plan does not apply to clients with an Enterprise or Business membership.
4. Conditions of Grant
By accepting a Grant, Recipient agrees to comply with the following conditions:
To sign a Grant Agreement;
To use the Grant funds for the stated Proposal in the Application;
To create Promotional Materials and to be featured, and for your content to be featured, in promotional materials, including, without limitation, advertisements promoting Upwork, and to assign the rights to all such materials to Upwork for marketing purposes, as described and assigned in Section 5;
To comply with
Upwork’s Nondiscrimination Statement
;
To subscribe to marketing emails;
To use the Grant by December 27, 2020, and agrees that the failure to do so is authorization for Upwork to remove any remaining funds from Recipient’s Account
It will not use Grant funds to pay any Freelancer or Agency that Recipient invited to join the Site (a “BYO Talent”);
It will not use Grant funds for any Prohibited Purpose.
Recipient further acknowledges that (a) by accepting a Grant, it agrees to provide, upon request, (i) a written confirmation that the funds were used as described in the Application and consistent with these Grant Terms, and (ii) accounting of how the Grant funds were used, and (b) if Recipient fails to comply with any of these conditions or other Grant Terms will result in a forfeiture of any funds remaining in the Account, which Recipient authorizes Upwork to reclaim, and that Recipient will return any used Grant funds within 30 days of Upwork’s demand that Recipient do so, provided Upwork provides a reasonable basis for its demand.
Recipient is not eligible for any credit from Upwork for any Grant funds under Upwork’s Payment Protection programs.
5. License to Content; Company Name and Logo; Likenesses
By applying for a Grant, you agree to grant Upwork the rights to use your story in marketing assets and, without limiting the foregoing, create and provide Promotional Materials, including, without limitation, any video, film, recording, audio and/or photograph(s) as agreed in the Grant Agreement to be used by Upwork in its marketing and promotional materials. Upwork shall have complete ownership of any such video, film, recording, audio and/or photograph(s), including any copyright interests, and you hereby waive any all interest and ownership rights therein. Upwork will have the right to edit and alter any such video, film, recording, audio and/or photograph(s) and you waive any right of approval.
By applying for a Grant, you hereby grant to Upwork and our successors and affiliates a royalty-free, sub-licensable, transferable, perpetual, irrevocable, exclusive (except non-exclusive with respect to your name, logo, voice and likeness), worldwide license to use, reproduce, modify, publish, list information regarding, edit, translate, distribute, publicly perform, and publicly display, any and all content you create or participate in, your logo (including those of the entity you represent), your name, voice, and/or likeness, in whole or in part, and in any form, media, or technology, whether now known or hereafter developed, including for promoting, marketing, and redistributing Upwork or part or all of the Site (and derivative works thereof) in any media formats and through any media channels.
6. Upwork Service Fees
For any Service Contract Recipient pays with Grant funds, Upwork will waive all associated fees and costs on the Service Contract, including payment processing fees and Freelancer Service Fees. If Upwork inadvertently charges fees due to an administrative oversight, Upwork will promptly refund any such fees upon request or upon discovery of the oversight.
7. Authority
If you submit an Application as an employee or agent on behalf of a business or non-profit entity, you represent and warrant that you are authorized to bind yourself and your entity.
8. Privacy
Your privacy is important to Upwork and your information, including information submitted in an Application, will be handled in accordance with our
Privacy Policy
, which is part of the Terms of Service, and applicable law.
9. Additional Definitions
Terms not defined above have the definitions stated here:
“
Agency
” has the meaning defined in the Upwork Terms of Service.
An “
Applicant
” means the authorized agent of and the business or non-profit entity that completes an Application through its authorized agent.
An “
Application
” means an application for a Grant submitted at
www.upwork.com/worktogether
.
“
Freelancer
” has the meaning defined in the Upwork Terms of Service.
“
Payment Protection
” has the meaning defined in the Upwork Terms of Service.
“
Proposal
” means the proposed COVID-19 response efforts described in an Application.
“
Promotional Materials
” means content created by Recipient for use in promotional activities by Upwork in any medium in any jurisdiction and as further agreed in the Grant Agreement.
“
Services
” means any services provided by a Freelancer or Agency engaged and paid through the Site pursuant to a Service Contract.
“
Service Contract
” has the meaning defined in the Upwork Terms of Service.
The “
Site
” has the meaning defined in the Upwork Terms of Service.
“
Upwork
” means Upwork Inc.
The terms “
you
”
and “
your
” refer to an Applicant.
Effective December 10th 2018
Download
Table of Contents
These Jumpstarter Projects Program Terms of Use (“
Jumpstarter Terms
”) are part of and incorporate by reference the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service. The Jumpstarter Terms are in addition to and do not supersede, replace, or limit other similar terms in the Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the User Agreement or elsewhere in the Terms of Service.
YOU AGREE TO BE BOUND BY THE JUMPSTARTER TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT ACCEPT THE JUMPSTARTER TERMS, YOU MAY NOT ACCESS OR USE ANY JUMPSTARTER SERVICES FOR ANY PROJECT.
SECTION 1. JUMPSTARTER PROJECT SERVICES DEFINED
The Jumpstarter Program aims to help Clients use the Site to post projects quickly and efficiently. For this purpose, Upwork may make sample project descriptions and budgets available for optional use and help connect Clients with Freelancers who have indicated interest in completing such projects (“
Jumpstarter
Services
” and such projects posted by Clients, “
Jumpstarter Projects
”).  If such sample project descriptions and budgets are not acceptable to Clients or not appropriate for the scope of the project, Client will post a project outside of the Jumpstarter Program.  Upwork will assist Clients in using the Site if needed.  If Freelancer does not consider the terms acceptable for any reason or for no reason at all, Freelancer is under no obligation to accept any Jumpstarter Project.
SECTION 2. SCOPE AND LIMITATIONS
Jumpstarter Services may be used subject to the following parameters and limitations, which you understand and acknowledge.
Clients may only use Jumpstarter Services when they conclude that the scope and price are appropriate for their project. If the Client has needs that are not consistent with the Jumpstarter Projects, Client agrees that Client will post projects without using Jumpstarter Services.
Freelancer is under no obligation whatsoever to accept any Jumpstarter Project at all, and, if the Freelancer chooses, may decline every Jumpstarter Project.  Freelancer’s acceptance or non-acceptance of any Jumpstarter Project will not affect in any way Freelancer’s ability to continue to use the Site for their business needs.  By accepting a Jumpstarter Project, Freelancer understands and agrees that Freelancer will enter into a Services Contract directly with the Client on the stated terms.
All information about a project, Freelancer or Client obtained in connection with Jumpstarter Services is intended to be illustrative only and will not constitute any requirement, guarantee or warranty by Upwork. Users have discretion whether to contract with each other and, if they do not agree to the terms of the Jumpstarter Projects, agree that they will negotiate and determine the specific terms of their Service Contracts with each other. Users choose whether to use any Jumpstarter Project and may enter into new Services Contracts to add any milestones to their Service Contracts and/or post different terms using the job post, contract offer or other features available on the Site.
SECTION 3. ROLE OF UPWORK AND CLIENT RESPONSIBILITIES
You understand and agree that Upwork is not a party to any Service Contract, is not involved in or responsible for any work performed by Freelancers, and has no control over any Freelancer or Client. Upwork does not have any power or authority to, and does not, determine any eligibility standards for any Services Contract, select or contract any Freelancer to provide services to a Client, determine or control any term or condition of the Service Contract or Project, or cause any Freelancer to accept any Service Contract or perform any Freelancer Services.
SECTION 4. OTHER TERMS
Together with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service, these Jumpstarter Terms represent the entire agreement with Upwork and supersede all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters covered. You agree that you did not accept the Jumpstarter Terms based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained herein. No modification of or amendment to the Jumpstarter Terms, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by you and Upwork. Notwithstanding the foregoing, to the extent permitted by applicable law, Upwork may amend the Jumpstarter Terms with prior notice at any time. Your continued use of the Jumpstarter Services after the effective date of a revised version of the Jumpstarter Terms or notice to you of updated Jumpstarter Terms constitutes your acceptance of its terms and agreement to be bound by its terms.
Effective August 19th 2022
Download
Table of Contents
These Upwork Terms for Task Mate Beta (“
Beta Terms
”) define the agreement between you (the “
Freelancer
”) and Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) regarding projects offered by Google LLC (the “
Client
”) through Client’s
Task Mate mobile app
(“
Task Mate Projects
”), and are part of and incorporate by reference the other
Upwork Terms of Service
, including the
Upwork User Agreement
and
Privacy Policy
(collectively, the “
Upwork Agreement
”). These Beta Terms are in addition to and, except where explicitly stated, do not supersede, replace, or limit terms in the Upwork Terms of Service. Capitalized terms not defined herein are defined in the Upwork User Agreement or elsewhere in Upwork’s Terms of Service. The Upwork Agreement, including these Beta Terms, only governs Freelancer’s relationship with Upwork for Task Mate Projects and does not create any contract between you and Client, or create any obligations or restrict any rights of Client. Instead, Freelancer’s contractual relationship with Client for Task Mate Projects is exclusively governed by the
Google Task Mate Terms of Service
(“
Google Task Mate Terms
”), which you must agree to in order to participate in the Task Mate Projects.
In order to receive payment through the Upwork platform for completed Task Mate Projects, you agree to be bound by the Upwork Terms of Service and the
Dispute Process and Arbitration and Class Action Waiver
in the Upwork User Agreement. If you do not accept these terms, including the arbitration and class action waiver, you may not use or access the Upwork platform to receive payment for any Task Mate Projects.
1. HOW IT WORKS
Any Freelancer that is invited by Upwork to participate is eligible to participate in the Task Mate Projects, provided that (a) their Upwork Account is in good standing and they agree to comply with the Upwork Agreement (these Beta Terms as well as the Upwork User Agreement and other Upwork Terms of Service available
here
), and (b) they successfully create and maintain in good standing a Google Task Mate account and agree to comply with the Google Task Mate Terms. In the event of any conflict between the Upwork Agreement and the Google Task Mate Terms, the Google Task Mate Terms will govern your relationship with Client in connection with your access to and use of the Task Mate app and your performance of the Task Mate Projects.
2. CONTRACT TERMS FOR TASK MATE PROJECTS
Each Freelancer that completes any of the available Task Mate Projects agrees to the Google Task Mate Terms and payment amounts offered by the Client on the Task Mate app.
3. FEES
Freelancers are not charged Freelancer Service Fees (see Sections 2.1, 2.2, and 2.3 of the Fee and ACH Agreement) for earnings for Task Mate Projects. If Freelancer requests disbursement as described below in Section 4 (Disbursements to Freelancer), Freelancer will not be charged Disbursement Fees (see Section 5.1 of the Upwork User Agreement) for disbursing earnings for Task Mate Projects. However, Freelancers will pay any other applicable fees (see Section 2.4 of the Fee and ACH Agreement) and, if Freelancer requests disbursement other than as described in Section 4 below, will be charged Disbursement Fees. Earnings and fees are subject to tax and withholdings as described in the Upwork User Agreement.
4. DISBURSEMENTS TO FREELANCER
Once Freelancer completes the Task Mate Project, Freelancer can initiate disbursement of funds related to the Task Mate Project by clicking “Cash Out on Upwork” from the Task Mate app, which will include the amount of funds Freelancer seeks to disburse. Funds will be available to Freelancer’s Withdrawal Method, normally within 48 hours. When Freelancer initiates a “Cash Out on Upwork” from the Task Mate app, Upwork will be deemed to have been authorized to release payment to the Freelancer unless provided notice to the contrary. Freelancer acknowledges that use of Upwork for these services is intended for business use only, and agrees to use these services only for business purposes and not for consumer, personal, family, or household purposes.
5. FREELANCER AUTHORIZATION
Freelancer represents and warrants that it has the authority to agree to these Beta Terms on behalf of Freelancer and the business entity they represent.
6. OTHER TERMS
The Upwork Agreement, including these Beta Terms along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Upwork Terms of Service, represents the entire agreement between Upwork and Freelancer and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings between Freelancer and Upwork with respect to Task Mate Projects. However, Client and Freelancer may agree to different terms with respect to the terms between them, provided that such terms do not purport to restrict or enlarge Upwork’s rights or obligations. To the extent of a conflict between these Beta Terms and the other Upwork Terms of Service, these Beta Terms shall govern any matters involving Upwork and Task Mate Projects. Provisions of the Upwork User Agreement and other Upwork Terms of Service apply in full force and effect to the extent that they do not either conflict with any provision of these Beta Terms or exclusively apply to any products or services other than the Task Mate Projects. You agree that you did not accept these Beta Terms based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained herein, along with the Upwork User Agreement and other Upwork Terms of Service. No modification of or amendment to these Beta Terms, nor any waiver of any rights, will be effective unless in writing signed by Freelancer and Upwork.
Effective January 18th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
By choosing to receive electronic copies of your IRS Tax Information returns, you acknowledge and consent to the following terms:
1.  You have a computer with Internet access.
For the best experience, we encourage you to use current versions of Google Chrome or Mozilla Firefox. You also need to have hardware that supports this software. We can’t provide technical support if you’re using an outdated browser.
2.  You will be able to view Hyper Text Markup Language (HTML) files and read Adobe PDF files.
To download and print a PDF file, install Adobe Acrobat Reader.
3.  You agree to electronically receive the following IRS Tax Information returns: Form 1099-K, Form 1099-MISC, and Form 1099-NEC.
Your IRS Tax Information returns remain available electronically for one year following the date it is originally made available to you electronically. You may obtain a paper copy of the electronic information by printing it from your computer.
If your account is suspended, terminated or canceled, your consent is nullified and any future IRS Tax Information returns will be mailed to the address provided on your Form W-9.
4.  If you select electronic delivery, you will receive email and online communications and disclosures regarding your account instead of physical mail. Communications will not be provided in paper form unless you have elected not to receive electronic communications at the time the electronic statement is furnished.
Your consent applies to all IRS Tax Information returns we send, disclose, or communicate to you online. In addition to emails with embedded links and attachments, this includes disclosures, statements, and notices such as the annual privacy notice posted on our website.
5.  You permit Upwork to obtain your electronic signature if you choose to sign certain communications. If you do sign electronically, your electronic signature will bind you to the terms and conditions to the same extent as if you signed the communications on paper with an ink signature.
6.  You will update your Upwork account with any changes to your email address.
We need to deliver notices, notification of tax reports, and other documents and information to you by email, therefore you must update your Upwork account with any changes. For instructions on how to update your email address, read this
article
.
7.  If you have opted into electronic delivery consent, and are requesting IRS Tax Information returns in paper form, your request will not nullify the electronic delivery consent for future electronic deliveries of IRS Tax Information returns and other Upwork online communications unless consent is withdrawn (by opting out through the notification settings page, underneath the Tax Preferences section).
You may request an IRS Tax Information return in paper form by contacting customer support.
8.  Your consent to receive electronic IRS Tax Information returns is effective immediately until you choose to withdraw it.
You may withdraw your consent electronically by going to the Notification Settings in your Account and "unchecking" the box next to Tax Preferences to receive electronic communications (underneath the Tax Preferences section).
Effective February 24th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
UTG INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR AGREEMENT
UPWORK CONFIDENTIAL
THIS UTG INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR AGREEMENT
(this “
Agreement
”) is entered into by and between Upwork Talent Group Inc. (“
UTG
”), a Delaware corporation with its principal place of business at 2625 Augustine Drive, Suite 601, Santa Clara, CA 95054, and Freelancer, as of the date Freelancer accepts this Agreement via the Site (the “
Effective Date
”). UTG and Freelancer are sometimes referred to collectively herein as the “
Parties
” and individually as a “
Party
.” “
Upwork Client
” refers to [UPWORK ENTERPRISE COMPLIANCE CLIENT]. UTG and Freelancer agree as follows:
1.BACKGROUND AND INITIAL OBLIGATIONS.
1.1 Use of Platform.
UTG and Freelancer agree to use the marketplace for services owned and operated by Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) at the domain and sub-domains of
http://www.upwork.com
(the “
Site
”) for the designation of, delivery of and payment for Freelancer’s services under this Agreement. UTG and Freelancer specifically incorporate into this Agreement and agree to be bound by the Site’s Terms of Service available at
https://www.upwork.com/legal
(“
Terms of Service
”), as they may be amended from time to time. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement have the meanings given to them in the Terms of Service. To the extent that any provision of this Agreement conflicts with a provision of the Terms of Service, the applicable provision of this Agreement will control.
1.2 Identity of Freelancer.
The “
Freelancer
” is the self-employed individual or entity whose legal name and address are listed in the Tax Information section of the Account on the Site of the User accepting this Agreement via the Site.
a.
Any person who accepts this Agreement on behalf of a corporation, limited company or other legal entity represents and warrants that they accept this Agreement on behalf of such legal entity and that they have the legal authority and authorization to contractually bind that legal entity. A Freelancer that is a legal entity further represents and warrants that it is in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction(s) where Freelancer conducts business and will promptly provide proof of its organization, registration and good standing upon request.
b.
If Freelancer was offered the Project as an Agency Member, Freelancer represents and warrants that it is accepting this Agreement on behalf of the Agency whose Agency Account it is associated with and that Freelancer has the legal authority and authorization to do so. In such cases, except as used in this paragraph, the term “Freelancer” in this Agreement refers to and includes the Agency.
1.3 Work for Upwork Client.
UTG has contracted with Freelancer to provide certain services or deliverables to the Upwork Client (the “
Project
”). Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that the Upwork Client is an express third-party beneficiary of this Agreement, including without limitation the Arbitration Provision contained in section 15, below, having the right to enforce this Agreement in accordance with its terms.
1.4 UPWORK CLIENT CONFIDENTIALITY.
THE IDENTITY OF THE UPWORK CLIENT AND THE NATURE OF THE UPWORK CLIENT’S WORK ARE UPWORK CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION AND THE UPWORK CLIENT CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION UNDER THIS AGREEMENT. FREELANCER AGREES NOT TO DISCLOSE THIS INFORMATION AT ANY TIME, DURING OR AFTER THE PROJECT, WITHOUT ADVANCE WRITTEN APPROVAL BY THE UPWORK CLIENT.
1.5 The Project.
Freelancer agrees to complete the Project described in the contract offer on the Site related to this Project and to comply with all terms or specifications about the work to be completed agreed to by Freelancer on the Site (collectively, “Project Terms”). Freelancer further agrees that Project Terms are incorporated into this Agreement by this reference.
1.6 Use of the Upwork Site.
Freelancer agrees to use the Site, including Upwork Messages, for any communications with UTG, to record time spent working on hourly contracts, to request payment for contract milestones, and to submit any other invoice under this Agreement. Freelancer further understands and agrees that in order to receive payment for the Project all invoicing and payment must be completed through the Site.
1.7 Upwork Enterprise.
Freelancer agrees that Freelancer’s profile may be included in the Upwork Client’s Talent Cloud network on the Site for future consideration by the Upwork Client.
1.8 Upwork Enterprise Compliance.
For clarity, and for the
avoidance of doubt, this Independent Contractor Agreement exclusively applies to Upwork Enterprise Compliance clients where UTG is the agent of record.
1.9 Information Provided by Freelancer.
Freelancer represents and warrants that the information is and has been provided to Upwork or UTG is accurate and that Freelancer will provide notice of any material changes, including, without limitation, changes to Freelancer’s location, insurance coverage, tax residence or identification number, or changes to Freelancer’s business licensure, registration, or similar status.
2.
PROJECT
AND PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES.
2.1
Project Work Product.
Freelancer agrees to complete the Project specified by the Upwork Client in the Project Terms and to deliver the Work Product (defined below) to the Upwork Client by any deadline(s) set forth in the Project Terms or such other time as Freelancer may agree. UTG will pay Freelancer for Work Product in accordance with this Agreement and the Project Terms. As used in this Agreement, the term “
Work Product
” means any and all work and work product developed by Freelancer in completing the Project or delivered to the Upwork Client in performing the Project. This Agreement is only for the Work Product completed in accordance with this Agreement, and UTG will not pay Freelancer a regular salary or any minimum regular payment.
2.2
Performance of Services.
Freelancer will perform the services necessary to complete the Project in a timely and professional manner, consistent with industry standards, at a location, place and time (including specific hours), that Freelancer deems appropriate. Freelancer has the sole right to determine and control, and will determine and control, the manner and means of performing the Project. In completing the Project, Freelancer will provide and use Freelancer’s own equipment, tools, and other materials at Freelancer’s own expense. UTG is the agent of record for contracting purposes and is not involved in Freelancer’s work performance or completion of the Work Product. Freelancer is not performing services for this Project on Upwork’s behalf. Freelancer will perform the Project Terms without training from UTG or Upwork Client regarding the project performance. Freelancer will not perform services at UTG’s physical business location. Freelancer will not include in the Work Product any material that is owned by, copyrighted by, or that requires licensing, permission or authorization from a third party without the advance written permission of the Upwork Client.
2.3 Agreements with Upwork Client.
Freelancer acknowledges that Freelancer has contracted to perform work for the Upwork Client, and that material conditions of UTG agreeing to contract with Freelancer are that Freelancer maintain the Upwork Client’s confidentiality and that the Upwork Client owns all Work Product created by Freelancer while providing services to the Upwork Client, all as provided in this Agreement. Freelancer acknowledges that Upwork Client may require Freelancer to enter into a direct agreement addressing confidentiality and Work Product obligations as a condition to accepting the Project and performing services under it. In such instances, Freelancer agrees that it will not accept any Project from the Upwork Client or otherwise provide any services to Upwork Client unless and until Freelance reviews, accepts and enters into any such direct agreement required by the Upwork Client.
3.
COMPENSATION.
UTG will, subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, pay Freelancer the fee specified in the Project Terms. Payment will be made by UTG to Freelancer through the Site in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Terms of Service. Freelancer agrees that UTG will make payment under this section provided the Upwork Client’s account is current at the time the Freelancer’s payment is due. Freelancer also agrees that the Upwork Client is responsible for payment of the fee specified in the Project Terms if the Upwork Client’s account is terminated or suspended. Freelancer will be responsible for all expenses incurred in performing services under this Agreement.
4.
INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR RELATIONSHIP.
Freelancer’s relationship with UTG, the Upwork Client and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors will be that of an independent contractor, and nothing in this Agreement should be construed to create a partnership, joint venture, or employer-employee relationship.
4.1 No Employment or Agency.
Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Freelancer (a) is not an employee of UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors; (b) is not the agent of UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors; (c) is not authorized to make or hold itself out as authorized to make any statement, representation, contract, or commitment on behalf of UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors; and (d) is not and will not be entitled to any of the benefits that UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors makes available to its employees, such as group insurance, stock plans, profit-sharing or retirement benefits (and waives the right to receive any such benefits).
4.2 Tax and
Regulatory Compliance.
Freelancer is and will at all times remain solely responsible for all tax returns and payments required to be filed with or made to any national, federal, state, or local tax authority with respect to Freelancer’s performance of services and/or receipt of fees under this Agreement.
If applicable, UTG will report amounts paid to Freelancer by filing a Form 1099 with the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), as required by law. Freelancer agrees to complete the tax information fields on the Site and, as requested by UTG, to complete an IRS Form W-9, Form W-8 or other tax form. Freelancer accepts sole and exclusive liability for complying with all applicable national, federal, state, provincial and local laws, including laws governing self-employed individuals and other businesses, such as laws related to payment of taxes, social security, disability, and other contributions based on fees paid to Freelancer under this Agreement. Where such coverage is required by law, Freelancer represents and warrants that Freelancer has appropriate workers’ compensation coverage or, if it does not already have such coverage, agrees to obtain coverage before beginning work under this Agreement.
Neither UTG nor any Upwork Client will withhold or make payments for social security, any pension or social insurance plan, unemployment insurance or disability insurance contributions, any employer health taxes or other payroll taxes, including penalties and interest, or obtain workers’ compensation insurance on Freelancer’s behalf.
Freelancer hereby agrees to make any such required payments and obtain any required insurance and to indemnify and defend and hold harmless UTG and the Upwork Client from and against any and all such taxes or contributions, including penalties and interest. Freelancer agrees to provide proof of payment of appropriate taxes on any fees paid to Freelancer under this Agreement upon reasonable request by UTG.
4.3 Withholding.
Upon execution of this Agreement and thereafter as may be reasonably requested by UTG, Freelancer shall complete and provide to UTG any form reasonably requested by UTG or required by a relevant taxing authority in order to certify that UTG is not required to withhold from Freelancer’s fees or pay on Freelancer’s behalf any income or other tax withholding on any payment of fees under this Agreement.  In the event any such tax is required by law to be withheld by UTG on compensation payable under this Agreement, UTG may terminate this Agreement immediately. If UTG elects to continue the Agreement, UTG will have the right to pay such tax on behalf of Freelancer to the appropriate governmental authority, offset the compensation by such tax and furnish Freelancer with proof of payment of such tax.  Any such tax required to be withheld will be an expense of and borne by Freelancer.
5.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS.
5.1
Definition of
Inventions and Intellectual Property Rights.
“
Invention
” means any copyrightable material, notes, records, ideas, concepts, information, materials, processes, data, programs, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, artwork, formulae, techniques, or trade secrets conceived, authored, discovered, invented, developed or reduced to practice by Freelancer, solely or in collaboration with others, during the term of this Agreement, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein. “
Intellectual Property Rights
” means all trade secrets, copyrights, trademarks, mask work rights, patents, moral rights, and other intellectual property rights recognized by the laws of any country.
5.2
Definition of use of Background Technology.
As used in this Agreement, the term “
Background Technology
” means all Inventions developed by Freelancer other than in the course of providing services hereunder and all Inventions acquired or licensed by Freelancer that Freelancer uses in performing services under this Agreement or incorporates in the Work Product. Freelancer will disclose in advance in writing to the Upwork Client and in the Project Terms any Background Technology that Freelancer proposes to incorporate into Work Product or upon which use or distribution of the Work Product will depend. The Upwork Client will have the right to reject the use or incorporation of such Background Technology in the Upwork Client’s sole and absolute discretion. If Freelancer discloses no Background Technology, Freelancer warrants that it will not incorporate any Background Technology into Work Product. Freelancer will separately provide, with each delivery of Work Product to the Upwork Client, a third-party bill of materials that identifies all Background Technology and other third-party materials that have been incorporated into the Work Product and will provide, for each item of Background Technology identified, (a) the name and any associated version number (b) the applicable license or licensing terms, (c) whether the item has been modified by Freelancer, and (d) how the item has been incorporated into, is used by, or is relied upon by the Work Product. Notwithstanding the foregoing, unless otherwise agreed in the Project Terms, Freelancer agrees that it will not incorporate into Work Product or otherwise deliver to the Upwork Client any software code for which the use or distribution of the code will create (or purport to create) obligations for the Upwork Client to grant any rights or immunities under the Upwork Client’s Intellectual Property Rights to a third party, including, without limitation, any obligation that the Work Product or the Upwork Client software combined with, derived from, or distributed with such Work Product (x) be disclosed or distributed in source code form, (y) be licensed for the purpose of making derivative works, or (z) be redistributable at no charge.
5.3
Ownership and Assignment of Work Produc
t
.
Upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG, Freelancer hereby unconditionally and irrevocably assigns to the Upwork Client, without further consideration, all right, title and interest worldwide in and to all Work Product, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights in and to the Work Product. Except as set forth below, Freelancer retains no rights to use the Work Product and agrees not to challenge the validity of the Upwork Client’s exclusive rights in and ownership of the Work Product, including without limitation all Intellectual Property Rights therein. Freelancer hereby waives unconditionally and irrevocably for the benefit of the Upwork Client and its successors and assigns, without further consideration, any and all moral or similar rights in or to any Work Product (including without limitation, any rights of identification of authorship; any rights of approval; or restrictions or limitations on use, subsequent modification or development of derivative works) in which copyright may subsist in each jurisdiction throughout the world, to the extent that such rights may be waived in each respective jurisdiction. Freelancer agrees to, at the request of the Upwork Client and without any right to further consideration, sign all lawful papers, make all rightful oaths and execute all divisional, continuing, continuation-in-part or reissue applications, all assignments, all registration applications and all other instruments or papers, to carry into full force and effect, the assignment hereby made or intended to be made and generally do everything necessary or helpful for title to the Work Product, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein, to be clearly and exclusively owned and held by the Upwork Client. Freelancer hereby grants to the Upwork Client a power of attorney to execute any of the aforementioned documents on Freelancer’s behalf in order to give effect to the assignment hereby made.
5.4
License to Background Technology.
Freelancer hereby automatically upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG, and without further consideration, grants to the Upwork Client a non-exclusive, perpetual, fully-paid and royalty-free, irrevocable, non-terminable and world-wide right, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels or tiers of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform, and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, have made, use, sell, import, offer for sale, and exercise any and all present or future rights in the Background Technology incorporated or used in the Work Product.
5.5 License to or Waiver of Other Rights
.
If Freelancer has any right to the Work Product that cannot be assigned by Freelancer to the Upwork Client, Freelancer hereby automatically upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG unconditionally and irrevocably grants to the Upwork Client, without further consideration and during the term of such rights, an exclusive, even as to Freelancer, irrevocable, perpetual, non-terminable, worldwide, fully paid up and royalty-free license, with rights to sublicense through multiple levels or tiers of sublicensees, to reproduce, make derivative works of, distribute, publicly perform and publicly display in any form or medium, whether now known or later developed, make, have made, use, sell, import, offer for sale and exercise any and all such rights. If Freelancer has any rights to the Work Product that cannot be assigned or licensed to the Upwork Client, Freelancer hereby automatically upon receipt of payment of undisputed amounts from UTG unconditionally and irrevocably, without further consideration, waives the enforcement of such rights around the world, and all claims and causes of action of any kind against the Upwork Client, its successors and assigns, or related to the Upwork Client’s customers, with respect to such rights, and agrees, at UTG or the Upwork Client’s request and expense, to consent to and join in any action to enforce such rights.
5.6 Assistance.
Freelancer agrees to, at the request of the Upwork Client and without any right to further consideration, to assist the Upwork Client in every way, during and after the term of this Agreement, to obtain and enforce United States and foreign Intellectual Property Rights relating to the Work Product, in all countries, including to sign all lawful papers, make all rightful oaths and execute all divisional, continuing, continuation-in-part or reissue applications, all assignments, all registration applications and all other instruments or papers, to carry into full force and effect the assignment hereby made or intended to be made and generally do everything necessary or helpful for title to the Work Product, and all Intellectual Property Rights therein, to be clearly and exclusively owned and held by the Upwork Client, including testifying in a suit or other proceeding regarding such Inventions. Freelancer hereby grants to the Upwork Client a power of attorney to execute any of the aforementioned documents on Freelancer’s behalf in order to give effect to the assignment hereby made. This power of attorney shall be deemed coupled with an interest, and shall be irrevocable. Freelancer further agrees that Freelancer’s obligations under this Section 5.6 shall continue after termination of this Agreement.
6. CONFLICTING PROJECTS.
UTG and the Upwork Client acknowledge that Freelancer may enter into other contracts and accept work from any other persons or entities during the term of this Agreement; however, Freelancer agrees not to enter into a contract or accept an obligation that would conflict with the provisions of this Agreement or prevent Freelancer from meeting its obligations under this Agreement. Freelancer represents and warrants that there is no such contract or obligation in effect as of the Effective Date. Freelancer further agrees not to disclose to, deliver to, or induce UTG or the Upwork Client to use any confidential information that belongs to anyone other than UTG, the Upwork Client or Freelancer.
7. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION OF THE UPWORK CLIENT.
Freelancer agrees that during the term of this Agreement and thereafter, except as expressly authorized in writing by the Upwork Client, Freelancer (a) will not use or permit the use of Client Confidential Information (defined below) in any manner or for any purpose not expressly set forth in this Agreement; (b) will not disclose, lecture upon, publish, or permit others to disclose, lecture upon, or publish any such Client Confidential Information to any third party without first obtaining the Upwork Client’s express written consent on a case-by-case basis; (c) will limit access to Client Confidential Information to Freelancer Personnel who need to know such information in connection with the Project and who are likewise bound by non-use and non-disclosure obligations at least as restrictive as those set forth in this section; and (d) will not remove any tangible embodiment of any Client Confidential Information from the Upwork Client’s premises without the Upwork Client’s prior written consent. “
Client Confidential Information
” means and includes, but is not limited to, all Work Product and all non-public information related to the business of the Upwork Client or any of its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors and the actual or anticipated research and development of the Upwork Client or any of its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors, including without limitation (i) trade secrets, inventions, ideas, processes, computer source and object code, formulae, data, databases, programs, other works of authorship, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, and techniques; (ii) information regarding products or plans for research and development, marketing and business plans, budgets, financial statements, contracts, prices, suppliers, and customers; (iii) information regarding the skills and compensation of the Upwork Client’s employees, contractors, and any other Freelancers; (iv) the existence of any business discussions, negotiations, or agreements between the Upwork Client and any third party; and (v) all such information related to any third party that is disclosed during the course of the Project. Confidential Information will not include any such information which Freelancer can establish (x) was publicly known or made generally available prior to the time of disclosure to Freelancer; (y) becomes publicly known or made generally available after disclosure to Freelancer through no wrongful action or inaction of Freelancer; or (z) is in the rightful possession of Freelancer, without confidentiality obligations, at the time of disclosure as shown by Freelancer’s then-contemporaneous written records; provided that any combination of individual items of information shall not be deemed to be within any of the foregoing exceptions merely because one or more of the individual items are within such exception, unless the combination as a whole is within such exception. To the extent Freelancer (1) collects, stores, transmits, discloses, processes, and/or otherwise uses information that identifies a particular individual (“
Personal Information
”) or (2) accesses Upwork Client’s computer systems or networks in providing services under this Agreement, Freelancer will comply with the privacy and security requirements in
Exhibit 1
, and will ensure Freelancer Personnel comply with such requirements, for the purpose of conforming with applicable laws.
8. CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION OF UTG.
Freelancer agrees that during the term of this Agreement and thereafter, except as expressly authorized in writing by UTG, it (a) will not use or permit the use of UTG Confidential Information (defined below) in any manner or for any purpose not expressly set forth in this Agreement; (b) will not disclose, lecture upon, publish, or permit others to disclose, lecture upon, or publish any such UTG Confidential Information to any third party without first obtaining UTG’s express written consent on a case-by-case basis; (c) will limit access to UTG Confidential Information to Freelancer Personnel who need to know such information in connection with their work for UTG and who are likewise bound by non-use and non-disclosure obligations at least as restrictive as those set forth in this section; and (d) will not remove any tangible embodiment of any UTG Confidential Information from UTG’s premises without UTG’s prior written consent. “
UTG Confidential Information
” means and includes, but is not limited to, all non-public information related to UTG’s and/or its affiliates’, subsidiaries’, or parent company’s business and its/their actual or anticipated research and development, including without limitation (i) trade secrets, inventions, ideas, processes, computer source and object code, formulae, data, databases programs, other works of authorship, know-how, improvements, discoveries, developments, designs, and techniques; (ii) information regarding products or plans for research and development, marketing and business plans, budgets, financial statements, contracts, prices, suppliers, and customers; (iii) information regarding the skills and compensation of UTG’s, its affiliates’, subsidiaries’, or parent company’s employees, contractors, and any other Freelancers; (iv) the existence of any business discussions, negotiations, or agreements between UTG, its affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent company, and any third party; and (v) all such information related to any third party that is disclosed during the course of the Project. Confidential Information will not include any such information which Freelancer can establish (x) was publicly known or made generally available prior to the time of disclosure to Freelancer; (y) becomes publicly known or made generally available after disclosure to Freelancer through no wrongful action or inaction of Freelancer; or (z) is in the rightful possession of Freelancer, without confidentiality obligations, at the time of disclosure as shown by Freelancer’s then-contemporaneous written records; provided that any combination of individual items of information shall not be deemed to be within any of the foregoing exceptions merely because one or more of the individual items are within such exception, unless the combination as a whole is within such exception.
To the extent Freelancer (1) collects, stores, transmits, discloses, processes, and/or otherwise uses information that identifies a particular individual (“
Personal Information
”) or (2) accesses Upwork Client’s computer systems or networks in providing services under this Agreement, Freelancer will comply with the privacy and security requirements in
Exhibit 1
, and will ensure Freelancer Personnel comply with such requirements, for the purpose of conforming with applicable laws.
Immunity for Certain Disclosures.
As set forth in the U.S. Defend Trade Secrets Act, 18 U.S.C. section 1833, please note that a disclosure of trade secrets or other Confidential Information is immune from prosecution or civil action under U.S. Federal or State trade secret law if the disclosure (a) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney; and (ii) solely for the purpose of reporting or investigating a suspected violation of law; or (b) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
Provision Applicable to New York City.
Nothing in this Agreement, including but not limited to its provisions relating to confidentiality, prohibits (or should be construed as prohibiting) any Freelancer residing in, or engaged to provide services in, New York City under this Agreement from disclosing the terms of this Agreement to the Director of the Office of Labor Standards.
9. FREELANCER’S AGENTS AND SUBCONTRACTORS.
Freelancer is free to rely on its employees or subcontractors to assist with performance of services under this Agreement
.
If at any time Freelancer has any employee, independent contractor or other person or entity performing work on Freelancer’s behalf in connection with the Project, however, Freelancer agrees Freelancer remains responsible for the quality of the Work Product and agrees to the following representations and obligations:
9.1
Project
and Performance of Services.
a.
Work Product Ownership, Confidential Information and Other Contractual Provisions
. Before any employee, independent contractor or other person or entity employed or engaged by Freelancer (collectively, “
Freelancer Personnel
”) performs any services in connection with the Project or has access to any Client Confidential Information or UTG Confidential Information, Freelancer will enter into a binding written agreement with such Freelancer Personnel that (i) contains provisions with the same effect as the Agreement sections titled “Intellectual Property Rights,” “Confidential Information of Upwork Client” and “Confidential Information of UTG”; and (ii) specifies that Freelancer Personnel do not have any employment relationship with Upwork Client or UTG or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors and are not entitled to or eligible for any benefits that Upwork Client or UTG or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors may make available to any of their respective employees. In addition, Freelancer will limit access to Client Confidential Information and UTG Confidential Information to Freelancer Personnel who have a reasonable need to have such access in order to perform services for the Project.
b.
Freelancer Personnel Not Employed by Upwork Client or UTG.
Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that Freelancer Personnel are not engaged by, supervised by, directed by or assigned work by Upwork Client, UTG, or any of their respective parents, subsidiaries or affiliates. Freelancer further acknowledges and agrees that neither Upwork Client nor UTG determine or control, or have the right to determine or control, any terms and conditions of employment or engagement of any Freelancer Personnel, including without limitation their selection, hiring, work assignment, work hours, compensation, work methods, discipline, working conditions, or termination. For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer Personnel are not employees of Upwork Client or UTG or any of their respective parents, subsidiaries or affiliates. Freelancer will be fully responsible for the acts, work and safety of Freelancer Personnel at all times.
c. Freelancer Personnel Compensation, Taxes and Benefits.
In accordance with all applicable law, Freelancer will be solely responsible for determining and paying all compensation of Freelancer Personnel and will be solely responsible for and pay any taxes, contributions and/or benefits owed to or on behalf of Freelancer Personnel. Neither Upwork Client nor UTG nor any of their respective parents, subsidiaries or affiliates will be liable to Freelancer or to Freelancer Personnel for Freelancer’s failure to perform Freelancer’s compensation, tax or benefit obligations with respect to Freelancer Personnel. Freelancer will indemnify, defend and hold Upwork Client and UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors harmless from and against all such taxes, contributions and benefits and will comply with all associated governmental regulations, including the filing of all necessary reports and tax returns.
d. Background Screening of Freelancer Personnel.
If requested by UTG or Upwork Client and permitted by applicable law, Freelancer will conduct reasonable background screening measures with respect to Freelancer Personnel (the “
Screenings
”) and will be responsible for all costs and fees relating to such Screenings. Freelancer will conduct Screenings in accordance with applicable laws and will obtain written authorization from Freelancer Personnel to share the results of such screening with Upwork Client and/or UTG upon request.
e. Work Diary
. Freelancer agrees to record and invoice through Work Diary on the Site all work performed by any Freelancer Personnel for Projects performed on a time and material or hourly basis under this Agreement.
Freelancer acknowledges that UTG has no obligation to pay Freelancer, and may not approve payment of Freelancer, for time spent on hourly Projects that is not recorded in the Work Diary.
9.2 Freelancer Responsible for Freelancer Personnel.
a. Employees.
With respect to Freelancer Personnel,
Freelancer is solely responsible for and will comply with all applicable employment laws, including without limitation laws governing workers’ compensation, unemployment and disability insurance, health insurance and other employee benefits, wage and hour, employment discrimination and harassment, leaves of absence, and health and safety. Freelancer is responsible for providing meal and rest breaks to employees in accordance with any applicable laws and for complying with all paycheck requirements. If applicable, Freelancer will also comply with all licensing and other regulatory steps necessary to employ workers. Freelancer assumes full responsibility for any claims brought by, on behalf of or in connection with Freelancer’s employees (or other Freelancer Personnel alleging they are or should have been classified as employees) and agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Upwork Client, UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates and successors harmless from and against any such claims.
b. Independent Contractors.
With respect to Freelancer Personnel, Freelancer is solely responsible for properly classifying and engaging any Freelancer Personnel as independent contractors or as its employees and will comply with all applicable laws defining or governing the independent contractor or employment relationship. Freelancer warrants and represents that any Freelancer Personnel treated as an independent contractor is properly classified and assumes full responsibility for any claims brought by, on behalf of or in connection with Freelancer Personnel working as independent contractors and agrees to indemnify, defend and hold Upwork Client, UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates and successors harmless from and against any such claims.
9.3 Intellectual Property Rights.
Freelancer agrees that all copyrightable material, notes, records, drawings, designs, inventions, improvements, developments, discoveries and trade secrets conceived, discovered, developed or reduced to practice by Freelancer Personnel, solely or in collaboration with others, during the term of this Agreement that relate in any manner to the business of Upwork Client will belong exclusively to Upwork Client. Freelancer will ensure that Freelancer Personnel execute appropriate agreements with Freelancer to confirm such ownership, narrowed if and to the extent required by applicable law to be enforceable in the applicable jurisdiction, and to confirm that Freelancer Personnel will not challenge the validity of Upwork Client’s ownership in Work Product, including without limitation the Intellectual Property Rights in Work Product.
9.4 Indemnification.
In addition to the indemnification obligations set forth elsewhere in this Agreement, Freelancer will defend, indemnify, and hold harmless UTG, Upwork Client and each of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates and successors, individually and collectively, against any damage, cost, loss or expense arising from any claim, suit, proceeding, investigation, government inquiry or other action brought against UTG, Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors (a) alleging that any Freelancer Personnel is an employee of UTG, Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors or (b) arising out of the failure (whether negligent, willful, intentional, or unintended in cases of strict liability) of Freelancer to comply with this Agreement or any applicable law or regulation.
10. FREELANCER’S COVENANTS, REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES.
Freelancer hereby covenants, represents and warrants to UTG and to Upwork Client that (a) Freelancer will perform the services necessary to perform the Project in a timely and professional manner, consistent with industry standards, and all in accordance with this Agreement; (b) except any pre-approved Background Technology used or incorporated as part of the Work Product, the Work Product will be an original work of Freelancer and any third parties will have executed assignment of rights prior to being allowed to participate in the development of the Work Product; (c) the Work Product will fully conform to the requirements and terms set forth in this Agreement, including any Project Terms; (d) the Work Product will be free from material errors, faults and defects of any kind; (e) the Work Product will not contain any virus, Trojan horse, malicious code, trap door, time bomb, or shutdown mechanism, or any other software code or functionality that will “lock” or prevent the use of or access to the Work Product or otherwise cause the Work Product to cease functioning, or which is otherwise designed to harm any systems, servers, computers or websites of Upwork Client, UTG or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates or successors; (f) neither the Work Product nor any element thereof does or will infringe or misappropriate the Intellectual Property Rights of any third party; (g) neither the Work Product nor any element thereof will be subject to any restrictions or to any mortgages, liens, pledges, security interests, or encumbrances; (h) Freelancer will not grant, directly or indirectly, any rights or interest whatsoever in the Work Product to third parties other than the Upwork Client; (i) Freelancer has full right and power to enter into and perform this Agreement without the consent of any third party; (j) Freelancer has an unqualified right to grant the license to all Background Technology as set forth in the section titled “License to Background Technology”; (k) if Freelancer is required to possess or maintain any license, registration, or other authorization necessary to provide the Work Product or to provide independent contractor services under this Agreement, then it possess such a license, registration, or other authorization and will maintain such license, registration, or other authorization during the term of this Agreement; (l) Freelancer will not use or incorporate as part of the Work Product any Open Source Code other than as expressly authorized in this Agreement; (m) Freelancer will promptly update changes to Freelancer’s contact information as outlined in the Terms of Service; and (n) Freelancer will comply with all laws and regulations applicable to Freelancer’s obligations under this Agreement.
11. UTG DISCLAIMER; LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
11.1 Disclaimer.
UTG MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES WITH RESPECT TO THE PROJECT, THE PROJECT TERMS, OR IN CONNECTION WITH UTG’S PERFORMANCE OF ITS OBLIGATIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES HEREUNDER, AND FREELANCER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT THE SAME ARE BEING PROVIDED OR PERFORMED HEREUNDER “AS IS” AND WITHOUT REPRESENTATION OR WARRANTY OF ANY KIND. UTG HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIMS ALL SUCH REPRESENTATIONS OR WARRANTIES, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED, WRITTEN, ORAL OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, ANY WARRANTY OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, NON-INFRINGEMENT, TITLE, AND/OR VALIDITY. SOME STATES AND JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW FOR ALL THE FOREGOING EXCLUSIONS, SO TO THAT EXTENT, IF ANY, SOME OR ALL OF THESE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY.
11.2 Limitation of Liability.
IN NO EVENT WILL UTG, UPWORK CLIENT OR ANY OF THEIR PARENTS, SUBSIDIARIES, AFFILIATES, OR SUCCESSORS BE LIABLE TO FREELANCER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, CONSEQUENTIAL (INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, LOST PROFITS), EXEMPLARY, OR PUNITIVE DAMAGES, EVEN IF THEY WERE ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY UNDER WHICH ANY SUCH DAMAGES ARE SOUGHT. SOME STATES AND JURISDICTIONS DO NOT ALLOW FOR ALL THE FOREGOING EXCLUSIONS AND LIMITATIONS OF INCIDENTAL OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES, SO TO THAT EXTENT, IF ANY, SOME OR ALL OF THESE LIMITATIONS AND EXCLUSIONS MAY NOT APPLY.
12. INDEMNIFICATION.
Freelancer will defend, indemnify, and hold harmless UTG, Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors, individually and collectively, against any and all damage, cost, loss or expense arising from any claim, suit or proceeding, actual or alleged, brought or asserted against UTG, Upwork Client and/or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors (a) alleging that any Work Product that Freelancer delivers pursuant to this Agreement or the Project infringes upon any intellectual property rights; (b) alleging that any Work Product that Freelancer delivers pursuant to this Agreement or the Project misappropriates any trade secrets of UTG, Upwork Client and any of their parents and affiliates, or any third party; (c) arising from or related to Freelancer’s breach of any representation or warranty; (d) arising from or related to Freelancer’s failure to pay any taxes or fees due as a result of Freelancer’s work under this Agreement; (e) arising from or related to Freelancer’s or Freelancer’s personnel’s failure to comply with any applicable law or regulation; or (f) arising from or related to Freelancer’s breach of any other terms of this Agreement.
13. INSURANCE.
Freelancer, at its sole cost and expense, will maintain appropriate insurance in accordance with any applicable laws and regulations and in no event less than industry standards, including but not limited to unemployment and workers’ compensation insurance. Upon request, Freelancer will furnish proof of insurance in a form acceptable to UTG and the Upwork Client.
14.TERM AND TERMINATION.
14.1 Term.
The term of this Agreement (the “
Term
”) will begin on the Effective Date and will terminate on the first to occur of: (a) the end date in the Project Terms; or (b) the date that the Project is fully completed and thus closed on the Site.
14.2 Termination with Cause.
Either Party has the right to terminate this Agreement immediately in the event that the other Party has materially breached the Agreement and fails to cure such breach within 15 calendar days of receipt of notice by the non-breaching Party, setting forth in reasonable detail the nature of the breach. UTG may also terminate this Agreement immediately, in writing, in its sole discretion in the event of Freelancer’s material breach of section 5, 6, 7, 8 or 9 (including subsections), or if Freelancer engages in unlawful activities while rendering the services specified in the Project.
14.3 Return of Property.
Upon termination of the Agreement or upon UTG’s or Upwork Client’s request at any other time, Freelancer will deliver to UTG or Upwork Client, as applicable, all of UTG’s or the Upwork Client’s property together with all copies thereof and any other documents or materials that contain any Work Product, Client Confidential Information or UTG Confidential Information.
14.4 Survival.
The following provisions will survive the expiration or termination of this Agreement for any reason: sections 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14.3, 14.4, 15, and 16, each including subsections. For the avoidance of doubt, Freelancer acknowledges and agrees that the license rights and other rights granted by Freelancer in section 5 above are perpetual in nature and will continue in perpetuity notwithstanding the expiration or termination of this Agreement, regardless of the cause, and the expiration or termination of this Agreement will not affect, limit, or otherwise impair such rights.
15. DISPUTES; ARBITRATION PROVISION.
15.1 Dispute Process.
The Parties agree to resolve any claim, dispute, or controversy that arises out of or relates to (a) this Agreement, (b) Freelancer’s relationship with or work or UTG, the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors (each of which are express third-party beneficiaries of this Arbitration Provision), including without limitation any claimed employment, or the termination of any relationship referred to in this Agreement, and/or (c) the Site or the Site Services (each, a “
Claim
”) in accordance with this section 15 (sometimes referred to as “Arbitration Provision”).
15.2 Informal Dispute Resolution.
Before serving a demand for arbitration of a Claim, or otherwise seeking relief for any Claim, Freelancer and UTG agree to first notify the other Party or Parties (the “
Notice
”). The Parties will then seek informal resolution of the Claim. The Notice must be in writing and include Freelancer’s name, pertinent account information, a brief description of the Claim, and the drafting Party’s contact information, so that the receiving Party may evaluate and attempt to informally resolve the Claim. The receiving Party will have 60 calendar days from the date of its receipt of the Notice to informally resolve the Claim, which, if successful, will avoid the need for further action. Notice to UTG of the Claim will be sent to Upwork Global Inc. Headquarters as listed on its Site (https://www.upwork.com/about/contact/), Attn: Legal or
legalnotices@upwork.com
. Notice to the Upwork Client will be made through any means by which Freelancer communicates with the Upwork Client about the Work Product. Notice to Freelancer will be provided to the most current physical or email address on the Site.
15.3 Binding Arbitration and Class Action/Jury Trial Waiver (Does Not Apply to Freelancers Located Outside the United States and Its Territories).
This Arbitration Provision applies to all Freelancers except Freelancers located outside of the United States and its territories. In the unlikely event the Parties are unable to resolve a Claim within 60 calendar days of the receipt of the applicable Notice, Freelancer, UTG and any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors, and Upwork Client and any of its parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors agree to resolve the Claim by final and binding arbitration before an arbitrator from JAMS. JAMS may be contacted at
www.jamsadr.com.
If for any reason JAMS will not administer the arbitration, either Party may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction with authority over the location where the arbitration will be conducted for appointment of a neutral arbitrator.
a. Scope of Arbitration Agreement and Conduct of Arbitration
Arbitration as provided in this Arbitration Provision is governed by the United States Federal Arbitration Act (9 U.S.C. §§ 1
et seq
.).  This Arbitration Provision applies to any and all Claims (as defined in section 15.1). For the avoidance of doubt, Claims include, but are not limited to, all claims, disputes, or controversies arising out of or relating to this Agreement, the Project, the Terms of Service, escrow payments or agreements, any payments or monies Freelancer claims are due, trade secrets, unfair competition, false advertising, consumer protection, privacy, compensation, worker classification, minimum wage, seating, expense reimbursement, overtime, breaks and rest periods, termination, retaliation, discrimination or harassment and all claims arising under the Defend Trade Secrets Act, the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. §1981, the Rehabilitation Act, the Civil Rights Acts of 1866 and 1871, the Civil Rights Act of 1991, the Pregnancy Discrimination Act, the Equal Pay Act, the Americans With Disabilities Act, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the Family Medical Leave Act, the Fair Labor Standards Act, the Employee Retirement Income Security Act, the Affordable Care Act, the Genetic Information Non-Discrimination Act, the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, the Worker Adjustment and Retraining Notification Act, all state statutes or regulations addressing the same or similar subject matters, and all other federal, state or local legal claims arising out of or relating to Freelancer’s relationship with or work for UTG or the Upwork Client or any of their parents, subsidiaries, affiliates, or successors and/or the termination of that relationship. The Upwork Client is an express third party beneficiary and may enforce the agreement to the full extent as though it were a signatory.
Disputes between the parties that may not be subject to a pre-dispute arbitration agreement as provided by the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act (Public Law 111-203) or as provided by an Act of Congress or lawful, enforceable Executive Order, are excluded from the coverage of this Agreement.
Except as otherwise provided herein, arbitration will be conducted in Santa Clara County, California in accordance with the JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures under the Optional Expedited Arbitration Procedures then in effect for JAMS.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any Claims by Freelancers that allege employment or worker classification disputes will be conducted within 25 miles of where Freelancer is located in accordance with the JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules and Procedures then in effect.  The JAMS arbitration rules may be found at
www.jamsadr.com
or by searching online for “JAMS Comprehensive Arbitration Rules and Procedures” or “JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules.”  The Parties agree that any Party will have the right to appear at the arbitration by telephone and/or video rather than in person.
The Parties will follow the applicable JAMS rules with respect to arbitration fees.  In any arbitration under the JAMS Employment Arbitration Rules and Procedures, Freelancer will pay JAMS arbitration fees only to the extent those fees are no greater than the filing or initial appearance fees applicable to court actions in the jurisdiction where the arbitration will be conducted, with UTG to make up the difference, if any.  The arbitrator must follow applicable law and may award only those remedies that would have applied had the matter been heard in court.  Judgment may be entered on the arbitrator’s decision in any court having jurisdiction.
This Arbitration Provision does not apply to litigation to which Freelancer is a party that is or was already pending in a state or federal court or arbitration before the Effective Date.  This Arbitration Provision also does not apply to claims for workers compensation, state disability insurance or unemployment insurance benefits.  Either Freelancer or UTG may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for provisional injunctive relief in connection with an arbitrable controversy, but only upon the ground that the award to which that party may be entitled may be rendered ineffectual without such relief; the arbitrator will render the final judgment in the matter.
Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents Freelancer from making a report to or filing a claim or charge with a government agency, including without limitation the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, U.S. Department of Labor, U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, National Labor Relations Board, or Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs. Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents the investigation by a government agency of any report, claim or charge otherwise covered by this Arbitration Provision. This Arbitration Provision also does not prevent federal administrative agencies from adjudicating claims and awarding remedies based on those claims, even if the claims would otherwise be covered by this Arbitration Provision. Nothing in this Arbitration Provision prevents or excuses a party from satisfying any conditions precedent and/or exhausting administrative remedies under applicable law before bringing a claim in arbitration. UTG will not retaliate against Freelancer for filing a claim with an administrative agency or for exercising rights (individually or in concert with others) under Section 7 of the National Labor Relations Act.
b. Interpretation and Enforcement of this Arbitration Provision
This Arbitration Provision is the full and complete agreement relating to the formal resolution of Claims and replaces all prior agreements between Freelancer and UTG regarding the arbitration of disputes covered by this Arbitration Provision.  Except as otherwise provided in this Arbitration Provision, this Arbitration Provision covers, and the arbitrator will have exclusive jurisdiction to decide, all disputes arising out of or relating to the interpretation, enforcement, or application of this Arbitration Provision, including, except as otherwise provided in this Arbitration Provision, the enforceability, revocability, scope, or validity of the Arbitration Provision or whether any portion of the Arbitration Provision is void or voidable.  All such matters will be decided by an arbitrator and not by a court.
In the event any portion of this Arbitration Provision is deemed unenforceable, the remainder of this Arbitration Provision will be enforceable.  If any portion of the Class Action Waiver in subsection c, below, of this Arbitration Provision is deemed to be unenforceable, the Parties agree that this Arbitration Provision will be enforced to the fullest extent permitted by law.
c. Class and Collective Action Waiver
Private attorney general representative actions under the California Labor Code are not arbitrable, not within the scope of this Arbitration Provision and may be maintained in a court of law. However, this Arbitration Provision affects the Parties’ ability to participate in class or collective actions. The Parties agree to bring any dispute in arbitration on an individual basis only, and not on a class or collective basis on behalf of others.  There will be no right or authority for any dispute to be brought, heard or arbitrated as a class or collective action, or as a member in any such class or collective proceeding (“Class Action Waiver”). Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement or the JAMS Rules, disputes regarding the enforceability, revocability, scope, or validity or breach of the Class Action Waiver may be resolved only by a civil court of competent jurisdiction and not by an arbitrator. In any case in which (1) the dispute is filed as a class or collective action and (2) there is a final judicial determination that all or part of the Class Action Waiver is unenforceable, the class or collective action to that extent must be litigated in a civil court of competent jurisdiction, but the portion of the Class Action Waiver that is enforceable shall be enforced in arbitration. Freelancer will not be retaliated against, disciplined or threatened with discipline as a result of exercising any rights under Section 7 of the National Labor Relations Act, if applicable, by filing or participating in a class or collective action in any forum. However, any Party may lawfully seek enforcement of this Arbitration Provision and the Class Action Waiver under the Federal Arbitration Act and seek dismissal of such class or collective actions or claims.
d. Right to Opt Out of the Arbitration Provision.
Freelancer may opt out of the Arbitration Provision by notifying UTG in writing within 30 calendar days of the Effective Date.
To opt out, Freelancer must send a written notification to UTG to Upwork Global Inc. headquarters as listed on its Site (https://www.upwork.com/about/contact/), Attn: Legal or
legalnotices@upwork.com
that includes (a) Freelancer’s account username, (b) Freelancer’s name, (c) Freelancer’s address, (d) Freelancer’s telephone number, (e) Freelancer’s email address, and (f) a statement that Freelancer wishes to opt out of the Arbitration Provision. Freelancer understands that Freelancer has the right to consult with counsel of Freelancer’s choice concerning this Agreement and the Arbitration Provision.
16. GENERAL PROVISIONS
16.1
Choice of Law.
Except as otherwise specifically provided herein, this Agreement and any Claims will be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of Delaware, without regard to its conflict of law provisions and excluding the United Nations Convention on Contracts for the International Sale of Goods (CISG); provided, however, that any Claims by any Freelancer located within the United States will be governed by the law of the state in which such Freelancer resided at the time the Project was performed.
16.2 Severability.
If any provision of this Agreement is, for any reason, held to be invalid or unenforceable, the other provisions of this Agreement will be unimpaired and the invalid or unenforceable provision will be deemed modified so that it is valid and enforceable to the maximum extent permitted by law. Section 15.3(c) governs severability of the Class Action Waiver.
16.3 No Assignment
.
This Agreement, and the Parties’ respective rights and obligations herein, may not be assigned or otherwise transferred by either Party without the other’s prior written consent, and any attempted assignment or transfer in violation of the foregoing will be null and void; provided, however, UTG may assign this Agreement, its rights and its obligations to an affiliate or to any successor to its business or assets to which this Agreement relates, whether by merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization or otherwise. The terms of this Agreement will be binding upon assignees.
16.4 Injunctive Relief.
Freelancer acknowledges that, because its services are personal and unique and because Freelancer will have access to Confidential Information of UTG and Upwork Client, any breach of this Agreement by Freelancer would cause irreparable injury to UTG or Upwork Client for which monetary damages would not be an adequate remedy and, therefore, will entitle UTG or Upwork Client to injunctive relief (including specific performance). The rights and remedies provided to each Party in this Agreement are cumulative and in addition to any other rights and remedies available to such Party at law or in equity not otherwise waived by this Agreement.
16.5 Waiver.
Any waiver or failure to enforce any provision of this Agreement on one occasion will not be deemed a waiver of any other provision or of such provision on any other occasion.
16.6 Export.
Freelancer agrees not to export, directly or indirectly, any U.S. technical data acquired from UTG, Upwork or Upwork Client, or any products utilizing such data, to countries outside the United States, because such export could be in violation of the United States export laws or regulations.
16.7 Entire Agreement.
This Agreement is the final, complete and exclusive agreement of the Parties with respect to the subject matters hereof and supersedes and merges all prior discussions between the Parties with respect to such subject matters. No modification of or amendment to this Agreement, or any waiver of any rights under this Agreement, will be effective unless in writing and signed by Freelancer and UTG.
16.8 Electronic Acceptance.
The Parties expressly agree that this Agreement may be electronically signed and accepted, and that the Site’s record of Freelancer’s acceptance will be treated, for purposes of validity, enforceability and admissibility, the same as written signatures.
THE PARTIES AGREE THAT BY ACCEPTING THIS AGREEMENT VIA THE SITE, FREELANCER HAS BOUND ITSELF TO THIS AGREEMENT AND CREATED AN AGREEMENT THAT IS ENFORCEABLE AGAINST ALL PARTIES.
FREELANCER ACKNOWLEDGES AND AGREES THAT FREELANCER HAS BEEN GIVEN THE OPPORTUNITY TO OBTAIN INDEPENDENT LEGAL ADVICE WITH RESPECT TO THIS AGREEMENT BEFORE ACCEPTING IT, AND THAT FREELANCER VOLUNTARILY AGREES TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT WITH FULL KNOWLEDGE AND UNDERSTANDING OF ITS TERMS.
EXHIBIT A
Privacy and Information Security Exhibit
To the extent Freelancer (1) collects, stores, transmits, discloses, processes, and/or otherwise uses information that identifies a particular individual (“Personal Information”) or (2) accesses Upwork Client’s computer systems or networks in providing services under this Agreement, Freelancer will comply with the privacy and security requirements in this Exhibit for the purpose of conforming with applicable laws regarding protection of Personal Information.  Freelancer is expected to be familiar with such laws and take whatever additional security measures may be warranted by the particular circumstances.
Privacy Requirements
1. Personal Information:
Freelancer will collect, store, transmit, disclose, process, destroy, or otherwise process Personal Information only (a) for purposes of providing the Services and as otherwise instructed by Upwork Client, (b) in accordance with this Exhibit 1, and (c) in compliance with applicable law.  In the event of any conflict between applicable law and this Exhibit 1, Freelancer will comply with applicable law.  Personal Information includes any information related to an identified or identifiable natural person where such information is protected under applicable data protection law.
2. Notification Of Security Incident:
Freelancer will notify Upwork Client of any actual or suspected security incident involving Personal Information as soon as possible after becoming aware of the incident, but never later than 24 hours after learning of the incident.  Freelancer will cooperate with Upwork Client on any investigation of the security incident.  A “security incident” is a breach of security leading to the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to, Personal Information transmitted, stored or otherwise processed.
3. Security Standards:
Freelancer will utilize reasonable and physical, technical and administrative safeguards to protect Personal Information and comply at all times with applicable laws concerning the protection and securing of Personal Information. For as long as Freelancer has access to Personal Information or to Upwork Client’s systems/networks, Freelancer will update security practices and controls at Freelancer’s own cost.
4. Malware Protection:
Freelancer will use up-to-date, commercially reasonable virus protection software (i.e. anti-virus) for the duration of the Engagement.
5. Device and Software Management:
Before the start of the Engagement and at all times while Freelancer accesses any Personal Information or Upwork Client’s systems/networks, Freelancer will:
Use up-to-date software and firmware that includes any current patches and updates and that is configured to automatically update/patch;
Use a firewall to protect Freelancer’s own information systems;
Use strong, unique passwords of at least 8 characters (with a mix of letters, numbers, and special characters where possible) for access to devices and applications;
Use password-activated screensavers to lock hardware or devices after a period of inactivity;
Configure devices and applications to require new passwords at least every 90 days;
Ensure that multiple failed login attempts (no more than 10) to devices and applications result in lockout (check security settings on applications); and
Disable Bluetooth on devices (except when use is necessary).
6. Secure Practices:
Freelancer will only connect to trusted, private wireless networks that use complex passwords not known or easily accessible to the public (e.g., not Starbucks).
Freelancer will not share hardware or devices with other people (roommates, spouses, children, etc.) while performing the Engagement until all Personal Information is removed/destroyed from the hardware or device.  Hardware and devices shall be housed in secure places when not in use.
Freelancer will not download and install unsolicited software.  Software downloaded to hardware or devices that connect to Upwork Client’s systems/network could be used to distribute malware.
Freelancer will not share passwords used to access Personal Information with anyone or post passwords near hardware or devices.
7. Disposal:
When no longer needed for the Engagement, and always upon completion of the Engagement or at Upwork Client’s request, Freelancer will return all Personal Information received, compiled or created in the course of the Engagement.  Further, Freelancer will securely delete any and all copies of such Personal Information (including backups) in Freelancer’s possession (e.g., hard copies shredded, desktop/email trashcan emptied, etc.).  Personal Information in electronic form will be deleted with a “wiping” program that overwrites data on the hardware; paper documents containing Personal Information will be shredded.  Deleting files using standard keyboard commands is not sufficient because data may remain on the computer’s hard drive. Wiping programs are available at most office supply stores. Freelancer understands that a failure to delete Personal Information in Freelancer’s possession after completion of the Engagement may constitute theft of Personal Information.
8. Data Protection:
Freelancer will not disclose Personal Information to a subcontractor without Upwork Client’s prior, written consent.  Freelancer will not disclose Personal Information to any other third party without Upwork Client’s prior, written consent except as required by law.  Freelancer will not ever sell Personal Information.  Freelancer will promptly notify Upwork Client of any legally binding request for the production or disclosure of Personal Information (unless prohibited by law from doing so) to allow Upwork Client sufficient time to object to the request.
Freelancer will not attempt to link, identify, or otherwise create a relationship between Personal Information made available to Freelancer by Upwork Client with any other data without the express authorization of Upwork Client.
In the event Freelancer access to, or storage of, Personal Information results in the transfer of Personal Information to a country outside the country where the Personal Information originated, Freelancer will, at Upwork Client’s request and to the extent required by applicable law, take such reasonable steps as Upwork Client deems necessary (e.g., execute a data transfer agreement) to comply with any law in the country of origin that restricts the international transfer of Personal Information.
Freelancer will cooperate with Upwork Client’s reasonable request for assistance in responding to a request to Upwork Client by an individual to exercise his or her rights under applicable data protection law, including but not limited to requests to delete Personal Information, and requests to access Personal Information.  In the event Freelancer receives such a request directly from an individual concerning Personal Information in Freelancer’s possession, Freelancer will promptly forward the request to Upwork Client so that Upwork Client can respond to the individual.
Freelancer will make available, upon Upwork Client’s reasonable request, information necessary to demonstrate compliance with this Exhibit 1 and will allow for audits or inspection by Upwork Client or its designee concerning Freelancer’s handling of Personal Information in accordance with this Exhibit 1.
In the event the Personal Information relates to an individual located in the European Economic Area, Attachment A to this Exhibit 1 describes the nature and purpose of the processing of Personal Information, the type of Personal Information processed, and the categories of data subjects.
Additional information on best practices for protecting Personal Information may be found at
https://www.bulkorder.ftc.gov/publications/protecting-personal-information-guide-business
. Freelancer is encouraged to obtain and read a copy of this free publication.
Attachment A
Description Of The Processing
Nature Of Processing By Freelancer:
Purposes Of Processing By Freelancer:
Categories Of Data Subjects Whose Personal Information Is Processed By Freelancer:
Categories Of Personal Information Processed By Freelancer:
Effective May 15th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Upwork may offer registered users the opportunity to join Upwork’s Referral Program (“
Referral Program
”). Upwork may withdraw, or suspend, or change the requirements or incentives of the Referral Program, and may change the requirements and incentives at any time.
Eligibility
Referrer
: You must be a registered user with an active account on Upwork (www.upwork.com) and be invited by Upwork to participate in the Referral Program.
Referee
: To be an eligible referee, you must not have ever had an Upwork Account (or an account with Upwork predecessors, oDesk or Elance, prior to 2014), and you must be referred by a qualified referrer via their unique referral link or code.
Qualified Referrals
For a referral to be considered a Qualified Referral, all of the following must occur:
As an eligible referrer, you share your unique referral link or code with an eligible referee;
The eligible referee registers for an Upwork Account using your unique referral link or code;
The eligible referee enters into a Service Contract within the time frame designated in the referral invitation; and
Any other requirements as detailed in your specific Referral Program offer are met. Check your Referral Program offer for eligibility details such as required minimum spend by the Referee or time limits.
Earn and Spend Referral Rewards
Referrers
: As a qualified referrer, you will earn Referral Rewards in the form of account credit, as specified in the Referral Program offer, for each Qualified Referral you make under the Referral Program. Once the conditions for the Qualified Referral have been met, Upwork will apply the account credit to your Upwork Account.
Referees
: As an eligible referee, you will earn Referral Rewards in the form of account credit, as specified in the Referral Program offer, if you meet the conditions of a Qualified Referral. Check the referral offer you received for applicable terms such as required minimum spend or time limits.
Redemption
: You can spend account credit on your next Upwork purchase, unless there are restrictions listed on your specific referral offer. Referral Reward account credit cannot be transferred.
Important Disclaimers
Upwork reserves the right to suspend your account and remove any account credit should we notice any activity by the Referrer and/or Referee that is determined to be a violation of this Referral Program Terms or Upwork’s Terms of Service. We reserve the right to amend, suspend or terminate this Referral Program at any time without notice.
Effective April 9th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
MASTER SUBSCRIPTION AGREEMENT - ENTERPRISE CORE
This Master Subscription Agreement governs the Order Form (collectively, the “
Agreement
”) entered into by Upwork Global Inc. (“
Upwork
”) and the subscriber identified in the Order Form (“
Subscriber
”). Any term used in this Master Subscription Agreement that is defined in the Order Form and is not otherwise defined herein will have the meaning ascribed to it in the Order Form. The parties hereby agree:
DEFINITIONS
. The following terms will have the meanings ascribed to them below when used in this Agreement:
1.1 “
Affiliate
” means an entity which directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable), whereby “control” (including, with correlative meaning, the terms “controlled by” and “under common control”) means direct or indirect ownership or control of more than 50% of the voting interests of Subscriber or Upwork (as applicable).
1.2 “
Authorized Recipients
” means employees and representatives of the party receiving Confidential Information that have a bona fide need to receive such Confidential Information.
1.3 “
Authorized Users
” means Subscriber’s representatives who are permitted to access and use the Platform on Subscriber’s behalf.
1.4 “
BYO Freelancer
” means a Freelancer that Subscriber brings to the Platform that is not already a registered freelancer on the Platform.
1.5 “
BYO Service Fee
” means the fee specified in the Order Form that is payable by Subscriber to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a BYO Freelancer.
1.6 “
Claims
” means any and all third-party claims, suits or proceedings, including without limitation claims or actions by applicable government agencies. For the purposes of Upwork’s indemnities owed to Subscriber in Section 8.1, the term “Claims” excludes Excluded Claims.
1.7 “
Confidential Information
” means any information or materials (regardless of form or manner of disclosure) that are disclosed by or on behalf of one party to the other party that (i) are marked, flagged, or communicated as being “confidential” or “proprietary” at the time of such disclosure; (ii) the disclosing party orally discloses to the receiving party and identifies as being confidential or proprietary at the time of disclosure and confirms to be such in writing promptly after such disclosure; or (iii) a reasonable person should know to be confidential, even if not so marked. The term “Confidential Information” does not include any information or materials that: (a) are or become generally known or available to the public through no breach of this Agreement or other wrongful act or omission by the receiving party; (b) were already known by the receiving party; (c) are acquired by the receiving party without restriction from a third party who has the right to make such disclosure; or (d) are independently developed by or on behalf of the receiving party without reference to any Confidential Information.
1.8 “
Effective Date
”
means the later of either the “Contract Start Date” listed on the first Order Form signed by the parties or the date that the first Order Form is fully executed by the parties.
1.9 “
Engagement
” means an engagement for Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product that a Freelancer provides to a Subscriber.
1.10 “
Enterprise Billing Services
” means Upwork’s Service of issuing Freelancer Payments on Subscriber’s behalf as due for each Engagement and then billing Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments as further described in Section 3.1 (Enterprise Billing Services).
1.11 “
Excluded Claims
” means claims to the extent arising from (i) Subscriber’s direct engagement of a Freelancer before, after or outside of an Engagement under this Agreement, or (ii) Subscriber’s breach of this Agreement.
1.12
“Freelancer”
means a user that advertises and provides services via the Platform. Freelancers collectively refers to all BYO Freelancers and Platform Freelancers, regardless of their classification.
1.13 “
Freelancer Information
” means any information regarding a Freelancer on the Platform.
1.14 “
Freelancer Payments
”
means all payments made by Upwork on behalf of Subscriber to Freelancers in accordance with this Agreement.
1.15 “
Freelancer Services
” means the services that a Freelancer has agreed to perform for Subscriber, including Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.16 “
Freelancer Work Product
” means all work, work product, and deliverables created by a Freelancer for Subscriber based on Subscriber’s project post and description on the Platform.
1.17 “
Order Form
” means the applicable enterprise order form executed by Subscriber and Upwork that references this Agreement.
1.18 “
Platform
”
means the website located at
www.upwork.com
, including any pages tailored to or viewable by a specific client thereon.
1.19 “
Platform Content
” means content (including text, images, video, audio, and other materials or information) that is submitted, uploaded, or posted to Upwork and the Platform for the purposes of such content being displayed on the Platform for the purpose of finding Freelancers. “Platform Content” does not include Freelancer Work Product or Subscriber’s Confidential Information.
1.20 “
Platform Freelancer
” means a Freelancer that is not a BYO Freelancer.
1.21 “
Program Management Services
” means, upon Subscriber's request, one initial review of Subscriber's draft project post. Program Management Services do not include project management or oversight of the Freelancer, the Freelancer Services, or other aspects of the actual Engagement.
1.22
"Service Contract"
means the contractual provisions that govern each Engagement, including any independent contractor agreement, non-disclosure agreement, or other agreement between Subscriber and Freelancer in connection with the Engagement, and the provisioning of Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product, including the Engagement terms awarded and accepted on the Platform, applicable project descriptions and Freelancer rates, hours, and milestones, provided, however, that in each case, such terms will not, and will not purport to, expand Upwork’s obligations or restrict Upwork’s rights under this Agreement. In the event that Subscriber does not provide its own independent contractor agreement for an Engagement, Subscriber will have the ability to use the Platform’s optional service contract terms by default as a convenience.
1.23 “
Service Fee
” means the fee specified in the Order Form that is payable by Subscriber to Upwork that applies to Engagements involving a Platform Freelancer.
1.24 “
Services
”
means Upwork’s products and services that are provided to Subscriber in connection with this Agreement, and as further set forth on the Order Form, and any Technology provided by Upwork in connection with the operation or provision of such products and services, including provisioning access to the Platform. The “Services” are separate from and do not include Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product.
1.25 “
Talent Sourcing Services
” means, upon Subscriber's request, the provision of one short list per project post of Freelancers advertising the skills that Subscriber seeks.
1.26 “
Taxes
” means all taxes, levies, imposts, duties, and similar governmental assessments arising in connection with this Agreement, including but not limited to sales, use, VAT, GST, excise, service, business, service, and similar transactional taxes imposed by any jurisdiction, and the interest and penalties for non-compliance by Subscriber. The term “Taxes” does not include taxes levied on Upwork’s own income and property.
1.27 “
Technology
” means all ideas, concepts, inventions, systems, platforms, software, interfaces, tools, utilities, templates, forms, documentation, content, training materials, techniques, methods, processes, algorithms, know-how, trade secrets, and other technologies, implementations, and information.
1.28 “
UTC
”
means Universal Time Coordinated.
PLATFORM AND SERVICES.
2.1
Platform Access
. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, Upwork (i) shall use commercially reasonable efforts to make the Platform available to Subscriber and (ii) hereby grants to Subscriber and its Authorized Users the right to access and use the Platform to (a) find, communicate with, and engage Freelancers through the Platform, (b) receive, review, and approve Freelancer Services and Freelancer Work Product, and (c) review Freelancer billing records for payment by Upwork on behalf of Subscriber. Subscriber acknowledges that Upwork’s implementation of Subscriber’s Platform account requires Subscriber’s reasonable cooperation and agrees to promptly provide the information required by Upwork for such implementation. During the Term, Upwork may modify the features and functionality of the Platform provided the modifications do not materially degrade the Services. Subscriber is responsible for its Authorized Users’ use of the Platform and compliance with this Agreement and agrees to be directly responsible for all costs and fees incurred by such Authorized User. Subscriber shall take reasonable steps to prevent unauthorized access to the Platform, including without limitation by protecting and instructing Authorized Users to protect passwords and login information. Subscriber shall promptly notify Upwork if it becomes aware of any unauthorized use of the Platform and will reasonably cooperate with Upwork to remediate such breaches.
2.1.1
Affiliate Order Form
. Subscriber’s Affiliates are permitted to contract for Services and to use the Platform pursuant to the terms of this Master Subscription Agreement by either (i) directly entering into a separate Order Form with Upwork, which will be governed under the same terms of this Master Subscription Agreement (an “
Affiliate Order Form
”) or (ii) if authorized by Subscriber, using the Platform as an Authorized User under Subscriber’s existing account. By entering into an Affiliate Order Form directly with Upwork under romanette (i), Subscriber’s Affiliate will receive its own separate Platform account and shall sign their own Master Subscription Agreement.
2.2
Program Management and Talent Sourcing Services
. At its discretion, Subscriber may request Upwork’s optional Program Management Services and/or Talent Sourcing Services. Any use by Subscriber of Program Management Services or Talent Sourcing Services will not alter, reduce or eliminate any Subscriber responsibilities under this Agreement, including without limitation worker classification.
2.3
Freelancer Services
.
2.3.1
Freelancer Relationship.
If and after the Freelancer has agreed to provide Freelancer Services to Subscriber and has executed a Service Contract and any other necessary agreements that Subscriber may require, Subscriber and Freelancer will work directly together. Upwork will not supervise, control, or otherwise be responsible for the performance of the Freelancer Services by Freelancer. If there is a dispute between Subscriber and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Subscriber and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable to either Subscriber or Freelancer with respect to such dispute. For the avoidance of doubt, Subscriber is responsible for the appropriate classification of each Freelancer. This enterprise Platform account may only be used to engage Freelancers properly classified by Subscriber as independent contractors in accordance with applicable law. Subscriber agrees not to engage Freelancers that it has or should have classified as employees using this enterprise Platform account. If Subscriber classifies (or should classify) a Freelancer as an employee, Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that such engagements may only be supported on Upwork by creating a marketplace account and engaging such Freelancer through the
Upwork Payroll
solution.
2.3.2
Hourly Work for Independent Contractors
. For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as independent contractors, Subscriber can dispute the Freelancer billing entries as described by this Section. The Freelancer invoice will cover the billing period that begins Mondays at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sundays at 23:59 UTC (the “
Weekly Billing Period
”). Following each Weekly Billing Period, Subscriber has from Monday at 12 noon UTC until Friday at 23:59 UTC to review the Freelancer’s billing records and file a dispute through the Platform if Subscriber disputes the hours billed by the Freelancer (the “
Subscriber Review Period
”). If Subscriber does not file a dispute during the Subscriber Review Period, then (i) Subscriber will be deemed to have approved the time billed and accepted the Freelancer Services during the time reflected on the Platform at the end of the Subscriber Review Period, and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on the Platform. Once approved by Subscriber, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Subscriber.
2.3.3
Milestone Work
. For Engagements where Freelancer Payments are tied to completing milestones, Subscriber must approve or reject milestone approval requests through the Platform within 14 calendar days after such approval requests are submitted through the Platform. Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that in the event Subscriber fails to approve or reject a submitted milestone approval request within such 14 calendar day period, then (i) the Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product reflected in the milestone approval request will be deemed accepted by Subscriber, and any payment associated with the milestone will be deemed approved by Subscriber and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for such milestone. Once approved by Subscriber, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Subscriber.
2.3.4
Arbitration with Freelancer
. Subscriber shall enter into an agreement with each Freelancer for each Engagement that includes a provision requiring that any and all disputes between Subscriber and Freelancer will be subject to individual arbitration and include a waiver of all class and collective actions. In addition, the arbitration provision must expressly identify Upwork, including its affiliates, officers, and directors, as a third-party beneficiary of such arbitration provision.
2.4
Legal
Compliance
. Upwork shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing its obligations under this Agreement pertaining to its provision of Services including payment to Freelancers. Subscriber shall comply with applicable laws and regulations governing its use of the Platform and Services and Engagement of Freelancers including, but not limited to, workplace safety or conduct if Subscriber requires onsite work.
2.5
Restrictions
. Subscriber will not nor attempt to: (i) license, sublicense, sell, resell, distribute, transfer, assign, or otherwise commercially exploit or make available to any third party, the Platform or the Services, except as expressly permitted herein; (ii) modify or make derivative works based on the Services or otherwise violate Upwork’s intellectual property rights in the Services; (iii) reverse engineer or access the Platform, the Services or their systems or networks for any reason that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement, including, without limitation, in order to (a) build a competitive product or service, or for any benchmarking or competitive purposes using similar ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Service, or (b) scrape the Platform for data or content or copy any ideas, features, functions or graphics of the Services, or (c) interfere with the integrity or performance of the Services or data contained in it, including engaging in denial of service attacks; (iv) transmit information that identifies or relates to natural persons or confidential financial information through the Platform unless requested by Upwork; (v) submit or post Platform Content or other material to the Platform that (a) is fraudulent, discriminatory, abusive, spamming, infringing, obscene, threatening, defamatory, unlawful, tortious, or that Upwork in its reasonable discretion determines is inappropriate or objectionable; (b) violates the privacy rights, publicity rights, or intellectual property rights of any third party; or (c) contains viruses, worms, Trojan horses, spam, or other harmful computer code, files, scripts, agents, or programs. Subscriber will not encourage any third party to violate these restrictions.
2.6
Upgrading/Downgrading
. If Subscriber requests to change its subscription to a different enterprise product, then, upon execution of the new subscription agreement, Subscriber authorizes and directs Upwork to migrate Freelancer contracts related to existing Engagements by opening a new Freelancer contract under the new subscription and then closing the old Freelancer contract under the old subscription.
2.7
Beta Access
. Subscriber may, from time to time, be given the option to access certain beta versions of the Platform and/or Services ("
Beta Products
") for the purpose of testing and providing feedback to Upwork. Access to Beta Products is permitted only for Subscriber's internal evaluation. Subscriber acknowledges that Beta Products are provided 'as is' and may contain bugs, errors, or other issues. Upwork makes no warranties of any kind, either express or implied, regarding the Beta Products. The use of Beta Products is entirely at Subscriber's own risk, and Upwork shall not be liable for any damages arising from the use of such Beta Products.
FEES AND PAYMENTS.
3.1
Enterprise Billing Services
. Upwork will make, or cause to be made, Freelancer Payments on behalf of Subscriber in accordance with this Agreement. Upwork will bill Subscriber in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments made by Upwork and all applicable fees and costs. Subscriber’s ability to use Enterprise Billing Services described in this Section is subject to Upwork’s approval of credit for Subscriber. Upwork may grant, deny, limit, extend, withdraw, increase or decrease credit to Subscriber at its sole discretion.
3.2
Billing and Payment
. Subscriber shall pay Upwork the fees as set forth in the Order Form, in addition to all Freelancer Payments, within the time period stated on the Order Form measured from the date of the invoice. Payment obligations are non-cancelable and non-refundable. Any late payments are subject to a charge equal to the lesser of 2% per month or the maximum permitted by law, plus reimbursement for collection expenses. All amounts specified in the Order Form are in U.S. dollars. All amounts hereunder will be invoiced in, and must be paid in, U.S. dollars. Upwork has the right to immediately suspend or terminate Subscriber’s account if Upwork does not receive payment from Subscriber by the due date in this Agreement.
3.3
Freelancer Service Fee
.
Upwork normally charges Freelancers a fee stated on the Platform. However, Upwork will not charge such fee to the Freelancer for any work the Freelancer performs for Subscriber as a BYO Freelancer.
3.4
Taxes
. All amounts payable to Upwork under this Agreement are exclusive of Taxes. Subscriber will be responsible for promptly paying or reimbursing, as the case might be, all Taxes arising in connection with this Agreement and all invoiced amounts shall be paid to Upwork in full, without any offset, deduction or withholding. If applicable for countries outside of the United States, Subscriber shall either (a) provide to Upwork its VAT or GST identification number(s) for the country where Subscriber (i) has established its business, and/or (ii) uses the Services for Subscriber’s business use, or (b) pay such Taxes via reverse charge mechanism to the appropriate tax authority. Upon request, Subscriber shall promptly provide Upwork with proof of Tax payments made to applicable authorities. If Subscriber provides a valid tax exemption certificate, Upwork will not charge Subscriber any Taxes from which it is exempt.
3.5
Non-Circumvention
. If Subscriber engages (or directs a third party to engage) the services of a Platform Freelancer that Subscriber found on the Platform through a source other than Upwork within two years after the date that such Platform Freelancer is first engaged by Subscriber, then Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. If upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork finds a Freelancer that was not on the Platform and Subscriber engages that Freelancer through a source other than Upwork, Subscriber agrees to pay Upwork $10,000 for each such Freelancer. This provision does not apply to (i) BYO Freelancers or (ii) Freelancers responding independently (without direct solicitation) to Subscriber’s indirect solicitations (such as employment agency referrals and internet job postings).
TERM AND TERMINATION.
4.1
Term.
This Agreement will begin on the Effective Date and will continue for the duration of the initial term length specified in the Order Form (the “
Initial Term
”) unless sooner terminated in accordance with the terms of this Agreement. Following the Initial Term, Subscriber’s Order Form subscription will automatically renew for successive one-year terms unless either party provides the other party notice of non-renewal at least 30 days before the end of the then-current Term (each a “
Renewal Term
”, all of which together with the Initial Term are referred to as the “
Term
”). The pricing during any Renewal Term will remain unchanged unless Upwork provides written notice of a price change at least 60 days before the end of the then-current Term.
4.2
Termination for Cause
. Either party may terminate this Agreement (i) if the other party fails to cure a material breach of this Agreement within 30 days after written notice, or (ii) immediately if the other party becomes subject to any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding under federal or state statute that is not dismissed within 30 days, becomes subject to direct control by a trustee, receiver or similar authority, or has wound up or liquidated, voluntarily, or otherwise.
4.3
Effect of Termination and Survival
. As of the date either party provides notice of termination to the other, Subscriber shall not enter into new Engagements via the Platform. For Engagements in a working status as of the termination date of this Agreement (each a “
Final Engagement
”), Enterprise Billing Services may continue until completion of the Final Engagement for up to a maximum of 30 days after the effective termination date of this Agreement at which point Upwork is directed to close all open Final Engagements, unless otherwise agreed by the parties and the affected Freelancer(s). Notwithstanding any termination of this Agreement, Subscriber remains responsible for payment of all fees and payments owed to Upwork under this Agreement, including any Freelancer Payments. The sections and subsections titled “Fees and Payments”, “Effect of Termination and Survival”, “Intellectual Property”, “Representations, Warranties and Disclaimers”, “Confidentiality”, “Indemnification”, “Limitation of Liability”, “Miscellaneous” and all of Subscriber’s outstanding obligations, will survive any termination or expiration of this Agreement.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY.
5.1
Ownership of the Platform and Services
. All rights in and to the Platform and Services, including any modifications made thereto and derivatives thereof, exclusively belong to and at all times will remain the sole and exclusive property of Upwork. All rights not expressly granted to Subscriber and its Authorized Users with respect to the Platform and Services are reserved by Upwork. Subscriber will not take or permit any third party to take any action with respect to the Platform or Services that is not expressly authorized under this Agreement or that is inconsistent with Upwork’s ownership interest herein.
5.2
Platform Content
. Subscriber is solely responsible for all Platform Content submitted, uploaded, or otherwise posted by it to the Platform. Upwork reserves the right to delete Platform Content (in whole or in part) that it reasonably determines may violate this Agreement. By providing Platform Content, Subscriber hereby grants (and represents and warrants that it has the right to grant) Upwork and its representatives the worldwide, royalty-free, perpetual, and sublicensable right to use and publish the Platform Content without limitation.
5.3
User Feedback
. Upwork will own, without restriction or obligation of any kind, any feedback, insights, and suggestions provided by or on behalf of Subscriber to Upwork concerning the Platform or Services (“
User Feedback
”). User Feedback is provided “AS IS” and Subscriber will not be identified as the source without Subscriber’s permission.
5.4
Ownership of Freelancer Work Product
. Ownership of all Freelancer Work Product will be governed by the Service Contract. Upwork will not own any Freelancer Work Product. In the event that ownership rights in Freelancer Work Product arising from an Engagement accrue to the benefit of Upwork, Upwork hereby assigns such rights to Subscriber.
REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND DISCLAIMERS.
6.1
Representations and Warranties
. Each party represents and warrants that: (i) it is an entity that is duly organized and validly existing under the laws of the jurisdiction in which it is established; (ii) it has full power and authority, and has obtained all required approvals, permissions and consents necessary, to enter into this Agreement and to perform its obligations hereunder; (iii) this Agreement is legally binding upon it and enforceable in accordance with its terms; and (iv) the execution, delivery and performance of this Agreement does not and will not conflict with any agreement, instrument, judgment or understanding, oral or written, to which it is a party or by which it may be bound.
6.2
Subscriber Acknowledgements
. Other than as stated in this Agreement, Subscriber expressly acknowledges, agrees, and understands that: (i) Upwork is not a party to the dealings between Subscriber and Freelancer, including the substantive terms of project posts, the selection of a Freelancer, the decision to contract with a Freelancer, and the performance or receipt of Freelancer Services or provisioning of Freelancer Work Product; (ii) Upwork does not, in any way, supervise, direct, or control the Freelancer or Freelancer Services; (iii) Upwork is not a party to any Service Contract and will not have any liability or obligations under or related to Service Contracts for any acts or omissions by Freelancers; (iv) Upwork makes no representations as to the quality, security, or legality of any Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product, and Upwork disclaims any and all liability relating thereto; (v) Upwork does not determine the suitability of Freelancers for Subscriber; (vi) Upwork does not set Freelancer’s work hours, work schedules, or location of work, nor is Upwork involved in determining if the Freelancer fees will be set at an hourly or fixed rate for a Service Contract or what those rates will be; (vii) Upwork will not provide Freelancer with training or any equipment, tools, labor, or materials needed to complete their work; (viii) Upwork does not provide the premises at which the Freelancer will perform the work; (ix) if there is a dispute between Subscriber and Freelancer, that dispute is solely between Subscriber and the Freelancer and Upwork will not be responsible or liable with respect to such dispute; (x) Upwork is not an employer of or joint employer or integrated or single enterprise with any independent contractor Freelancer or Subscriber; and (xi) unless otherwise agreed as part of the relevant Engagement, independent contractor Freelancers may hire employees or engage contractors or subcontractors (at the Freelancer’s sole expense) to assist with providing the Freelancer Services. Upwork makes no representations about and does not guarantee the truth or accuracy of Freelancer’s listings on the Platform; the ability of Freelancers to deliver the Freelancer Services; or that Subscriber or Freelancer can or will actually complete an Engagement.
6.3
Freelancer Information
. Upwork does not independently evaluate, investigate, or otherwise conduct any due diligence regarding Freelancers’ profiles, portfolios, resumes, qualifications, skills, background, or prior experience. Accordingly, Upwork makes no representations as to the reliability, capability, background, identity or qualifications of any Freelancer. Freelancer Information posted on or to the Platform, is intended to be illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty by Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and will have no liability for Subscriber’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer Information, and Subscriber acknowledges and agrees that Subscriber will be solely responsible for undertaking the necessary research and due diligence to evaluate Freelancer Information.
6.4
Disclaimer
. EXCEPT AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 6.1 OF THIS AGREEMENT, UPWORK, ITS AFFILIATES, PARTNERS, AND SUBCONTRACTORS HEREBY EXPRESSLY DISCLAIM ANY AND ALL REPRESENTATIONS, WARRANTIES, AND CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, WHETHER EXPRESS, IMPLIED OR STATUTORY, INCLUDING THOSE OF ACCURACY, SYSTEM INTEGRATION, MERCHANTABILITY, FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE, TITLE, VALIDITY, NON-INFRINGEMENT, THOSE ARISING FROM A COURSE OF DEALING OR USAGE OF TRADE WITH RESPECT THERETO, THOSE MADE BY A FREELANCER TO SUBSCRIBER OR RELATING TO ANY FREELANCER SERVICE OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT. THE SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE PROVIDED “AS IS” AND WITH ALL FAULTS. LIABILITY FOR FREELANCER’S WORK PRODUCT AND THE FREELANCER SERVICES ARE SOLELY THAT OF THE FREELANCER. NEITHER UPWORK NOR ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES OR SUBCONTRACTORS HAVE ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR FREELANCER SERVICES OR FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT.
CONFIDENTIALITY.
7.1
Obligations and Restrictions
. The receiving party will: (i) keep the disclosing party’s Confidential Information confidential; (ii) not disclose such Confidential Information to any third party other than an Authorized Recipient without the disclosing party’s prior written permission; (iii) exclusively use such Confidential Information for its intended purpose; and (iv) not remove any copyrights, trademark notices, or other indications of confidentiality from such Confidential Information. The receiving party may disclose Confidential Information to Authorized Recipients provided that each such Authorized Recipient is bound by confidentiality obligations that are at least as restrictive as the terms contained in this Agreement. The receiving party is responsible for its Authorized Recipients’ use and disclosure of Confidential Information and will take reasonable steps to ensure their compliance with this Agreement. Subscriber acknowledges that Freelancers working on their Engagements will have access to Confidential Information that is shared through the Platform with respect to such Engagements. Subscriber authorizes Upwork to collect data related to Subscriber’s use of the Services and Platform, to de-identify (with respect to Subscriber and any user) any such data, and to use and disclose any such data that is not identifiable to a specific person or to Subscriber.
7.2
Compelled Disclosure
. This Agreement does not prohibit a party from complying with (but only to the extent of) a valid legal requirement to disclose Confidential Information, but such party must make reasonable efforts to give the other party reasonable advance notice of such requirement. Subscriber and Upwork further acknowledge receipt of this notice under 18 U.S.C § 1833(b)(1) and that an individual will not be held criminally or civilly liable under any Federal or State trade secret law for disclosing a trade secret that (A) is made (i) in confidence to a Federal, State, or local government official, either directly or indirectly, or to an attorney; and (ii) solely to report or investigate a suspected violation of law; or (B) is made in a complaint or other document filed in a lawsuit or other proceeding, if such filing is made under seal.
7.3
Retention of Confidential Information
. Upon termination of this Agreement or at the disclosing party’s request, the receiving party will promptly destroy the disclosing party’s Confidential Information that is in its or its Authorized Recipients’ possession (including materials containing or based upon such Confidential Information). Upon request, the receiving party will also certify in writing its compliance with this provision. However, each party is permitted to retain a copy of any Confidential Information to the extent required by law or as automatically archived pursuant to standard backup processes
provided
that, notwithstanding the expiration of this Agreement, the confidentiality terms of this Agreement will continue to apply to any Confidential Information that remains in the possession of the receiving party or its Authorized Recipients for as long as it remains in their possession.
7.4
Equitable Relief
. The receiving party acknowledges that the unauthorized use or disclosure of the disclosing party’s Confidential Information may cause the disclosing party irreparable harm and significant damages that may be difficult to calculate. Therefore, the disclosing party will have the right to seek equitable relief to prevent or stop any actual or threatened unauthorized use or disclosure of its Confidential Information in addition to any other rights and remedies that it may have.
INDEMNIFICATION.
8.1
Indemnification by Upwork
. Upwork
will indemnify Subscriber and its directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any losses or liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by the infringement or alleged infringement of U.S. intellectual property rights of a third party due to Subscriber’s use of the Platform or Services, excluding infringement or alleged infringement that arises or results from (i) Subscriber’s use of the Services or Platform in a way not authorized by Upwork; (ii) any modification to the Platform made by Subscriber; (iii) use of the Services or Platform in combination with any other service, platform, process, or materials with which the Services or Platform is not intended to be combined; (iv) Subscriber’s continued use of the infringing or allegedly infringing Services or Platform after Subscriber has been provided with modifications or other remedies to avoid the alleged infringement; (v) Platform Content; (vi) Freelancer Services; or (vii) Freelancer Work Product.
8.2
Indemnification by Subscriber
. Subscriber will indemnify Upwork and its Affiliates and their directors, officers, agents and employees from and against any and all losses and liabilities related to Claims to the extent caused by (i) Subscriber’s violation of applicable law or regulation related to its Engagement of Freelancers; (ii) the misuse or unauthorized use of the Platform; (iii) Platform Content; or (iv) the misclassification of a Freelancer under applicable classification laws and regulations.
8.3
Indemnification Requirements
. The indemnification obligations of each party (the “
Indemnifying Party
”) are contingent upon the other party (the “
Indemnified Party
”) providing the Indemnifying Party with: (i) prompt written notice of any Claim for which indemnification may be sought under this Agreement; (ii) control over the defense and settlement of any such Claim with counsel of the Indemnifying Party’s choice; and (iii) proper and full information and assistance, at the Indemnifying Party’s expense and request, to settle or defend any such Claim. Indemnified Party will be entitled to participate in, through its own counsel at its own cost and expense, but not to determine or conduct, any defense or settlement of a Claim. Indemnifying Party is not permitted to enter into any settlement with respect to a Claim other than one for purely money paid by Indemnifying Party with a full release of liability with respect to Indemnified Party without Indemnified Party’s prior written consent, which will not be unreasonably withheld.
LIMITATION OF LIABILITY.
IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR LOST PROFITS OR CONSEQUENTIAL, INCIDENTAL, SPECIAL, INDIRECT, PUNITIVE, OR EXEMPLARY DAMAGES OF ANY KIND ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND REGARDLESS OF THE THEORY OF LIABILITY (INCLUDING NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF THAT PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. EXCEPT FOR (I) AMOUNTS DUE TO UPWORK FROM SUBSCRIBER UNDER THIS AGREEMENT, (II) AMOUNTS PAYABLE TO THIRD PARTIES PURSUANT TO INDEMNIFICATION OBLIGATIONS HEREIN AND (III) BREACHES OF CONFIDENTIALITY UNDER SECTION 7.1 (CONFIDENTIALITY) WITH RESPECT TO CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY BE LIABLE FOR AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE TOTAL FEES PAID BY SUBSCRIBER TO UPWORK DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE EVENT GIVING RISE TO LIABILITY. SUBSCRIBER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE UNDER THIS AGREEMENT ARE BASED IN PART ON THESE LIMITATIONS, AND FURTHER AGREES THAT THESE LIMITATIONS WILL APPLY NOTWITHSTANDING ANY FAILURE OF ESSENTIAL PURPOSE OF ANY LIMITED REMEDY.
MISCELLANEOUS.
10.1
Records and Audit
. Upwork will maintain reasonable records related to the engagement of Freelancers under this Agreement (“
Engagement Records
”) for at least five years following the termination of the Freelancer’s work for Subscriber. Subject to restrictions imposed by laws and regulations related to the privacy of the Freelancer, for the duration of the Term, Subscriber, at its sole cost and expense and no more than once per calendar year, may audit Engagement Records at any time during Upwork’s normal business hours after providing Upwork with 15 days’ written notice of such audit. Such Engagement Records will automatically be deemed Upwork’s Confidential Information and any outside auditor engaged by Subscriber with respect to such audit will (i) be reasonably acceptable to Upwork; and (ii) enter into a confidentiality and non-use agreement in such form provided by Upwork with respect to the Engagement Records. Subscriber will conduct audits in a manner that is designed to minimize disruptions to Upwork’s business operations. If errors are identified by an audit, then Upwork shall take prompt action to correct such errors.
10.2
Insurance
. Upwork shall maintain at minimum the following types and limits of insurance at its own expense at all times during the Term:
(i) Commercial General Liability covering products/operations, bodily injury, property damage, and personal injury with limits of $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate.
(ii) Automobile Liability with a combined single limit of $1,000,000 for bodily injury and property damage covering both hired and non-owned automobiles used by Upwork to provide Services to Subscriber under this Agreement.
(iii) Statutory Workers Compensation coverage as required by state law with employer’s liability limits of at least $1,000,000 per claim and $1,000,000 in the aggregate.
(iv) Errors and Omissions coverage including network security and privacy liability that includes third parties with limits of at least $10,000,000 per claim and in the aggregate.
The foregoing policies will be issued on an occurrence basis and provided by a carrier with a rating of at least A-VII. The existence of these insurance policies will neither limit nor expand Upwork’s liability hereunder. Upon Subscriber’s request, Upwork will provide Subscriber with a certification evidencing the coverage described in this Section.
10.3
Service Delivery
. Notwithstanding any other provision in this Agreement, Upwork has the right, in its sole discretion, to provide the Platform and its Services through, an Affiliate or a third-party subcontractor. Upwork will at all times remain responsible for its Affiliates’ or subcontractors’ compliance with the terms of this Agreement.
10.4
Governing Law
. The laws of California will govern this Agreement and its interpretation without reference to its principles of conflicts of laws. All disputes arising out of this Agreement between Upwork and Subscriber will be subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of and a venue located in the federal or state courts of San Francisco County, California. Subscriber and Upwork hereby consent to the personal and exclusive jurisdiction and venue of these courts and waive any objection (and right to object) to such venue or jurisdiction on the basis that such forum is an inconvenient forum.
10.5
Assignment
. Neither party will be permitted to assign this Agreement to a third party other than an Affiliate or successor to its business or assets without the other party’s prior written consent. For avoidance of doubt, this clause does not restrict (or require consent in connection with) the transfer or assignment of this Agreement in connection with a merger, sale of assets, sale of stock, reorganization, or otherwise by a party.
10.6
Entire Agreement
. This Agreement represents the entire agreement between the parties with respect to those certain Upwork products and services set forth on the Order Form and supersedes all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters herein. Subject to the terms of this Agreement, no amendment to this Agreement will be effective unless in writing signed by both parties. This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference all policies posted on the Platform, as applicable, as may be modified by Upwork from time to time in its sole discretion. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and the other policies, this Agreement will control. In the event of a conflict between this Agreement and an Order Form, the terms of the Order Form will govern to the extent of the conflict. The parties may execute this Agreement in counterparts, which taken together will constitute one instrument. No provision of any pre-printed order form, purchase order, click-through process, or other business form employed by Subscriber will supersede the terms and conditions of this Agreement, and any such document issued by Subscriber relating to this Agreement will be for administrative purposes only and will have no legal effect.
10.7
Force Majeure
. Except for the obligation to make payments hereunder, both parties will be excused from performance under this Agreement to the extent that either party is prevented from performing or is unable to perform any of its obligations under this Agreement as a result of causes beyond its reasonable control, including without limitation, any act of god, fire, casualty, flood, earthquake, war, strike, lockout, epidemic, destruction of facilities, riot, insurrection, material unavailability, telecommunications or internet failures, acts of the government, governmental requirements and regulations or restrictions imposed by law, if such party has used its commercially reasonable efforts to mitigate its effects, and gave prompt written notice to the other party. In such event, the time for the performance will be extended for the period of delay or inability to perform due to such occurrences.
10.8
Severability
. If any provision of this Agreement is held to be invalid or unenforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction, then such provision will be deemed to be severed from this Agreement and have no legal effect. Provided that the fundamental terms of this Agreement remain valid and enforceable following such severance, the remaining provisions of this Agreement will remain in full force and effect and binding upon the parties.
10.9
Waiver
. The waiver of one breach or default or any delay in exercising any rights hereunder will not constitute a waiver of any subsequent breach or default of such rights.
10.10
Notices
. All notices permitted or required under this Agreement must be in writing and will be delivered by electronic mail to
legalnotices@upwork.com
for Upwork or the email address listed on the Order Form for Subscriber, as applicable, in person or mailed by first class, registered or certified mail, postage prepaid, or by any nationally reputable overnight courier able to provide a receipt of delivery, to the address or email address of the party specified in this Agreement, or such other address or email address as either party may specify in writing. Such notice will be deemed to have been given upon receipt.
10.11
Independent Contractor
. Neither party will be deemed to be an agent of the other party and the relationship between the parties will only be that of independent contractors. Neither party will have any right or authority to assume or create any obligations or to make any representations or warranties on behalf of any other party, whether express or implied, or to bind the other party in any respect whatsoever.
10.12
Export Law Assurances
. Subscriber understands that the deliverables provided to Subscriber by Freelancers may be subject to export control laws and regulations. SUBSCRIBER MUST NOT EXPORT OR RE-EXPORT ANY FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR ANY INFORMATION OR TECHNOLOGY UNDERLYING THE FREELANCER WORK PRODUCT OR FREELANCER SERVICES EXCEPT IN FULL COMPLIANCE WITH ALL UNITED STATES AND OTHER APPLICABLE LAWS AND REGULATIONS, INCLUDING WITHOUT LIMITATION, UNITED STATES EXPORT CONTROL LAWS.
10.13
Costs
. If any action at law or in equity (including arbitration) is necessary to enforce or interpret the terms of this Agreement, the prevailing party will be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees, costs and necessary disbursements in addition to any other relief to which such party may be entitled.
Effective May 2nd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
If a Client signs up to use Upwork’s Recruitment Services, this Recruitment Services Agreement (this “Agreement”) applies to Client. Your use of the Site after the effective date will signify your acceptance of and agreement to this Agreement. This Agreement hereby incorporates by reference the
Terms of Service
. Capitalized terms not defined in this Agreement are defined in the
User Agreement
, elsewhere in the Terms of Service, or have the meanings given such terms on the Site.
This Agreement is a binding legal agreement by and between Client (“Client” and “you”) and Upwork Global Inc. (“Upwork” or “we”) and supersedes and replaces all prior agreements between Client and Upwork concerning Upwork’s Recruitment Services.
1. UPWORK RECRUITMENT SERVICES
Upwork helps clients scale their teams with top talent remotely or on-site, by linking them with the curated pool of professionals on the Upwork platform or website, enabling clients to find the right talent for an employment position. Client acknowledges that Upwork’s Recruitment Services provides tools to facilitate job postings, candidate search, and communication with Freelancers who are potential candidates for an employment position as described by Client to Upwork (each, a “Candidate”). These tools may present different results for similar search queries and allow for the organization of Candidates based on their alignment with job criteria. Client understands that results may vary.
2. CONTENT
Client is solely responsible for all content posted on the Upwork Platform through the Recruitment Services, including job descriptions, postings, and communications with Candidates. This responsibility extends to ensuring that content complies with legal and ethical standards and does not infringe upon the rights of third parties.
3. PROHIBITED ACTIONS
Client agrees not to:
a. Use Upwork’s Recruitment Services to send unsolicited, spam-like communications, or to contact Candidates for purposes other than the specific employment opportunity described in the posting.
b. Engage in harassment, stalking, or any form of unwanted contact with Candidates.
c. Utilize automated means, including scraping, data mining, or similar data gathering and extraction tools, to access, query, or collect information from Upwork’s Recruitment Services without express written permission from the service provider.
d. Create, copy, modify, or distribute derivative works of Upwork’s Recruitment Services or any related technology without prior written consent from the service provider.
e. require Candidates to pay or reimburse Client for any part of the fees charged to Client by Upwork  in connection with Upwork’s provision of Upwork Recruitment Services.
Direct competitors of Upwork, including but not limited to job aggregation, freelancer aggregation and posting websites, are prohibited from using Upwork’s Recruitment Services to contact Freelancers. Violation of this clause may result in immediate suspension or termination of service access, and legal action may be taken against the violator.
4. HIRING DECISIONS; LIMITATIONS ON HIRING
Client acknowledges and agrees that Client selects a Freelancer based upon Client’s determination that Freelancer possesses the skills, background, and education to satisfy the requirements of the job description. Upwork does not (a) select the Freelancer; (b) have the authority or ability to decide to engage or end the engagement of the Freelancer on behalf of Client; (c) make any independent evaluation or investigation or otherwise conduct any due diligence regarding Candidates, their resumes, qualifications, skills, background, or prior experience; or (d) make any representations or warranties as to the skills, experience, background, or education of any Freelancer. All information regarding a Freelancer posted on or to the Site or provided by Upwork is intended to be indicative or illustrative only and is not intended to be a guarantee or warranty on the part of Upwork. Upwork is not responsible for and shall have no liability for Client’s use of or reliance on any Freelancer information posted or provided by Upwork.
Upwork provides AI-driven tools that organize Candidates based on their potential alignment with Client’s requirements, analyzing the text in their resumes or their responses to screener questions. Despite this functionality, Client retains the ability to review any Candidate at their discretion, and Upwork does not make hiring decisions on behalf of any Client. By utilizing these tools, Client acknowledges that this functionality serves to assist rather than replace the need for human judgment and review in the hiring process. Client agrees not to rely solely on this technology, give it undue weight compared to other considerations, or let it override conclusions drawn from a comprehensive review of all relevant factors in Client’s decision-making and hiring practices.
5. NONDISCRIMINATION; COMPLIANCE WITH LAWS
Client is responsible for complying with Upwork’s
Nondiscrimination Statement
and with all applicable laws in connection with your job posts and hiring practices, including without limitation, as applicable, legal eligibility to work laws, wage transparency laws, nondiscrimination laws, accommodation and leave laws, privacy laws, and any other state, federal or international law.
6. FEES
For each successful hire of a Candidate, Client will pay to Upwork ten (10%) of the estimated first-year’s total cash compensation, including salary and incentive bonus, and excluding any sign-on, relocation, or similar bonus and any equity, equity-related, or non-cash compensation (the “Total Cash Compensation”) to be paid to a selected Candidate, regardless of whether the Candidate is chosen for the position set forth in the job description provided by Client to Upwork or an alternative position (the “Position Fee”). Each Position Fee is incurred on the applicable Candidate’s start date with Client and will be invoiced by Upwork without undue delay upon notification of the Candidate’s start date.  Client acknowledges and understands that payment is due in full the day the invoice is sent. Client agrees and authorizes Upwork to charge Client’s Payment Method the full amount invoiced during a Billing Period on the same day the invoice is issued.
Client agrees and acknowledges that the pricing and offerings associated with Upwork’s Recruitment Services are subject to change.
7. TERMINATION OF UPWORK’S RECRUITMENT SERVICES
Without limiting Upwork’s ability to terminate services provided to Client under other Terms of Service, Upwork may terminate Upwork’s Recruitment Services at any time after providing Client with notice of such termination at least 10 days in advance of the final day Upwork’s Recruitment Services will be offered (the “Termination Date”).
8. NON-CIRCUMVENTION
If Client engages (or directs a third party to engage) the services of a Freelancer first presented by Upwork as a Candidate within two years after the date that such Candidate is first presented to Client, then Client agrees to pay Upwork the Position Fee. This provision does not apply to (i) Known Candidates or (ii) Candidates responding independently (without direct solicitation) to Client’s indirect solicitations (such as employment agency referrals and internet job postings). A “Known Candidate” means any individual that was already known by Client and is under active consideration by Client for open positions prior to Upwork presenting the individual to Client as a Candidate.
9. AUDIT RIGHTS
Client will maintain reasonable records related to the engagement of Candidates (“Engagement Records”) for at least two years following the engagement of the Candidate’s work for Client (the “Record-Keeping Period”). Subject to restrictions imposed by laws and regulations related to the privacy of the Candidate, for the duration of the Record-Keeping Period, Upwork, at its sole cost and expense and no more than once per calendar year, may audit Engagement Records at any time during Upwork’s normal business hours after providing Client with 15 days’ written notice of such audit. Upwork will conduct audits in a manner that is designed to minimize disruptions to Client’s business operations. If errors are identified by an audit, then Client shall take prompt action to correct such errors.
10. OTHER TERMS
Together with the Upwork User Agreement and other Terms of Service, these Recruitment Services Terms represent the entire agreement with Upwork and supersede all prior agreements and understandings with respect to the matters covered. You agree that you did not accept the Recruitment Services Terms based on any representations, whether written or oral, other than those contained herein. In the event of a conflict between these Recruitment Services Terms and any other agreement in the Terms of Service, these Recruitment Services Terms shall govern.
11. CONTACTING US
If you have any questions, or need assistance, please contact
https://support.upwork.com/home
or legalnotices@upwork.com.
Effective September 25th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
These Dispute Terms are incorporated into the Upwork
Terms of Service
,
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
,
Escrow Instructions
, and apply to the Client on the Upwork Business Plus Plan that is provided Business Plus Billing and Payment Service(s) (“Net30 Terms”) from Upwork, and any Freelancer that has a Service Contract with the Business Plus Client on Net30 Terms.
1. That the Client is provided Billing and Payment Services from Upwork does not change the relationship between the Client and the Freelancer(s) engaged on the Site.
2. Once the Freelancer has agreed to provide Freelancer Services to Client and has executed a Service Contract and any other necessary agreements, Client and Freelancer will work directly together through the Site. Upwork will not supervise, control, or otherwise be responsible for the performance of the Freelancer Services by Freelancer. For the avoidance of doubt, Client is responsible for the appropriate classification of each Freelancer. Independent contractor relationships can be supported through Upwork’s Marketplace.
a.
Hourly Work for Independent Contractors.
For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as independent contractors, Client can dispute the Freelancer billing entries as described by this Section. The Freelancer invoice will cover the billing period that begins Mondays at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sundays at 23:59 UTC (the “Weekly Billing Period”). Following each Weekly Billing Period, Client will have from Monday at 12 noon UTC until Friday at 23:59 UTC (the “Client Review Period”) to review the Freelancer’s billing records and file a dispute through the Platform if Client disputes the hours billed by the Freelancer
i. If Client does not file a dispute during the Client Review Period, then (i) Client will be deemed to have approved the time billed as reflected on the Platform, and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on the Platform. Once approved by Client, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by Client.
ii. If Client files a dispute during the Client Review Period, (i) payment for the disputed period will be paused during the course of the dispute and (ii) Client and Freelancer will be obligated to cooperate in Upwork’s handling of the dispute. If either party fails to cooperate in a meaningful and timely manner in the dispute process, Client and Freelancer agree that the dispute may be resolved in the other party’s favor. Disputes handled by Upwork on hourly contracts can only address the hours billed, not the quality of the Freelancer Services or the Work Product. Clients and Freelancers are encouraged to use Work Diaries as part of the terms of their hourly Service Contracts, which will assist in facilitating the handling of disputes. Clients and Freelancers are also encouraged to collaborate to resolve the dispute between themselves. If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a resolution, Upwork will promptly investigate the Hourly Invoice and determine, in its sole discretion, whether an adjustment is appropriate consistent with the Work Diaries and other relevant data. Upwork’s determination of such dispute shall be final.
b.
Milestone Work.
For Engagements where Freelancer Payments are tied to completing milestones, Client must approve or reject milestone approval requests through the Platform within 14 calendar days after such approval requests are submitted through the Platform.
i. Client acknowledges and agrees that if Client approves the request or fails to take any action within this 14 calendar day period, then (i) the Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product reflected in the milestone approval request will be deemed accepted by Client, (ii) any payment associated with the milestone will be deemed approved by Client, and (iii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for such milestone and to bill Client for such payment. Once approved by Client, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer on Client’s behalf and such payment cannot be revoked by Client.
ii. In the event that Client rejects the milestone approval request within the 14 day period, (i) payment for the disputed milestone will be paused during the course of the dispute and (ii) Client and Freelancer will be obligated to cooperate in resolving the dispute. In the course of dispute resolution, Client or Freelancer may be requested to provide documentation in support of the dispute. If either party fails to cooperate in a meaningful and timely manner in the dispute process, Client and Freelancer agree that the dispute may be resolved in the other party’s favor. Clients and Freelancers are also encouraged to collaborate to resolve the dispute between themselves. If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a resolution, Upwork will promptly investigate the dispute and offer a non-binding resolution for the parties to consider. Upwork cannot render a binding judgment as it relates to the quality or functionality of the work provided. If Client and Freelancer do not agree to the proffered non-binding resolution, they may proceed to arbitration under the terms provided in the Arbitration provision of the
Upwork Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions
.
Effective September 25th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Non-Executable Version
This Addendum for Billing and Payment Terms (this “Addendum”) is incorporated into the
Fee and ACH Authorization Agreement
(accessible at
https://www.upwork.com/legal#fees
) and is an agreement between You (Client) and Upwork Global Inc. and its affiliates (“Upwork”). This Addendum is part of and incorporates by reference the
User Agreement
(accessible at
https://www.upwork.com/legal#useragreement
), and the other Terms of Service (accessible at
https://www.upwork.com/legal#terms
). Capitalized terms not defined in this Addendum are defined in the
User Agreement
or elsewhere in the
Terms of Service
.
1.
Business Plus Billing and Payment Service.
Upwork, at its sole discretion, offers You access to Business Plus Billing and Payment Service in accordance with this Addendum.
a.   “Freelancer Payments” means all payments made by Upwork to Freelancers on Your behalf in accordance with this Addendum, including, if applicable, expenses authorized by You or required by law.
b.   “Service” under this Addendum refers to Upwork issuing Freelancer Payments on your behalf as due for each Service Contract entered on the Site, and then billing You in arrears on a monthly basis for all such payments in addition to all applicable fees and costs. This Service does not apply to Consultations, Project Catalog, or Any Hire engagements entered into on the Site.
c.   Payment obligations are non-cancelable and non-refundable.
d.   Your ability to use this Business Plus Billing and Payment Service is subject to Upwork’s approval, and Upwork may grant, deny, limit, extend, withdraw, increase or decrease Your access to this Service at its sole discretion.
2.
Freelancer Services and Relationship.
This Addendum and the Services contemplated thereunder do not change or modify Your relationship with the Freelancer(s) that You engage on the Site. Once the Freelancer has agreed to provide Freelancer Services to You and has executed a Service Contract and any other necessary agreements, You and Freelancer will work directly together through the Site. Upwork will not supervise, control, or otherwise be responsible for the performance of the Freelancer Services by Freelancer. For the avoidance of doubt, You are responsible for the appropriate classification of each Freelancer. Independent contractor relationships can be supported through Upwork’s Marketplace. Should You classify the Freelancer as an employee, You acknowledge and agree that engagements with such Freelancer may only be supported on Upwork by engaging such Freelancer through the Upwork Payroll solution.
a.
Hourly Work for Independent Contractors.
For hourly work performed by Freelancers classified as independent contractors, You can dispute the Freelancer billing entries as described by this Section. The Freelancer invoice will cover the billing period that begins Mondays at 00:00 midnight UTC and ends Sundays at 23:59 UTC (the “Weekly Billing Period”). Following each Weekly Billing Period, You have from Monday at 12 noon UTC until Friday at 23:59 UTC to review the Freelancer’s billing records and file a dispute through the Platform if You dispute the hours billed by the Freelancer (the “Client Review Period”).
i.   If You do not file a dispute during the Client Review Period, then (i) You will be deemed to have approved the time billed and accepted the Freelancer Services during the time reflected on the Platform at the end of the Client Review Period, and (ii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for time reflected on the Platform. Once approved by You, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer and such payment cannot be revoked by You.
ii.   If You file a dispute during the Client Review Period, (i) payment for the disputed period will be paused during the course of the dispute and (ii) Client and Freelancer will be obligated to cooperate in Upwork’s handling of the dispute. If either party fails to cooperate in a meaningful and timely manner in the dispute process, Client and Freelancer agree that the dispute may be resolved in the other party’s favor. Disputes handled by Upwork on hourly contracts can only address the hours billed, not the quality of the Freelancer Services or the Work Product. Clients and Freelancers are encouraged to use Work Diaries as part of the terms of their hourly Service Contracts, which will assist in facilitating the handling of disputes. Clients and Freelancers are also encouraged to collaborate to resolve the dispute between themselves. If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a resolution, Upwork will promptly investigate the Hourly Invoice and determine, in its sole discretion, whether an adjustment is appropriate consistent with the Work Diaries and other relevant data. Upwork’s determination of such dispute shall be final.
b.
Milestone Work.
For Engagements where Freelancer Payments are tied to completing milestones, You must approve or reject milestone approval requests through the Platform within 14 calendar days after such approval requests are submitted through the Platform.
i.   You acknowledge and agree that if You approve the request or fail to take any action within this 14 calendar day period, then (i) the Freelancer Services or Freelancer Work Product reflected in the milestone approval request will be deemed accepted by You, (ii) any payment associated with the milestone will be deemed approved by You, and (iii) Upwork will be authorized and instructed to make payment to Freelancer for such milestone and to bill You for such payment. Once approved by You, Upwork will make payment to Freelancer on Your behalf and such payment cannot be revoked by You.
ii.   In the event that you reject the milestone approval request within the 14 day period, (i) payment for the disputed milestone will be paused during the course of the dispute and (ii) Client and Freelancer will be obligated to cooperate in resolving the dispute. In the course of dispute resolution, Client or Freelancer may be requested to provide documentation in support of the dispute. If either party fails to cooperate in a meaningful and timely manner in the dispute process, Client and Freelancer agree that the dispute may be resolved in the other party’s favor. Clients and Freelancers are also encouraged to collaborate to resolve the dispute between themselves. If Client and Freelancer fail to come to a resolution, Upwork will promptly investigate the dispute and offer a non-binding resolution for the parties to consider. Upwork cannot render a binding judgment as it relates to the quality or functionality of the work provided. If Client and Freelancer do not agree to the proffered non-binding resolution, they may proceed to arbitration under the terms provided in the Arbitration provision of the
Upwork Fixed Price Service Contract Escrow Instructions
.
3.
Payment Terms.
a.   Payment is due within 30 days from the date of invoice.
b.   If You have not initiated payment within 30 days from the date of invoice, You authorize Upwork to charge Your Payment Method on file.
c.   Upwork reserves the right to utilize all legal remedies if Client is in default, including those listed in Section 6.4 of the User Agreement (accessible at
https://www.upwork.com/legal#NONPAYMENT
).
4.
Applicability of Service.
You acknowledge that the Service offered under this Addendum does not apply to Consultations, Project Catalog, or Any Hire engagements entered into on the Site and You acknowledge and agree that You will close out any active Consultations, Project Catalog, or Any Hire engagements before Upwork will render Service under this Addendum.
5.
Taxes.
All amounts payable to Upwork under this Addendum are exclusive of Taxes. You will be responsible for promptly paying or reimbursing, as the case might be, all Taxes arising in connection with this Addendum and all invoiced amounts shall be paid to Upwork in full, without any offset, deduction or withholding. If applicable for countries outside of the United States, You shall either (a) provide to Upwork its VAT or GST identification number(s) for the country where You (i) have established Your business, and/or (ii) uses the Services for Your business use, or (b) pay such Taxes via reverse charge mechanism to the appropriate tax authority. Upon request, You shall promptly provide Upwork with proof of Tax payments made to applicable authorities. If You provide a valid tax exemption certificate, Upwork will not charge You any Taxes from which it is exempt.
6.
Term.
This Addendum will become effective on the date Upwork provides You with notice of acceptance and approval for Your use of this Service  (the ”Effective Date”) and will continue for a 30-day period, and will automatically renew for successive 30-day terms unless either side provides the other party notice of non-renewal. For the avoidance of doubt, if Your access to this Service is denied by Upwork in its sole discretion, the terms of the User Agreement and the other Terms of Service shall remain in effect pursuant to such terms.
7.
Post-Termination Obligations.
You are responsible for Freelancer Payments and any related fees and costs until the end of the then-current Term and you must pay Upwork for any and all costs invoiced in addition to any other amounts you may owe Upwork.
Use of this Service is subject to Upwork’s approval, and Upwork in its sole discretion may grant, deny, limit, extend, withdraw, increase or decrease Your access to this feature.